

he following study of U.S. foreign licy was 
written during a three-week period, preceding 
April , as an urgent contribution to the dialogue then 
 and still  proceeding within leading circles both in 
the USA and abroad. 

Leading forces representing a majority of the U.S. 
eleorate now, increasingly desire to rid the nation of 
this monstrosity called the Jimmy Carter Administra- 
tion. This opsition to Carter is based most visibly on 
deep anger against the so-called Carter energy 
licy." Among the best informed circles, both inside 
the U.S. and abroad, checking  and removing  the 
Carter Administration is also seen as necessary to 
prevent a general thermonuclear war which no nation 
desires and from which no nation could benefit. 



The method emoyed to that purse is to exse 
the roots of the current Carter Administration 
licies. The Carter Administration is exsed as the 
degenerated phase of a persisting American Tory 
effort to subvert and overthrow our constitutional 
republic, a subversion beginning most notably with 
the fraud-permeated  eleion of New York 
bankers' puppet-President Andrew Jackson, a sub- 
version which has accelerated during the present 
century under the influence of a Fabian bankers' 
licy now called the **Atlanticist" or '^American 
Century" dorine. 

The approach emoyed for this purse is to study 
that **Atlanticist Dorine" at its mid-, through 
Fabian Walter Lippmann's - articulation of 



The weakness among most of Carter's critics is that the Roosevelt stwar licy which has dominated 



 excepting energy licy as such  the critics are 
not yet agreed on a sitive set of foreign and 
domestic licies which in fa represent a genuine 
alternative to the licies diated by the Rockefellers 
and their allies. As the prophet Isaiah rightly warned: 
If the trumpet shall sound an uncertain note, who then 
shall heed the call to battle? 

The following study attacks that problem in a two- 
fold way. The primary task undertaken is to se a 
new coherent set of foreign and domestic licies, 
which are shown to be in the aual erests of a 
capitalist United States at this junure. These 
alternative, sitive licies are carefully defined in 
terms of the clear ent of the American Revolution, 
our Declaration of Independence, our Constitution and 
our republic. 



our foreign and domestic licies every since. 

The undertaking is in three logical parts, the three 
seions o which the study as a whole is divided. In 
the first seion, the insanity of the Atlanticist foreign 
licy is exsed. In the third, final seion, the si- 
tive alternative licy is prosed. The second, middle 
seion is the theoretical rtion of the study, in which 
the historical and organic roots of the American Tory 
Ideology are rigorously exsed, for the purse of 
defining the notions of natural law and constitutional 
law un which our republic was founded and which 
must be reestablished today as the princie of a 

"government of law, not men." 

The immediate purse of this study is to provide 
the basis on which Whig strata of Republican and 
Democratic leaderships summon the informed con- 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 




President Woodrow Wilson, right, with Colonel House. 

stood as a consciously Hamiltonian sort of early tion and to a large degree their systematic worl 
twentieth century Federalist. Beyond that, what he outlook was by then deey taed with the monetarii 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



viion to rid our nation of a treasonous **American 
Century" dorine. 

That use of the word treason is no metaphor, no 
hyperbole. The Constitution is exicit: Article III, 
Seion : * 'Treason against the United States shall 
consist only in levying war against them, or in 
adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and 
Comfort." Although the Founding Fathers did not 
anticipate the emergence of supranational weres, 
such as the International Monetary Fund-World Bank- 
Eurodollar market, as an adversary of the nation, 
such a force presently exists, and is pursuing its alien 
erest by using its U.S. agents and agents of in- 
fluence in the effort to overthrow our republic and 
destroy our vital industrial and agricultural erests, 
our nation*s credit, to the same kind of effe as our 
former adversary Great Britain attempted in the 
issues of the American Revolution and War of . 
The Carter Administration's ^'energy licy," a licy 
roduced in the erest of the cited alien supra- 
national were, is thus an A of Treason in the stri 
terms of the Constitution. 

Moreover, such an a as President Carter's April  
telegram to President Valery Giscard d'Estaing of 
France  endorsing French efforts to embroil the 
United States in a thermonuclear war with the Soviet 
Union  represents the attempt to use war as a way of 
shutting off U.S. access to essential primary com- 
modities in Africa and elsewhere. The Carter Ad- 
ministration's use of the '^breakaway ally" scenario 
for projeed Israeli operations against the Gulf oil- 
exrting states is a similar fostering of war against 
the vital erests of the United States. This is nothing 
but treason by the Carter Administration. 

It is treason, not mere folly. President Carter was a 
member and protege of David Rockefeller's Trilateral 
Commission, a supranational licy-formulating and 
coordinating body dedicated to imsing these of- 
fenses un the United States. Furthermore, the 
Carter Administration is comsed chiefly of mem- 
bers of the Trilateral Commission and that organ- 
ization's allies. President Carter,- National Security 
Council chief Zbigniew Brzezinski, Secretary of State 
Cyrus Vance, and others are variously agents-in-fa 
or agents of influence of the alien, supranational in- 
terest associated with David Rockefeller. 

It is indiable treason in the same sense as the 
indiment of Aaron Burr by the Thomas Jefferson 

administration. 
The secondary funion of this study, outside the 

U.S., is to create the informed view of the United 

States  - variously among leading OECD, developing 

seor and CMEA circles  which tends to sweep 

away the most idiotic, but nonetheless strongly held 



deep and hostile prejudices against the United States 
and its people. We must contribute to creating the 
global litical climate in which leading forces aing 
through the U.S. Congress can effe the appropriate 
transformations in U.S. domestic and foreign licy 
without having the congressional effe sabotaged 
with aid of some idiotic, prejudice-based nonsense 
from the Soviet leadership, certain developing seor 
nations and so forth. 

More fundamentally, it is past time that the U.S. 
working person had a dire look at the ugly realities 
behind the demagogic illusions and delusions which 
have heretofore, for so long, passed as United States 
foreign licy erests, and also understand how his 
follies, abetted by the so-called '^socialists," have 
contributed to creating and sustaining the domestic 
configuration of litical forces in which an ultimately 
suicidal foreign licy dorine has been installed and 
sustained. 

Although the initial and concluding rtions of this 
licy analysis are straightforward attacks on the 
obvious problems confronting our nation today, the 
substantial middle seion unavoidably gathers 
together the elements of a rigorous proof and exsi- 
tion of the correness and present apications of the 
constitutional princies of our republic to present 
world circumstances. In that middle seion, the 
average reader will find recung erlations of 
rigorous argument between the more immediately 
accessible successive presentations of the faual 
account of each step of the argument. We do not pro- 
se that these erlated, more rigorous rtions 
can be skipped over. If they were not essential, they 
would have been edited out of this text for statement in 
a different publication devoted to such theoretical 
considerations. However, we appreciate that many 
readers will get only the purse and gist of the er- 
lated more rigorous arguments at first reading. 
After assimilating this licy analysis as a whole, the 
more difficult  and necessary  passages of the 
middle seion can be studied again. 

Concerning that special, included charaer of the 
writing as a whole, the following licy  is 
properly emphasized. The formulation of the *'gut" of 
United States foreign licy is not to be based on the 
slick sort of ausible campaign document which 
Lippmann produced on behalf of President Franklin 
D. Roosevelt during the - onset of the  
presidential campaign. The methods of the successful 
used car salesman, or of the slick journalist and 
campaign speechwriter, have no morally tolerable 
ace in laying before an eleorate the vital issues of 
national domestic and foreign licy. Any basic 
feature of licy which is adopted because it was suc- 



m 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 



rJ r  



. - r -i . II K . , , 



^ 



I i 



+ ^ ^ I 



 I  

' I i . - II > % ,> ' - ! 



V.'J 



. 



l. l-,-' . 



:"i^:r-: 



 w 



 I'l"^'- I >  Vi ' . . „- 

 - ' . . 





Wall in the course of his  "Ich bin ein Berliner * adventure. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



cessfuUy sold by such methods, by an appeal to the 
superficial, mistaken knowledge of issues and licies 
by a misinformed eleorate, is a swindle* 

The eleorate must go through a forced process of 
informed refleion  of the sort the same eleorate's 
members wished they had emoyed before **buying 
that used car*'  or voting for Carter. 

A major document prosing a profound correion 
in domestic and foreign licies  such as the present 
one  is and must be ended to afford the rigorous 
statement of licy necessary to a process of broad 
and ense discussions within the eleorate. 

According to that princie and foresight, the initial 
and concluding seions of the document prove at first 
glance to the reader the nature of the olerable error 
in our existing domestic and foreign licies, proving 
also at first reading that in many respes the present 
licies of the Carter Administration are outright 
treason. Those same rtions of the document 
describe and illustrate the contrary licies we should 
adopt, in consistency with both our vital erests and 
the institutions and instruments specified by our Con- 
stitution. That aspe of the document suffices to ace 
our prosals properly in first ace on the nation's 
agenda for licy discussions and short-term 
decisions. 

However, any change in licy, even the prosed 



return to constitutional princies set forth here, has 
long-term imications. The statements we make in 
the initial and concluding seions are adequate to 
define our proper national licies for the immediate 
year or so ahead. The question remains: on what 
grounds can we be certain that these licies will work 
to our proper advantage, and that of our immediate 
sterity over the next decade and the decades to 
follow? 

For that reason, the middle seion, with its in- 
cluded more difficult passages, is indispensable. We 
cannot premise the future existence and condition of 
our nation  and the effe of our national licies 
un the world  on the authority of licies grounded 
only in the sentiments agreeable to a surface mood of 
the moment. As we qualify that imrtant distinion 
within the text, it is imssible to predi the future 
consequences of presently adopted licies, but we 
can and must forecast the range of alternative imi- 
cations of that licy. That forecast must not be a 
mere guess, an * uition." It must be rigorously 
grounded, so that we may be certain of what range of 
consequences of present licies we have bequeathed 
to ourselves and our immediate sterity. 

Respeing that latter aspe of the matter, let the 
relevant ferment of ense discussion begin. The time 
is short, and the matter is urgent. 

May ,  



[til] 




The drought' stricken Sahel in Africa, caused by the Rockefellers. The bare licy underlying the Rockefellers 
Atlanticist Dorine is to loot the world's agricultural-industrial base. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



t 




The signing of the Versailles Treaty, June , , President Wilson and Colonel House are seated at the head 
table at the center of the photo. 



IFD)F=T®®B[i@x. PEM© EI^^ 





Plato, left, and Aristotle, shown in a detail of The School of Athens by Raphael, 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



THE CRISIS 

IN U.S. 
FOREIGN POLICY 







 

The early American et and novelist Edgar 
Allan Poe related a tale of a man hypnotized at 
the moment of his death, whose mind remained aive 
while the dead body to which it was pinioned un- 
derwent the progress of decay. The smell of that grisly 
Poe tale erupts as an association, as one compares the 
 U.S. Foreign Policy and U.S. War Aims of 
Roosevelt's Fabian propagandist Walter Lippmann to 
the decay-stricken effluvia of today's Trilateral Com- 
mission and its fellow-accomices. 

Beginning shortly after his  screening and in- 
dorination under the Webbs in England, Lippmann 
emerged to become for over almost half a century a 
leading Fabian litical propagandist. He was an 
imate of both British litical elligence and 
Woodrow Wilson's confidential circles during the 
period of the Versailles treaty. An ^'outsider" during 
the s Republican administration periods, he 
regained his semi-official status in relationship to the 
Roosevelt administration and later drifted o the 
rank of ''elder statesman** of the Anglo-American 
litical elligence circles. 

At the time it was written and published, Lipp- 
mann*s cited book had an imrtant assigned role in 
the process of formulating stwar U.S. licy. 
Although the Rockefellers* Brookings Institution had 
already articulated the main premises of the prosed 
licy in the ''American Century** dorine issued 
some years earlier, that general dorine had not been 
elaborated in terms appropriate to the principal 
strategic relations emerging from the course of 
World War II developments. 

The years  and , the years the material in 
the book was first published, were the aftermath of a 
series of licy setting negotiations among Roosevelt, 
Churchill, and Stalin, notably including the Teheran 
agreement. Churchill and Roosevelt were satisfied that 
they had brought Stalin to terms, to the  that the 
basic lines of Anglo-American foreign licy could be 
defined for decades ahead with a large measure of cer- 
tay beforehand. Something more substantial than 
**Wilsonian** swindles, such as the sententious hy- 
crisy of the so-called "Atlantic Charter,** was wanted. 

Moreover, President Roosevelt, at the acme of his 
litical influence over the U.S. eleorate, was dying. 
The weres associated with Roosevelt, including 
notably John D. Rockefeller II and his sons, urgently 
needed to have Roosevelt run for one more term  
which he would not live out  so that they might use 
the Roosevelt charisma to commit the USA and 
other nations to a more specific version of that 
"American Century*' dorine through which the 
Rockefellers and their associates prosed to estab- 
lish an indefinite future period of increasing domina- 
tion over the entire world. 



The - period of preparation for Roosevelt's 
last eleion campaign was the crucial period of the 
big selling job  to use that campaign to imse un 
the U.S. government and eleorate's conscience that 
licy of ended Rockefeller world rule. Lippmann, 
then at the peak of his public influence, was the key 
Fabian publicist in the effort to indorinate the 
nation's editorial writers and others with the new 
elaboration of the "American Century'* dorine. In 
that conneion, Lippmann contributed more than 
marginally to the shaping of that licy o the forms 
deemed litically digestible to the credulous. The 
book in question thus represents one of the more 
imrtant pieces of Atlanticist litical-campaign 
literature of the present century. 

In most of its crucial features, the version of the 
"American Century" dorine set forth in Lippmann's 
book is the basis for the present-day foreign licies of 
the U.S. government, the dorine on which the 
current, Utopian, crisis-management and related 
schemes of the Rockefellers' Carter puppet- 
Administration are premised. In some specific 
features, the strategic alternatives adopted during 
- were made obsolete even before the final 
defeat of Nazi Germany, other conditions were super- 
seded by , and still others made obsolete by the 
developments of the - period. Large, but easily 
distinguishable chunks of Lippmann's writings were 
never to be taken seriously  Lippmann only far less 
than Woodrow Wilson, had a tendency to gush out gobs 
of sententious hycrisy. Such cautions noted, the 
Lippmann book represents the "American Century** 
dorine as it was to be passed down, without much 
modification of its essential kernel, to the present day. 

It is that overall significance of Lippmann's book, 
us certain advantages provided the critic by the fa 
that it is of superior reference quality to con- 
temrary Atlanticist effluvia, which has governed 
the text*s seleion as the  of reference for the 
discussion immediately at hand. 

Although Lippmann outrageously falsifies entire 
sweeps of U.S. national and diomatic history, on 
some s going so far as baldfaced lying, the in- 
telleual quality of his work nonetheless stands far 
above the almost incoherent and often babbling output 
of leading present-day "think-tankers,*' such as a 
Lester Brown, Zbigniew Brzezinski, James Schle- 
singer, and so forth. As was emphasized at the 
outset, the first broad impression of turning from the 
- Lippmann to present-day Trilateraloids is an 
immediate, overall perception of the progress toward 
advanced elleual and moral decay, presently to a 
 resembling the state of the corpse near the end of 
Poe*s tale. 

This relative quality of Lippmann's formulation is 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 




Benjamin Franklin, the founder of our country. 



 



best identified as an effort to take the preceding  
years of world history in its entireties, attempting to 
show, if merely in a pragmatisms fashion, some order- 
ing princies giving coherence to that totality. In this 
process, Lippmann adheres to the canonical forms of 
historical scholarship  however often he is a pious 
fraud respeing matters of content. Wrong as his 
view may be, both in fa and in perspeive, his is a 
worldview with a certain kind of relative elleual 
coherence. Consequently, as Lippmann uses that 
worldview as the supsed empirical body of know- 
ledge for the formulation of strategic dorines, he 
presents the result in a form that is immediately 
susceptible of systematic criticism. 

We do not unjustly deprecate the comparative 
qualities of contemrary Atlanticist skesmen. Put 
aside for a moment the question of the unfortunate 
Jimmy Carter. () 

Too many credulous people, of the sort who imagine 
that a wealthy individual is necessarily more elli- 
gent, fall prey to the reaion-formation delusion that 
the minions of the Rockefeller brothers must be 
^'awesomely clever." On the contrary, what cowards 
frequently mistake for personal qualities in that lot is 
predominantly their own fear of the vast weres 
concentrated in the hands of the Rockefeller-led 
machinery of ernational finance and litical in- 
telligence networks. 

This fa has been illustrated by the David-Goliath 
struggles of the U.S. Labor Party and Labor Com- 
mittees against the Rockefeller machine during, most 
notably, the period beginning December . Given 
the were prortionately at the dissal of the two 
opsing forces, which is  by far  the more in- 
telleually qualified to deal with crisis-issues on a 
national and global scale? Beginning Oober  and 
continuing over the wer of -, a certain 
perceptible tential parallel to the case of the Tudor 
fleet against the Hapsburg Armada became noted by 
an increasing number of observers. The beneficial 
correlated consequence of observations tending 
toward that judgment has been to somewhat 
demystify ''Rockefeller were.*' Given the were at 



. The significance of putting Jimmy Carter in the White House  
i.e., thumb on the well-known '^button"  is underlined by a Rand 
Corration scenario. The "game of chicken"  two lunatic automo- 
bilists approaching one another down the center of a highway at high 
speed, to test which swereves aside, "chickens," first  was suggested 
as adaptable to psychological warfare techniques, even on the level of 
thermonuclear confrontations between the White House and the 
Politburo. The Rand think-tankers sed the query: what if one of the 
drivers knows that his opnent is a raving lunatic? Would that 
knowledge imidate the saner of the two o swereving, and thus 
"losing the game?" Carter is the appropriate lunatic to ace o the 
White House for a game of "thermonuclear chicken" with the Soviet 
Politburo. 



 

their dissal, the leading figures of the Trilateraloid 
orbit are on performance a or lot. 

One of the key personnel problems of the Rocke- 
fellers' neo-Fabian and other **utopian" (e.g., In- 
terl-network) hierarchies is that an effeive mind 
requires a convincing self-image of elleual 
coherence and egrity, a consistent rationality and 
rigorous scope of relevant knowledge in at least the 
Aristotelian sense. This is the general sort of distinc- 
tion to be made between the Atlanticist "patricians" 
of earlier generations, including Lippmann, and the 
picaresque louts and thugs, such as a Cyrus Vance, a 
Lester Brown, a lunatic Brzezinski, who typify the 
Trilateraloid skesmen of today. 

Lippmann is already in his time a degenerate rela- 
tive to the image of the "Concord" patrician he 
parodies, already a refleion of the decay which 
seized Harvard University and similar institutions 
during the period of the accession of President Eliot. 
After , the degeneracy accelerated, along lines 
identified by John Dewey in his Reconstruion in 
Philosophy. The denial of universal praical and 
moral princies, an immorality which Dewey avowed 
in the aftermath of Versailles, is also Lippmann's 
criping affliion, that moral decay of elleual 
culture o babbling, sententious hycrisy which 
Princeton's Woodrow Wilson brought to our national 
institutions through his incumbency in the U.S. Presi- 
dency. 

That considered, Lippmann is a ausible stage- 
parody of a patrician, relative to the amoral mercen- 
aries of Vance's strata. 

The relevant world-historical  is that the 
present degeneration of the st-Versailles and st- 
Bretton Woods monetary orders and associated in- 
stitutions permits no credible appearance of 
corresndence between Rockefeller-centered 
monetary erests and the fundamental self-erests 
of those OECD and developing nations over which that 
decaying order desperately exerts its hegemonies. 

The credibility of the U.S. role respeing aual 
U.S. erests in the wars against the Kaiser's and 
Nazi Germany, gave to the ruling forces of this nation 
the appearance of representing not only Wall Street 
erests, but at least coincidentally the self-erests 
in prosperity and national security of the nation at 
large. Even those other nations which suffered 
degradation to satrapy status under lowere Manhat- 
tan's hegemonies, tended to swallow their anger and 
extend a certain degree of moral credit to the litical 
instruments of monetarist U.S. -based were. This 
persuasion was riddled with illusion  even downright 
delusion  but it was more or less ausible to anyone 
who was not fastidious respeing matters behind the 
coincidences and facades. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 




John Quincy Adams, who articulated the notion of **community of princie'* to describe the fundamental tenet 
of the foreign licy of the United States* Federalist Founding Fathers. 



 



 

At the time Lippmann*s book was published by 
Little, Brown, few went behind the surface appear- 
ances, the sentimental glosses of the author^s style, to 
assess the aual content of the prosals. The sort of 
licy Lippmann offered was broadly accepted by 
public opinion not because the licies involved were 
understood in any real sense, but chiefly because the 
rhetorical sentiments offered did not offend prevailing 
illusions and public tastes at the time. The U.S. elec- 
torate never understood the Roosevelt administration 
in any anually relevant detail; rather, they blindly 
trusted it, as a child trusts the fa of his particular 
parents, as more or less **the way things are decreed 
to be.'* Nothing yet had developed to disturb the con- 
soling self-delusions of more than a relative handful. 

In such a litical climate, a Lippmann could stand 
before his morning shaving mirror and imagine him- 
self to see a man not only honored in the contemrary 
codors of were, but regard those honors as the 
fruits of some genuine elleual egrity in agree- 
ment with a credible public erest. After the events 
of the Kennedy administration, and the increasingly 
savage assault un those institutions and princies 
which were our nation's heritage and conscience, the 
Rockefeller-linked and other financier elites represen- 
ted in the Kennedy administration proje stripped 
much of our nation's youth  and most of all them- 
selves  of the last shards of a credible self-image of 
elleual egrity. 

A capitalism which deliberately sets out  as early 
exemified by the "Trie Revolution'* Orwellianism 
 to systematically undermine and destroy the expan- 



sion and maenance of that technologically ad- 
vanced industrial and agricultural base which is and 
has been our nation's most vital self-erest, which 
tears the Constitution and other vital legal and moral 
institutions of the republic to shreds, which con- 
sciously and deliberately promotes the proliferation of 
dangerous drugs among our university and high 
school youth  what ssible illusion of egrity 
remains to the pronents of such hideousness? What 
man or woman of elleual egrity could devote 
personal capacities to such an enterprise; what 
person, while being in the ranks of the neo-Fabians, 
the Trilateral Commission, the Brookings Institution, 
the Law Enforcement Assistance Administration, the 
Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms unit of the U.S. 
Treasury, or the Kennedy, Clark, Katzenbach, Levi, 
or Bell Justice Department, could preserve under 
such circumstances even the vestiges of morality? 

Gifted individuals gripped by cruel neurotic 
problems have been otherwise creative; moral im- 
beciles of the Trilateraloid varieties, never. Moral 
imbecility, by destroying the individual's linking of his 
or her sense of personal social identity to some sense 
of a lawful causality in the universal consequences of 
individual willful praice, destroys the mental 
processes indispensable to tracing through the con- 
neions of isolated strategies and taical recipes to 
their universalizing consequences. 

Some moral imbeciles prevail as they wield vast 
weres like a berzerker's axe, and as saner men and 

women manifest the cowardice not to bring such 
lunatics to cage. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 






INH AB IT ANTS 



O F 



A M E R I C A, 



Oo the f jllowicg mtfrt)fi*j 



S U B J E 



S. 



C T 

L Of the O'lglo and Dcftgn f*f G^vf rnmrni in g*'neri!( 
with coRcife Rtjnjirki op (he En^Tiih CofiflitJ-iocu 



n. Of Man«ch)f lud Hcrf dUary Sucflii^ii. 
TTI. Thojglin <Mi (he prff^ni Sf*t< of AmtfUan AfF^irt^ 
IV, Of the prerem Abiliiy of Amlcft, w'lih Tvinc dT-* 



Min kmwi no Matter fjve ei irt^HrAVtN, 
Or thn(e vvliom cboke an couiipufi ^u jU ui-d^io. 



PHILADELPtlfAt 
Frmttd, iiKl Sold, hy R B R i ia 



S If eft* 



DCC LXXVf. 





' 





Federalist Tom Paine, author of the  pamphlet Common Sense, was a vigorous advocate q 
form of government as opsed to Tory "pure democracy, " 




P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



Three Atlanticist World Wars 



Exemary of the profitable present-day uses 
of the  Lippmann text is a comparison of his 
analysis of the licies impelling the United States 
o two world wars against Germany. What he states, 
which is in fa a fair if elliptical summary of the 
aual licies involved, affords an effeive basis for 
identifying the crucial methodological blunder of 
Atlanticist dorine presently impelling the Carter 
Administration  despite its consoling delusions to 
the contrary  on the track toward a general ther- 
monuclear war as early as . 

In a footnote to the text, Lippmann footnotes an 
excerpt from his own Feb. ,  New Republic 
editorial, **The Defense of the Atlantic World.'* To the 
quotation, he adds a parenthetical: "When I wrote this 
article I had the oprtunity to know what Colonel 
House and others among Wilson's advisors were think- 
ing.** From the footnoted excerpt of the  editorial, 
we sele the following most pertinent passage: 

. . . Had she (Germany) stood on the defen- 
sive against France and Britain, had she 
limited the war to the Balkans and the eastern 
front, and thrown in her lot with the western 
nations, she would have had their neutrality 
and probably their sympathy. But, when she 
caed the war to the Atlantic by violating 
Belgium, by invading France, by striking 
against Britain, and by attempting to disrupt 
us. neutrality of spirit or aion was out of the 
question. 

This compares direly with his summary of the 
balance of U.S. (Roosevelt administration) licy con- 
cerning Nazi Germany prior to May-June . After 
citing the list of notable preceding Nazi aions in 
central and eastern Europe, he states: 

. . . The Nazi agression appeared to be 
direed toward the east, away from the 
oceanic world. While the Nazis were generally 
execrated in the United States, only those who 
believed that Hitler would eventually turn 



west called for praical measures against 
him. . . . But when Germany breached the 
western baer, there was an instant and 
virtually unanimous recognition that the 
country was threatened. . . .The new defense 
program was called for because the Western 
European baer had been breached. ... If 
the Nazi regime had not been the vile thing it 
is, would the United States have reaed as it 
did to the conquest of France? The answere to 
that question was given in the first German 
war. 

Although Lippmann*s account skids over a number 
of crucial fas known to him  including the manipul- 
ation of public opinion in this and related matters  he 
imicitly and correly identifies the backers of both 
the Wilson and Roosevelt administrations as informed 
of and tending toward concurrence with the British 
scheme best identified as the Parvus Plan.'* Al- 
though the USA had certain strong reservations con- 
cerning that British licy for an alliance with the 
Kaiser's Germany, these objeions were, in the lesser 
part, the difficulties of peddling such a diomatic 
swindle to the U.S. eleorate, and of more imrt- 
ance, a realization that the success of the British 
venture would put the City of London in a strategic 
sition to resist  perhaps successfully  the lowere 
Manhattan impulse to reduce Britain to junior-partner 
status. Lippmann alludes to that comication of st- 
Versailles Anglo-American relations in the seion of 
his text devoted to U.S. -Russian relations. There, he 
both exaggerates and misrepresents the nature of U.S. 
blocking of British licies concerning breakup of the 
Soviet republic, a distortion which is understandable 
in light of the package the U.S. was attempting to 
peddle to Stalin during the  period. 

The role of Anglo-Dutch agents, including (Alex- 
ander Helphand) Parvus in Balkan affairs prior to 
World War I, and Parvus* peddling of the British 
eastern European strategy to the Kaiser's general 
staff in , expressed the City of London's purse in 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 




The first Cabinet: President 
[Knox], and, in background, 
century artist Alonzo Chappel 





on with the Secretaries of State \Jejf€rsoh\, Treasury [Hamilton], War 
General [Randolph], an engraving from a paing by nineteenth 



 



 

launching World War I. The Kaiserreich, created by 
Rothschild protege Bismarck with a helping hand (and 

other organs) from the ruling Hanoverian House of 
England, was ordained by City of London and allied 
Fabian licymakers to perform an indispensable role 
in the breakup of the Austro-Hungarian and Russian 
Empires. The proje stipulated the breakup of the 
Balkans and what is today called Eastern Europe o 
a pathetic agglomeration of squabbling separate 
states, each embodying the consolations of "national 
self-determination," which would come under the 
Anglo-Dutch financiers* departments of control of 
global grain and petroleum distribution. The Russian 
republic would contemate the beauties of liberalism, 
while liberally meeting the debt service owing to the 
Rothschilds, et al. from the Czarist regime. 

That same British-concoed Parvus Plan was the 
strategic licy which Hitler's British and New York 
City financier patrons adopted for him in imsing 
him from abroad on bankrupt Germany of . That 
Anglo-American backing of Hitler's assigned eastern 
and Balkan role was the reason that Neville Chamber- 
lain capitulated to Hitler at the  Munich affair, and 
why the opening months of World War II were a 
*'phony war" on the Anglo-French-Belgian western 
front. Rudolf Hess' flight to Scotland was not an in- 
dividual lunatic's caprice, but most probably a result 
of a licy decision by Hitler himself. Hess' predica- 
ments in England (and his prolonged stay in Spandau 
prison) are the result of the fa that the notable defe 
in his adventure was that he had undertaken it months 
too late. 

The broad  to be made for present praical 
purses is that the same Anglo-American, ''Atlantic- 
ist" dorines and methods which misfired in deter- 
mining the unexpeed course of two world wars 
against Germany are the dorine and method being 
emoyed around lowere Manhattan and Washington to 
the effe of blindly stumbling headlong o an early 
World War III. The "concert" method emoyed by 
British monetarism generally, the geolitical reduc- 
tionism charaeristic of all leading Atlanticists, Lipp- 
mann included, exemifies the essential pervasive 
stupidities of the dorine and methods involved. 

Rothschild thinking, the prototype for all modern 
monetarist litical-economic nostrums, does not 
recognize the existence of either economic reality or 
of the lawful litical processes which rigorously  if 
not always simy  refle real economic processes. 
Hence, twice, the Rothschilds and others committed 
the blunder of ending to march Germany eastward, 
then to discover to their astonishment that the kinds of 
German state suited, to that ordained purse were un- 
able to resist overwereing rinsic impulses to 
march both eastward and westward. NATO, under- 



neath all the sentimental babbling peddled to credu- 
lous North American and Western European publics, 
was created for the specific strategic purse of re- 
acing Germany's former role in a projeed third 
effort at imementing the "Parvus Plan." After the 
Soviet development of an operational thermonuclear 
wean before the U.S. itself, and the abortion of the 
Kennedy administration, the projeed dating for such 
use of NATO was apparently, at least, relegated to un- 
certay until the beginning of the Watergating pro- 
cess against the Nixon administration and the - 
 petrodollar-recycling affair. Despite the vacilla- 
tion respeing prospes for imementation, the 
Rockefeller and allied erests' "American Century'* 
or Atlanticist licy embodies the institutionalization 
of that same lunatic obsession which produced two 
preceding world wars, and which governs the be- 
havior of the Trilateraloid madmen presently em- 
barked on blundering o a third. 

This time, again, the Atlanticists' error includes a 
gross miscalculation of the determining relationship 
between German industrial self-erests and the most 
tent independent impulses of German litics. How- 
ever, this time that repeated miscalculation occupies 
a secondary ace relative to the present principal 
focus of the thrice-repeated methodological blunder. 
This time, the Atlanticists have emoyed the same 
method of miscalculation formerly apied to Ger- 
many to the case of the Soviet leadership. 

In the onset of World War I, the raving nominalists 
of the City of London wishfully consoled themselves 
that real economics did not exist. By the same utilitar- 
ian-Fabian conceits through which the City of London 
had deluded itself to have refuted Karl Marx, they had 
also assured themselves they had refuted Hamilton, 
Carey, Colbert, the litiques, and Gresham, Real 
economy did not exist  had not well-paid empiricism 
proven this? Geography, traditions, corruption, and so 
forth were  to the Rothschilds and their accom- 
ices  tne colleion of "faors" which determmed 
the manipulation of history. They had their multie 
influences on the Kaiserreich which they had  chief- 
ly  created through manipulation of the monetary 
means for raising and deoying armies, bringing 
down governments, wrecking currencies of stubborn 
regimes, and buying in job-lots liberal, conservative, 
aristocratic, and professed Marxist organizations. 
Beyond the City of London's dire influence on the 
Kaiser government, socialist August Bebel of the 
German Social Democracy  like Eduard Bernstein 
 had been a British agent up to the moment of 
his death, and he was by no means the exception. 
Kaiser's Germany would never break westward  
the liticians would overrule the Kaiser's high com- 
mand! 



IFD)F=T®®B[i@x. PEM© EI^^ 




Walter Lippmann 



In the second try, the case of Hitler, the City of Lon- 
don and its lowere Manhattan accomices were con- 
fident that the problems of  Germany could not 
ssibly recur. The ernal struure of st-Ver- 
sailles German litical life had been fine-tuned by 
first the dominant Americans and junior-partner 
British (and Dutch) agencies direing the Allied 
Armistice Commission. Although Schacht, by , 
was in honored retirement, Schacht was still a loyal 
and litically influential American agent, and 
similar Wall Street and City of London controls er- 
seed every conceivable  of the Nazireich, in- 
cluding the redoubtable Admiral Canaris. In creating 
Hitler as Atlanticism's dissable **breakaway ally" 



 to bleed itself to British terms in services per- 
formed in the east, the Atlanticists who created Hitler 
ignored the fa that the erseion of the self-aggra- 
vating German debt struure, and the Schacht 
method of primitive accumulation against the Ger- 
man economy's economic basis, set forces o lawful 
motion which could not be checked without destroying 
the debt struures and the litical machine created 
to serve its imperatives. Again, Germans being as 
capable of strategic thinking as Rothschilds, Hitler 
seized the Hitler-Stalin pa, and attacked the aston- 
ished and vulnerable western forces, determined thus 
to build up the necessary looting base for creating his 
eastward direed war machine. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



World War III 



Today, the Rockefeller faion manically insists 
that its operational confrontationist licies will 
not lead to an aual general war. This time, the Tavis- 
tock-Rand psychological profile of the Oblomovist 
Soviet leadership is the crux of their obsessive stupid- 
ity: "We have control of a key seion of the Soviet 
leadership/* emphasizing that Georgii Arbatov and 
others are hard-core Rockefeller agents within and 
aroundvthe CPSU Central Committee, and that the 
suprters of the Brezhnev licy of the moment will 
continue to perform as the profile specifies. As with 
the Kaiserreichy the Atlanticists of today insist that 
the litical institutions will overrule the military 
command. (In -, it was the delusion that the 
German military and Canaris would overrule Hitler 
on the risks of fighting a two-froift war.) 

They hysterically deny the lawfulness of wereful 
economic and related processes now as they did 
before. 

Contrary to London's calculations, the economics 
of the Kaiserreich demanded the securing of a looting 
base in either the east or the west as a precondition for 
bringing the war against the Trie Entente to a con- 
clusion. Gentlemen's understandings concerning 
Western Fronts or **zones of confli" do not operate 
under conditions of war. The Kaiser's Germany could 
not commit its forces to an engagement to the east and 
leave Russia's allies waiting behind its back to invade 
the Ruhr at some crucial  in the eastern affair. 
With an occupation of the Ruhr  in either the first or 
second world wars  Germany's war-fighting capa- 
bilities would have evarated. Objeively, Germany 
had no rational choice but to invade France in both 
wars. 

The Kaiser's Germany came close to winning the 
First World War at the outset  had the command 
exoited the peculiar vulnerabilities of French rail- 
way networks according to an enterprise then within 
their military capabilities. It was that vacillation and 
error in the German command which prevented the 
French forces from being shattered during the onset 



of the war, and thus established the breathing space 
during which the French command could dig in to 
transform the war o the hideous meatgrinder attri- 
tion which charaerized its prolongation. 

In the Second World War, Germany's imperatives 
for invasion of France were even more wereful. 
From a sime military stand, the Wehrmacht 
could not permit itself to be deoyed in depth on an 
eastern front, waiting for the  of mutual Nazi- 
Soviet attrition at which the Western allies cometed 
their preparations to occupy the Ruhr. From any 
objeive purely military strategic stand, the 
Wehrmacht had to conquer continental Western 
Europe before undertaking a thrust to the east of Po- 
land, That  certainly by -  was any 
military cadet's ABCs. The fa that the British and 
French financiers and liticians could suppress 
elementary strategic competence in their military 
commands was extended o the double folly of pre- 
suming that the Nazi litical struure could  or 
would attempt to  check its military command on 
that . The fa was, as London knew, the Hitler 
regime of - lived on the sufferance of the Ger- 
man military. Military questions as such aside, the 
bankruptcy of the German monetary system and the 
deeted condition of German basic industry 
demanded a substantial source of loot as a precon- 
dition for building up the German economy to the  
that an eastern thrust was ssible. 

The difference between  and - was that 
but for a command failure at the outset of World War 
I, the Kaiser's Germany would have won the peace by 
a successful early conquest of France. The conquest of 
France in June  could not produce the same dur- 
able result. The Kaiser's Germany was, relatively 
speaking, a viable capitalist economy, whose early 
military viories would have opened up Eastern 
Europe and Russia to massive German capitalist 
extended reproduion. The Nazi economy created by 
the Rockefellers, et al, was of a fundamentally dif- 
ferent charaer. It was an auto-cannibalizing 







economy, which subsisted by destroying the economic 
basis it assimilated, thus destroying the produive 
forces un whose expansion and development a dur- 
able conquest depended. 

If the Nazis had defeated the Soviets, the condition 
of Europe  and the world  would have been mon- 
strously worse than at the middle of , but then the 
Nazi economy, by its nature, must collapse of its own 
effes as it extended itself beyond a certain weighted 
ratio of Germany proper to looted conquered regions. 
However, that fa could not alter Hitler's licy any 
more than the force of reason  showing Rockefeller, 
et al. the inherent folly of their war aims  could deter 
the Trilateraloids. Entities such as the Hitler regime 
and the present-day Atlanticists must be destroyed 
before they go o full-scale motion, otherwise they 
will pursue their wretched follies to the end  
because, beyond their commitments, they have no al- 
ternatives. They have burned the bridges leading back 
to other alternatives. 

There is, admittedly, some weighty conceptual 
problem incurred by emoying the term ''objeive 
processes*' in conneion with-the hypergeometries of 
shifting patterns in lawful transformations being 
provoked within the Soviet licies and operations. As 
every Moscow- watcher knows, the canonical epithet 
for the so-called Brezhnev faion is "objeive.'* 
Brezhnev's self-aped sycophants, such as the 
Arbatovs insist on this, and Brezhnev, et al. seem to 
relish such litical insults. The Averell Hamans 
and others also insist on the same , as, in a 
slightly different form, do the Henry Kissingers, the 
James Schlesingers, and so forth. It is argued that 
precisely because the Brezhnev faion is "objeive," 

it will resnd to appropriate Mutt-and-Jeff confronta- 
tionist games by pragmatically retreating, grumbling 
bitterly as it nonetheless throws off concession after 
begrudged concession like so much confetti. 

Neither Haman nor Kissinger  nor Arbatov  
use the term "objeive" in the historically-rigorous 
epistemological sense. The cognates for the "objec- 
tivity" they attribute to the Brezhnev faion are 
"pragmatic," "empiricist," "Menshevik (Herzen- 
Plekhanov) fatalism." However, just as the Soviet 
command is "Clausewitzian," the Soviet opnents of 
Arbatov and the Bukharinist tradition are predom- 
inantly "objeive" in the rigorous epistemological 
usage of that term. It is that element of the Soviet com- 
mand struure which the Rockefellers will lawfully 
render predominantly operative by the sort of con- 
frontation-process now under way. So, the Rocke- 
fellers will repeat the same methodological stupidity 
charaerizing the two preceding world wars in 
triggering a third. 

Considering the mass of the twentieth century 



 

evidence on the , one might ordinarily presume 
that even a pragmatist would be wiser than in fa the 
Carter Administration's puppet-masters show them- 
selves. Indeed, such persons emphatically admit the 
most relevant fas  as they have done so, once 
again, in recent testimony before Congress. Yet, in 
that testimony, and repeatedly on the same topic over 
the three years that we have been direly confronting 
them and others on the issue, they fall back to the 
obsessive conviion that the pragmatism of the Brezh- 
nev faion obviates such fas and thus renders the 
prosed track toward World War III acceptable. 
Considering the uniformity of such manic hysteria 
within the Trilateraloid leadership, one must wonder 
what strange wishful delusions are operating there. 

There are two sources of the Atlanticist delusion. 
At first identification, the two causes may appear to 
be distin "faors," Modest critical assessment 
suffices to show without doubt that the two phenomena 
are but different facets of the same consideration. 

Predominantly, as David Rockefeller's desperate 
address to the New York City Economics Club symp- 
tomizes, they are obsessed by the need to believe that 
the schemes will succeed. For them, since they have 
committed themselves to such operational licies, 
cut themselves faionally off from alternative 
courses of aion, and so forth, the notion that the 
licy might fail is properly associated with the 
spere of an early collapse of Chase Manhattan Bank, 
and a total loss of their faion's financial and litical 
were. 

As with the  disclosures of Soviet physicist L. 
Rudakov, they prefer to believe that such realities do 
not exist, and if they are forced to acknowledge their 
existence, must convince themselves that such con- 
siderations will not be efficiently operative. They des- 
perately need to believe that the developing seor 
governments will indefinitely be the International 
Monetary Fund's instruments for calculated austerity 
genocide against their own pulations, that Japan 
and West Germany will willingly preside over the 
destruion of their industrial economies, and that the 
Soviets will foolishly trade away the very def ensibility 
of the Warsaw Pa nations for fear of what lunatic 
Carter might otherwise do  in one of his imbecilic 
rages  in proximity of the well-known "button." The 
mere fa that the method by which Atlanticists 
defend such rationalizations has been massively dis- 
credited by two preceding world wars does not dis- 
suade them from repeating the folly. 

In such behavior, the Atlanticist cabal is not 
merely resnding with reaion formation to an im- 
mediate set of expedients. Since David Hume  and 
anually earlier  Anglo-Dutch monetarism, its fore- 
bears and its lowere Manhattan by-produs have 







 

denied the efficient existence of uni versa Is. To the un- 
educated layman  which is to include most univer- 
sity philosophy professors  such phrases are a pure- 
ly academic matter. On the contrary, modern nomin- 
alism is the organic philosophical outlook of the stra- 
tum, dating as a correlative from the Guelph and 
Dominican alliances against humanism and the 
Hohenstaufens, which has attained world-domination 
over finance and much litics throughout the OECD 
and developing nations. Nominalism  the denial that 
individual as are causally conneed in a lawful and 
imicitly knowable way to universal consequences  
is the ingrained method and charaer of those mone- 
tarist forces and their elleual hangers-on. 

Whenever someone proses the existence of ef- 
ficient universal princies underlying social 
processes (in particular), on condition that such 
statements are made in a purely literary or academic 
setting, the Rockefellers' tame pundits emit animal- 
like groans, registering their shock at such olerable 
egregiousness, and if they can muster more than such 
barnyard forms of expression, profess sneering facial 
expressions and a few deprecatory slanders against 
the mental condition of the offender. If the expression 
of such scientific views goes beyond opinion o some 
form of praice, the same flock turns downright 
nasty, looking for guidance to the fourteenth century 
Dominicans and the immolation of Giordano Bruno. 

Hence, when the appropriate Trilateraloids are 
called to account for high treason, puppet-accomice 
Jimmy Carter will be released on the basis of a suc- 
cessful ea of lunacy, while most of the rest will ead 
stupidity in hope of clemency. Only the "thorough" 
Utopians, like the "technotronic'' Zbigniew Brzezin- 
ski, and the purrted liberals and leftists spinning out 

h 

fascist Orwellian "egalitarian" orders in the neo- 
Fabian and other think-tanks, think through the imi- 
cations of Rockefelleroid hyperinflationary austerity 
licies to the full extent of their hideous social, 
litical, and material consequences. It is geno-. 
cidalists such as Lester Brown who dispassionately 
prose means for wiping out the billions of the earth's 
"excess pulation." Otherwise, the average rank- 
and-file Atlanticist  the ordinary banker, litician, 
and so forth  simy refuses to make a conneion 
between his praice and such consequences: "Isn't 
that a bit highly theoretical?" 

Granted, in this culture  and in a large prortion 
of Soviet leading circles  there is abundant evidence 
to suprt the judgment that the overwhelming 
majority of people refuse ordinarily to make con- 
neions between causes and their lawful effes 



further down the line. This involves the fruits of mis- 
education and non-education. It also involves an 
essential princie of psychology. The ability to 
resnd to an idea  as Dante Alighieri, among 
others, emphasized as far back as the early fourteenth 
century  is delimited by the capacity to transfer 
conceptions of knowledge o the sensuous state of an 
informing of the will for praice. The ability to think 
through to consequences depends un the mental 
weres to make the consequence sensuous reality for 
thought  to feel oneself doing the anticipated willful 
a involved, to feel oneself experiencing the anti- 
cipated consequence involved. 

Hence, given the fa that layers of the Soviet 
leadership presently suprting or tolerating the 
operational Arbatov Dorine are capable of making 
the relevant conneions between Carter licies and 
their consequences, the pragmatic, irrational 
behavior of the moment does not mean that they will 
not abandon Arbatov for the diate of their weres of 
reason. It rather means that they will make such an 
abrupt transition instantly the moment the fuller 
imications of Carter's licy are made sensuous to 
them. It is for related reasons that great turns in 
history occur under conditions of crisis. The relevant 
feature of crisis is that it renders sensuous to a broad 
stratum of the pulation those rational perceptions 
which are otherwise sensuously real to only a relative 
few. 

Whatever Carter's advisors think Brezhnev thinks, 
or even what Brezhnev himself thinks he thinks are 
matters of clinical relevance, but they are not com- 
petent "statistical" evidence of what Brezhnev will 
abruptly find himself thinking under the effes of 
those confrontations which make Atlanticist licy 
imications sensuous to him. The principal undecided 
feature of those changes in Brezhnev's licies is 
whether Brezhnev et al. will rea simy by going to 
thermonuclear war  ignoring all Rockefeller's 
prosed deals about "zones," or whether, one hopes, 
he will rather opt in time to bring down the Rocke- 
feller monetary system before the  of war has 
been reached. 

Has the world ever seen such obsessed lunatics as 
our Atlanticist monetarists? In the  days of Walter 
Lippmann  before the successful Los Alamos test of 
the first nuclear bomb  even the Atlanticists thought 
somewhat in terms of real litical processes. Now- 
adays, ask Cyrus Vance if he knows litics. The 
wretch will probably rey, "Sure. Hit the opsition 
with a club," In the net, they have a orer litical 
sense than a charging rhinoceros. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The Dorine of Atlanticism 



It is Lippmann's development of a literary defense 
for the concept of an Atlanticist dorine which 
properly next occupies our attention here. What is of 
most current relevance in this conneion is both the 
way in which he depends un sweeping falsifications 
of U.S. history to establish precedents for such a 
licy, and his reliance un geolitical and related 
reduionist and pragmatist methods in prosing the 
edifice. In his defes, he is superior, if only relatively 
speaking, to his present-day successors  descen- 
dants who are nonetheless governed by the thrust of 
the Lippmann conception as almost by a set of axioms. 

The gist of Lippmann's Atlanticism is this. He starts 
from the Pitt-Rothschild-Palmerston-Canning-Russell 
dorines identifiable as '^concert" and ^'influence*'  
but without ever accounting for the development of 
such innovations. He adds a persisting, thematic 
truism, to the effe that commitments and means 
must be kept in prortion. Those  us geolitical 
nostrums  are the axioms un which he premises 
the struure for which he argues. He then seeks a 
legal precedent for modern Atlanticist dorine in the 
concurrence of three U.S. Presidents in the adoption of 
the ** Monroe Dorine." He then makes a twofold 
argument concerning the - period. First, that 
the imied Atlanticist dorine as organically em- 
bedded in the *'Monroe Dorine*' was consistent U.S. 
foreign licy throughout that period. Second, that the 
failure of the U.S. to extend the proto-Atlanticist 
foreign licy o a global alliance with Britain after 
 was the failure of U.S. foreign licy during the 
- period. 

The whole argument is charaerized by the in- 
terweaving of assorted frauds: fallacy of comsition 
(usually willful), turning exicit licy statements of 
leading figures o an assertion of a  opsite to 
that anually made, and a generous dose of downright 
lying. Despite such criping defes, the result he 
construs by such means is essentially Atlanticist 
dorine as understood and operational down to the 
present  in U.S. licy, and the arguments he 



uses, while in some particulars peculiar to himself, 
are broadly identical with the arguments used by most 
pronents of the same dorine. 

First, Lippmann falsifies the most crucial fas of 
U.S. history of the period to  and from  to . 
This error may sometimes involve innocent ignorance 
or miseducation on Lippmann's part; more often, the 
text itself shows that Lippmann has consulted rele- 
vant sources which must have informed him of such 
error. Hence, we write not of mistakes, but falsifica- 
tions. Falsification not of erpretation alone, but 
falsification also of fa. 

Lippmann ignores entirely the issues causing and 
shaping the American Revolution, emoys fallacy of 
comsition to misrepresent Federalist U.S. foreign 
licy during the - period, and brushes aside 
the War of . He does not go as far as Charles A. 
Beard, probably disagreed with Thurman Arnold's 
wilder distortions of the Constitution, and must have 

been disgusted by such later revisionist writers as 
William A. Williams. Even so, he belongs to the spec- 
trum of Fabian revisionism respeing U.S. history. 

As we have listed the  above, the  of 
departure he emoys for arguing the case for 
Atlanticism is the  **Monroe Dorine." In 
charaerizing that convention, he emoys three lies 
and one further major distortion. He lies in represent- 
ing the *'Monroe Dorine" as a de fao British-U.S. 
alliance against Holy Alliance ervention in the 
Western Hemisphere. He lies in asserting that such a 
view of the Monroe Dorine was in U.S. national in- 
terests at that time. He lies in accounting for the pro- 
cess by which it was originated. He distorts the views 
of U.S. leaders, notably John Quincy Adams, govern- 
ing the reasons for its adoption. 

The Holy Alliance was a British creation and a 
British instrument for governing the European con- 
tinent and Mediterranean region. It was a British 
contrivance of the form known as a "concert"  the 
''concert of Europe.'* Apart from the British manage- 
ment of the ''checks and balances" built o the 







 

arrangement, the aual fine-tuning of ernal control 
of the Holy Alliance was established by the Barings 
and taken over before  by the House of Rothschild. 
The Rothschilds effeively controlled the credit of 
every member of the Holy Alliance and direly con- 
trolled their bought-and-paid-for puppet Metternich. 
By controlling the credit of nations, with the aid of the 
monstrous debt of the City of London imsed un 
Europe under Treaty of Vienna conditions, the City of 
London determined the ability of the weres to field 
armies and to undertake other major enterprises. 
From the British stand of its controlling erest 
in the Holy Alliance, Canning^s prosed treaty with 
the United States was ended in effe to extend the 
Holy Alliance's ''concert of Europe" to the Western 
Hemisphere. 

U.S. hemispheric licy up to  was for the 
establishment of viable independent republics 
throughout the hemisphere, republics which would 
remove the perilous conditions of military and 
economic insecurity flowing from European weres' 
controlling presence within the hemisphere. In a 
broad sense the U.S. had a licy, shared by the 
Federalists and also largely by Jefferson, of 
recognizing viable or probably viable newly created 
republics in the hemisphere  analogous to Soviet 
licies of a similar effe relative to the present 
developing seor. 

The Canning prosal was direly contrary to U.S. 
licy and erests at that time. Under the almost- 
"Wilsonian" sentimental hycrisy of the 'Tanning- 
Rush" draft forwarded to Monroe, the U.S. was of- 
fered the face-saving formula which has been passed 
down for the edification of credulous schoolchildren 
and others to the present day. In fa, the praical 
content of the draft was to secure U.S. consent to free 
and virtually exclusive operations of the British fleet 
in the Western Hemisphere, and to ace the 
struggling republics of Latin America at the mercy of 
the British fleet and the Baring and Rothschild 
financial houses. 

The demand was so objeionable that President 
Monroe dared not accept it on his own resnsibility, 
and yet British control of the Holy Alliance had left the 
U.S. so strategically vulnerable to British naval and 
economic warfare that Monroe was in no sition, in 
praice, to refuse. Hence, Monroe solicited the 
counsel and co-resnsibility of two former 
Presidents, Jefferson and Madison, in formulating his 
resnse to Canning's veiled threat. 

The accuracy of our assessment of the Monroe 
Dorine on both these two preceding accounts was 
conclusively demonstrated during the jo British- 
French-Spanish military operation which overthrew 
the legal, Juarez government of Mexico, and aced 



the Barings' and Rothschilds' Hapsburg puppet on the 
throne of that country. The British-instigated com- 
bined operation against the Juarez government was 
taken in behalf of the Barings and Rothschilds, in 
consequence of Mexico's default on foreign debts. 

At that , the government of the United States 
was in profound opsition to this British-instigated 
operation, but for the moment the revolt of the Con- 
federacy, itself a Rothschild effort to destroy the 
United States, prevented the U.S. from taking effec- 
tive countermeasures against the hideous methods of 
debt colleion being emoyed against the Mexican 
nation by French troops of Paris-based Baron James 
Rothschild's puppet, Naleon III. James, at that 
time, was head of the ernational Rothschild House. 
Although jjfugust Belmont, the Rothschilds* principal 
U.S. agent, was conneed to the London branch of the 
House, the licies of the House overall were under the 
guidance of James. As traitor Belmont's corres- 
ndence exicitly states, the Confederacy was a 
Rothschild proje, and the purse of the overall 
Rothschild operations of the period (including Mexico 
and the Confederacy), was to divide the North 
American continent o a **balkanized" colleion of 
squabbling diatorships of various sorts, which could 
thus be managed from London, 

Admittedly, British licy on the Mexican operation 
did change, Lippmann, refeng to that affair, uses 
the change to argue that the British military role in 
the instigation of the affair was in some way an unin- 
tended blunder. On the contrary, the events of  
persuaded the British government to gradually 
disassociate itself from the Rothschilds' North 
American ''black operations," 

Returning to the events of , Lippmann twists the 
significance of a quotation from John Quincy Adams 
around half-circle, to make Adams signify the op- 
site of what he in fa states. Lippmann writes: "... 
at that time, as John Quincy Adams put it ... the naval 
were of the United States was to that of Great Britain 
'as a cockboat in the wake of a British man-of-war.' " 
This Adams view is properly set in the context of his 
successful arguments against accepting the '*doc- 
trine" in the form of the treaty which Canning 
prosed, Lippmann, resorting to his '^commitments 
and means" axiom, thus attempts to prove that the 
proferred treaty's most outsken opnent was 
arguing at least imicitly of the necessity for an 
alliance with British naval were. In fa, as Lipp- 
mann is otherwise forced to acknowledge in effe, the 
prosed treaty problem was solved by a **Solomon's 
decision," not to accept the treaty, but to adopt the 
gist of the draft as a U.S. foreign licy convention. 
Hence, the "Monroe Dorine," which acated the 
dangerous British while leaving a loophole for escape. 







It is in this context that Lippmann piles lie un lie 
in his glosses on the Maximilian affair. Lippmann 
argues against Adams' opsition to the Canning 
prosal of a treaty, arguing that the Maximilian 
ervention was made ssible because the U.S. had 
no operative treaty with the British along Monroe 
Dorine lines. As we have noted, Adams was proven 
corre and Lippmann^s argument indefensible by 
those Mexican developments. Lippmann quotes 
Adams' objeions to the prosed Canning treaty: 
**. . . Britain and America . . . would not be bound by 
' any permanent community of princie,' " (emphasis 
in source) because, Adams stipulated, the United 
States had recognized the independence of the newly 
formed Latin American republics, where Britain had 
so far refused to do so. 

This Lippmann distortion of the circumstances and 
imications of the * 'Monroe Dorine'* is direly 
conneed to the sweeping falsehood of his charac- 
terization of U.S. foreign licy during the - 
period. 

His thesis is: . . for nearly fifty years the nation 
has not had a settled and generally accepted foreign 
licy." Although the statement was ausible to the 
credulous at the time it was written, it is in ent a 
fraud, but we shall return to that  subsequently. 
He argues that the U.S. **had a secure licy toward 
the great weres from the decade after the War of  
to the end of the war with Spain in  . . , But . . . 
(since) the eleion of  ... it has (not) been 
ssible for any President of the United States to rely 
un the united suprt of the nation in the condu of 
foreign affairs." We focus, as we noted, first on the 
fraudulent assertion that the United States had a 
secure licy toward the great weres during the - 
 period. 

The basis for the foreign licy of the American 
Revolution and the United States of the - 
period is amy documented in The Political Economy 
of the American Revolution, () as well as the cir- 
cumstances of sharp shifts in both domestic and 
foreign licy during the period -. It is there- 
fore sufficient to summarize the most general s 
relevant to the case at hand. From , and especially 
 until , the United States* foreign licy was 
overall predominantly a consistent Federalist licy, 
to whose essential features Jefferson in effe largely 
subscribed (at least for purses of considering the 
- period in the broadest terms). The 
predominantly Federalist dorine of the - 



. Nancy B. Spannaus and Christopher White, eds., The Political 
Economy of the American Revolution (New York: Campaigner Pub- 
lications, Inc.. ), pp. -,  ff. 



 

period was continued as a partisan foreign licy of 
the Whigs and Republicans up through Lincoln's 
assassination, while the Baring-Rothschild-controlled 
national leadership of the Democratic Party from  
through   from Martin van Buren's loutish 
Andrew Jackson to August Belmont*s  presiden- 
tial candidate McClellan  had a contrary (pro- 
London) domestic and foreign licy. 

In effe, from  through , excepting the 
French affair, Great Britain was continuously the 
principal adversary of the most fundamental national 
erests and very existence of the United States. The 
expression of that fa as foreign licy under Fed- 
eralist, Whig, and Republican leadership up to  
was the effort to avoid war with this wereful ad- 
versary, Great Britain, hy every acceptable litical 
means. Within the balance of means available, this 
foreign licy in detail meant uneasant concessions 
to British demands and erests up to the  that 
forceful resistance was unavoidable. 

The - struggle of the United States against 
its principal adversary, Great Britain, centered 
around two s. The first, the most speacular, 
was the British (Rothschild) forcing of a reaivation 
of black slave traffic o the United States, and 
British operations, conduited chiefly through New 
York City and New Orleans (e.g., Belmont and Slidell) 
to build up the system of black antation slavery. The 
second, underlined by the naked treason of Andrew 
Jackson's Presidency, was to destroy the tech- 
nological progress of U.S. industry, to wreck the 
United States' national institutions of credit essential 
to the promotion of industrial progress, and to degrade 
the U.S. o conformity with the reaionary North 
American licy enunciated by the vile Adam Smith in 
his wretched Wealth of Nations, Through British con- 
trol of the national Democratic Party  especially 
during the - period, not only were these wreck- 
ing and treason licies significantly effeive on 
balance, but under puppet-Presidents of Rothschild 
Democratic Party kingmaker August Belmont, the 
U.S. government itself was the instrument, during the 
Buchanan administration, for the treasonous work of 
preparing the secession of the Rothschild-influenced 
Confederacy. 

After , the British government finally  eighty 
years after the Treaty of Paris  acknowledged in 
fa the sovereignty and egrity of the United States 
as a nation. In typically Rothschild fashion, the City of 
London financiers did not contribute pioneering 
venture capital to United States st- develop- 
ment, but they did ur mass amounts of capital in- 
vestment o established industrial technologies, 
especially those secured by the wealth and credit of 
the United States government. 







 

The effes of this new British licy toward the 
United States were decisively shaped by the Roth- 
schilds* assassination of Abraham Lincoln, 

Lincoln, a Whig of the Carey persuasion in economic 
licy, was determined to use the viory to transform 
the defeated South, in effe, o conformity with the 
mode of technological development emerging in the 
North and West. Lincoln had an economic develop- 
ment reconstruion licy for the st-bellum 
southern states. New York City's bankers, controlling 
the Democratic Party and with a major foothold in the 
leadership of the Republican Party, had a licy of 
looting the southern statel. The licy difference was 
settled  with the aid of a series of crucial aions by 
New York City-linked Secretary of War Stanton  by 
Lincoln's assassination, and pinned down by the 
**Watergating" of Lincoln's successor. 

The carpetbagging licy won, and by  many of 
the sitive features of Reconstruion were undone, 
to be cometely undone by the Democratic Party^s 
Jim Crow licies of the s and first decades of this 
century. The southern states did not begin to ap- 
preciably recover from British-instigated and New 
York City financier-instigated backwardness and loot- 
ing until the recent stwar period and the emergence 
of the ^'runaway shop." The role of British finance 
under the litically credulous Grant and his im- 
mediate successors prevented Lincoln's revival of 
Federalist licies from being firmly reestablished. 
Around the influx of British finance, New York and 
other centers produced new monetarist-oriented 
financial weres in imitation of the City of London. 

Despite growing monetarist hegemonies of the 
London-allied financial houses, the Federalist-Whig- 
Republican current expressed by Lincoln fought on 
stubbornly under conditions of our great agricultural 
and industrial development leading up to the turn of 
the century and slightly beyond. As Lippmann knew, 
but declined to rert, the "Whig" impulse for a U.S. 
war with Great Britain did not ebb away until the 
middle of the s, although by that time the impulse 
itself had assumed forms which would have been alien 
to the British-adversary perceptions of the Federalists 
and would have disgusted Lincoln. 

That is the setting in which the **Monroe Dorine" 
was adopted, at the instigation of a menacing Great 
Britain, at the  of the United States' greatest stra- 
tegic vulnerability since . It was at a  when 
Britain had almost conquered the world by the Treaty 
of Vienna and the banking arrangements involved. 
The United States could no longer maneuver between 
Britain and France, and had no strategic alternatives 
of that sort present or in immediate view. Adams' 
view of the dismal affair of the "Monroe Dorine" 
properly reminds one of Lenin's insistence that the 



Soviet republic would have to capitulate to the Ger- 
mans' Brest-Litovsk peace terms  giving Ger- 
many virtually everything but Great Russia  
stipulated under the hideous "Parvus Plan." Who 
would then say that Lenin prosed to make the 
"Parvus Plan" a Soviet foreign licy convention? 
The legal standing of the  "Monroe Dorine" has 
the same sort of disqualification. 

Now, return our attention to Lippmann's coma 
about the lack of a consistent U.S. foreign licy dur- 
ing the - period. As we have already indicated, 
the truth of the matter, direly contrary to Lipp- 
mann, is not that the U.S. lacked a foreign licy, but 
that it was divided by what were ultimately irrecon- 
cilable differences over foreign licy. Nor was this 
merely a foreign licy matter; the differences 
concerning foreign licy were inseparable from 
equally irreconcilable differences concerning domes- 
tic licy. Although the form had been much distorted 
by st- developments, the root of the confli on 
both domestic and foreign licies was rooted in the 
same differences which separated Americans and 
Tories during the American Revolution. It was a 
difference between a republican licy of industrial 
and agricultural expansion in terms of technological 
progress, and a monetarist licy centering around an 
Anglo-American (Atlanticist) le of New York City- 
centered financial erest. 

To those who know Lippmann's career in some 
principal detail, his effort to skid quietly through the 
role of the elder Senator Henry Cabot Lodge  
Wilson's opnent  and the Republican administra- 
tions of the - period, evokes a sense of con- 
temptuous amusement at the pettiness of Lippmann 
on this account. 

In , left-liberal, quasi-socialist young Walter 
Lippmann made a pilgrimage to the great Fabian 
centers in England. There, screened, indorinated, 
and patted on the head by such old imperialist hands 
as Sidney Webb and George Bernard Shaw, the duly- 
processed Lippmann was made acquaed with the 
innards of the codors of were, and became in the 
course of that a celebrated writer for the New 
Republic  which, in those days, was the "sh" 
association for up-and-coming Fabian Wunderkinder 
of the litical elligence establishment. His status 
skyrocketed under the Wilson administration. He be- 
came a licy-leak and confidant of the great and 
wereful, rev,elling in the thieves' and swindlers' orgy 
that was the Versailles Treaty proceedings. Abruptly, 
as Wilson broke down in face of defeat, Lippmann, the 
Fabian Wunderkind, abruptly found himself almost an 
"outsider" to the innards of national litical were. 

Senator Lodge, in large part the cause of Lipp- 
mann's temrary descent in status, is best under- 



President Woodrow Wilson, ri 

stood as a consciously Hamiltonian sort of early 
twentieth century Federalist. Beyond that, what he 
may or may not have been becomes less imrtant to 
our present inquiry, except to emphasize that the 
Whig strain in the pre- Republican Party had a 
sensibility of those things which violated the erests 
of the United States as an industrial nation, but lacked 
a sitive, contrary licy to counterse effeively 
to the evils they were resisting. Their party organiza- 



, with Colonel House, 

tion and to a large degree their systematic world 
outlook was by then deey taed with the monetarist 
corruption of U,S, capitalist thinking. Increasingly, 
the Whig current maained a social base among 
smaller industrialist erests and among a pular 
constituency of farmers, trade unionists, and black 
voters. In the financial-litical realities of that time, 
the Whig "patricians" of the Republican Party were 
caught up in scenarios featuring brawls among the 







 

major financier faions, domestically and er- 
nationally. 

From approximately  onwards, and especially 
after -, the Whig tendency in U.S. outlook and 
licy did express itself, but not as a major in- 
dependent litical force in its own right. Insofar as 
industrial development represented an erest which 
was refleed within the finance capital with which it 
was associated, that Whig tentiality expressed itself 
in a deformed way as a veor within various 
monetarist faions. 

This was most shary expressed in foreign licy 
in the "Open Door'' licy. By the end of the century, 
it had become the established special feature of the 
U.S. that our industries could out-produce the old 
world quicker, more, better, and cheaper. The U.S. 
industrialist and his financier were thus impelled to 
regard the flag-colony and other colonial institutions of 
the European weres  and the backward litical- 
economic institutions of the colonial and semi-colon- 
ial tential markets themselves, as olerable, even 
insufferable obstacles to U.S. national erests. At the 
same time that U.S. erests diated a desire for 
independence of the colonies and semi-colonies, it also 
required that these markets enjoy stable govern- 
ments, whose modest governmental credit and 
similar advantages ensured a solvent purchaser at 
that end of transaions with the U.S. 

To the extent that licy was expressed, it had the 
following notable imications. The Whig licy, of en- 
couraging stable, republican forms of government in 
colonial and semi-colonial regions, was expressed not 
as the consciously humanist litical licy of the 
Federalists and so forth, but as an agreement between 
republican institutions and the national erests of 
U.S. trade and investment. In this form, even the 
'*Open Door" and related U.S. challenges to Britain 
and British licy were a deformed expression of 
U.S. revolutionary (capitalist-republican) tradition 
springing from the source of U.S. industrial progress. 
Its contradiion was that, in its opsition to Roths- 
childs, Credit Lyonnais, and so forth, American licy 
was anti-monetarist in respe to its opnents, while 
already itself expressed in an increasingly monetarist 
form. 

The turning- was Versailles. The Versailles 
Treaty's German war-reparations provision was the 
crucial problem. Either Germany was encouraged to 
resume industrial development, therefore requiring 
levels of wages, working conditions, social services, 
and investment capital adequate to that purse, or 
the prosed and adopted war reparations would loot 
Germany of the variable and constant capital of even 
its existing, stalled labor force and industry. The 
former licy, which meant a general capitalist 



recovery of the classical type, would have required 
the U.S. to write off. in one guise or another, rtions 
of the debts of Britain, France, and other allied 
countries. The choice was either to prop up the Wall 
Street financiers through the leverage of Germany's 
imssible war reparations, or to have an economic 
recovery. Versailles chose In favor of Rockefeller, et 
al. The Allies at Versailles chose in favor of an early 
general economic collapse, a collapse which the 
Dawes Plan stned, but could not prevent. 

So, the United States slammed down all but the 
smallest gates of Ellis Island, instituted such 
atrocities as the "Palmer Raids," and, after a brief 
stwar depression, settled in for a period of the s 
growing dionysiac frenzies. 

Objeively, from the Whig stand, there were 
good reasons to go to the  of war with Great 
Britain during the early s, Bust up the colonial 
system, rid the world economy of the ison of ster- 
ling indebtedness, create elbowroom and a significant 
further purging of the sick monetary system, scrap 
the German war reparations, and get a dollar system 
moving in a way to salvage as much as was viable to 
provide the basis for significant further industrial 
expansion. 

Friion between the U.S. and Britain on the Soviet 
issue, which the  Lippmann exaggerates and dis- 
torts in behalf of the tentative form of agreement with 
Stalin being considered prior to the successful Los 
Alamos testing of "The Bomb," erseed such 
impulses within U.S. licy. From the U.S. stand, 
it was one thing to bust up the Bolshevik Revolution 

and that sort of thing; it was quite a different matter 
to turn the real estate over to Britain just at the time 
that the U.S. was attempting to reduce Britain's status 
definitively to that of a junior partner ~ if there was to 
be a partnership at all. As soon as it became clear that 
the Soviet republic was a going concern, the same 
impulses which evoked the Rapallo perspeive 
among German industrialists were experienced in a 
milder way in the USA. 

Broadly, the United States of the s wished to 
return to the pre- period's industrial-boom times. 
The industrialists and the pulation generally 
hungered for technological progress. Versailles was a 
failure, and everyone either knew it or sensed it. 
Europe was dying economically. Wilson had been a 
fool who had shamed the United States before the 
world with his sententious hycritical babblings. 

The disgust with the babbling Wilson and Colonel 
House's schemings was comementary to the shame- 
less fascist enthusiasms of John Dewey and the 
broadly corratist utopianism trickling out from the 
Fabian liberals of the New Republic and Progressive 
Party. The Whigs and many others didn't like it, and 







said so by voting Republican  out of hatred for '*Wil- 
sonism'* and Fabianism, without having much clear 
idea of what to do but to try to stop things from drifting 
o the weird condition the Fabians and others were 
prosing. We knew what we weren't going to be , 
pulled o  at least on a few salient s, but we 
had no sitive idea of what to do effeively about the 
downward slide away from the Constitution and the 
Idea of Progress. () 

The significance of the s U.S. foreign licy and 
domestic licy is that it constituted a grudging 
retreat in face of an encroaching foreign and domestic 
licy which was in fa both fascist in impulse and 
treasonous in content. The uncertaies and lack of 
consistency in foreign licy aims during that period 



. The indicated crisis among the anti-Wilson Whigs and their allies 
is exemified by the shocking toleration of the "pre-revisionist" over- 
throw of the U.S. Constitution by Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes. 
Whereas the founding fathers conceived of "sovereignty" as a 
sitive instrument of a humanist licy of capitalist development. 
Holmes' so-called "force" dorine degrades the instrument o a 
self-evident princie of sovereignty-in-itself. (The Holmes-Laski cor- 
resndence is illuminating on this in more ways than the letters 
taken by themselves exicitly state.) Thus, Homes laid the transi- 
tional basis for the rampant revisionist corruption undertaken 
beginning with the Roosevelt administration. Holmes, in the 
nominalist spirit of Dewey's vile Reconstruion in Philosophy, denies 
the existence of universals, and in a way which repudiates and thus 
sets forth to subvert the aive princies embedded in the U.S. Consti- 
tution. Hence, similarly, the notion of mens rea was essentially in- 
comprehensible to Holmes. Refeng to Christopher White's account 
of Colbertisme and its humanist roots, in The Political Economy of the 
American Revolution, the case is made in fa and in respe of the 
ent and content of the Constitution for a flat rejeion of not only the 
revisionist amoralism now sweeping the U.S. Department of Justice 
and federal courts, but also for Holmes* dorines and their 
derivations. The founding fathers were anti-monetarist humanists, 
committed to perfeion through the means of the general education 
and praice of an energetic advancement of produive technologies, 
and defining the need for a praical universality, the centralized 
state, as the common instrument indispensable to the enabling of such 
progress. 

The individual is obliged to contribute in praice and through the 
self-development of his capacities for praice, to the advancement of 
the society in behalf of its citizens and the sterity. The society, in 
turn, is obliged by its self-erest to foster and prote such forms of 
self-development and praice. The right of the state to exist and be 
preserved is not axiomatic, but flows from the need for the state to 
fulfill a defined funion, and the obligation of the individual to prote 
that funion efficiently to the extent of defining the self-erests of 
such a state as his own self-erests. 

The founding fathers believed in the existence of a natural law, and 
a human community, which natural law was man's right and obliga- 
tion to perfe his human existence. The state, the particular society 
within humanity, has the rights of sovereignty insofar as it is the in- 
strument of that natural law. The state, to sacrifice the distinions 
for the sake of the summary argument, is the instrument of the 
society. The distinion between the democratic state  which the 
founding fathers rightly rejeed on the combined basis of historical 
knowledge and corroborating experience  and the republic, is that 
the democratic state confuses the immediate majority of a pulation 
with the ongoing existence of that pulation. Hence, Federalist Tom 
Paine, among others, rightly and vigorously rejeed a democracy as 
being as tentially evil as a monarchy, as tending to the same errors. 
The republic is constituted to force refleion on the whole erest of 



 

is not that the U.S. lacked a licy, but that it had two 
wrong foreign licies in constant contention. The 
first, the vestiges of a self-erested Federalist- Whig- 
Republican licy, had been made ineffeive except 
as a rallying-ground for resistance against a Fabian- 
corratist monetarist licy that was thoroughly evil. 

The breakdown of the monetary order during - 
, and the immediate economic sequelae of that 
monetary failure broke the will of America to continue 
to resist the fascist impulse. Franklin Delano Roose- 
velt, beginning in , attempted to exoit the shock- 
effes of the social crisis to attempt to roduce con- 
sciously fascist licies, and obtained instead a com- 
promise, a thinly disguised corratism litely 
termed the **New Deal." 



the current society and its sterity, to ensure that whole erest 
against the whims of an episodic majority. The seleion of President, 
of Congress, and Federal Courts was to ensure that the true erest of 
the whole society and its sterity was enforced, not by any arbitrary 
standard, but according to the standard of the humanist Idea of 
Progress. 

The proper heart of U.S. constitutional law is truth. By enforcing a 
standard of refleive search for truth in the highest institutions of 
Federal republican government, the decisions reached in smaller 
matters are supied a yardstick and method by which their ap- 
proximate agreeableness to truth is imsed. The sovereignty of a 
humanist republic is not a mere thing, an entity, but a process; it is 
the egrity of that process which is the only rightful location of the 
rights of sovereignty in its momentary aspe as a thing. 

The aive bearing of the Holmes "force" perversion un the in- 
capacities of the s Whigs is that, although at each moment those 
things to be defended have the momentary appearance of something 
which is or should be a norm for corresnding, indicated praice, 
these norms are not permanent, self-evident existences. To fail to 
comprehend that is to fall back o feudal-aristotelianizing or the 
relatively bestial monotony of a more primitive or degenerated form 
of society. The distinion of living processes from their corresnd- 
ing, non-living chemical imitations, is that the living process is 
essentially charaerized by negentropy. This is expressed in the 
extreme by the creative capabilities of human thought, the fun- 
damental distinion between man and the lowere beasts. Human 
thought, like any lawful negentropic continuum, is causally rigorous 
respeing the chain leading from the a, through ripes radiating 
from the a o ultimately universal consequences. However, just 
because the cumulative effe of successful sitive innovation is to 
change the geometry of efficient relations, the sets of rules of 
relationship which are properly determining for one ech of develop- 
ment are different from those of the receding and succeeding echs. 
Ho wever, the causal lawfulness joining those successive echs 
through human praice is coherent throughout. Such lawfulness is 
properly expressed not in terms of its specific form in any echal 
state, but in respe of its determination of the successive ordering of 
echs. 

Hence, the proper simicity of the U.S. Constitution. Prudent 
compromises refleed in the comsition passed by, the Constitution 
defines essentially the Federal State as the sovereign instrument for 

I 

realizing the princie of the Idea of Progress. Taken in that essence, 
the Constitution and subsumed development of U.S. law has a funda- 
mental and corre distinion of princie from the notion of a body of 
common law, from Roman law, and is in absolute opsition to princi- 
es of feudal law. 

The Whigs' insensibility of the fa that Holmes, in particular, was 
tearing the Constitution to shreds, refleed their insensibility of the 
nature of the praical erest of the nation which was thus and other- 
wise being aced in peril. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



 

Wilson, Roosevelt, Kennedy, 
Carter and War 



There is a crucial feature of the twentieth cen- 
tury history of the Democratic and Repubfican 
parties which must be considered in analyzing the pre- 
sent century's foreign-licy problems. Since the 
Spanish-American War, it has been the Democratic 
Party White House which  rightly or wrongly  has 
sent the nation to war. Wilson got us o World War I 
and laid the broad preconditions for World War II. 
Franklin Roosevelt's administration's licies 
created the immediate conditions under which we 
were impelled o war against Japan and Germany, 
and then gained acclaim for fighting the war imsed 
un us. A Rockefeller-influenced State Department 
under Truman set up the Korean War. A Kennedy 
administration unleashed a wave of horrors  the 
Congo adventure, the Bay of Pigs, the  missile 
crisis, the Berlin affair, attempted and aual assassi- 
nations of nominal adversaries and allies alike, 
Vietnam, and had Kennedy lived, a continuing, 
escalating wave of confrontations leading o a  
Kissinger '^brinkmanship" dorine unge toward 
World Warm. 

Going back o the nineteenth century, although 
Lincoln led the nation in the Civil War, it was the 
treason of the Rothschild protege, the Buchanan White 
House, capping the aions of a series of Democratic 
Party administrations beginning with Andrew Jack- 
son, which created the Confederacy and the asso- 
ciated British effort to destroy this nation. 
The role of Rockefeller proteges  Dean Acheson, 

John Foster Dulles, Dean Rusk, Henry Kissinger, and 
others  in the U.S. State Department, and Rocke- 
feller proteges  Allen Dulles, McGeorge Bundy, and 
others  in direing the evolution and licies of the 
elligence establishment  is most relevant to the 
problem. The Rockefellers' role in creating the 
Kennedy administration with the aid of eleion fraud 
and in creating the Carter Administration by means of 
a monstrous eleion fraud, combined with relevant 
blackmail threatened against an incumbent President 



 sheds most essential light on the conneion be- 
tween the Democratic Party White House and wars. 

Globally, in the history of modern European culture 
going back o the Renaissance period, it has been the 
vigorous pursuit of a licy-aim governed by what we 
today describe as a monetarist licy, which has been 
the predominant cause for nearly every period of war- 
fare and major war in modern history. Nationally, it is 
the fa that since Andrew Jackson, the so-called 
'iiberal" faion of the national Democratic Party has 
been the Tory instrument of a purely monetarist 
licy, which is key to the correlation between that 
Party in the White House and getting our nation o 
wars. 

It is that conneion and the way in which mone- 
tarist and pro-industrialist faions and tendencies 
have conflied and compromised during this century 
(most notably), which is key to proving and under- 
standing the lawfulness of that correlation. 

Genuine economic development is in the most 

fundamental self-erest of every nation. Moreover, 
the genuine economic development of every other 
nation is in the fundamental erest of each nation 
and the human race as a whole. Consequently, to the 
extent that the U.S. or any other dominant were pur- 
sues a combined, mutually consistent domestic and 
foreign licy of global genuine economic develop- 
ment, of technologically veored expansion of in- 
dustry and agriculture, in the tradition of Benjamin 
Franklin and the Federalists, that were's licy is 
coordinate with the underlying fundamental erests 
of the people of every other nation, and is thus the 
basis; and the most effeive licy for global peace. 

The included problematic feature which cannot be 
solved by that licy alone is the fa that govern- 
ments and the aual erests of the governed nations 
do not necessarily coincide. The difficulty, in the 
lesser part, is that the wrong perception of national 
erests by some governments is predominantly a 
matter of ignorance and delusions. In such cases the 







optimal course for avoiding war is to adopt the maxi- 
mum restra tolerable in the course of the effort to 
bring the opinion of eng governments and pular 
opinion o conformity with reason. In the most 
imrtant part, the faion which governs a nation is 
not susceptible of the ordinary means of influence of 
reason, because the government faion represents a 
special self-erest fundamentally antagonistic to the 
fundamental economic erests of its own nation as a 
whole. Such governments represent an obstacle which 
must be removed in the general world erest. In such 
causes the proper foreign licy of the United States 
toward such a government is emphatically ^'Clause- 
witzian, 

When such obstacles are in the form of the govern- 
ing faion of a relatively weak were, an aggressive 
world climate of industrial and agricultural tech- 
nological progress sets o motion the processes 
under which the obstacle may be removed efficiently 
by force if necessary. The use of military force may be 
avoided in such cases if the opnent can be induced 
to bend to the economic and related forces, be induced 
to adapt to a pro-development orientation, and so 
evolve a modified nature and perception of self- 
erests consistent with both global erests and real 

national erests. 

Such obstacles, such tential adversaries are those 
faional erests which represent the special in- 
terests of either pre-capitalist institutions, or an anti- 
industrial monetarist impulse. In the case that such a 
reaionary or monetarist force represents a major 
were  such as the eighteenth and nineteenth cen- 
tury English monarchy, or Czarist Russia  only in- 
ternal litical transformation or war, or revolutions 
fostered by the circumstances of war, will ordinarily 
suffice. 

The twentieth century governments of the United 
States have not, as a whole, corresnded to either 
category. The impulse for national and global 
technological progress, the heritage of our American 
Revolution and Constitution, has been centered as an 
impulse in the industrial-capitalist erests and in 
traditionalist trade-union forces, with suprt from 
those technologically progressive agricultural strata 
oriented to the role of U.S. agricultural exrts in the 
world market. These echoes of our Federalist foun- 
dations are pitted against a Tory monetarist force 
gathered presently around the Rockefeller faion, 
and suprted by that faion's pular base among 
the liberal and so-called left-radical strata associated 
with both the Republican and, most emphatically, the 
liberal wing of the Democratic Party. 

The so-called conservatives in both major parties  
excepting Rockefeller's own Buckley and Larry 
McDonald varieties  predominantly represent the 



 

pro-development, or American tradition and tendency 
for perception of self-erests. These conservative 
industrialist, trade-union, and agricultural strata may 
be seized by a badly misdireed perception of 
national erests on many issues, but under appro- 
priate circumstances they are susceptible of corre- 
ing such errors through the force of reason. The Tory 
faion  the Rockefeller-linked liberals of both 
parties and their lunatic-radical fringes inside and out- 
side the parties  represent a monetarist erest 
which is not susceptible of the influence of reason. 

The further comication is that the nominal 
holdings of the pro-development capitalist forces are 
dependently erlinked in many short-term aspes 
with the national and ernational monetary insti- 
tutions controlled by the Rockefellers and their allies. 
For this reason, the pro-development capitalist 
currents are delimited in the scope of their opsition 
to the Rockefeller-led forces. Their pro-development 
impulse is usually expressed as resistance to the most 
outrageous pro-monetarist innovations, especially in 
domestic licies. This resistance has the charaer of 
attempted Whig reforms within the ruling monetarist 
order, rather than an effort to overturn the monetarist 
order in favor of American Federalist princies. To 
the extent that these capitalist strata are imprisoned 
in fa and in perception by these circumstances, they 
are reluantly induced to tolerate and suprt the 
monetarist institutions' erests as a matter of 
defending their own perceived nominal wealth. 

Such comications taken o account, the conser- 
vative current of the Republican Party tends to repre- 
sent the bastion and rallying- for a pro-develop- 
ment erest in both domestic and foreign licy  
heretofore, emphatically in respe of domestic 
licy. To the extent that such conservative Republi- 
can licy-thrusts are allied with major seions of the 
trade-union and related social forces, that aual or de 
fao alliance provides the basis for a coalition with 
conservative Democratic Party forces on such issues. 
That tendency within U.S. litical life has been the 
principal tendency for effeive restra operating 
against the Tory forces. 

Nonetheless, because the capitalist constituent of 
such pro-development alliances has located its in- 
terests otherwise within the terms of the monetarist 
national and ernational institutions and licies, 
the conservative wings of the Republican and Demo- 
cratic parties have heretofore regarded themselves as 
compelled, however reluantly at times, to serve 
monetarist erests domestically and abroad. 

That is the content of what has been euphemistically 
defined as a ''bi-partisan foreign licy." The idea 
that our nation ought to have a clear domestic 
majority for the crucial features of its foreign licy 







 

 by itself a commendable aspiration  has been per- 
verted by the Tories o threatening their opnents 
with charges of at least obstruionist and even ten- 
tially treasonous condu, should they refuse to sup- 
rt those licies which have been often in fa 
direly contrary to genuine U.S. national erests. 
One is reminded of the commonly heard, fraudulent 
argument: an individual, unable to maain rational 
defense for the licy he is demanding, accuses his 
critic: **If you would only stop disagreeing with me, 
we could both get something done.*' 

The content of this wretched "bi-partisan foreign 
licy*' dorine has been that the conservative Con- 
gressional opsition is thus deemed obliged to rally 
behind a Tory White House, or a Republican Presi- 
dency is deemed obliged to stay within the constras 
of the liberal, Tory faion of the Congress. It also has 
come to mean that a Republican President may re- 
fle conservative erests on condition that Rocke- 
feller creatures not only occupy such crucial Cabinet 
offices as Justice, State, and Treasury, maain a 
Rockefeller-controlled National Security Council nest 
within the White House itself, but also consent to the 
flagrantly unconstitutional praice of according 
Rockefeller-controlled Executive agencies de fao 
**Fourth Branch of Government*' autonomy with res- 
pe to the Presidency itself. 

Accordingly, since the Republican and Democratic 
parties* pro-development, anti-Tory base comes more 
immediately o confli with the atrocities of mone- 
tarist licies at home, it has been in domestic licy, 
through predominantly rearguard opsition to 
liberal swindles, that the aual erests of the nation 
have been relatively best defended. Otherwise, 
although these conservatives opse the most obvious 
sorts of liberal swindles in such matters of foreign 
licy as agricultural exrts and obvious efforts to 
loot the U.S. Treasury to lowere Manhattan's ad- 
vantage, the conservatives tend otherwise to submit to 
the most basic aspes of established monetarists* 
licies in foreign affairs. 

Because of the pro-development thrust of 
Republican and Democratic conservatives centered 
within the Republican Party, that party does not 
funion as an efficient initiator of the wildest of the 
monetarists' innovations and adventures either at 
home or abroad. Consequently, when the Rockefeller 
and allied forces, or their predecessors, wished to 
launch a new sort of major swindle in foreign licy, 
or launch a series of wild adventures to that effe, the 
corresnding Wall Street forces concentrated their 
financial, litical, press and related muscle to bring 
a liberal Democrat o the White House, and attempt- 
ed to push through correlated adjustments of the 



correlations of faional forces in the Congress and 
federal courts. 

Hence, the lawful correlation between a liberal 
Democrat in the White House and U,S. tendencies for 
involvement in wars. 

The broadest irony of this pattern over, especially, 
the present century, is that not only does the Tory 
foreign licy represent a dire violation of the ent 
of the Constitution and the nation's most vital in- 
terests, but the combination of industrialists, trade- 
union, farmer and other pro-development currents 
represents a combination which has always represent- 
ed the overwhelming majority of the eleorate and of 
mobilizable litical forces. This properly dires 
attention to the historical fa that the Tory faion's 
were has been based un breaking-up aual and 
tential alliances between pro-development in- 
dustrialist and labor-movement forces. 

The central feature of that dividing of pro-develop- 
ment litical forces is the role of primitive accu- 
mulation in driving the industrialists and the labor 
movement o embittered opsition to one another. 

Insofar as this problem is located in inadequate 
general consciousness of its nature, Karl Marx 
himself has been partially to blame. Not because 
Marx prosed the mistaken perceptions which have 
governed the wereful ideological influence exerted 
cumulatively by the (admittedly, usually tiny) social- 
ist forces within the labor movement, but because 
Marx's notable errors gave tacit consent to licies 
and influences otherwise direly contrary to his most 
fundamental strategic-litical conceptions. 

Out of respe for the usefulness of the concept at 
issue, we are obliged to corre Marx himself 
unequivocally on the  at issue. 

Although Marx did not go so far as his self-designat- 
ed epigones usually allege him to have done on this 
, Marx did commit the historical blunder of fa 
in viewing the early nineteenth century English 
economy as an approximate, clinical model of critical 
reference for adducing lawful princies of capitalist 
development. This error refles the fa, pervasively 
demonstrated throughout Marx's writings, that he 
was largely ignorant of the twelfth through seven- 
teenth centuries* history of the process by which 
capitalism in fa emerged from the development of 
Renaissance humanism. For those reasons of 
ignorance, he credulously accepted the absolutely 
wrong and misleading view that, at least for purses 
of acceptable approximation, the emergence of 
capitalist development could be traced empirically in 
terms of beginnings in Holland and England during 
the last half of the seventeenth century. 

Marx would have been compelled to discard such 







isonous misassumptions had he been informed of 
the principal features and issues of the American 
Revolution. Although he was appreciative of the early- 
nineteenth century Whig economist Carey, his general 
view of the U.S. was limited to both the Civil War 
period, and the preceding decades during which U.S. 
foreign and domestic licies were usually and 
predominantly controlled by British agents con- 
trolling the Democratic Party. 

For such reasons, Marx*s rtrait of the thrust of 
industrial-capitalist impulses is entirely mistaken. He 
reicates the tendency for st hoc ergo propter hoc 
rationalization of the succession of apparent develop- 
ment which Hegel earlier committed in respe to 
regarding slave-based economy as a necessary phase 
in the succession of human social evolution. Although 
Marx rightly deprecated Hegel for that method- 
ological blunder, he in fa committed an analogous 
historiographical blunder himself. He did not re- 
cognize the fa of the American Revolution: that 
the dominant forms of the Dutch and English 
monetarist-ruled economy of Europe were already in 
their time reaionary forms representing the con- 
sequences of the counterrevolutionary viory of an 
anti-capitalist impulse over the capitalist trans- 
formations most centrally focussed in the English 
Tudors and Colbertian France. By remaining un- 
sensible of such crucial historical fas, Marx tends to 
draw a smoothed curve of the upward process of 
capitalist development through a series of s 
which in themselves represent a grave fallacy of 
comsition. 

Although Marx was corre in respe to all his 
critics and competitors concerning the systematic 
princies of capitalist produion, circulation and 
capital-in-general, he fell o fallacies of comsi- 
tion in respe of those matters which had to be un- 
derstood in terms of the aual historical process of 
capitalist development. 

For exame, if Marx had been informed of the 
litical-economic history of the fifteenth and six- 
teenth centuries, or of the aual imications of the 
fall of the English Commonwealth and Colbert, and 
had also been confronted with the principal fas of the 
American Revolution, he would have criticized the 
despicable Adam Smith from an entirely different 
stand than one reads in Marx*s Theories of 
Surus Value, and would have understood David 
Ricardo much less naively than Capital as a whole 
refles. 

The immediately relevant  demanding such 
parenthetical observation is that the charaeristics of 
the early nineteenth century British developments 
were determined from the top by the massive debt 



 

which the Barings, Rothschilds and others held over 
both England and continental Europe, and by the 
coordinate monetarist charaer of the English 
monarchy. For this reason, the economic relations 
and related social features of English development (in 
particular) during the Naleonic wars and following 
the Treaty of Vienna were not determined by any 
oppressive burdens of industrial capitalist develop- 
ment as such, but by the monstrous tax of debt service 
created outside the ernal mechanisms of industrial 
growth. 

This correlated direly with every charaeristic 
feature of continental Europe. 

Although France of  included a kernel of gifted 
thinkers in the tradition of the sixteenth century 
litiques and Colbert, those able republicans were 
blocked with the comicity of British agents such as 
Danton and Marat, from affording revolutionary 
France the kind of sound economic and related repub- 
lican licies which would have made the French 
Revolution a success on the lines of the existing model 
of the American Revolution's experience. 

This insight is aided by an honest representation of 
the relationship and included difficulties of Federalist 
Tom Paine within the French Revolution. Through the 
litical backwardness of France  relative to the 
higher cultural level of the American workingmen and 
farmers of , the illiteracy of the sansculottes and 
the cultural enfeeblement of the French peasantry  
the related repetition of the worst blunders of the 
English Commonwealth to the most extreme degree 
and the faional viory of a blundering attempt at 
inappropriate Jacobin democracy effeed the con- 
sequent emergence of diatorship. The Naleonic 
France which emerged from the chaos fomented by 
British agents and incompetent revolutionary licies 
was a mixture of capitalist republican thrusts for tech- 
nological development  Colbertism, and so forth  
combined with a tendency for the same errors which 
had defeated the English Commonwealth and had 
caused Louis XIV's undoing of the Colbert effort. 

France's foreign licy under Naleon, rather than 
fostering independent capitalist republics, rather 
than destroying bucolic obscenities  such as the 
Hapsburgs  and outlawing monarchy and 
aristocracy, created the means for its own destruion 
in the form of an effeively monetarist foreign licy, 
and an insane reallitiking approach to alliances 
with these bucolic obscenities which had to be 
destroyed if France's self-erests were to prevail 
against British monetarist licies. 

In consequence, the Hanoverian obscenity and the 
City of London prevailed over the European continent, 
turning the litical clock of history backwards in the 







 

form of the British **agent of influence/* the Holy 
Alliance. As we have noted above, this control of 
continental Europe included not only the litical and 
related military **checks and balances" of the 
^'concert of Europe," but those means, which could 
not otherwise have succeeded as long as they did, 
were regulated by the system of debts which the City 
of London imsed un st- Europe, and the 
manipulation of the debt-strapped regimes of Europe 
through, principally, Rothschild control of the 
availability of credit in respe to the various en- 
terprises of litical and economic licy. 

It was these conditions which produced the specific 
pattern of primitive accumulation in Great Britain 
and on the continent during the early nineteenth 
century. 

The tato crises of the s in Ireland and Ger- 
many are a dire refleion of that monetarist- 
diated licy, and had nothing to do with industrial- 
capitalist development as such. The British 
monetarists' primitive accumulation licy for 
Ireland, the germ-model for the *'deindustrial- 
ization" and related licies of Rockefeller's Carter 
Administration today, involved stripping Ireland of its 
relatively higher-technology form of agricultural 
produion through substituting the ensive use of 
the tato. The same licy was roduced o parts 
of Germany. Through the tato monoculture praice 
in Ireland, and similar effes in Germany, the 
natural results developed. The attempt to use a 
"natural," **lowere energy" mode of cheaper nutrition 
of the pulation through the degradation of much of 
the pulation to "tato-eaters," had inevitable 
effes un the soil and also created the forcing- 
conditions under which the tato disease exoded  
as the Rothschilds* fostering of the slave-antation 
methods of "low energy" cotton produion produced 
the boll weevil ague and the destruion of the 
preconditions for successful agriculture in those 
regions of the U.S. southern states. Hence, the mon- 
strous genocide among the Irish pulation of the 
s and correlated, if relatively more buffered 
conditions in Germany. 

The tato crisis symptomizes the entire sperum 
of the effes of the British monetarists' consciously 
Malthusian economic and social licy of the 
nineteenth century. 

This set of primitive-accumulation correlatives was 
not in any respe an expression of industrial- 
capitalist development. 

Capitalist development originated in Tudor Eng- 
land, was on the verge of being consciously roduced 
to sixteenth century France, was attempted under 
Colbert in seventeenth century France, and was 



developed by the followeres and collaborators of 
Benjamin Frankin in the course of the American 
Revolution. This development of capitalism was a 
consciously humanist conception, (Humanism has 
nothing to do with, but is absolutely the enemy of the 
bestialist licies professed in the misappropriated 
name of "humanism" by the pragmatist wretches of 
the Humanist Society and the Ethical Union.) From 
the outset, capitalist development was consciously 
anti-primitive-accumulation. This licy was not an 
accidentally sitive feature of the Tudor initiation of 
capitalist development, but refleed their ap- 
propriate, if preliminary, insight o the fundamental 
laws and self-erests of national economies. The 
persistence of primitive accumulation praices in 
modern history has consistently originated with anti- 
industrial-capitalist erests. 

Gresham and others recognized immediately and 
absolutely that the advancement of the material 
conditions of life and the aggressive technological 
education of the labor force as a whole was an indis- 
pensable precondition both for capitalist develop- 
ment and for the sustained augmentation of real 
national wealth. The same thrust predominated 
among the Franklin-instigated Federalist movement 
in the USA. The notion of augmenting capitalist in- 
comes at the expense of the necessary material and 
cultural conditions of life of the labor force is as alien 
to industrial-capitalist self-erest as a whole as 
smashing the machinery of produion in order there- 
by to augment the annual profits of corrations from 
the sale of the resulting scrap. 

It was as the monetarist faions gained were, first 
in Holland, then, especially after , in England, and 
then first in  and, again, most notably after  in 
the United States, that the licy of squeezing of the 
industrial capitalists by monetarist debt licies 
produced not only exacerbated looting of primary 
resources, but, worse, the squeezing of additional 
margins of capitalist income from the necessary 
material and cultural conditions of life of the labor 
force. 

To put the issue of primitive accumulation against 
primary resources out of the way, the following should 
be noted before resuming concentration on the 
problem of the industrial-labor litical alliance. 

As we have repeatedly developed this crucial  
in numerous published locations, including the 
author's textbook on litical economy, () primary 
resources are not a permanently preordained set of 



. Lyn Marcus (a.k.a. Lyndon H. LaRouche), Dialeical Economics 
(Lexington, Mass.: D.C. Heath and Co., ), pp. -, -,  
if., passim. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



forms of "natural wealth.'* Primary resources as such 
are always defined by the technology of produion of 
a culture for a relatively limited span of its develop- 
ment. In each case, any specific primary resource so 
defined is necessarily relatively finite in respe of the 
effeive social cost of its procurement. This relative 
finiteness may or may not be expressed as the 
phenomenon of relative deetion of such a resource 
as development proceeds. In any case, the problem is 
solved by technological progress to modes of 
produion which are thermodynamically negentropic 
relative to preceding modes. It is by increasing the 
negentropy of the mode of produion, that the in- 
creased energy thus apied to produion and con- 
sumption per capita constantly enlarges the total 
primary resources available, while qualitatively and 
Quantitatively redefining the sperum of primary 

resources as a whole. 
For exame, again, Tudor England. The most 

serious obstacle to crawling out of the conditions of the 
England of the fifteenth century was that England had 
to supersede a de fao licy of **solar energy*' and 
**biomass'* as its energy licy. To solve this, the 
Tudors roduced the large scale use of a new energy 
source, fossil fuel  coal, thus avoiding the catas- 
trophes which must have resulted from continuation 
of a medieval culture's reliance un **solar" and 
"biomass" (wood and charcoal) energy licies. 

Similarly, in contrast to the efforts of the Rocke- 
fellers and their neo-Fabian henchmen, the Tudors 
initiated the efforts to develop the steam engine  
freeing basic economy from dependence un such 
outdated contrivances as windmills. 

To return to the main focus of our concern here, 
although the precise measurement of the **equili- 
brium-value" separating primitive accumula- 
tion from redistribution of proper profit as wages, is 
presently beyond the means of existing institu- 
tions in praice, the maenance of household 
income, social services, leisure (e.g., education) at 
levels consonant with the developing of a labor force 
suited to tomorrow's more-advanced technology ef- 
fes a corresnding tendency for **social equilibri- 
ation" in the relations between industrial capital and 
labor. That was the gist of the approach to this 
problem by Gresham et al., and the thrust of licy of 
Franklin's collaborators. Such an incomes licy does 
not preclude strikes and so forth. It does provide the 
circumstances of perceived respeive self-erests 
and corresnding praices in which the settlement 
of strikes and other industrialist-labor negotiations 
become the "molecular process" of aving at the 
properly adjusted trends in wages, working conditions 
and social services. 



 

Otherwise, when the element of primitive accu- 
mulation is roduced to industrialist-labor relations, 
through a massive debt burden direly and indirely 
imsed un industries, agriculture and government 
agencies, the confli between industrialists and labor 
must tend to become a profound litical crisis. 

That  is key to the Roosevelt administration. 

The Roosevelt administration became a ssibility 
through a process of monetary decay in the ernal 
U.S. economy over the period -. The effes of 
that monetary decay were transmitted through debt 
overhangs, as a primitive-accumulation licy im- 
sed un industrialists, to exacerbating of manage- 
ment-labor relations, unemoyment, and associated 
matters. In consequence, the Republican Party, which 
had maained the White House during the - 
period through suprt of black voters and large 
rtions of the labor movement, lost its traditional 
labor-black social base to the Democratic Party 
during -. 

Roosevelt, by using corratist methods  e.g., the 
NRA  and by emulating the Hitler regime's Ar- 
beitsdienst in forms such as the WPA, CCC, and so 
forth, took credit for the autocannibalistic process of 
modest recovery of -, and called the whole 
unwholesome mass the **New Deal." 

It is a wretched delusion to imagine that Roosevelt's 
licies in any significant way contributed to an eco- 
nomic recovery during the middle of the s. Once 
the process of liquidating some of the weakest 
financial paper and other bankrupt property titles had 
been effeed by approximately , and especially 
beginning , the shattered economy made an 
automatic upturn in levels of numerical emoyment. 
The marginal source of the wealth for this semi- 
recovery was the looting of stored-up real value 
caed forward from the pre- period. Physical 
ant and inventories were run down, and, as in Nazi 
Germany, levels of wages and working conditions 
were pushed substantially below those of the earlier 
period. Both the produive capacities of industries 
and the tential produivity of the labor force were 
savagely deeted during the - period. This 
was demonstrated by the mass of comas in 
rerts on the war mobilization begun in late  and 
during . The produion tential of ant and 
labor was far below the levels of . This decline 
represented a looting of industry and labor force, of 
operating - ant and labor force overall at 
levels of maenance below that needed to maain 
them at pre-existing levels of produive tential. It 
was that margin of looting of the pre- build-up of 
produive forces which provided the thin margins of 
primitive-accumulation profits on which the de- 







 

pressed U.S. economy stumbled miserably through 
the economic autocannibalization of the - 
period. 

The Roosevelt administration's corratist licies 
of primitive accumulation ensified the bitterness 
between labor and industry, an industry pularly 
identified with Morgan and the Republican Party, 
Roosevelt, chiefly with the aid of Fabian operative 
Sidney Hillman, kept the emerging organized labor 
movement within the Democratic Party. Organized 
labor  egged on beginning in  by the Communist 
Party  suprted Roosevelt's diluted fascist primi- 
tive-accumulation licies of government and finance, 
and viewed the results of their suprt of such licies 
as all the more reason to hate the Republicans. By and 
large, the Republicans fell o the same scenario- 
trap, as did the industrialists. 

The litical princies involved are by no means a 
pecularity of the - period. The American 
Revolution was based un an alliance forged by 
Franklin, Adams, Tom Paine and others, between pro- 
development capitalist forces and urban labor, 
dragging farmers along behind. The Lincoln govern- 
ment was based on an alliance among industrialists, 
urban labor, and the new farm strata emerging 
around the growing ernational role of U.S. grain 
produion. The - conflis  and the con- 
ditions preceding those eruptions  were the result of 
a massive debt-accumulation, which broke apart the 
Lincoln social base of the Federalist-Whig-Republican 
current. 

The same princie underlay the coalition of 
litical and social forces which charaerized the 
period of the reign of Tudor Elizabeth I up through 
. 

Such litical coalitions of capitalists and labor can 
exist and funion effeively only under the condition 
that the industrialist alliance is based on a conscious- 
ness of the princies involved, and when constituted 
as an anti-monetarist force. The Tudor development 
of capitalism was based un an alliance of English 
forces for a conscious licy of forced technological 
progress, against the well-defined monetarist enemy 
(Fugger-Hapsburg) and monetarist licies. The 
American Revolution was an alliance forged by 
Benjamin Franklin and his collaborators, an alliance 
of pro-development capitalist and urban labor forces 
against the Hanoverian monetarist enemy, and 
against the hated monetarist licies otherwise set 
forth in Adam Smith's despicable Wealth of Nations, 
The Lincoln administration was built un a rear- 
ticulation of Federalist anti-monetarist licies, a 
Lincoln licy immediately incorrating the con- 
verging features of Henry Clay and Carey. Whenever 



such a consciously anti-monetarist licy is lost or 
otherwise abandoned, the coalition must tend to 
disperse, and monetarism and monetarist licy 
easily insinuates itself and then prevails. 

This princie is obviously not something we have 
just now uncovered. If more persons would seriously 
read Karl Marx's Communist Manifesto, and waste 
less energy professing to be frightened by its pular 
misrepresentation, they would discover that Marx 
prosed there the establishment of a German 
national capitalist republic. Indeed, the German 
capitalists' earlier choice of Karl Marx, over the 
alternate candidate, Friedrich List, to edit their Neue 
Rheinische Zeitung, was not a refleion of any 
misunderstanding of one another's commitments. The 
Communist Manifesto not only proses the establish- 
ment of a German national capitalist republic, but 
sets forth a conscious licy under which the German 
working class was to be mobilized as an independent 
litical force as an indispensable agency to secure 
capitalist success. Marx's licy toward the United 
States during the s and s is identical in 
strategic princie to the licy of the Communist 
Manifesto. As leader of the International Working- 
men's Association (IWMA), he performed a signi- 
ficant catalytic role in contributing toward the viory 
of the U.S. against the Rothschild-direed forces then 
attempting to destroy our nation. () 

The viable independent litical role of the labor 
movement develops, as Marx specified correly in 
the Communist Manifesto, through the conscious 
struggle to realize the litical and economic ten- 
tialities of capitalist development. That licy is 
correly rooted in the fa that the form of extended 
reproduion proper to industrial capitalism and to 
socialism is identical in every respe but the hetero- 
nomic litical form of capitalist ownership of the 
basic means of produion and distribution. 

As long as industrial capitalism fulfills its self- 
erested funion of technologically advancing 
enlargement of the produive forces, with the private 



. Marx's role in conneion with the U.S. Civil War was at least suf- 
ficiently effeive that the injured Rothschilds  Lincoln's viory 
was their first major defeat in history  expended large sums and the 
coordinated efforts of their entire House, including their creation of 
the Bakuninist anarchist movement, in the effort to wreck the 
IWMA and ace Marx himself under a virtually total containment, 
from which Marx personally virtually never escaped throughout the 
remainder of his life. As for Lincoln himself, they assassinated him. 
Once the truth is recognized concerning the German and Austrian 
social democratic leaderships of the nineteenth century, the true 
extent of the containment against Marx funded and most prominently 
coordinated by, first, the Rothschilds and then the Rothschild- 
spawned Fabian Society begins to be appreciated. Rockefeller 
praice of buying up and even sometimes creating "leftist" organiz- 
ations in job-lot quantities is by no means a twentieth century in- 
novation. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



ownership feature included, a socialist transformation 
is unfeasible. The socialist transformation properly 
occurs either because the capitalists abort industrial 
capitalist development, or because the general pro- 
gress of culture under capitalist development reaches 
the  that capitalist heteronomic forms are 
broadly regarded as obsolete and impediments to 
some specific and urgent task of further extended 
reproduion. 

The question of whether a socialist transformation 
anually occurs at such appropriate junures is a 
subjeive, litical question, a question of whether 
appropriately developed leading institutions of the 
litical labor movement are qualified to undertake 
the successful continuation of those economic and 
related duties which the capitalists have, for one 
reason or another, abandoned. The fragmented 
working class as such could not conceivably assemble 
itself to competently dire a modern economy. 
Hence, socialism becomes a ssibility only if the 
litical labor movement develops the universalizing 
qualities of consciousness and culture needed to 
assume such a task. The school for such tentialities' 
development is the proper role of the litical labor 
movement in allying litically with the industrial 
capitalists against monetarist and other abysmal 
litical forces opsing technological progress and 
economic growth. 

Meanwhile, pending the challenge of assuming sole 
resnsibility for continued technological progress, 
the litical labor movement best defends its own 
erests most fundamentally by allying with indus- 
trial capitalism against monetarism (e.g., against 
Keynesian, Schachtian, Friedmanite obscenities), 
and using its sition as an ally of the industrial 
capitalists as the setting for preventing primitive- 
accumulation licies from developing. 

Prevailing incompetent contrary opinion con- 
cerning this princie arises notably from such in- 
cluded causes as the predominance of lunatic 
socialism among even self-styled Marxian socialist 
organizations, and the teaching of lunatic socialism as 
Marxism in our university survey courses and texts in 
this conneion. The anti-Marx socialists  the 
Utopians, the anarchists, the anarchosyndicalists, and 
by-produs of Fabianism generally  are epis- 
temologically bestialists, who therefore deny the 
primary imrtance of economic growth, tech- 
nological progress, and creative scientific knowledge 
in respe to both society and individual human 
qualities. Their stand is, like that of the authors 
of the Norman Domesday Book, to regard existing 
modes and scales of produion as if admissibly or 
properly fixed, and to reduce everything to conflis 



 

over the shares of **goodies*' in terms of the existing 
scale and mode of produion of wealth. Therefore, the 
very existence of profit, as the necessary basis for 
expansion and technological progress, is at best a 
matter of indifference to them, as it was to the most 
feudal-minded among the French eighteenth century, 
anti-Colbertian Physiocrats. Accordingly, er- 
preting the world and economic processes in terms 
of the most reaionary among eighteenth century 
notions of ground rent, their ground-rent*' socialism 
is premised essentially and axiomatically un the 
bestialists' presumption that the very existence of 
profit is the central issue of confli between the 
capitalists and labor. 

Out of that anti-humanist variety of lunatic or 
''ground-rent" socialism, for which anarchism is the 
purest lunacy, the * 'ground-rent" socialists variously 
prose, according to their degrees of **radicalness," 
the partial or total * 'redistribution" of profit for 
personal household income. 

Marx's view and method are totally opsite to such 
' 'ground-rent" or "egalitarian' ' pseudo-socialism . 
Marx's view demands a maximization of the mass and 

rate of profit  not its elimination. However, Marx 
adds the stipulation that this profit, as capitalist in- 
come, must not be derived from relative surus value 
(primitive accumulation), and that the profit pro- 
duced must be predominantly invested to effe 
enlargement of the scale of produion on a tech- 
nologically more advanced level. 

For such reasons, the Rothschilds, hating Karl 
Marx, created the anarchist movement of wild 
lunatics and terrorist bombers. For such reasons the 
same Rothschilds and their allies created the Fabian 
Society as the principal global litical elligence 
arm of the British Foreign Office. For such reasons, 
Rothschild protege Cecil Rhodes bequeathed his 
estate to found a Rhodes scholarship program, with 
the included testamentary proviso that the purse of 
the program was in part to subvert the United States. 
The Rothschilds may have been evil, but they were not 
therefore lacking in feral qualities of cleverness. They 
understood that their fundamental self-erest was to 
prevent the litical labor movement from entering 
o a conscious, anti-monetarist alliance with in- 
dustrial capitalists. It was not immediately because 
Marx was a socialist that the Rothschilds set out to 
destroy him and his influence; it was because Marx 
had launched an ernational campaign for litical 
labor movement suprt of Abraham Lincoln's 
government. For the same reasons those monetarist 
forces hated Karl Marx, they have funded and other- 
wise aided and fostered lunatic socialist and terrorist 
organizations by the scores in every part of the world. 







 

From the stand we have just developed, the 
nature of the conflis and confusion in U.S. foreign 
licy during the - period  and later can 
be competently appreciated. To regard the - 
period as in some sense merely a state of confusion, as 
Lippmann tends to do, is sweeping incompetence or 
outright historical fraud  or, as in Lippmann's case, 
a varying prortioning of both. 

A brief survey of U.S. wars and related matters 
from  to date pins down this  to the ultimate 
end we have in view in this paper as a whole  of 
defining an alternative foreign licy consistent with 
real U.S. national erests, to reace the bankrupt 
**American Century" or **Atlanticist" dorine. 

The War with Spain expressed two U.S. impulses. 
Although it did embark the United States un an 
imperialist course of development, it also involved an 
element which was consistent with U.S. vital erests. 
Broadly, such contradioriness is historically typical 
of most of st- U.S. foreign and domestic licy, 
that a proper and a deorable impulse are embedded 
in the same aion. 

It has been and is presently in the erest of the 
United States that the development of viable republics 
 whether capitalist or socialist  reace colonial 
and semi-colonial vestiges. To the same effe, the 
erests of the United States require the eradication 
of de fao semi-colonial forms of rule, as represented 
by a foreign nation's submission to determination of 
its domestic and foreign licies by foreign debt- 
holders, whether those debt-holders are the London 
and allied bankers of the Maximilian affair in Mexico, 
or U.S. citizens with aces of business in lowere 
Manhattan. 

U.S. licy was originally and correly based on 
that impulse. To the extent that our nation had the 
means to effe such a licy in praice, our national 
foreign licy was based on the princie of viable and 
truly sovereign republics, and most emphatically so 
respeing our hemispheric neighbors. Hence, John 
Quincy Adams' cited . In former times, that 
meant capitalist republics; today it means either 
socialist or capitalist republics. From the stand 
of U.S. erests as a sovereign nation, our foreign 
licy is properly indifferent to the distinion be- 
tween socialist and capitalist republics. Our national 
foreign licy erest respeing the quality of such 
foreign governments is our concern that such 
republics be economically viabley whether capitalist 
or socialist. Our exrts are, to put the  of self- 
erest most narrowly, delimited by their growth. 
Our need for imrts from such nations is similarly 
constrained. Otherwise, broadly, economically shaky 
governments are generally a menace to their own 
people and their neighbors. 



In the War with Spain, unfortunately we did not 
leave matters at the  of fulfilling our national 
erests. We assimilated Puerto Rico  which was 
consistent with our own erests and that of the 
Puerto Rican people. We assimilated the Philippines, 
which need not have been contrary to our erests or 
that of the Filipinos, but we condued the matter 
badly and not without third-party erference to 
make bad matters worse. What we did that was evil 
and wrong was to bring the Spanish ex-colonies under 
a moneta ris t in teres t 's im p eria lis t licy. 

The best proof of that is our licy toward the 
principal Spanish colony involved which we did not 
formally assimilate, Cuba. 

Let us glance for a moment at the background to 
Cuba's turn to the Soviet Union, after cometing an 
earlier litical revolution (sometimes called **the 
lawyer's revolution") under encouragement of high- 
level forces within the United States. Since this writer 
had an oprtunity to gain a glance o the situation 
behind-the-scenes in Cuba during the - period, 
there are corresnding special advantages to con- 
sidering that exame of the problem under con- 
sideration. 

Prior to Castro, as the current saying goes, U.S. 
licy for Cuba fit within the sperum of standard 
Wilsonian twentieth-century U.S. licy for all 
smaller Caribbean countries. In the erest of some 
particular investment group  one used to speak of 
United Fruit and Grace  a gang of petty swindlers 
was eleed to maain the formalities of the local 
government. The government in fa was essentially 
an extension of the princie of the Pinkertons and 
similar corrate security agencies of the last half of 
the nineteenth century. This arrangement had the 
disturbing correlative that the government bureau- 
cracy so ensconced would acquire the tendency to line 
its own private purse to the extent that this corruption, 
originally licensed on a relatively petty scale, became 
more than a substantial annoyance to the foreign 
investors. Between that rinsic problem and fights 
among various financial erests in the same nation, 
from time to time a representative of the U.S. State 
Department would hold a discreet discussion of the 
problem of **appalling corruption" with the patriotic 
colonel of some regiment barracked proximate to the 
small country's national capital. Not too long after 
that discreet chat, the patriotic colonel would march 
on the capital, shoot or hang a few of the overturned 
government's exemary thieves, exile the rest, and 
settle down to establish a new government, beginning 
the **yin-yang" cycle of Caribbean destism all over 

again. 

At least, that is the aspe of the *'yin-yang" or 
**yo-yo"pattern of U.S. Caribbean licy which is 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



most pertinent to the problem of the Batista regime of 
the late s. A half-million unemoyed around 
Havana alone, a tourist trap, pimps on every street 
and in every taxicab, every imaginable vice, and a 
national economy going bankrupt while the Batista 
bureaucracy stole left and right. At a certain  in 
the endemic tumult these conditions engendered 
within Cuba, the Castro-led force, having **proven 
itself*' chiefly on its own merits, was assimilated o 
the amalgam of organizations which represented U.S. 
licy for eliminating the Batista problem. 

The difficulty was that once in were, Castro et al. 
proceeded toward delivering on the promises they had 
made in the course of campaigning for office. Then 
Castro did what any other sensible capitalist govern- 
ment would have done in such a fix  took over the 
sugar mills and demanded a scheduling of debt and 
debt-payments consistent with permitting Cuba's eco- 
nomic recovery from Batista's reign. Certain lowere 
Manhattan erests howled, acing their nominal, 
short-term private erest above the national in- 
terest, and various forms of warfare were unleashed 
against Cuba. Under conditions of de fao economic 
blockade, Castro turned (the details of the process are 
secondary for present purses) to the only source of 
aid adequate to defend his national economy against 
U.S. economic warfare. 

Putting the matter thus, in terms which could not be 
competently disputed by any honest anti-Communist 
conservative in the U.S., what would you expe from 
such a U.S. foreign licy? The ABC of the princies 
we have outlined above operated, precisely as they 
operated in the case of the Bolshevik Revolution of 
. When the industrial-capitalist forces fail to un- 
dertake the tasks of extended reproduion, or, worse, 
ally themselves with the monetarists against 
economic growth and technological development, the 
socialist movement has the duty, if it is able, to make 
a socialist transformation. We are not suggesting that 
socialist transformations are merely remedies for 
forms of illness which occur from grievous mistakes. 
On the contrary, provided they are viable, they are to 
be esteemed. The  is that any capitalist who 
comains about socialist transformations in Russia 
or Cuba is unentionally or not a hycrite. In both 
cases, the socialist transformation occurred because 
industrial-capitalist forces, rather than attending to 
their own real erests, were aying lackey to the 
monetarists. 

That is the gist of the wrong and evil things the U.S. 
did in the conclusion of the Spanish-American War, 
and the gist of every wrong thing, anually contrary to 
our vital national erests, we have permitted our 
government to undertake or tolerate since. 

To kick away any lunatic-socialists or sick liberals 



 

who might be tempted to attach themselves to our 
litical coattails on this , we shall be very blunt 
concerning the U.S. assimilation of Puerto Rico. 

The mere fa that the U.S. ^'gobbled up" Puerto 
Rico was no offense against proper ernational law, 
nor was it a crime or offense in any other rational 
respe. Only a sentimental babbler in the Wilsonian 
tradition of hycrisy would argue to the contrary. 
Puerto Rico was a wretched little Spanish colony, with 
no visible economic viability as an independent 
nation. Under the circumstances, the best praicable 
alternative for the Puerto Ricans themselves was to 
become part of the United States. Whether we con- 
dued the assimilation badly or well is a different 
matter. This is not to suggest that today we should 
enlarge the tetorial United States by such prac- 
tices; for those past circumstances and at that time, 
the mere fa of appropriation was consistent with 
U.S. and Puerto Rican erests, and represented no 
offense in fa against the Puerto Ricans. 

The First World War is not to be direly compared 
with the Second World War, except, as Lippmann 
emphasizes, that the same monetarists' licies 
governed U.S. condu in both affairs. A few obser- 
vations, more in the form of moot s than pros- 
ed, retrospeive alternatives, serve the funion of 
showing that there is reason to challenge the 
argument that we should have gone to war against the 
Kaiser's Germany  where no such doubt can be 
sed for the Nazi case. What we should have done, as 
we shall indicate the dimensions of the difficulty here, 
is open to discovery, but, otherwise, we absolutely 
should not have done what Wilson did, either in the 
way he got us o the war or the way he purrted to 
extricate us from it. 

It was consistent with U.S. erests as an industrial- 
capitalist republic that Czarist Russia and the Austro- 
Hungarian obscenity should be terminated. However, 
it was also in our vital erest that British monetarist 
control of the world market be ended, and, hence, that 
under no circumstances should Britain be permitted 
to gobble up elements of Russia or the Balkans. It was 
contrary to our erest that the defeat of Britain, 
which was eminently desirable, should be contingent 
un the Kaiser's looting of France. However, it was 
not in our national erest that the corrupt and 
stagnating form of licy represented by the Third 
Republic be perpetuated by our sacrifices. It was in 
our urgent erest that the British Empire be 
dismantled, both as a litical system of colonies and 
semi-colonies and as a monetary entity. We could not 
welcome a Kaiser Germany takeover of those British 
roles. Furthermore, although the prenderance of 
our national erests recommended the destruion of 
Czarism and British imperial and monetary rule, the 







 

anti-republican Kaiser's government was to a lesser 
degree also an obscenity contrary to our national 
erests. 

The overall charaer of the problem was that we 
had not made the mess, and lacked immediately the 
degree of were wanted to sort it out to coincide with 
all our principal licy-erests. Obviously, we had to 
maneuver strategically to ensure that the balance of 
the outcome was in our erests. This would have re- 
quired building up our naval and military forces, 
especially our naval forces, prior to , in 
preparation for the difficulties awaiting us. 

No doubt, some of the softer-skulled critics will find 
in this basis to exse me as a raving jingoist- 
militarist or something of that sort. Brushing such 
tential Wilsons to one side, and continuing on the 
presumption that a litical force representing in- 
dustrial-capitalist erests could have shaped U.S. 
licy, the fa of the matter was that, for reasons 
beyond our control, we were doomed to fight war 
somewhere in some context in the immediate future. 
If we did not apy our capabilities, including our 
military tential, at the proper ace, the condition of 
the world was going to become olerably much 
worse. Fighting the right war at the right time during 
that period was the least costly of all alternatives. 

Out of those comexities, it is clear that our indus- 
trial-capitalist erest prescribed a set of basic clear 
licy-guidelines. () Ending monetarist world- 
monetary control of world credit and markets; () 
Fostering independent, truly sovereign, and viable 
republics; () Pressing the **Open Door'* licy to the 
effe of ending colonialism and semi-coionialism; () 
Build a naval were able to control Britain's; () Seek 
and make whatever compromises were necessary to 
improve the balance of world developments in the 
direions stipulated by such a licy. 

Such tendencies did exist, as tendencies toward 
licy perceptions during that and the immediate 
stwar period, but those tendencies did nothing 
more, unfortunately, than to color and constrain, 
rather than sitively charaerize our licies. 

The fa that the writer otherwise proses no 
specific, retrospeive licy for the - United 
States does not refle the writer's methodological 
dissition for vacillation on the problem of strategic 
choices presented. Beyond the formulating of firm 
licies, the execution and further detailing of that set 
of licies is primarily a resnsibility asgigned to the 
statecraft of the executive branch. The aual choice 
of licies which the United States should have 
followed in pursuit of the licies we have listed had to 
be determined through an organic global litical 
process of negotiations among the forces in motion. 



When a were such as the United States was even at 
that time, effeively deoys in behalf of its com- 
mitted erest, diomatically and otherwise, such 
erventions in the course of events readily and 
substantially alter the strategic configuration to 
define a combination from which a concrete course of 
commitment to aion is then eleed. 

For exame, it was in the erest of the U.S. to 
attempt to break France out of the entente with 
Britain and Czarist Russia, and to make that feasible 
through a navy adequate to the anti-colonialist, anti- 
monetarist licy that involved. It was in U.S. erest 
to attempt to secure with the government of Germany 
an agreement on questions of both Russian and 
colonial licy, to stipulate an independent Russian 
republic to undergo massive industrializing 
development, and a similar anti-colonialist, in- 
dustrialist licy for the region below the Tropic of 
Cancer. It was our proper course to make our erests 
and objeives clear, to the  that the commitment 
of a credible amount of mobilized U.S. were added to 
or aced opsite to the licies and aions of any 
nation or combination of nations would have re- 
presented a significant, probably decisive margin in 
determining the perceivable consequences of alter- 
native licies and projes among other nations. 

The problem of the Wilson administration was not 
that it was fumbling and incompetent (as it was), but 
that it could not have conceivably developed a licy 
consistent with U.S. erests. This was not a problem 
located so much in the unstable Wilson himself, but is 
a problem better brought to consciousness by refer- 
ring to Colonel House. 

There are two crucial features of Colonel House's 
role preceding and during the Wilson administration 
which adequately prove the case. The first was the 
establishment of the U.S. Federal Reserve System on 
a predominantly monetarist basis. The second is the 
monetarist-imperialist innovations in U.S. foreign l- 
icy exemified by Wilson's condu in the Mexican 
affair. The Mexican affair underscores the pure 
hycrisy overall of Wilson and the ** Wilson tradi- 
tion," 

The United States had undergone a major and pro- 
traed crisis during the s and s, a new crisis 
early during the s, and joined the world in the 
ominous crisis of the - period. All of these 
crises were essentially global in cause, rather than 
autochthonous problems of our national economy. 
These were crises of the British monetary system. The 
sterling ruled the world's credit and trade markets, 
the ernal convulsions of sterling were necessarily 
global monetary convulsions. However, in global 
crises, the effes prortionately experienced in each 







nation, the tendency of one or another nation to exhibit 
the crisis earlier or later, and the prolongation of the 
crisis in each national seor, represent differential 
features of the national seor^s relative global 
sition  degree of illiquidity, economic develop- 
ment, and so forth  and ernal weaknesses and 
strengths of the national economy and its domestic 
monetary system. 

In fa, the succession of crises from the early s 
through - were overall a ratchet-process of de- 
cline of the sterling system as a whole. Sterling  the 
sterling system  founded most immediately un the 
crushing debt imsed un Britain and Europe dur- 
ing the Naleonic wars and immediately following 
the Treaty of Vienna, was a sick system from the out- 
set and becoming no healthier. The sterling system 
survived, first, because bankrupt England of - 
was able to imse a major rtion of its national illi- 
quidity (as credit) un the defeated Europe of the 
Holy Alliance, because it was able to imse that self- 
aggravating mass of nominal wealth, British sterling 
bankruptcy, in the form of primitive accumulation 
and related forced backwardness licies un the 
colonies and other seors of the world. 

The U.S. use of British credit for development of our 
rails system and other projes obliged our national 
economy to emoy such credit on terms determined 
by the sick sterling system. By adapting our national 
credit system and national monetary licies to the 
margin of national financial balance-of-payments 
represented by sterling credit, our economy became 
increasingly enslaved to and increasingly sensitive to 
fluuations in sterling credit markets. 

These pulsations of bankrupt sterling's world domi- 
nation are the dire cause for the crucial s in the 
history of the labor movement. 

Although the Paris Commune is ausibly exained 
by the Franco-Prussian War, in fa the crisis of 
French institutions produced by Naleon IIFs defeat 
took the lid off the tential eruption which had al- 
ready been developed through the domestic conse- 
quences of France's indebtedness to consortia of ster- 
ling-bloc bankers led by the then-dominant House of 
Rothschild. Indeed, France of that period had been 
ruled by two monarchs, Naleon III and Paris-based 
Baron James Rothschild, the funioning head of the 
Rothschild House. The - wave of mass strikes 
in the USA, predominantly associated with railway 
workers and the Knights of Labor  the strikes which 
created the organizations within the Knights of Labor 
later forming the American Federation of Labor, were 
coordinate with the general strikes of the s in Eng- 
land, and the wave of strikes in Germany, from the 
late s through , which overthrew Bismarck. 



 

The rise of pulism, and the Coxey*s army and Debs- 
linked strikes of the s are also incomprehensible 
social eruptions apart from the effes of the primi- 
tive-accumulation praices extended o various 
countries by the decline of bankrupt sterling. The Rus- 
sian Revolution of , and coordinate eruptions of 
that period, including the symptomatic rise of the 
IWW in the USA, are also direly refleions of the 
deepening crisis of the sterling monetary system. 

From approximately  through , the United 
States was confronted by a fundamental crisis flowing 
from our imprisonment within the dying sterling 
monetary order. 

Beginning with President Theodore Roosevelt, we 
prenderantly committed our nation to the wrong re- 
snse to this crisis. We turned away from the indus- 
trial-capitalist thrust represented somewhat by An- 
drew Carnegie and others, to the inflated nominal 
capitalization of our industries, centering around the 
so-called **trusts.'* The inevitable effe of the '*trust- 
building" process, which came to a head about the 
middle of the first decade of this century, was to 
capitalize U.S. produion in such a way as to drive 
U.S. prices up, skyrocketing toward levels which were 
non-competitive on the world market, and which 
permanently damaged our vital erests by aborting 
the commitment to expansion and technological 
progress. Roosevelt's administration used the fa of 
this scandalous development to admittedly check the 
most extreme heteronomic outrages being perpe- 
trated, but approached the problem in such a seleive 
fashion as to strengthen the sition of financial capi- 
tal as such at the expense of the were of industrial 
capital as such. 

The effe of the way in which the trust-busting was 
done was to break up the concentration of were in 
industries in a way which concentrated were predom- 
inantly in lowere Manhattan. 

Colonel House's role in the establishment of the Fed- 
eral Reserve System was coordinate with the seleive 
approach to trust-busting associated with the Roose- 
velt administration. 

The proper, self-erested licy of the United 
States in resnse to the  panic was to revert to a 
Hamiltonian licy, of establishing a national bank. 
Instead, House and others established a central bank 
modeled un the British monetarist conception, a 
bank effeively controlled by the major, lowere Man- 
hattan financial erests. By committing the United 
States to define the nominal value of its wealth in a 
way determined by lowere Manhattan's control of the 
major conduits of credit, and by acing the monetary 
were of the United States government at the diss- 
al of those banking erests, the Federal Reserve 







 

System created the false appearance that the spe- 
cial monetarist erests of lowere Manhattan were 
the determining feature of national-capitalist self-in- 
terests. 

Wilson*s licy toward Mexico was a dire exten- 
sion of the pro-monetarist counterrevolution against 

I 

the U.S. Constitution and associated licies which 
had been prepared most notably by the preceding 
aions of the Roosevelt administration and Rocke- 
feller-linked Taft administration. Direly contrary to 
John Quincy Adams, in particular, contrary to Lin- 
coln, Wilson overthrew the U.S. princied self- 
erest in the sovereignty of Latin American repub- 
lics. 

Wilson's wretched hycrisy in conneion with 
Mexico is the proper source of insight o the moraliz- 
ing of his ^'Fourteen Pos.*' 

What of such precedents as the Texas affair and the 
Mexican-American War? Taking the charaer of the 
- period as a whole o account, there is a 
double aspe to both affairs. Some will not be eased 
by what we must properly say on this account, but 
truth is truth, however it may offend liberals' pre- 
judices. 

The founding perceptions un which this nation 
was established were those of the Idea of Progress. 
That means, in praice, that the nature and rights of 
nations and cultures are not "culturally relativist." We 

do not regard all cultures and nations as equally de- 
serving of sovereignty or survival. That is not an 
imperialist licy: it does not specify a licy of U,S. 
acquisitions of the areas occupied by more backward 
nations and cultures. It is rather a statement of U.S. 
national self-erest in the realization of the proper 
rule of the Idea of Progress as a universal natural law 
governing the entirety of the human species. Any one 
who does not recognize such a clear statement of 
princies in the Declaration of Independence and U.S. 
Constitution  written, predominantly, by the same 
set of authors approximately two decades apart in 
time, must be indeed an illiterate. 

Was it then corre for the American branch of 
European humanist culture to absorb the tetories 
occupied by a miserable, relatively bestial culture of 
indigenous Americans? Absolutely. Was it corre to 
absorb Texas and the areas taken in the Mexican- 
American War? Historically, yes  for the same 
reason. The only legitimate moral and related licy 
question in such affairs is how we treated the human 
beings we were obliged to bring quickly o a success- 
ful participation in our more appropriately human 
levels of culture. 

These aions of the pre- period were not only 
permissible (at least as aions overall) but impera- 
tive, because of our adversary relationship, in fa, to 



a British were determined to subvert and crush us. 
The affair of the British agent and U.S. traitor, Aaron 
Burr, in itself justifies entirely Jefferson's Louisiana 
Purchase  a  on which Lippmann's analysis is 
predominantly corre as far as it goes. We had to 
develop the United States, tetorially, as well as in 
respe of its ernal life in areas existing at any 
time. We could not tolerate the relinquishing of thos^ 
areas of development contiguous to our existing bor- 
ders by either colonial weres or by weak, unreliable, 
nominally-independent states which were inherently 
the instruments for British-coordinated aions 
against our vital erests. 

However, to the extent that hemispheric neighbors 
were truly sovereign and viable republics, or strug- 
gling against British-controlled forces to become such, 
it was our duty, as we had means of force or maneuver 
to accomish this, to defend the sovereignty of those 
republics even against faions which might temr- 
arily gain governmental were in our own nation. 

Neither the licies of the founding fathers nor our 
own vital national erests to the present day can be 
separated  as Lippmann attempts to do  from 
questions of litical economy. 

Humanism y the body of epistemological develop- 
ment and associated natural law countersed to both 
feudalist scholasticism and nominalism, is rooted in 
the scientific perception of the nature of the abso- 
lute difference which separates man from the lowere 
beasts. This humanism subsumes both industrial- 
capitalist society and socialist modes of extending the 
capitalist form of extended reproduion. Humanism 
is rooted in the princie that it is the duty of society to 
perfe itself, to bring its ideas and willful praice o 
conformity with universal law. Humanism breaks 
with scholasticism axiomatically concerning the con- 
tent of natural law. Scholasticism assumes the natural 
order to be essentially fixed respeing appropriate 
knowledge and individual and general condu. 
Hence, respeing law, scholasticism sees Roman law, 
feudal law, common law, and so forth as being proper- 
ly convergent un a common set of underlying deter- 
mining princies. Humanism defines development, 
society's progress through the realization of scientific 
discoveries mediated through the creative mental pro- 
cesses of individuals, as the kernel of natural law, and 
defines the progress of societies to higher orders of 
technology as the indispensable material comement 
of providing the cultural conditions for advancing the 
qualities of the individual. 

Although our argument for those princies is 
significantly better informed than that of the founding 
fathers, in respe to all essential conclusions for l- 
icy what we argue is exicitly stipulated in the 
Declaration of Independence and Constitution, and 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 



I



- . . ^ J T 




President Kennedy inspeing the Berlin Wall in the course of his  *lch bin ein Berliner * adventure. 







 

conforms to the thrust of the praice of the American 
Revolution during, notably, the - period, and 
the overall outcome of the - period. 

We deny that any people are inferior as people, but 
insist that many governments and cultures are. Our 
humanist licy is to free the people from the oppres- 
sions of a backward culture so that they may fulfill the 
human tentials we defend. The nominalists (the 
leading Democrats of -) argued that slavery was 
justified on the empirical evidence that enslaved 
blacks and the cultures from which they and their an- 
cestors had been stolen were inferior. So far, the state- 
ment of fa was absolutely corre. However, the en- 
slaved blacks were modally culturally inferior be- 
cause slavery made them so. Furthermore, as the 
humanist Whig abolitionists of the Carey-Lincoln 
current properly argued, the holding of a black seion 
of the U.S. labor force in a condition of servitude was a 
source of degradation of the labor force as a whole and 
thus otherwise a vital threat to the most fundamental 
national erests of the nation. 

The notion of national erests, proper er- 
national law, and foreign licy is not admissibly 
based on the nominalist (empiricist) form of reduc- 
tionist assumption that the law properly pertains to 
formal categories of cultures, nations, and so forth. It 
is based on the Idea of Progress, understanding of the 
necessity of republican over democratic forms of 
government for the human condition to date, and the 
princied sacredness of the development of the cre- 
ative tentials of the individual, not as an abstra 
personality, but as a resitory for the tentiality 
of development to effe contributions in the universal 
erest. 

Today, the United States and the Soviet Union are 
the dominant world weres. Potentially, since both 
governments have a vital self-erest not only in 
accelerating economic progress in their own nations, 
but throughout the world, the comexities of 
maneuvers imsed un our founding fathers, un 
Lincoln, and un our nation during the first decades 
of this century no longer need exist. In fa, although 
the governing party of the Soviet Union is committed 
to the perspeive of socialist republics, and the 
United States parties' predominantly committed to 
capitalist republics by strong preference, the question 
whether a viable republic is capitalist or socialist is 
properly a matter of indifference to either were in- 
sofar as it is a state were with state erests. This 
ssibility is conditional un the commitment of the 
United States to an industrial-capitalist perception of 
self-erests and licies. In that case, on that con- 
dition, no concert of nations could develop a mone- 
tarist form of monetary system which could endure 



the combined economic counterforce of a pro-indus- 
trial-development monetary system joly suprted 
by the two major weres. Under those conditions, 
consistent with the ent and specifications of the U.S. 
Constitution, the problem of ordering the world ac- 
cording to the Idea of Progress, on the basis of 
sovereignty of viable republics, requires none of the 
comex adjustments to licy which were the 
unavoidable circumstance of former periods of our 
republic. 

The institutionalization of monetarist licies 

during the period of the Roosevelt, Taft, and Wilson 

administrations created a thrust in U.S. domestic and 

foreign licy, which was to ally with the City of 

London in perpetuating a jo Anglo-American 

monetarist world order while reducing Britain to 

junior-partner status within that alliance. In brief, to 

maain the continuity of the City of London's 

monetarist world order while subjugating the City of 
London. 

Excepting thrusts such as those most clearly ex- 
pressed by Wilson's opnent. Senator Lodge, the 
rearguard resistance of Whig currents to the extreme 
innovations sited by the Tories, that consistently 
contradiory monetarist licy consolidated under 
Wilson has been the trend in U.S. foreign licy doc- 
trines to date. This is to be qualified in the most im- 
rtant respe that the alleged ''isolationist" ten- 
dencies of Senator Lodge and the - Republican 
administrations and Congress were not isolationism in 
fa, but a rearguard expression of negativity against 
the kind of foreign involvements the Tory faion 
demanded. This Whig tendency emerged in a modified 
form under the Eisenhowere administrations, es- 
pecially the second Eisenhowere administration, and 
was an imrtant background tendency within the 
Nixon and Ford administrations  as the Rumsfeld- 
led "Hallowe'en Massacre" of  most visibly re- 
fles. 

What Lippmann of - was demagogically 
misrepresenting as a kind of foreign licy vacuum, 
was essentially the determination of the Franklin 
Roosevelt-led Tory faion to extirpate the last 
vestiges of a constitutional, Whig element in U.S. 
foreign licy. Lippmann's foreign licy thesis on 
this  is comementary to Thurman Arnold's 
defense of Roosevelt's effort to speed up the overthrow 
of the U.S. Constitution, in FDR's aborted effort to 
pack the U.S. Supreme Court. 

Colonel House's (which is to say Rockefeller's) 
World War I licy was to commit the U.S. to the 
British cause, while using U.S. were to cut Britain off 
from any substantial, net gains by which she might 
resist a process of takeover by U.S. monetarist in- 







terests. In that licy everything from getting the U.S. 
o war, through the pack of swindles called the 
Versailles Treaty, and the ostensible ernal contra- 
diions of U.S. anti-Soviet licy are compre- 
hensively subsumed. 

The comement to Wilson's administration itself 
was the private elligence establishment and licy- 
formulating and imementation network represented 
most prominently by the National Civic Federation, 
the Rockefeller Foundation, and the Russell Sage 
Foundation. The Rockefeller Foundation was already 
emerging as a major vehicle for coordinating and 
catalyzing the shaping of U.S. foreign and domestic 
licies. The Russell Sage Foundation comemented 
and overlapped the Settlement House movement as 
the pioneering and coordinating institution for 
domestic and foreign litical elligence and '*black 
operations" in the Fabian mode. The operations of this 
Rockefeller-linked (later. Rockefeller-dominated) 
Fabian private elligence network were both 
direly overlapped with the British Fabian private 
elligence networks and were also developed as a 
competitor to the British Fabians. These licy and 
elligence operations refleed the same U.S. 
Atlanticists' contradiory consistency as Colonel 
House*s government licies. The National Civic 
Federation ebbed out its last dominant role under that 
name, as the vehicle, in large part, for the licies 
which were increasingly Rockefeller-determined. 

The Russell Sage Foundation is so crucial in the 
affairs of the - period that no competent 
discussion of U.S. foreign licy and dorines dating 
from that period can be accomished without st- 
lighting the evil conduited through that presumably 
small but monstrously significant **social work'* in- 
stitution. The Foundation was coopted to direion of 
overall U.S. elligence during the First World War 
and continued a related role at Versailles and in 
various ''black" and related operations in Europe 
(and elsewhere) during the s. That nasty little 
Foundation has not ceased to perform an innovative 
role of similar imications down to the present day, 
but at the moment it is the period leading o 
Roosevelt's administration that concerns us. 

It was the Russell Sage Foundation, for exame, 
which drafted the element of the Versailles 
agreements under which Admiral Canaris* career 
under Weimar and Hitler was founded. The marine 
transrt unit (that unit had been the element of the 
Kaiser's military-litical elligence most im- 
mediately involved in the Parvus operation), was 
exempted from the drastic reduions apied to other 
German military and related elements, and soon 
aced under the direion of a Canaris who had 



 

already served (-) as a part of Colonel 
Nikolai's Anglo-American agent network inside the 
German military elligence. () 

It was the Russell Sage Foundation which served as 
an instrument for Rockefeller's establishing of Inter- 
l during the s, an organization which was later 
headed by Nazi elligence chiefs Heydrich and 
Kaltenbrunner during the s, down to , which 
was headed by avowed Nazis while still based in 
Vienna, and which was "reorganized" (i.e. laun- 
dered) under the direion of former top Nazi officials 
by Rockefeller's Allen Dulles and others at the end of 
the war. 

It is the same network, deey overlapping present- 
day Interl, which conduited the "Law Enforcement 
Assistance Administration" o the U.S. Justice 
Department, principally via the Ford Foundation 
conduit, which today condus the majority of illegal 
arms and drug smuggling ernationally, which today 
performs an egral funion in the deoying of all 
notable forms of ernational terrorist as, which is 
egral to most of the assassinations and related 
horrors which a credulous Congress and public too 
quickly axiomatically presume to be the work of the 
U.S. Central Intelligence Agency as such. 

Although, broadly, such covert aivities of the 
Rockefellers and their allies are not an exicit 
feature of stipulated U.S. foreign licy conventions, 
these covert and related operations have become 
today an element of U.S. government de fao praice 
almost approaching the significance of our national 
military sture and deoyments and our financial 
and economic stures. Even though such Rocke- 
feller-linked covert-operations networks and forces 
may not be Congress's perception of official U.S. 
foreign licy, they are very much de fao U.S. 
foreign licy instruments  to the effe that official 
statements not taking these o account amount to 
"Wilsonian" hycrisy. Furthermore, any analysis of 
foreign licy which does not take these o account 
in assessing the - period is for that reason 
essentially an incompetent appraisal, 

Wilson's licies, especially Versailles itself, 
established the fateful preconditions for World War , 



. This Nikolai-Canaris element in - Anglo-American el- 
ligence networks inside Germany was based in part on British and 
Rockefeller agreements with "Farben" representatives concerning 
Chilean nitrates and related matters. Colonel Nikolai was a key part 
of the "Farben" firm's private elligence network and operations, 
as well as part of the Kaiser's official elligence organization. It was 
through the Rockefeiler-British-Nikolai network collaborations in 
Chile that Canaris was smuggled out of ernment in Chile during 
World War I, and conduited, through the erventions of the 
British Foreign Office, back o Germany, via Anglo-Dutch ac- 
comices of the Anglo-American erests involved. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

The U.S. was headed for war with Japan, and most 
probably Germany as well, from the day Franklin D. 
Roosevelt was eleed. By , this was apparent to 
and openly stated by various well-informed circles. 
The foundations had been laid by the Wilson ad- 
ministration. It was the initially pro-fascist foreign 
licy of the Roosevelt administration, and the 
manner in which that administration dealt with the 
monetary crisis, which by no later than  
predetermined the inevitability of the war. 

Whatever their faional differences on matters of 
detail, the City of London and lowere Manhattan were 

agreed on installing the fascist rule of Benito Musso- 
lini in Italy and Hitler*s rule in Germany. Further- 
more, the leading liberals in the United States  such as 
John Dewey and his associates  were largely un- 
ashamedly pro-fascist during the s and o the 
earliest part of the Roosevelt administration period. 

It was immediately British elligence which had 
moved Mussolini o were in Italy  with the aid of 
such British agents as the fathers of present-day 
Italian Communist Party leaders Enrico Berlinguer 
and Giorgio Amendola. During the s, Mussolini 
was Winston Churchill's personal acquaance and 
protege. Roosevelt's administration maained a 
special relationship to the Mussolini regime up to the 
Fall of France. 

Hjalmar Schacht, a prominent lowere Manhattan 
agent of influence in Germany since the World War I 
armistice, aced Hitler in were through clearing the 
proje with key forces in the City of London and New 
York City, including the consent of the publishers of 
the New York Times, whose diluted Jewish con- 
sciences required Schacht's assurances on this pro- 
je. It was lowere Manhattan erests, not German 
industrialists, who direed and spearheaded the fund- 
ing of Hitler's accession to the Chancellorship  and 
induced the German industrialists to go along with the 
proje under the diates of a jo lowere Manhattan 
and City of London de fao **Atlanticist" direive to 
this effe. Roosevelt's principal backers, as well as 
some of his chief Republican opnents, were among 
those included in that Atlanticist proje of installing 
and suprting Hitler as Schacbtian monetary l- 
icy's indispensable tool 

The military side of the Hitler proje involved 
faional comications among the Atlanticists. All 
faions agreed broadly on the objeive of using a Hit- 
ler Germany to overturn the Soviet republic. They 
were not agreed on the exicit approach to such a re- 
sult, or how the loot from such an enterprise should be 
distributed. Despite faional misgivings and differ- 
ences, the thrust of the military perspeive fatefully 
converged un some form of adaptation of the 
"Parvus Plan." 



On the monetary and economic side, there was no 
significant overall disagreement concerning the 
Atlanticists' pro-Hitler licy. Assurances had been 
given to the Rothschilds, Sulzbergers, and others that 
the Nazi Jewish licy was not to go beyond an i- 
tant. Otherwise the Hitler proje meant the following. 
It meant, first of all, saving the shards of the bankrupt 
sterling-dollar monetary system, providing litical 
credibility for the existing ernational debt struc- 
tures. It meant that the **Rapallo" tendency among 
German industrialists and trade unionists for break- 
ing out of the dollar-sterling orbit, for massive eco- 
nomic cooperation with the Soviet east, was blocked  
with the aid of the * 'termination" of Gregor Strasser, 
Schleicher, and so forth. It meant that the capability 
of using Germany as a ''breakaway ally" ''marcher 
lord" force against the Soviet Union was being estab- 
lished. 

To grasp the sense of the relevant opinion of the 
times, it must be understood that Atlanticist attitudes 
and praices in imsing the Hitler regime in Ger- 
many, in behalf of Schacht's fascist monetary l- 
icies, were broadly identical with the thinking and 
public toleration of the David Rockefeller-led opera- 
tion establishing the Pinochet regime in Chile in 
behalf of Milton Friedman's fascist monetary 
licies. 

Although Roosevelt attitudes toward the two 
Atlanticist-created fascist regimes of Mussolini and 
Hitler were significantly differentiated from the out- 
side, and this predominantly for strategic reasons, 
Roosevelt's administration was pro-fascist from the 
outset. 

Not only was Roosevelt's administration pro-fascist 
in foreign licy, but also in domestic licy. General 
Hugh Johnson and the National Recovery A left no 
doubt of that. With the defeat of the NRA and Congres- 
sional and Supreme Court resistance and foot-drag- 
ging on other legislation, executive aions, and labor 
struggles to the same effe, Roosevelt's administra- 
tion was compelled litically to retreat to a compro- 
mise, semi-fascist licy, called the *'New Deal." 
Such dire imitations of the Hitler regime's labor- 
ensive Arbeitsdienst measures and BdM insti- 
tutions as the Works Proje Administration (WPA), 
Public Works Administration (PWA), and Civilian 
Conservation Corps were not only imitations of the 
Nazi regime, but consciously so. The Agricultural 
Adjustment A (AAA) was another fascist *'zero 
growth"-oriented atrocity of the same genre. 

From the contrary stand, of vital U.S. national 
erests, the Nazi regime was from inception an unre- 
deemable adversary in the Clausewitzian sense as we 
have outlined that sense above. Just as the collapse of 
German industrial development imsed by Ver- 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



sailles not only created the preconditions for a new 
general war but destroyed the tential for world- 
market recovery, the Hitler regime was a more pro- 
found economic threat to our most vital national in- 
terests on that same account. By its nature, its organic 
constitution as a * 'command economy" dedicated to 
maaining inflationary, already bankrupt debt 
struures by increasingly savage primitive accumu- 
lation against its own economic base, the persistence 
of the regime meant a nation which had no alternative 
but to prevent the otherwise inevitable, total ernal 
collapse of its ernal economy by soon launching 
wars of looting against its neighbors. This irrepres- 
sible military impulse, and the infeious conse- 
quences of such primitive-accumulation licies on 

the world economy, represented an olerable con- 
dition. 

It must be emphasized that the Wall Street backing 
of Roosevelt's first eleion and the installation of Hit- 
ler were comementary efforts. 

Hitler could have been pulled down  probably 
without war  by the United States at any time prior 
to the  Munich agreements. The U.S. could have 
sent the French army  two or three divisions would 
have sufficed  o the Rhineland in , and Hitler 
would have collapsed. The economic and monetary 
were of the United States respeing Britain and 
France would have sufficed to prevent the  Mun- 
ich agreement, and could also have induced the 
French to accept the Tukachevsky Plan if we had 
wished. Although the U.S. capacity for litical and 
related aion was admittedly delimited by the in- 
ternal litical situation inside the U.S., it is obscenely 
false to profess that a Roosevelt administration either 
helessly watched the growth of the Nazi problem in 
Europe, or that the Roosevelt administration did not 
consciously refrain from emoying those preventive 
measures within the existing discretionary capabili- 
ties of the government. Shattered as the U.S. was by 
the Depression, we had the were to determine, mar- 
ginally but crucially, the licies of England and 
France in such respes, if the Roosevelt administra- 
tion had chosen to exercise such were to that effe. 

Nor can Roosevelt defenders argue that he was 
either uninformed of the imications of the Nazi re- 
gime, or profess that public opinion prevented him 
from taking preventive aions otherwise within his 
means. As Lippmann most imately knew, the 
Roosevelt administration largely molded public opin- 
ion in the U.S. during the - period  after all, 
Lippmann was part of the proje of refining the use of 
the press as a ^'brainwashing*' tool against the U.S. 
pulation, and Roosevelt himself was the "confi- 
dence man's confidence man." 

Central to the overall licy-configuration of the 



 

Roosevelt administration was the *'bank holiday." 
The definitions of nominal wealth embedded in the 
chosen form of financial reorganization delimited and 
otherwise determined domestic and foreign licy op- 
tions overall thereafter. 

It was objeively unnecessary for the United States 
to go through the prolonged depression of -. 
With the collapse of sterling and the appropriate bank- 
ruptcy precedures against worthless debt struures 
in the U.S. itself, the proper task was to resort to a 
**HamiItonian" National Bank licy, putting the cre- 
dit of the government o such a bank, and acing 
Colonel House's ruined Federal Reserve System o a 
"holding corration" status for sorting-out at leisure- 
Provided that government-issued credit was re- 
stried to restoring viable industrial and agricultural 
capacities  and not to refinancing of old paper or 
non-tangible-wealth-regenerative forms, the lawful 
reproduive operation of the profitable produive 
process, raised above the real-economic break-even 
, would have sufficed to convert the credit issued 
o an appropriate margin of profit in the form of 
tangible commodities. Under any circumstances of 
crisis, such use of mobilized government weres to 
create produion credit can promptly reverse any de- 
pression, provided that the credit issued is efficiently 
direed to a ''hard commodity'' licy of delimiting 
loans to cranking up and expanding existing produc- 
tive capacities to, first, an approximate full-produion 
level and then beyond. 

Such measures require ermediate-term dracon- 
ian financial measures, but not exotic or "utopian" 
measures. Debt moratoria against financial debt ser- 
vice for industry, agriculture, and government are not 
a repudiation of debt obligations, but an ordinary 
bankruptcy's financial-reorganization praice. To 
apy them on a much larger scale than that of a 
corration requires supementary procedures to 
prevent the echoing collapse of essential institutions of 
credit and desit, but the procedure is eminently well 
known and praicable, and gives everyone an opr- 
tunity to sort out the blocked debt-service demands at 
litical-economic leisure. We have already specified 
the necessary measures in other published locations, 
so we need not restate them in full here. () 

The  is, once a viable economy (i.e., the pro- 
duion and circulation of tangible forms of wealth) 
has been cranked up well above its real-economic 



. Lyndon LaRouche, "How the International Development Bank 
Will Work," in How the International Development Bank Will Work 
(New York: Campaigner Publications, Inc., ), issued by the U.S. 
Labor Party, pp. -; Lyndon LaRouche, "The Emergency Emoy- 
ment A of " in The Emergency Emoyment A of  (New 
York: Campaigner Publications, Inc., ), issued by the U.S. Labor 
Party, pp. -. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

break-even  (above the tangible costs of pro- 
duion, including maenance of produive forces), 
alternative feasible solutions of various litical pref- 
erences are realistically available. Below the econ- 
omic break-even , no solution exists but one form 
of horror or another. 

That "Hamiltonian" approach to domestic econ- 
omic problems would have required a comementary 
foreign licy. Since the full-produion level opera- 
tion of the U.S. produive economy depended (and 
depends) un a significant and ever-growing volume 
and ratio of exrts and imrts, national erest 
would have required organizing a new, dollar-cen- 
tered block of countries going through the same sort 
of ernal financial reorganization. These countries 
would serve as our primary trading partners. Such 
aion would have brought down sterling entirely, and 
quickly brought a financially reorganized British 
industry and agriculture o a new, gold-reserve- 
based dollar monetary system  which shock-treat- 
ment would have been the greatest boon the U.S. could 
have given to Britain at that time. 

Roosevelt took the opsite direion in his admin- 
istration's approach to the unavoidable **bank holi- 
day.'* Although he **triaged" the most vulnerable 
fringe rtions of the financial debt struure, he did 
so in order to reduce the margin of debt overhang only 
to the prortions which probably could be maained 
through primitive accumulation against the U.S. 
produive forces operating near or below a break- 
even . His approach paralleled Schacht's reor- 
ganization of the Nazi economy in method if not in 
detailed form. 

Instead of freeing industry and agriculture of im- 
mediate debt and related financial requirements out- 
side circulating capital flow, and pushing in credits 
o industry and agriculture direly, he resorted to 
**pump-priming" methods, principally through the 
Federal Reserve System and through make-work pro- 
jes. Even at erest rates in the range of  percent, 
credit refused to move through the Federal Reserve 
System o industry. The various make- work pro- 
jes amounted to inducing the unemoyed to **work 
off welfare checks." Relative to restarting the econ- 
omy, the make-work itself was predominantly re- 
latively useless or done at such a primitive level of 
technology as to be abysmally uneconomical on that 
account. The "pump-priming" approach, even if well- 
ended, could have accomished nothing toward 
genuine recovery under such circumstances. What it 
did was serve as a manipulative social-work palliative 
and a buffering of total purchasing were of the in- 
ternal economy, but buffered at levels which were 
rinsically still way below the levels of purchasing 
were which would have been required to bring pro- 



duion levels above a true economic break-even 
 and self-feeding recovery. 

The - war economy illustrated the right 
princies in the wrong way. Once credit was ured 
direly o industrial and agricultural produion, 
the depressed economy, despite the worn bearings of 
the machinery and the gray-faced deetion of the 
labor force, began to crank up o a war-produion 
boom. The problems of the - war economy 
were twofold. First, the substitution of military pro- 
duion for consumable capital and consumer goods is 
inherently econoniicay inflationary (as distin from 
purely monetary inflation). Second, under the taed 
Federal Reserve System, the economic-inflationary 
impulse was cancerously multiied o a monetary 
inflation which threatened to exode during the - 
 period. On the first account, when government 
credit is used to generate useful produion of capital 
goods and consumer goods, rather than military hard- 
ware, the produs become additional ant and the 
emoyment of labor operating such ants. In that 
case, the scale of wealth is expanding, if modern tech- 
nology is emphasized, more rapidly than the credit ex- 
pansion is generating debt service demands. 

In short, the problem of the st- period was that 
then, as now, the monetarist approach must divert 
such large rtions of credit created o refinancing 
old debt struures and related paper, that the infusion 
of sufficient credit o an illiquid monetary system, to 
resume produion on an overall profitable level, can- 
not be approached without generating a hyperinflat- 
ionary spiral. The war-economy approach, because it 
simulates genuine economic recovery at the outset, 
temrarily succeeds where the "New Deal" could 
not, for that reason. However, the war-economy ap- 
proach to a sick monetary system inherently produces 
an economic-inflationary crisis, and when war eco- 
nomy is used as a "permanent" approach to propping 
up such an already bankrupt monetary system, as was 
done in - Nazi Germany, the fires of Hell are 
about to descend un us  relatively sooner or some- 
what later. 

It must be emphasized again  although we have al- 
ready stipulated the  in this conneion just above 
 that such a domestic "Hamiltonian'* approach to 
recovery could not have succeeded unless it was ac- 
companied by a corresnding foreign licy, a licy 
of wrecking and reacing the sterling-centered mone- 
tary system. 

The overall monetary and economic history of the 
Roosevelt administration shows where we must dis- 
tinguish between conscious wickedness and mere 
ignorance and incompetence. From the administrat- 
ion's praice and from study of the writings of key 
New Deal brarusters, both their work of the s 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



and later, it is clear that on economic matters they 
were worse than incompetent. As we noted in assess- 
ing the Atlanticists' present repetition of the same 
strategic follies they committed during two preceding 
world wars, their behavior is not only regulated by the 
pressures of expediency-driven hysteria, but by their 
traditional, organic organization of their sense of 
elleual identity around the nominalist world out- 
look and methodologies. With them, Keynesian, 
Schachtian, Friedmanite monetarist (nominalist) 
dorines are not merely expediencies; the Atlan- 

ticists broadly^ seriously believe that such quackery 
represents a competent economic theory and doc- 
trine! 

Roosevelt's fascist-flavored monetarist approach to 
the *'bank holiday," and other features of his admini- 
stration are clear instances of evil motivations serv- 
ing special erests at the expense of the vital in- 
terests of the United States. Otherwise, especially in 
respe of Roosevelt's persistence with an economic 
recovery program whose preordained failure would 
be ABC to any competent economist, the Roosevelt 
administration was predominantly, sincerely stupid. 

This is underlined by the prediable conditional 
success of the war economy, and Roosevelt's inability 
even to conceive of a war economy's **civilian" equi- 
valent earlier. 

The U.S. drive to a war economy as the anticipated 

solution to the depression was based most broadly 

un s and s study of the war economy of the 

wartime Kaiser Germany. The theory of a war eco- 
nomy was first outlined by Rosa Luxemburg in the 

conclusion of her  draft of The Accumulation of 
Capital and the outline expanded in terms of the 
empirical features of wartime Germany's aual war 
economy in her later Introduion to National Eco- 
nomy, It was the - German war economy ex- 
perience which served immediately as the model used 
by other analysts for the Nazi Germany ''recovery'* of 
-, and which, together with study of the - 
 Nazi Germany experience, provided the back- 
ground against which the Roosevelt administration's 
conception of a war-economy licy was sed. This 
appreciation was glued onto, so to speak, the U.S. war- 
mobilization experience during World War L 

Although the U.S. has lived under a war economy 
and semi-war economy since , to date no notable 
Atlanticist economist has been able competently to 
conne the notion of war economy to a **peace eco- 
nomy" recovery using somewhat analogous mech- 
anisms, or to account for the way in which the U.S. de- 
fense budget anually operates in respe to the U.S. 
stwar economy. On this count, they are sincerely 
incompetent. 

On World War II itself, earlier here we have covered 



 

all but two of the essential s to be reviewed. 
Immediately above, we identified U.S. vital erests 
defining Nazi Germany as an adversary from the in- 
ception; earlier we summarized the Atlanticist licy 
toward Nazi Germany and how it misfired. The princi- 
pal overlapping issues of the emerging, st- re- 
lations with the Soviet Union must be treated. Here, 
we must also clear away the illusion imied by Lipp- 
mann's argument, that the U.S. would not have gone 
to war against Nazi Germany if Germany had not 

broken the western baer." 

As Lippmann thus far correly states. Chamber- 
lain's  Munich agreement, coming after Anglo- 
French rejeion of the 'Tukachevsky Plan," left Stal- 
in with no strategic option but to attempt to secure a 
treaty with Nazi Germany, This treaty was feasible 
and adopted because it coincided with Germany^s 
most vital strategic problem. At the  that Ger- 
many became deey enmired, suffering heavy mili- 
tary attrition in a war inside the Soviet Union, the 

allied Anglo-French-Belgian forces could and would 
move o the Ruhr, forcing Germany to make peace 
essentially on allied terms. Thus, the Atlanticists 
would have both Germany and Russia. This required 
Hitler, if at all ssible, to crush the Belgians, British 
and French before launching war to the east. Stalin's 
treaty-improvisation fitted o that strategic problem 
like a hand o a glove. 

The problems of the Stalin leadership we have ade- 
quately covered in an edition of the Campaigner de- 
voted to that subje. () It is clear apart from other 
unsettled matters, that Stalin refused to believe that 
'*Barbarossa" was in progress until it was already 
substantially under way. This was a failure of Soviet 
litical elligence more than military elligence, 
a failure to comprehend the crucial ernal dynamics 
of the Nazi economy and regime. Otherwise, Stalin's 
pre-Barbarossa offers of concessions to Nazi eco- 
nomic needs were generous, and Britain was still left 
in Hitler's rear for an eastward thrust  such con- 
siderations, us Soviet wishful conviion that more 
time for Soviet military preparations was available, 
left the Red Army badly deoyed for the attack  
with well-known consequences. 

By   and until the successful test of "The 
Bomb" at Los Alamos  Soviet stwar were was so 
foreseeably tent that  other considerations ac- 
knowledged  Churchill and Roosevelt were com- 
mitted to affording Stalin significant concessions in 
order to contain the "Soviet problem." The consider- 
ations included not only Soviet stwar strength, but 
the imssibility of depending un suprt of U.S., 



. Lyndon LaRouche, "The Question of Stalinism Today," The 
Campaigner, Vol. VIII, No.  (Nov. ). 







 

British and other pulations for an abrupt turning 
against the wartime Soviet ally. Although there was a 
strong opsition to the prosed licy from within 
Atlanticist ranks, the notion of rallying the shards of 
the Nazi Waffen SS for a jo Allied-Germany late- 
,  or  assault against the Red Army was 
the Utopian conception of a relative few narrowly 
focused, and hence litically incompetent anti- 
Communist zealots. 

Zealots then  and later  prosed that U.S. 
ssession of "The Bomb*' invalidated the Soviet 
approach embedded in the  Lippmann draft. Such 
commentators overlooked the number of "The 
Bombs" the U.S. had at the end of World War II, and 
also the problem of producing them quickly in num- 
bers which could significantly offset both Soviet mili- 
tary strength and the litical countervailing con- 
siderations operating at that time. 

"The Bomb"  although only an exotic, limited 
operational capability consideration of the - 
period  did shift the dynamics of licy, and became 
the fetish-obje deluding worshippers of the anti- 
Clausewitzian dorine of "air were" and its wild- 
eyed "Utopian" sequelae. This combined effe did 
produce the Rockefeller hard-liners' (unsuccessful) 
"preventive war" campaign of the immediate st- 
war period, contributed to the way in which the "Cold 
War" and Red-hunt psychological conditioning of the 
larger pulation was fostered, and was influential in 
guiding Rockefeller State Department and other 
agents within the Truman administration to set up the 
Korean War. However, with the discovery  among 
other, related s  that the Soviets had gained 
priority in developing an operational thermonuclear 
wean, the "preventive war" and associated liti- 
cal impulses were diverted o new direions. The 
development of "brinkmanship"  leading o the 
Kennedy administration's efforts to carry out Henry 
("Strangelove") Kissinger's licy  became the new 
form of military thrust. The latter "brinkmanship" 
form of Utopian strategic dorine has persisted down 
to the present day, with only subsumed, increasingly 
exotic Utopian improvisations rather than anything 
qualitatively new. 

The military variants for Atlanticist dorine are 
auxiliary elements, such that various military 
alternatives can be substituted from time to time 
without altering the basic features of the dorine 
itself. Vis-a-vis the Soviets, the dorine specified a 
flexible containment licy to reace the old, 
relatively inflexible version and to use this increased 
flexibility as a way of lowereing the threshold for 
Atlanticist economic and litical penetration of the 
war-ravaged Soviet Union. This penetration was to be 
enhanced with the aid of Anglo-American litical 



elligence networks anted in the Eastern 
European countries. By agreements cutting the 
Soviets off from China, and construing a semi- 
penetrable baer on the Soviet west in central 
Europe, the conditions for reducing the Soviets to a 
condition of conquerability would be fostered (- 
) in the due course of preparations to this effe in 
the "Atlanticist world." 

In short, the predominant Atlanticist licy of - 
 toward the Soviet Union was a Fabian licy. 

Even without the  invasion of France, Roosevelt 
would have led the U.S. to war, certainly against a 
Japan manipulated and insulted o the required 
adversary sture, and direly or indirely  as 
required  the U.S. forces would have been deoyed 
in the Anglo-French-Belgian occupation of the Ruhr  
which would have been the "scenario" had Hitler gone 
only eastward. 

Overall, Roosevelt, like Wilson before him, led the 
U.S. o a war  which, this time, the U.S. could have 
prevented by appropriate aions before   and he 
established a licy which brought us out of the war 
with an Atlanticist licy aimed in fa, at World War 
III as its embedded, fateful imication. 

As we have indicated, the Korean War was a set-up 
in the spirit of the bloody escapades the Kennedy and 
Carter administrations were committed to unleashing 
under a modified licy later on. We were building up 
our arsenal of "The Bomb," on the way to developing 
an operational hydrogen bomb, and believed we had 
the correlation of forces to accelerate the Atlanticist 
dorine's Soviet licy substantially ahead of the 
schedule imied by Lippmann's (Roosevelt's) - 
 Fabian perspeive. So, North Korea was 
outrageously provoked by operations condued 
within and based un South Korea, while a 
(Rockefeller) Acheson State Department nominally 
under Truman advertised that the U.S. did not con- 
sider South Korea's defense in strategic U.S. erests. 
Naturally, with this public assurance, and provoked 
still further, the North Korean army moved south. We 
moved in with a counterassault, and we were on the 
way to our test showdown with both China and the 
Soviet Union. Then, we discovered such things as that 
the Soviets had developed an operational hydrogen 
bomb, and the war  by then close to a major war 
with China  no longer had the strategic appeal it had 

been deemed to have at the outset of the bloody affair. 
The pullback from the - licy took the 

form of the Eisenhowere administration, the scuttling 
of the included psychological-warfare tool, the 

astonished Senator Joseph McCarthy, and con- 
centration on a domestic, Japanese and European 
credit expansion. The Eisenhowere administration was 
partially a Rockefeller administration. For excellent 
reasons on former Senator and President Harry 







Truman's side, Truman and Nelson Rockefeller were 
not on the most amiable of terms. A piqued Nelson had 
left government shortly after the end of the war. Along 
with much of the New York City downtown establish- 
ment, Nelson Rockefeller scuttled back in under 
Eisenhowere, busied himself setting up the Fabian 
horrors-nest known as the Department of Health, 
Education and Welfare, and took a hand developing 
the National Security Council. Otherwise, the em- 
phasis on domestic credit expansion of industrial 
produion, rising toward Korean War heights of in- 
dustrial emoyment under peacetime conditions 
was a climate more favorable to Whig moods and 
influences in Washington, an Eisenhowere era which 
continued with general national approbation until the 
 recession. Relative to the s and the Korean 
War period, it was a time of peace and prosperity. 
Unfortunately, the Eisenhowere prosperity was 

'I 

predominantly a monetarist prosperity. To defend in- 
flated mortgages, instead of rebuilding our cities, we 
built around them and left the old hulks to rot. Bowing 
to the appetites of an inflated financial struure, we 
reached toward our produive output capacity levels 
then in existence, but we did not launch a genuine 
wave of net real capital expansion. To make 
stagnation palatable, the children of suburbia were 
given too many toys and too much of the Dr. Sck 
treatment, instead of goals and parental exames of a 
commitment to the Idea of Progress, The monetarist- 
contained Whig tendencies of the Eisenhowere period 
were predominantly just that, outside relatively small 
circles. What was not done permitted and thus con- 
tributed to the further moral erosion of the nation. 

Apart from the  vote fraud and the itant of 
Richard Nixon's caed-forward reputation from the 
pre- period, it was the  recession which made 
ssible the eleion of John F. Kennedy, for reasons 
mimicking the  Roosevelt viory through the 
Republican-linked - monetary crisis. 
Exemary was the concert of forces, including major 
steel companies, which reaed to the monetary 
pressures of - by setting up an attempted 
decisive showdown with the steelworkers* union. It 
was a mere parody of , but it served Rockefeller 
forces' purses. 

The bloody crisis in the Congo was the first such 
feature of the Kennedy administration, set o motion 
even before Kennedy was decently inaugurated. It 
was a Rockefeller operation, as scrutiny of the ac- 
counts of Union Miniere and assorted mining and rail 
holdings of Katanga and Rhodesia indicates most 
strikingly, and as the movement of Rockefeller- 
conneed finance o (what became) Zaire after the 
death of Lumumba and defeat of Gizenga illustrates to 
the same effe. It was also Rockefeller operatives 
and witting accomices of such known Rockefeller 



 

operatives, who condued and supervised the 
operation. 

The Bay of Pigs' defeat was covered quickly with 
mythology. Kennedy was not as misled as he 
professed. He had wereful reasons to abort the 
anned U.S. dire ervention o Cuba, anned to 
follow the cosmetic **beach-head" deoyment. Those 
compelling reasons were concealed to be used in aid of 
subsequent shennanigans. 

The Kennedy, ''Ich bin ein Berliner'' Crisis 
represented a reheating of Berlin which had been 
adopted almost as standard procedure for 
destabilizing ernational relations ever since st- 
operations audit of the first, real crisis of the "Berlin 

Airlift" period. 

The conneion between the Kennedy discussions 
with Khrushchev at Vienna and the  Cuban Missile 
Crisis is well-recognized, although the disingenuous- 
ness of Kennedy administration propaganda concern- 
ing Cuban missiles, and certain of the conneions to 
the Bay of Pigs affair are not so widely recognized. 

It is sometimes wishfully imagined that the  
Missile Crisis was the high- and turning- of 
Rockefeller brinkmanship under Kennedy. From 
approximately the period of the Missile Crisis until 
Kennedy's death, the antics of the administration 
were building up to a crescendo on all fronts. 

Rockefeller erests were enraged against Charles 
de Gaulle generally, and regarded his successful 
economic-cooperation and related agreements with 
the BRD's Konrad Adenauer as rtending a fun- 

damental threat to Atlanticist strategic erests. The 
use of the rigged Der Spiegel affair to begin the 
'^Watergating'* of the Adenauer government, 
especially respeing the seleion and licies of 
Adenauer's successor, was by no means the only 
expression of Rockefeller's diseasure. In the same 
overall operation for which a anned simulated 
**Castro-inspired" assassination of Kennedy himself 
was projeed by forces associated with the Kennedy 
administration, Italian industrialist Mattei was 
murdered, there was an attempted assassination 
against de Gaulle, and a series of attempted 
assassinations were deoyed against Fidel Castro. 

What still remains unknown to us concerning the 
Kennedy assassination is the question of who, working 
from the inside of the anned simulated ''Castro- 
inspired'' assassination proje, turned the ended 
simulation o an aual assassination? What is 
known is that the occurrence of the assassination 
coincided with a anned simulation of a ''Castro- 
inspired" assassination attempt. We also have an 
excellent estimation of what John F. Kennedy, Bobby 
Kennedy, McGeorge Bundy and others would have 
done had the simulation occurred as projeed. We 
also deduce from such background fas why the 







 

aual assassination was not used to carry through the 
new confrontation with Cuba and the Soviet Union, 
and why the massive cover-up of the more relevant 
fas was effeed from that time to the present date. 

Apart from such most-notable developments of the 
- period, and the institutionalization of the 
Vietnam War and "Berkeley" coup of  in In- 
donesia  to be cometed under President Johnson  
the global pattern of the Kennedy administration 
period is waves of destabilizations, tampering in 
foreign eleions, and other typically Rockefeller 

antics, direed not only against nominal opnents 
and adversaries, but against governments and parties 
that were nominally U.S. allies. 

The further notable, foreign-licy and related 
heritages of the Kennedy administration include the 
following. () A sweeping reorganization of the 
Atlanticists' global elligence establishment, 
deemphasizing the role of elligence agencies under 
government control, in favor of neo-Fabian and linked 
Interl private litical elligence and elligence 
operations capabilities. McGeorge Bundy is among 
those traditional Rockefeller associates key in that 
process, () An acceleration of drastic licy changes 
within the U.S. Justice Department. Bobby Kennedy 
was at the center of this, but McGeorge Bundy, both in 
the administration and later through a Ford Foun- 
dation base, is of more substantial imrtance, as are 
the Russell Sage Foundation and its networks, us the 
Fab ian law firms associated with the liberal wings of 
the Democratic and Republican parties' "Eastern 
Establishment" bases in Washington and New York 
City. () An upgrading of the Department of Health, 
Education and Welfare as a base of neo-Fabian 
"destabilization" and related elligence-style op- 
erations against both foreign allies and U.S. insti- 
tutions and the U.S. pulation. The same hierarchy 
of foundations, law firms and key individuals involved 
in the Justice Department operation are prominent in 
this conneion. () The institutionalizing of a future 
licy of "deindustrializing" the United States and our 
allies (e.g., "Trie Revolution"). 

The Kennedy administration represents a first 
attempt to launch the kind of entionally-decisive 
successive confrontations with the Soviet leadership, 
along lines outlined in Henry Kissinger's earlier brink- 
manship dorinal piece, for which the present Carter 
Administration is an inflated parody, down to Jimmy 
Carter's cultivation of a "Kennedy coiffure." 

As to the overall charaer of the Rockefellers' 
Kennedy administration, the following erseing 
considerations are causal and on the surface. 

As Henry Kissinger's famous  paper attests  
the document which associated him with the fiional 
"Dr. Strangelove"  the development of what U.S. 
Atlanticists viewed as a credible Soviet strategic de- 



terrent capability, combined with the imications of a 
projeed development of ercontinental ballistic 
missiles during the "Sputnik" period, pushed the 
Atlanticists' Utopians toward a strategic licy of em- 
oying psychological warfare on a strategic scale. 

This required a series of adventurous bluffs. In each 
bluff the U.S. litical command must appear to have 
become sufficiently lunatic to launch thermonuclear 
war if the Soviets did not yield some significant con- 
cession. The rational, hofied Soviets, confronted 

with such lunacy, were supsed to make some signifi- 
cant concession in the direion of the confrontation- 
ists' demand. Next, using various concoed pretexts, 
the operation would be repeated, either with open 
thermoculear confrontation, or the h of such con- 
frontation lurking visibly in the background. By a 
succession of such bluffs, it was prosed that the 
Soviets could be induced to retreat each time to a rela- 
tively more-weakened strategic sture, so that the 
ratio of tential resistance-effeiveness to the next 
would be reduced. 

By such a succession of confrontations, the Soviet 
defense capability would be eroded, converging 
toward a level representing an acceptable risk of pen- 
alty for war from the Atlanticist stand. As a by- 
produ of this process against the Soviet leadership, 
the other governments of the OECD and developing 
seors would be left exsed and tefied, and thus 
malleable in face of Rockefellers' immediate auster- 
ity demands against them. 

The future tential of Soviet economic and defense 
capabilities, the emergence of centrifugal tendencies 
on economic and monetary issues away from lowere 
Manhattan among Europeans, and the  recession, 
represented a configuration of developments and r- 
tents recommending some early draconian measures 
of counteraion by the Atlanticists. An imemen- 
tation of the successive-confrontation-scenario 
against the Soviet leadership was the obvious key- 
stone element for a broad range of measures and insti- 
tutional changes. 

The background to the Missile Crisis and related 
Kennedy capers is identified sufficiently by two note- 
worthy fas. The first is the fraudulent "missile gap" 
theme of the  Kennedy campaign trail. The second 
is New York State Governor Nelson Rockefeller's 
campaign for building air-raid shelters. () 

Someone, shall we say, had induced Khrushchev et 
al. to go against Soviet military dorine, to opt for a 
reduion of the "conventional" war-fighting capa- 



. In a war, air-raid shelters around target cities would simy be 
tombs for the incinerated and suffocated dead, but the duping of the 
pulation o relying un such useless objes convinces an adver- 
sary government that the U.S. pulation is to that degree litically 
conditioned  however credulously  to permit its government to 
make a confrontation. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







bility in preference for a shift to a missile-centered 
**mutual strategic deterrence" capability. In fa, 
contrary to the fraudulent '*missile gap'* propaganda 
of the  Kennedy campaign trail, the Soviets had so 
far developed only a token missile force relative to the 
U.S. capabilities. This Khrushchev period licy 
blunder left the Soviets for the ermediate-term in a 
relatively weakened strategic sition, which Atlanti- 
cists might exoit in the near-term or probably 
never. 

Ironically, the consequence of the - Kennedy 
capers was to discredit forever the prosal of a 
**mutual strategic deterrence'* sture and U.S.- 
Soviet agreements within Soviet leading circles. The 
Soviet return to a Clausewitzian sture is associated 
 somewhat ironically  with the abrupt fall of N.S. 
Khrushchev. As one ought to know, Soviet agriculture 
has been a weak  in the litical sition of Soviet 
officials of Khrushchev's and Brezhnev's career his- 
tory, such that it is difficult to assess from the outside 
how the combination of unsuccessful agricultural 
adventurism, unsuccessful sturing, the context of a 
suicidal military sture, and other special considera- 
tions  not all to Khrushchev's discredit  were pro- 
rtioned in contributing to Khrushchev's dismissal. 
Nonetheless, the consequence of the Kennedy admin- 
istration has been the Soviet and Warsaw Pa 
commitment to a thermonuclear war-winning capa- 



 

bility  a development imrtant to cite as il- 
lustration of the lawful tendencies which ovede 
the Atlanticists* estimations of the strategic 
process. 

Since Kennedy, and since Senator Barry Gold- 
water's  eleion campaign, excepting the forces 
behind the **Hallowe'en Massacre," no credibly large 
litical force in the U.S. has mustered the gumption 
until now to seriously opse direly the Rockefellers 
and their allies. Since President Gerald Ford backed 
down in face of a monstrous eleion fraud on the 
morning of November , , amid blackmailing 
rumors from Rockefeller circles concerning Ford's 
alleged '*KCIA ta," and since others predominant- 
ly, wishfully refused to believe up through Dec. , 
 U.S. Labor Party warnings of what a Carter 
administration and its licies would be, we have the 
worst Democratic Party administration in a chain of 
horror-stories going back through Kennedy, Roose- 
velt, Wilson, Buchanan, Van Buren, and Andrew Jack- 
son  with Republicans Theodore Roosevelt and Taft 
properly thrown o the colleion. Unless forces are 
mustered adequate to change U.S. nominal licy 
now, the result may well be the physical extinion of 
our nation this year or next. 

Monetarism leads to war, Atlanticism is its litical 
dorine, the dorine of war, and Atlanticist 
**liberals" are its principal social base. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 



j-j'. ..y. 




The drought' stricken Sahel in Africa, caused by the Rockefellers. The bare licy underlying the Rockefellers ' 
Atlanticist Dorine is to loot the world*s agricultural-industrial base. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 



THE GEOPOLITICS 
OF ATLANTICISM 







 

Thus far we have considered two sets of foreign- 
licy outlooks and praices, one Anglo-Amer- 
ican monetarist and the other admissibly termed 
either *Xonstitutionalist" or **Whig,'* Now, to un- 
derstand the fuller praical imications of the 
problem, we must consider the special feature of the 
**American Century" dorine which warrants its self- 
charaerization as an **Atlanticist Dorine." 

Taken at face value, as Walter Lippmann and others 
set forth their exanations of it, the ^'Atlantic Doc- 
trine" is the most radical version of the geolitical 
teachings associated inclusively with the name of Nazi 
Rudolf Hess*s teacher, Haushofer. () On the surface, 
Lippmann's (Roosevelt's) conception of U.S. foreign 
licy is entirely a reduionist metaphysical struc- 
ture derived from the most radical and most ob- 
sessively-seized axioms of the Haushofer school. This 
metaphysical concoion serves ostensibly as a pur- 
rtedly ausible rationalization for the special self- 
erests of the lowere Manhattan-based monetarists. 

The fa that the metaphysical dorine serves as a 
rationalization for monetarist erests, and that Fab- 
ian Lippmann is essentially a monetarist's hired in- 
telleual thug in the tradition of James Mill and 

Jeremy Bentham, might suggest that this form of doc- 
trine itself is merely a deliberate hoax. If one signifies 
by that that all the rationalization involved is there- 
fore entirely hycrisy on the part of the perpetrators, 
that conclusion would be mistaken. 

Granted, wherever a Roosevelt (Lippmann) and 
other notable pronents of the document wish to 
press a licy which is in their faion's own naked 
self-erest and also visibly contrary to the vital in- 
terests of the United States, they consciously prefer to 
state the argument for the prosal or aion in its 
geolitical or other metaphysical disguises. Such con- 
scious fraud, such hycrisy is what we properly 
signify as exemifying ''the Wilsonian tradition." 
Such hycrisy taken o account, for the rest of the 
matter they are, unfortunately, sincere. At its core, 
the Atlanticists' geolitical dorine is not merely 
false, but it is that special kind of false notion proper- 
ly, rigorously defined as an ideology. 

The metaphysical reduionism represented by the 
geolitical Atlanticist Dorine is the guise for the 
ruling ideology of the combined force of the ruling 
monetarists and their broader liberal-to-radical social 
base. 

m 

Stri epistemological distinions are imperative if 
the problems involved are to be effeively understood 
for praical remedies. The Atlanticist Dorine is not 
in-and-of-itself the ruling core ideology of that fac- 
tion, but an appropriate refleion of the core ideology 



. The British authorship of the dorine is, in fa, equally im- 
rtant, but less recognized pularly than Haujshofer's. 



respeing the configuration of problems the faion's 
leadership confronts in the domain of foreign licy. 
Other expressions of the same core ideology are 
Keynesian economics, pragmatism, behaviorism, and 
the mentality of a slum-landlord's overdressed attor- 
ney eading the axiomatic sanity of rent before a 
session of New York City Landlord-Tenant Court. 
Epistemologically, the core ideology is the contem- 
rary form of the nominalist world outlook, in ops- 
ition both to the scholastic version of humanist 
rationalism and to the historically "neo-atonic" out- 
look of stri humanism which we, together variously 
with Thomas Gresham, Jean Bodin, John Milton, 
Rene Descartes, Benedi Spinoza, Benjamin Frank- 
lin, Hegel and Marx represent. 

The rigorous epistemological approach is indispens- 
able to comprehending how Atlanticist litics func- 
tions. 

Such funions involve, most immediately, the pro- 
cesses governing the way leading Atlanticists think. 
This enables us to predi within a reasonable range of 
accuracy how the Atlanticist faion will behave. The 
Atlanticists are not governed by reason, not by a per- 
ception of aual cause-and-effe conneions in the 
real world; they are governed by a false erpre- 
tation of the real world, a delusion, through which they 
mis-sele and misdefine appearances as purrted 
fas according to a mode which conforms to their 
nominalist ideology. 

Hence, to predi the lawful trends in their behavior, 
we must be able to conceptualize models of the world 
which show how Atlanticists misperceive the real 
world. 

This requires a method which must appear concept- 
ually difficult to the novice at first encounter. It is the 
mastery of precisely this methodology, apied to the 
praical work of litical elligence, which has 

earned our organization its presently growing author- 
ity in matters of global litical and related strategy, 
that cumulative if begrudged credibility we have 
secured in many fields of inquiry. 

The problem demanding this method is in fa ele- 
mentary, once the significance of a ruling ideology is 
recognized. On the one side, there is the real world. 
This is a world which, without the efficient, willful, rul- 
ing erventions of the Atlanticists, would tend to 
evolve patterns according to rational, universalizing 
princies of cause and effe. We can imagine such a 
world governed by forces more or less correly 
committed to the discovery of those rational prin- 
cies, and in which such ruling forces more or less 
correly erpret both the consequences of aions as 
such, and the causal relationship between those conse- 
quences and preceding as of deed or omission. How- 
ever, under Atlanticists' domination of a highly 
influential aspe of the global process of development 







in the real world, the course of events in the real world 
cannot proceed as would be the case in which the rul- 
ing forces were governed by self-improving **negative 
feedback*' tendencies toward rationality. 

To the extent that the ruling forces of the world are 
in significant part axiomatically irrational, we have 
the following rigorous form of problem in at- 
tempting to reduce the course of development to a 
lawful ordering. 

Let E stand for event, and P for perception of the 
event, the judgment of the significance of the event. 
The perception of the nature of the event as such is 
inseparable in fa from an imied anticipation of the 
subsequent occurrence by the perceiving agency. 
Hence, Ei leads to Pi, such that Pj leads to aions on 
the real domain, which aions lead to E. Pi has a real 
content (anually or tentially  virtually  distin 
from its subjeive-error content), such that the real 
content of the aion taken on account of Pi can be 
identified as distin from the imagined ent of the 
a, and this real content designated by Ei' . Now Ei , 
El' , and Eform a causal sequence of aions in a 
lawful, rational perception of the ordering of events. 
However, where Pi is governed by an ideology, the 
rational imications of Ei do not appropriately 
determine Ei' . Hence, although Ei' lawfully 
(causally) generates E , E is not the event generated 
by the alternative erpretation of Eifrom the 
stand of human self-erests. 

Hence, analysis of an ideologically driven system of 
misperception produces a sequence of events which is 
not in corresndence with imications of a lawful 
perception of reality from the stand of real 
human erests. Nonetheless, the ideologically, 
irrationally driven sequence of erventions can 
always, and must be erpreted from the stand 
of rational knowledge of the lawful ordering processes 
in the real world. 

The special feature next to be considered is that the 
cumulative effe of an ideologically driven set of P's 
leads toEjjS which are not in corresndence with the 
imied ideologically-anticipated consequences, Pn. 
However, still worse, aual E^ is then erpreted in 
the ideologically driven system of perceptions as 

Pn-f . 

In the instance of a rational ruling force, the 
discrepancy between Pn and En, insofar as it is taken 
properly as evidence of some error in previously 
emoyed licy or method, causes a correion in the 
defeive method. This is not necessarily the corre 
adjustment at each , but the * 'negative feed- 
back*' aion imied (to speak with admissible 
crudeness for this immediate purse) is operative 
and thus more broadly charaerizes the evolution of 
ruling lices and methods. In the case of the system 



 

of perceptions driven by an ideology of an obsessive 
form, the imied ''negative feedback*' conneion 
almost never causes a correion in the axiomatic 
features of licy and method, but leads to a (**si- 
tive feedback") discarding of every collateral prin- 
cie not axiomatic to the ideology, in the effort to save 
the ideology itself. 

Fascist economy is the best available, most con- 
centrated modern exame of this behavior. The Felix 
Rohatyn-led approach to fascist economic methods of 

debt-rollover against New York City illustrates the 
same princie. Rather than correing the immediate 
error of New York City's  finances  that its 
economic base's capability for revenue-produion 
had been not only stagnant, but anually eroded by 
pyramiding of debt, Rohatyn et al. proceeded to 
savagely destroy the economic base of the local 
economy in order to pyramid the unpayable debt still 
further. 

At each  in the - process during which 
Rohatyn and his accomices made a fresh innovation 
governed by the same depraved conceptions, the utter 
economic incompetence and inevitable consequences 
of each fresh innovation were properly blatantly 
obvious to any rational observer. Yet, the financiers. 
New York State's Governor Hugh Carey, the pathetic 
Mayor Beame administration, the cowardly City 
Council, and trade-union skesman Vior Gotbaum 
undered trade-union trust funds and looted the vital 
services of the city, unging ever-ahead to new in- 
novations more depraved and incompetent than the 
proceding atrocities. The mess, inevitably, is now 
monstrously worse as a result of the "remedies" than 
the original ^'disease" could ever have caused. Ob- 
sessional ''sitive feedback, " 

This is identical to the logic leading from the Hitler- 
Schacht Mefo-Bill and 'Mabor-ensive" Ar- 
beitsdienst licies of - o World War II, and 
o the ensified apication of the same labor- 
ensive methods in the slave-labor-death-camp 
system of approximately -. 

Like Felix Rohatyn et al., in the New York ugliness, 
the Nazis and their backers did not set out with a 
conscious perception of a consequent, subsumed 
licy which (inclusively) slaughtered six million 
Jews. Rather, clinging to the same ('^sitive feed- 
back") licy now being emoyed by Austrian Jewish 
refugee Felix Rohatyn to New York City, the Nazis 
were impelled, lawfully, step-by-step, to drive 
Rohatyn (to safety) out of Austria  he, thus, one of 
the fortunate ones  and to slaughter six million of the 
European Jews the safe-and-sound Rohatyn left 
behind. 

The Nazi regime which accomished those deeds 
was not only the creation inclusive of some of the same 







 

financial erests with which Rohatyn is today 
associated as adopted representative, but the Nazi 
licy those financial weres built o Hitler's Ger- 
many is the same licy  the same monetarists' 
litical dorine  which Rohatyn is apying on 
their behalf to New York City, In princie, Rohatyn is 
imicitly, retroaively endorsing the murder of the 

six million European Jews he left behind to be 
slaughtered. That is obsessive ideology. 

The associated process of moral degradation of the 
Nazis, exaly like that being exhibited by Rohatyn 
and his present associates in New York City, is 
elementary. At each  the axiomatic imperatives 
of the ideology come o praical confli with some 
praical or moral princie representing the genuine 
self-erest of the nation or humanity, that princie 
is discarded, in order to maain the obsessional 
praical imperatives demanded at that junure by 
the ideology itself. Hence, the ''sitive feedback'* 
syndrome. 

The same method of analysis is mandatory for 
comprehending the licies of the Trilateral Com- 
mission and its puppet, Carter Administration, 

Apy to the world and national economy the exa 
same princies Felix Rohatyn et al. have illustrated 
for the case of New York City. The ratio of the debt- 
service requirements of Chase Manhattan et al. to the 
absolute profit of the global and national economic 
basis has grown so monstrously large that this 
bankrupt mass of debt cannot be rolled over without 
looting wages, working conditions, essential social 
services, and also the circulating capital of 
agricultural and industrial produion. The alter- 
native, monetarists' methods of rollover through 
credit expansion can no longer be simy apied, 
since the ratio of debt-service requirements to the 
economic base has grown so monstrous that such 
credit expansion would immediately trigger an un- 
controllable hyperinflationary spiral. The time span 
for the collapse of the monetary system through the 
latter option has become so short relative to the time 
span for deflationary collapse through successfully 
looting the economic base that the latter course, 
although itself totally insane, represents to the lowere 
Manhattan and allied erests involved the best op- 
tion for briefly prolonging their financial and litical 
were in the world. The same ''sitive feedback. 

Among the many features of the overall Trilateral 
package, properly first singled out for attention is the 
economic program itself. All the other features of the 

package are litical and related derivatives of the 
economic licy. 

The bare licy of the Rockefeller-led forces is that 
of looting the industrial-agricultural base of the 
national and global economy, a form of economic 



auto-cannibalization of the stored-up produive 
tential represented in the form of existing ant, 
farms, mines, labor force. Through this they attempt 
to give a semblance of liquidity to U.S. Treasury and 
Federal Reserve System (and IMF, Eurodollar) 
issuance of credit to the account of bankrupt, 
overextended paper, to the effe of stning the 
reckoning of David Rockefeller's already insoluble 
and worsening condition of bankruptcy. 

All the weird, lewd legislative and other packages, 
all the covert-operations gimmickry featuring 

elements such as terrorism and drug-decriminaliza- 

tion, all the permutations on the S- bill, all the 
corruption of our Federal courts, are merely taical 
efforts to imement that hard-core economic 
package. Similarly, as we have shown, the Rocke- 
feller impulsion toward World War III, the confronta- 
tionist adventures of the unstable Carter and his 
**mentor" Zbigniew Brzezinski, are ultimately 
nothing but a refleion of the same bare economic 
licy. 

The principal litical packaging of the bare 
economic licy takes the form of fostering litical 
movements which demand the evil consequences of a 
Rockefellers' fascist economic licy as a matter of 
variously liberal and radical demands for im- 
provement in the 'Equality of life." The prototype for 
such packages is the **Trie Revolution" st- 
industrial society thesis of the Ford Foundation's 
Fund for the Republic. The process of creating a 
semblance of a mass social base for the Rockefellers' 
fascist economic licies to this effe involves 
grafting st-industrial * 'quality of life" demands, as 
purrted liberal and ^'radical" demands, un a neo- 
Fabian-coordinated, *' egalitarian" movement 
developed through Fabian manipulation of the Civil 
Rights ferment, and developed similarly through the 
relevant litical-elligence agencies' design and 
fostering of the so-called New Left ferment and its 
''scenario-molded" offshoots. 

The germs of the **new radical" ferment were 
developed, in a coordinated way, out of the old Fabian 
litical-elligence networks in Western Europe 
and North America (principally), including Fabian 
nests in and around the old Americans for Democratic 
Aion, the Socialist Party of America, the old New 
Republic orbit, with an overlapping hard-core of law 
firms and other networks springing chiefly from the 
Roosevelt administration. These contributed the seeds 
of the "grand scenario" through which the social 
ferment among university students and ghetto youth, 
the social by-produ of the  recession and its 
aftermath, were channelled through various, suc- 
cessive, variously programmed and almost- 
programmed scenarios o creating a New Left. 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



This scenario began, as any effeive psychological 
manipulation of pulations must do to be successful, 

with a relatively credible focal issue, civil rights for 
blacks in the southern states. () Once the southern 
civil rights movement had been developed among 
university youth strata in the northern centers, the 
dorine of "Up South" was roduced (beginning 
with the judo taic of the Wool worth picketing 
campaign), to deoy the white university-youth civil 
rights aivists and their indispensable core-seeding 
of radical organizations o the ghettoes of the north- 
ern cities. 

By maaining a climate of confrontation 
throughout, first in the southern states, and then in the 
northern ghetto aivities, the liberal attorneys, the 
Rockefeller- and Rothschild- denominated funding and 
licy conduits ervened as the **good guy" allies of 
the duped and manipulated aivists, against the **bad 
guys," the also-manipulated conservatives. On the 
latter count, the imrtant countergang role of 
William Buckley and his nests becomes clear. 

The aual, root problem of the northern ghettoes 
and so forth was chiefly a stagnation of the nation's 
industrial growth, a monetarist system of real estate 
finance imanted in the U.S. through imrtation of 
British and Dutch influences, and a correlated 
degradation of the northern cities notably as economic 
entities. By diverting the issue focus away from the 
American princies of industrial progress to the 
Fabian prosition of equitable "redistribution" of 
existing economic decay, the white liberal and radical 
youth associated (most prominently) with the Depart- 
ment of Health, Education and Welfare, Ford Founda- 
tion and Russell Sage Foundation projes, were 
sensuously conditioned in a climate of low-grade 
confrontation o an anti-industrial, anually proto- 
fascist mass of white radicals and lumpen youth  in 
the image of the s Weimar Germany counter- 
cultural ferment on which the Nazi Jugendbewegung 
("youth movement") was based. 

The attempts to crush  and later assassinate  
Reverend Martin Luther King, the issuance of the 
"Trie Revolution" st-industrial society thesis ^ the 
role of Fabian operative Stokely Carmichael in the 

"Rap" Brown "Black Powere" turn, the killing of 
Malcolm X, and the first roduions of the Nazi 
Volksgemeinschaft licy and related dorines of 
"community control" and "cultural nationalism," 
were all exemary, coordinate expressions of the 
degree and form of molding of "new radical" outlooks 
in a proto-fascist direion by the middle of the s. 



IL We have analyzed the civil rights movement in an issue of The 
Campaigner devoted to that subje ("What Happened to In- 
tegration?", Vol. VIII, No. . Aug. , pp. -). 



 

In this process, the Kennedy administration was 
crucial. It was the Rockefellers' "Kennedy Mafia" 
which provided the essential circumstances and much 
of the impetus for this hideous "attitudinal condition- 
ing" of much of our nation's youth, both before and 
after Kennedy's decease. 

The ernal social convulsions produced by the 
prolongation of the Vietnam War provided the energiz- 
ing climate, through which, around the catalyst of the 
"Anti-War Movement," broader layers of liberals 
were direly infused with the ideologies anted 
among the mid-s ghetto-oriented radical aivists. 
The role of the Socialist Workers Party is one of the 
most accessible paradigms for this process. 

The  New York City teachers' strike, and related 
convulsions throughout the nation at that time  in- 
cluding the provocateur-steeped, orchestrated affair 
at the  Chicago Democratic Convention  are 
crucial to understanding this process. 

The fa that the hard-core of the developing proto- 
fascist movement included such traditionally 
"Marxist'* organizations as the Communist Party 
(after ) and the Socialist Workers Party 
(throughout) , prompts special attention to the fa that 
the traditional socialist outlook is toward the 
organized labor movement, and to the organization of 
the unorganized o trade-union formations affiliated 
or allied with other trade unions generally. Yet, the 
charaeristic impulse of the "Up South" movement 
from the beginning was bitterly anti-labor. 

The Socialist Workers Party, which no longer had a 
significant praical erest within the trade-union 
organizations, quickly adapted to this anti-labor 
impulse. The Communist Party, whose gate-receipts 
still significantly depended un a prortionately 
significant base in trade unions, could not make such 
a transition toward an anti-labor impulse credible to 
its membership until approximately -. In , 
every nominal socialist organization left over from the 
s and s but the Socialist Party of America 
openly and consciously led an effort dedicated to 
breaking up the largest single municipal trade-union 
in the U.S. (It happened also to be a major trade-union 
base of the New York SP of A organization.) Fur- 
thermore, those nominal socialists and their ac- 
comices were consciously dedicated already to 
breaking up municipal unions and construion unions 
throughout the U.S. in behalf of the same "community 
control" licy of union-busting. 

Excepting the  Cambodia affair, the Nixon 
eleion of  took the steam out of the anti-war 
movement and corresnded to a sharp ebbing away 
from the various radicalisms charaeristic of the 
Johnson administration. The mass youth aivism of 
the pre- period was frustrated, worn out. This 







 

ebbing of a social force in motion did not, however, 
frustrate the manipulators working from behind the 
scenes. On the contrary, such a development 
represents the optimal circumstance for diverting the 
duped, frustrated strata formerly engaged in **mass 
aion'* o zealots for the broadest assortment of 
exotic absurdities. 

Around the  presidential nomination campaigns 
of Eugene McCarthy and Robert Kennedy, these 
frustrated layers were diverted toward such new focal 
issues as *'environmentalism." The demoralization 
was used, for exame, to feed the  development of 
the ''feminist movement," repeating the civil-rights 
syndrome of using a legitimate reformist issue as a 
**judo taic" of social manipulation, to infuse (and 
proceed to re-dire) the ''feminist movement" with 
assorted neo-Fabian's Utopian imbecilities. The im- 
becilities, at first broadly rejeed as obscene by most 
among women's rights forces, grew less alien to their 
perception with constant conta, and even became 
defended as a matter of defending "a part of the 
women's movement" against a common "male'* out- 
sider. Meanwhile, by , the fostering of the use of 
marijuana, launched among the "Up South" strata 
during the earlier s, had begun to become part of 
the tenets of the liberal-radical "sub-culture," and the 
foot-in-the-door for promoting LSD. 

With the aid of influential law firms and wereful 
foundations and other allied forces, this youth "sub- 
culture," although a minority force, was transformed 
o the labile, manipulable, mobile battering ram 
used to spread its isonous ideology not only among 
liberal and ghetto pulations, but o the industrial 
unions. This social force, now organically fascist in 
world outlook, has been the indispensable auxiliary 
through which the National Environmental Policy A 
has been turned, with the growing comicity of the 
courts, o an instrument both for sabotaging our 
industrial and agricultural produion, and for 
creating a climate in which this treason against our 
nation's most vital erests is hegemonic in the pres- 
ent Carter Administration. 

It will probably be objeed by some that our ac- 
count of this aspe of national history is too coherent, 
too rational, "too theoretical." It will be objeed by 
some that we imy (as, in fa we do not), a were 
and capacity for systematic thinking to Rockefeller 
and associated circles which is visibly far beyond the 
capabilities of a Nelson, David or John D. Ill (we have 
not profiled Laurance). Some will make the further 
objeion, since such forces were incapable of such 
coherent ent, it could not have happened in quite 
that way. This involves precisely the issue of method 
we outlined above. 
When a member of one's family is ill, does one seek 



account of the disease from the viim or the medical 
profession? Does the fa that the person afflied with 
the illness lacks the knowledge to undergo willfully XYvq 
lawful sequence of biological processes involved 
signify that the disease has not developed, or has not 
developed in at least approximately the way medical 
professional knowledge stipulates? Does one assay a 
rock by asking the rock its opinion, or by emoying a 
geologist? 

In fa, the way in which the transformation of liber- 
al and radical youth o today's proto-fascist "envi- 
ronmentalists" and drug-decriminalizers occurred 
was a mixture of overall Fabian-utopian social an- 
ning, and in detail largely successive improvisations 
of the moment by those neo-Fabian operatives imme- 
diately involved. Our dire knowledge, documenta- 
tion from relevant archives, highly-aced infor- 
mants, and published sources of each period more or 
less accurately defines that mixture. Insofar as the 
isolated features of the process appeared to have a "hit- 
or-miss" charaer from the stand of the con- 
sciousness of the controllers involved, the set of under- 
lying ideological axioms governing their judgment de- 
limited the range of ''hit-or-miss" choices made at a 
net predominance of s, and thus had an overall 
"sitive feedback" effe of a corresnding 
"Markov process." The net effe of the overall pro- 
cess, deoyed on a large scale, had a prediable 
overai evolution in terms of the method of analysis we 
summarized above. () 

One apies something like the same approach pro- 
per to study of the behavior of lowere forms of animal 
life. The conceptions of choice or future as we know it 
do not exist for lowere animals. Yet, their choices and 
chains of behavior over time are essentially predi- 
able  by the hunter, ethologist, and so forth, but not 
the animal itself . One must think , for emphasis, of the 
Rockefeller-Fabian beast, and of the problem of 
analyzing the lawful features and prediable behav- 
ior of that Zjeast; then one has the broad notion of the 
method apicable. 

Would the same emphasis be appropriate to ruling 
rational human institutions? As we have described the 
method, no. As we shall see, there are the most were- 
ful epistemological reasons for apying the methods 



. Carol LaRouche and L. Marcus, "The New Left, Local Control 
and Fascism," The Campaigner, yol I, No.  (Sept. ), pp. -, 
repr. in Strategy for Socialism Volume I (New York: Campaigner 
Publications. Inc..*), pp. -; "SDS Beyond the Grave," The 
Campaigner, Vol. II, No.  (Sept.-O. ), pp. -; The Third 
American Revolution (New York: Campaigner Publications, Inc.. 
), p.  ff., -; " 'Police Socialism* in NYC," The Campaigner, 
Vol. I, No.  (Dec. ), pp. -; L, Marcus, "The Mass Strike," The 
Campaigner, Vol. I. No. , May-June , pp. -. -. 







of ethology, rather than proper anthrology, to the 
neo-Fabian beast. () 

Today, the economic licy of the proto-fascist liber- 
al-radical *'left" centers around the topics of **envir- 
onmental proteion,*' zero growth, and **small is 
better." These exicitly represent fascist economic 
ideology. Once the dire relationship of such fascist 
liberal-radical hoodlumism to David Rockefeller's 
erests is recognized, one is not astonished that the 
Rockefellers and their allies have funded, coddled and 

otherwise fostered the inspiring and molding of the 
neo-Fabians' fascist liberal-radical upsurge which 
presently confronts us. 

The Rockefellers' energy licy has a double aspe. 
The traditional stand of the petroleum marketing 
monolies' financial backers and controllers has 
been to hold back produion in order to increase the 
rate of profit on the marketing of each barrel, both by 
monolistically jacking up the price at which the 
marketing monoly delivers petroleum, and, when- 
ever ssible, by keeping their purchase-price down 
by creating a condition of aual or tential competi- 
tive oversupy at the  of constried produion. 
(*'gas wars) aside.) In this and equivalent ways, the 
financier forces associated with a hegemonic sition 
in world marketing of petroleum squeeze marginal 
profits from both the consumer and the producer. 
Insofar as the Rockefellers represent both petroleum- 
marketing erests (although they incidentally con- 
trol major producers, they do not represent a produ- 
cer-erest overall), and also monetarist financier in- 
terests, their decades-old approach to energy licy 
has this traditional double aspe. 

This double aspe concentrates at a middle  
best illustrated by the - petroleum hoax. The 
net flow of funds as dollar-denominated desits o 
the accounts of Rockefeller and allied institutions rep- 
resented income not immediately consumed by the 
exrting economies, and hence was in the form of de- 
sits to strengthen the otherwise indefensibly over- 
extended sition of the Rockefeller and allied finan- 



. That, as we have rerted it, is the way it happened. That is not a 
surmise, an inference. This writer was there, a dire observer of 
many of the principal events and personalities involved at each turn. 
It was merely necessary to enrich one's knowledge of the significance 
of McGeorge Bundy's and other visible controllers' roles and con- 
neions by research after the fa, to uncover the conneions which 
accounted for the way they behaved in praice at each . The 
archives of Eric Gerlach, exsing certain relevant leaders of the 
American "left" as long-standing Fabian agents dating back to World 
War II, are illustrative of the kind of background research involved. 
This writer has lived through the s as a child, aware of that era's 
values, the s as a youth, and from the end of World War II went 
through such relevant experiences as the American Veterans Com- 
mittee, the campus Americans for Democratic Aion, parts of the 
labor movement experience, the s through s socialist 



 

cial erests. What was most significant financially 
was the abrupt enlargement of this flow of dollar-de- 
nominated desits through such institutions. This en- 
largement was crucial, since the preceding flows were 
part of the insufficiency which represented the insta- 
bility of the base of the financial institutions involved. 
The other economic side of the price increase was that 
the added income came from savagely deeting the cir- 
culating capital of industry and agriculture in the non- 
oil-exrting, or net-consuming nations. Since the glob- 
al economic base involved was already in a depres- 
sion taken as a whole^ a purely temrary rollover of 

the Rockefellers' and others' overextended sitions 
slashed further  often deey  in its destruion 
of circulating capital. This reduced the overall ability 
of the debtors to pay, making the subsequently ex- 
panded mass of refinanced paper vastly more over- 
extended. ''Positive feedback/' 

From any rational stand, it represents a hope- 
less, hopelessly insane spiral, but each time the 
Rockefellers and their allies go to that well they bring 
back a moment or so of further stnement of their 

ultimately inevitable financial collapse. Again, 
''sitive feedback, " 

The present Rockefeller-Ford Foundation- 
Schlesinger energy prosal projes the licy-imi- 
cations of such Rockefeller looting of the United States 
in an obvious way. In order to roll over the Rockefel- 
lers' and others' worthless paper yet once 
again  for a short time  they require a massive 
refinancing of the International Monetary Fund  so 
that the IMF may in turn loot the contributing govern- 
ments' treasuries with hyperinflationary conse- 
quences, to finance various nations' unpayable debt 
service to Chase Manhattan Bank. 

It requires more. It requires also a massive aug- 
mentation of the desits put through bankrupt finan- 
cial institutions. Hence, we have witnessed the Rocke- 
fellers' effort to get through the International Re- 
sources Bank swindle (a dire imitation of Hjalmar 
Schacht's Mefo Bill swindle), and such token "foot-in- 



movement, and was himself an increasingly aive participant, and 
oppenent of neo-Fabianism in key related developments of the s, 
experiencing and fighting against what then most often first appeared 
to be inexicably irrational sudden turns to new firm conviions 
among those varying grades of influential figures with whom he was 
acquaed. Since , he has been the founder and leader of a 
growing organization at the center of struggles against the neo- 
Fabians of our liberal and radical strata, leading an organization of 
limited physical but extraordinary and expanding research and 
related capabilities, which itself has experienced the most relevant 
experiences of the s. Although the account we have presented is 
condensed for obvious reasons here, every aspe of it is 
authoritatively based on a massive, accumulated detailed record of 
combined dire observation and authoritative documentation. That 
is the way it happened. 



Mp;//www.d)®(BU=tiirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 



 

the-door" efforts to the same effe as the so-called 
"Common Fund." Hence, the Rockefellers* energy 



licy 



the Carter-Schlesinger energy licy pre- 



pared with the aid of McGeorge Bundy's Ford Founda- 
tion: to force a massive rise in ernal U.S. petro- 
leum and natural gas prices, much larger than the 
- leap, and hope to do the same with Third 
World and other primary commodities, to repeat the 
refinancing swindle of - on a broader scale. 



growth movement the final solution to the over- 
pulation question. 

It is a licy to reduce the pulation of the United 
States to the order of  million persons, aqd to 
reduce the global pulation to the order of not ex- 
ceeding two billion persons  within more or less the 
relatively near term. There are only two ways to effe 
such a licy. One is by wars and mass murder 
direly. The other is by unleashing biological catas- 



This same package has an auxiliary, devilish imi- trophe in the form of famine and associated waves of 



cation. Since the per capita energy-throughput of in- 
dustry correlates with the level of produive technol- 



epidemics. 

Rockefeller erests are not prosing to wipe out a 



ogy overall, by driving up energy prices to parity with coue of billion human beings because the Pocantico 



the price of uneconomical solar were, and by simul- 
taneously blocking fission energy and other augmen- 
tation of energy availability, the Carter Administrat- 
ion creates a climate (if that is allowed) in which main- 



Estate in New York is itself becoming oppressively 
overcrowded. They are prosing genocide because 
their economic licies  their global hyper- 
inflationary austerity licies  have the inevitable 



tenance of modern technology becomes increasingly consequenceof producing the conditions of famine and 



imssible. If Carter can push his energy program 
through the Congress, the combined forces of indus- 
try, trade unions, and farmers will have thereby lost 
meaningful legal were to resist a licy of deindustri- 
alization and driving back of agriculture toward more 
primitive forms of produion. 

Rockefeller has demanded the same licy for 
Western Europe, for Japan, and throughout the 
developing seor. If that combined energy licy and 
IMF-refinancing were to go through, the combined 
OECD and developing nations (or, most of them), 
including the United States itself, would soon be under 
firm fascist-economic rule by the Rockefellers and 
allied erests. 

The other principal features of the Trilateral pack- 
age are, as we have stipulated above, litical and 
social derivatives of the Rockefellers' fascist eco- 
nomic licy. 

The most prominent, and broadest feature of the 
Trilateral program is the prosal that the present 
economic situation precludes the toleration of con- 
tinued forms of republican and parliamentary rule. 
The Trilateraloids* demand '^command economies" 
 e.g., regimes paralleling David Rockefeller's 
Chilean Pinochet regime, with its fascist licies as 
specified by Milton Friedman. 

The reason for Rockefellers' prosal of a reign of 



diatorships throughout the OECD and developing 
seors  including the USA  is that no form of 
representative government can imement the 
protraed process of the licy of hyperinflationary 



epidemics in which that result must occur. Zero 
growth  the fraudulent '^overpulation" dorine  
is a litical movement designed to make the geno- 
cidal consequences of hyperinflationary austerity 
acceptable to a sufficient force within the pulation 
that the imminence of such consequences will not 
evoke an effeive revolt against the hyperinflation- 
ary-a usterity licies. 

The ''small is better" and the allied '*local com- 
munity control" movements are of the same form. 
These fascist social movements are not developed by 
Rockefeller and allied forces because the Rockefellers 
themselves have, necessarily, some compelling desire 
to enjoy fascism, but because a pulation which tol- 
erates such fascist social licies is a pulation 
which cannot effeively resist, and will probably 
tolerate the effes of deindustrialization and other 
forced breakdown of the nation's produive forces. 

Otherwise, prompted by memories of Franklin 
Roosevelt's blocked efforts to pack the Supreme 
Court, the Fabians have systematically corrupted the 
Federal and other courts, and large segments of the 
legal profession. The advantage of this is obvious. The 
U.S. Constitution has the most wereful exicit and 
associated authority emwereing any honest federal 
court system to a as a defense of last resort against 
the fascist criminality which Rockefeller's Carter 
Administration is attempting to imse. In the event 
that the Congress, as well as the executive, capitu- 
lated to Rockefeller's treason, the Supreme Court has 
the authority to block fascism. However, if the Su- 



austerity to the  of deliberate genocide against preme Court is itself sufficiently corrupted, that 

major rtions of its pulation and destruion of its bastion is removed, and as in Weimar, becomes an 

industrial and agricultural produive capabilities in instrument for treason, 

the service of an alien (Rockefeller) erest. How, then, is it ssible that a government of the 

This coincides with John D. Rockefeller Ill's zero United States  the Executive Branch and part of the 







U.S. Congress, as well as seions of the federal 
courts up to the Supreme Court itself  could ime- 
ment or even condone such treason against the United 
States and such monstrous repudiation of the clearest 
and most fundamental specifications of natural law? 

The answere to such questions will be made clearer 
as we turn now, direly to the specifications of the 

Atlanticist Dorine as a geolitical metaphysics. 

In the preceding major topical seions, we con- 
sidered predominantly the real content of Atlanticist 
dorine, as a monetarist self-erest which 
developed o an alliance of the monetarist forces 
based principally in the City of London and lowere 
Manhattan, and which established its litical 
dominance over the government of the United States. 
The Atlanticist system and its licies have been 
examined thus as a consistent but ernally contra- 
diory Anglo-American monetarists* alliance, in 
behalf of the attempt at world domination by their 
monetarist were, but accompanied by faional 
struggles between (growing) Manhattan and 
(weakening) City of London forces for hegemony 
within that monetarist world order. 

Now, that monetarists' alliance, in its form as a 
litical alliance between the monetarists of the 
United States and the United Kingdom as a nation, is 
at the  of breaking apart. The looting of the 
economy of the United Kingdom and of the City of 
London's Commonwealth-sterling base by lowere 

Manhattan-based forces has reached the  at 
which the looted British forces are coming to view 
themselves as suffering relative to lowere Manhattan 
today, the sition inverting that of the rebelling 
North American English colonies and United States 
during -. In contemrary litical-science 
usages, one says that today's United Kingdom is 
among those nations of Western Europe (us Japan) 
which are moving toward '"Gaullist" opsition to the 
Rockefellers' Carter Administration. 

It is illustrative of that circumstance that during the 
first half of last year, one leading executive of a major 
London bank observed to this writer that lowere 
Manhattan was blindly repeating the past mistakes of 
the London bankers. It is also illustrative of the same 
, that at about the same time we received that 
cited comment, a leading British parliamentarian 
observed that the  of crisis had not yet quite been 
reached  at that moment  at which new forces 
fermenting within the British labor movement would 
manifest themselves in defense against the mone- 
tarist-imsed hyperinflationary austerity. We see 
how matters have progressed since then. 

Since that time, the Giulio Andreotti government 
and its ernational role of the June  through 



 

January  period have triggered the chain of events 
which is tending to turn most of Western Europe to 
**Gaullist" opsition to Rockefellers' monetary and 
austerity licies, and correlated opsition to Carter 
Administration strategic and covert-operations ad- 
ventures. 

At this junure, were this writer the President of 
the United States, he would be developing a trans- 
atlantic alliance  not because of, but despite Lipp- 
mann's dorine  and would be in imate collabora- 
tive discussions with Messrs. Callaghan, Schmidt, 
Andreotti and others to this effe. Our past enemy has 
not been the United Kingdom as such, the competitor 
to our present vital economic self-erests is not 
England as such  nor continental Western Europe 
nor Japan. The thrust of emerging *'Gaullist** ten- 
dencies in Western Europe and Japan converge on 
coincidence with our own nation's most vital, im- 
mediate erests. (Unfortunately, at the moment of 
writing, the *'Gaullist" thrust is only a tendency, and 
not yet a consolidated set of institutions appropriate to 
its imied goals.) 

Even the old Fabians of Western Europe, without 
yet freeing themselves of ingrained nominalist habits, 
are tending to become almost semi-Gaullists, in op- 
sition on many praical issues and corresnding 
overall self-perception to the lunatic neo-Fabians 

based in the United States. Among British Fabians, 
since especially , their growing perception of the 
Rockefellers' neo-Fabianism is that the traditions of 
Rothschild, Palmerston, the Russells and the Webbs 
have been extralated far beyond toleration, 

England, to single out the feature of the present 
situation most relevant to the immediate discussion, 
has come around, albeit two hundred years late, 
toward recognizing the merits of Benjamin Franklin's 
persisting advice to the British parliamentarians 
during the decades preceding . In southern Africa, 
for exame, the Callaghan government, in healthy 
tendency towards repudiation in fa both of the vile 
precepts of Adam Smith and of the Carter Administra- 
tion's licies, shows an impulse toward Franklin's 
prosed, urgent English reforms of the mid- 
eighteenth century, 

England, in concert with other leading forces in 
Western Europe, and in parallel to wereful thrusts 
emanating from industrialist erests in Japan, is 
edging  if ever-cautiously, uncertainly  toward the 
financial and economic licies of Alexander 
Hamilton, In sum, the United States, as a nation, now 
has the oprtunity to secure finally the foreign licy 
objeives of the American Revolution and its Con- 
stitution. 

Lippmann's (Roosevelt's) Atlanticist Dorine 
predominantly denies that such a lawful development 







 

would be ssible. From the stand of the real 
processes and erests operating, the history of the 
rise of monetarism in the United States and the Anglo- 
American monetarists* alliance of the two govern- 
ments they controlled is exicitly comprehensible in 
the main from the stand of perceiving as central 
the real aspe of the special self-erests of the 
monetarist faions based in lowere Manhattan and the 
City of London. However, as the current tendency of 
the United Kingdom to break away from such a licy 
illustrates, the continuation of the Atlanticist Dorine 
is in no one's objeive net erests  even the Rocke- 
fellers'  over the clearly-defined relatively near- 
term. 

At that , we encounter that feature of Atlanti- 
cism which is pure irrationality, the metaphysics of 
the Dorine itself. 

It is in this respe that the geolitical metaphysics 
and its root, core ideology must be brought o focus. 

Although this analysis demands formal criticism of 
the geolitical dorine itself, such criticism is inade- 
quate to our praical purse by itself. The fa that 
a few lunatics in ruling sitions adhere to such a 
special dorine fails to account for the ability of such 
creatures to mobilize substantial litical forces of a 
nation's people to suprt such monstrous nonsense 
(the liberals and radical fringe) or to tolerate it (a 

large, vacillating if grumbling rtion of the 
Republican and Democratic conservatives). We 

are obliged to examine the conneion between 
the geolitical dorine and susceptibility repre- 
sented by the more widely diffused core ideology 
un which the effeiveness of the geolitical doc- 
trine depends. 

The dire conneion between the geolitical 
dorine and the core ideology was developed and is to 
be best comprehended historically in terms of the 
drastic shift in world outlook which caused a profound 
philosophical differentiation between England and the 
American English colonies over the (predominantly) 



- period. That differentiation was reicated in 
the United States, beginning with the Jacksonian 
period, and was consolidated to the extent it presently 
prevails from, most notably, the last decade of the 
past century. 

The thrust underlying the rise of capitalism during 
the sixteenth century was a conscious, neo-atonic 
humanism concentrated at that time in England, 
France and the low countries. It was predominantly 
Erasmian humanism, but Erasmianism incorrated 
under its broader basis for included faional coali- 
tions, more vigorous  more rigorous  currents of 
epistemology leading through Ficino and others o 
Descartes and Spinoza. Advancing beyond the rela- 
tively prudent representation of Ghibelline humanism 
in Dante Alighieri's De Monarchia  which World 
Federalists and kindred cranks have attempted to 
coopt groundlessly o their hagiolatry  the leading 
English, French, and Dutch humanists envisaged not 
semi-autarkical national economies, but nations 
within a world order based essentially on neo-atonic 
princies. The content of their perception of the 
impulse toward proper natural law appropriate to 
such a world order must be understood as distin 
from the scholastic (Aristotelian) or rationalist notion 
of natural law and universal order based on such law. 

In undertaking this course of inquiry here, we 
cannot be rebuked for going far beyond the ostensible 
range of topics and related arguments on which 
Lippmann and others exicitly depend in articulating 
their Atlanticist Dorine's geolitical axioms. If we 
exse these issues here in an admittedly rigorous 
fashion, Lippman and his co-faioneers insist on 
exicitly preempting the same topical areas 
ignorantly. The distinion between a rigorous con- 
sideration of these topics and Lippmann's superficial 
skidding through the same areas, with a grease of 
sime-minded and false ** truisms," is crucial to 
understanding the praical side of the dynamics of 
Atlanticist and relevant irrational litical behavior. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



Humanism and Aristotelianism 



As we have noted above, and have developed the 
 in other published locations, the past eight 
centuries of Mediterranean-European culture  the 
present world culture  are rigorously charaerized 
by the contention among three principal epistemo- 
logical currents. 

The imicit outlook of the first, the scholastic or 
Aristotelian outlook, was already embedded in feudal 
relations, as exemified by Charlemagne's inventory 
of the realm and the Norman Domesday Book. This 
presumed an essentially fixed mode of technology of 
produion and consumption (beast-likeness), in 
which the humanist distinion between man and the 
lowere beasts was dependent principally on the reli- 
gious concept of the metaphysical rationality of man, 
the institutionalized religious aspe of feudal re- 
lations which Thomas Aquinas and others made con- 
scious as the premise for the scholastic dorine of 
humanism. 

Medieval Scholasticism or Aristotelianism devel- 
oped as a conscious outlook after the emergence 
of its immediate opnent, the neo-atonic or 
Averroean or Avicennian (Ibn Sina) influence, as a 
major elleual force in Europe. Avicenna identi- 
fied the creative processes of scientific discovery and 
informed praice as both the fundamental distinion 
between man and the lowere beasts, and also a 
refleion, in his exicit argument to that effe, of 
the fundamental ordering-princie of the universe. As 
typified most early by the case of Franciscan Roger 
Bacon (not the wretched, later Francis Bacon), the 



Avicennian or neo-atonic outlook, true humanism, 
constituted an immediate praical threat to the 
feudal order. Thus, the feudal Inquisition was launched 
against the Avicennians, including Roger Bacon, 
and, in the course of attempting to develop an in- 
telleual defense, an elleual inoculation against 
the experienced were of neo-atonic humanism, 
Thomas Aquinas, ironically a creative elle of 
unusual were in his own right, became the dorinal 
rallying- for the ideological defense of the 
Inquisition. () This Inquisition was litically 
predominantly a feudal counterrevolution against the 
emerging capitalist imications of neo-atonism. 

Despite the feudal basis of the Inquisition, the w- 
erful, objeive impulses of technological develop- 
ment were already under way at the  of the 
launching of that Inquisition. The thirteenth century 
and later institutions of Edwardian reforms in 
England, and the accompanying influx to England of 
the so-called ''Lombard" mercantile bankers, typify 
the organic undermining of feudalism and the were 
of the feudal church in the emergence of the proto- 
capitalist dorine of alienable property-forms. 

The counterrevolutionary or feudal reaion of the 
thirteenth and fourteenth centuries was thus not 



. Criton Zoakos, "Western Civilization's Debt to the Arab 
Renaissance," delivered at the National Convention of the U.S. Labor 
Party in New York City, Dec. , ; Helga Zepp, "European-Arab 
Cooperation from Avicenna to the Nationalization of Aramco," 
delivered at the European Conference of the European Labor Party in 
Wiesbaden, West Germany, Jan. , . 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

purely feudal, but embodied an alliance between those 
feudal forces and monetarist bankers typified by the 
dominant financial houses, the Bardi and Peruzzi. 

The Bardi, official bankers to the papacy, put 
England and France  as well as Italy and other 
feudal weres  under monstrously accelerating 
indebtedness. The catapulting debt-burdens, as in 
the process leading to the English foreign-debt 
repudiation of the fourteenth century, were main- 
tained throughout Europe through spiralling rates of 
primitive accumulation against the feudal produive 
basis. The inevitable genocidal consequences of the 
Inquisition's defeat of the Hohenstaufen and other 
humanist-influenced faions on behalf of the feudal- 
banker faion, were the developing of the conditions of 
famine and serf-lumpenization which led to the mid- 
fourteenth century Black Death. 

Out of the Black Death breakdown (wiping out one- 
third to one-half of the pulation of central Europe) 
emerged the broader influence of nominalism. To 
understand the subsequent spread of the dorine of 
nominalism from the relatively isolated elleual 
influences such as muddleheaded William of Ockham, 
one must look at fourteenth-century Europe more 
deey, and consider such phenomena as the 
* 'flagellants" and other broad evidence of the crisis- 
breakdown of belief in rationality. 

We restate and develop these and related s 
here, because it is indispensable to build up the con- 
ceptual instruments required to master the clinical- 
historiographical  immediately at hand. 

The lawfulness and deeper imications of the 
contention and eray among these three distin 
epistemological currents is demonstrated by situating 
the specific developments of Europe's thirteenth 
through sixteenth century cultural development in its 
broader, determining context, the approximate , 
years of Mediterranean-littoral and European culture 
since Thales, In that overall span of the development 
of present world culture, there are the same three 
epistemological currents refleed as dominant in- 
telleual forces throughout. The case of art, since art 
is the mode by which the people of a culture celebrate 
their sense of identity, is not only the most accessible 
form of overall, historical illustration of the , but 
is in fa an epistemologically rigorous approach to 
the questions immediately involved. 

All of the major art forms of that , years of our 
cultural heritage are analytically incomprehensible 
except as we view them as the contention and er- 
ay of three distin "moods" and epistemological 
outlooks precisely corresnding in charaeristic 
features to the Aristotelian, humanist and nominalist 
outlooks. These are, to emoy the appropriate 
classical archetypes, the allonian (Aristotelian), 
promethean (humanist) and dionysian (nominalist) 



moods. The immediate corresndence between each 
of these artistic moods and the corresnding 
epistemological outlook is formally and historically 
lawful. 

The same epistemological problem is key and 
relevant to the present crisis within the physical 
sciences. The prevailing institutionalized scientific 
view has been predominantly shifted until recently 
from the relativist thrust behind the nineteenth cen- 
tury's development of the notion of a relativistic 
physics around a **theory of funions" (e.g., Fourier, 
Gauss, Weierstrass, Riemann, Cantor, Klein, Pasteur, 
et al-), toward a reaionary notion whose faional 
sition was temrarily consolidated around the 
Rockefeller and Rothschild proteges of the 
Copenhagen school and the wretched Solvay confer- 
ence. Recent Soviet announcements have begun to 
reverse that trend globally. 

Experimental and related theoretical work of the 
nineteenth century had produced the germinal notions 
of relativism (e.g., Gauss, Weierstrass, Riemann, 
Cantor, Pasteur, et al.) , and the confrontation with the 
fundamental crisis-ridden paradox of Lagrangian and 
Maxwellian physics in the ambigious guise of both 
Boltzmann's work () and the epistemologically- 
cognate Planck definition of the quantum. 

Although Planck's discovery is pularly mis- 
represented in most educated circles as upholding 
the Copenhagen and related empiricist and sitivist 
dorines, in fa it has exaly the opsite imica- 
tion. Planck's discovery of an additional arbitrary ele- 
ment necessary to imrt to the old physics to **glue 
it together" despite contradiory evidence, the 
quantum, was a crucial-experimental proof of the 
bankruptcy of the old physics, and worse bankruptcy 
of the wretched epistemological Frankenstein- 
monster which Niels Bohr and others construed  
with a bit of thuggery against critics such as Erwin 
Schrodinger thrown in  in the effort to mobilize a 
counterrevolution (inquisition) against the relativist 
thrust within existing advanced physics. 

From the stand of microphysics, the attack on 
the crisis presented to physics by Planck's work was 
obliged to proceed toward one, and only one er- 
mediate objeive. To make short of identifying the 
, that ermediate task is identified by 
Schrodinger's and related work concerning the so- 
called psi-funion. 

This is no mere illustration of a , but, as we 
shall show, bears direly on the underlying problem 
of the scholastic-humanist-nominalist outlooks in the 
most dire, praical and rigorous way. 



. Mos Levitt, "Linearity and Entropy: Ludwig Boltzmann and 
the Second Law of Thermodynamics," Fusion Energy Foundation 
Newsletter, Vol. II, No,  (Sept. ), pp. -. 







The negentropic quality of living processes, and 
most notably the crucially-demonstrated relationship 
of human creative (negentropic) synthesis of new 
knowledge to man's historical mastery of material 
processes, demonstrates that there must be an ad- 
ditional magnitude of energy of some kind in material 
processes above and beyond the magnitude imied by 
notions such as the ^'conservation of energy." The 
Aristotelian or allonian outlook denies this in 
respe to physical processes, and exains away the 
crucial evidence contrary to such asserted denials by 
relegating the unexained aspe of reality to the 
metaphysical realm. The best comprehension of 
universal reality, of a universal lawful ordering of 
physical processes ssible to the Aristotelian or 
allonian view, is that of pre-ordained (epistemo- 
logically) fixed universal fields and also fixed, self- 
evident particles existing within such fields. 

The Planck discovery situated the empirical loca- 
tion (at least, the empirical location properly next-to- 
be-exored) of the field-particle absurdities of 
Maxwellian physics in respe to these ernal field 
aspes of particles themselves, which supied an 
additional source of energy beyond that ostensibly 
existent in the thermodynamic assembly-relation- 
ships of what may be regarded as more or less 
"classical" Lagrangian and also Maxwellian physics. 

This is the same problem which determined the 
inevitable bankruptcy of the Einstein-Weyl program 
for developing a solution to the unified-field problem. 
On the astronomical scale, as Parpart has developed 
the , () the **big bang" dorine flowing 
rigorously from presently most-accredited methods of 
erpreting the crucial evidence leads to a related 
demonstration of the relevant absurdity within the 
axiomatic features of the Aristotelian method itself. 

By taking only the simest (and crudest) included 
variant-case within the broader whole of Riemannian 
physics, the Gaussian affine or tiling" approxima- 
tion in the microphysical domain of, ostensibly, an 
otherwise relativistic macro- and astronomical or- 
dering, Einstein-Weyl ignorantly represented them- 
selves as having developed a relativistic conception of 
physics, being equally wrong in their conceit that 
Einstein's relativistic physics was in fa Rieman- 
nian, as Parpart outlines that . The micro- 
physical struure of the Einstein-Weyl program is 
epistemologically a degenerate, hythesized condi- 
tion, which condition is exicitly Aristotelian (anti- 
relativistic), and which imicitly determines that the 
Einstein-Weyl macro and astronomical programs are 
also permeated with the same, most devastating, 
'^hereditary" fallacy. 



. Uwe Parpart, "The Concept of the Transfinite," The Cam- 
paJgner, Vol. IX, Nos. - (Jan.-Feb. ), pp. -. 



 

Unless we experimentally and theoretically com- 
prehend the microphysical erpenetration of field 
and particle as both coherent and negentropic, physics 
falls apart epistemologically whenever a cor- 
resnding experimental or related praical 
condition is encountered. Hence, Schrodinger's and 
related work, focusing on topics centering around the 
psi-funion, represented the crucial, ermediate 
experimental-theoretical nexus at which the further 
progress of science respeing physics fundamentals 
was inescapably determined. 

It is agreed that neither the pre-Descartes scientific 
investigators nor the founders of our republic based 
their litical and philosophical conceptions on such 
exicit forms of contemation of physical science as 
such (although Benjamin Franklin himself verges 
un being an exception to this). However, as we are 
emphasizing here, just as crucial evidence concerning 
living processes and the historical crucial-experi- 
mental evidence of man's secularly-increasing 
dominion over nature is the mandatory praical and 
theoretical basis for guiding the investigations of 
physics, our forefathers were essentially neo-atonic 
humanists who approached litics in terms of a 
method which is today most relevantly illustrated by 
resort to the same method of approach to the 
epistemological side of physical science funda- 
mentals. The issue is the nature of man and of the 
physical universe, and the erconneion of these 
two erpenetrating aspes in a truly coherent way, 
thus uniquely providing the rigorous basis for cer- 
tay in the determination for knowledge of what is 
natural law. 

The epistemological argument concerning physics 
has recently been demonstrated experimentally most 
clearly in conneion with negentropic categories of 
'*non-linear effes" in asma physics and related 
work. Apying these newly developed asma- 
physics methods to the recent shift in global weather 
patterns, we and our collaborators have been driven, 
as a by-produ of that concern, to effe the begin- 
nings of an overturning of the prevailing dorines of 
meteorology, showing how the overlooked element of 
the determination of stable vortex-systems in the 
atmosphere makes the existence of weather patterns 
dependent un the negentropic **added energy" 
supied by living ecologies, ecologies which man 
can regulate to produce the desired weather- 
patterns. () 

As various, recently-accumulated evidence con- 
cerning asma vortices, **solitons," and coherent- 
particle beams at higher energy concentrations 
shows, under these conditions the energy-field within 



. (Eric Lerner), "The Real Causes of the Wer's Weather,' 
Executive Intelligence Review, Vol. IV, No.  (Feb. , ), pp. -. 







 

the particle erreas on an enlarged scale with the 
concentrated ''externar* field, such that this **ad- 
ditional supy of energy*' in respe to the experi- 
mental field itself makes the system negentropic and 
generates self-organizing aivities as * 'entities/' 

Thus, in the negentropic space of the higher-energy 
domain, we have inclusively the particles and so forth 
which are also existent in the lowere order of physical 
space, but in addition, particles share the experi- 
mentally-defined sition of being determinate en- 
tities with other metastable configurations, and 
under new sets of special laws such that the perceived 
as determining "field-particle" relations of the lowere 
order of space are not experimentally appropriate to 
the higher order of space. 

Looking backward from this to the work of 
Schrodinger and others on the problems associated 
with the psi-funion, a new world of physics begins to 
open up to our consciousness. Moreover, the special 
laws of the higher-order physical space  even as we 
are now only beginning to exore them  conform to 
the kinds of notions of negentropy we are compelled to 
adduce by regarding the very existence of living 
processes, and the realized creative impulses of the 
history of human creative (synthetic) thought as 
crucial evidence respeing the necessary funda- 
mental lawful ordering of our universe. 

More narrowly considered, this does more than 
exse the significance of the thuggery done against 
the progress of science by Rothschild and Rockefeller 
proteges such as Niels Bohr, and by John von 
Neumann and others. It has a coherent, ironic bearing 
on the emerging tential hegemony of basic Soviet 
science over relatively stagnating overall scientific 
progress in the OECD countries. 

Following Versailles, during the period the Roth- 
schilds and Rockefellers were direly and deliberately 
attempting to wreck the foundations of fundamental 
scientific progress in the capitalist seor, a tiny 
kernel surviving from the greatest nineteenth century 
scientific traditions was providing the kernel of the 
future development of Soviet physics. The emphat- 
ically distinive advantages in impulse of Soviet 
basic physics work over the capitalist seor today, 
are not only, as General George Brown observed, the 
prortionately greater emphasis on scientific 
progress and development of cadres in the Soviet 
Union, () but, respeing their ernal, epistemo- 
logical features, the most notable Soviet physics 
breakthroughs known to us are crucially traceable to 



. George S, Brown, United States Military Posture for Fiscal Year 

: Statement by the Chairman of the Jo Chiefs of Staff to the 

Congress on the Defense Posture of the United States (n.p., Jan. , 

) , pp.  ff. ; cf. Lyndon H. LaRouche, ''The Political Economy of 

Military Posture," Executive Intelligence Review, Vol. IV, No  (Feb. 
, ), pp. -. 



the specific epistemological approach transmitted 
and amified by academician Vernadsky. 

It is certainly. relevant  if not all decisive  to the 
fa that Soviet physics is so excellent, while Soviet 
psychology is a reaionary shambles, that the leading 
figures the Soviets inherited from the previous regime 
in developing these two fields were Vernadsky for 
physics, and the pathetically reduionist, bestialist 
LP. Pavlov for psychology. 

Vernadsky, whom Rand think-tankers' memoranda 
correly described once as one of the greatest in- 
ternal Soviet threats to the Atlanticists' erests, was 
a student of Curie within the subsuming outlook of 
Louis Pasteur. It was this same current which 
provoked the famous s origin of life thesis of 
Oparin. Moreover, Vernadsky correly adduced the 
imications of Riemannian physics  the real 
Riemann, not the Einstein-Weyl program*s carica- 
ture-Riemann  for a coordinated breakthrough in 
biology and physics. In classical epistemological 
terms, Vernadsky's view was hylozoic in the true 
sense, rather than in that modified-Aristotelian 
reduionists' notion of '^materialism" regrettably 
predominant in ^'official Marxist-Leninist" literature. 
Indeed, ironically, like Lenin himself, Vernadsky's 
Russian philosophical roots are best traced (at least 
imicitly) in terms of Chernyshevsky's voluntarist 
(hence, also hylozoic) precedent. Accessible writings 
of Vernadsky () show that he consciously and 
competently apied this Riemannian-hylozoic 
overview simultaneously to biology and physics, and 
to the exoration of the erconneion between the 
two. It is also established that Soviet efforts to develop 
nuclear fission as a basic energy source were already 
embryonically under way as a state licy-commit- 
ment during the middle s(!), and that Vernadsky 
was key in this at that time. 

Hence, despite the other accomishments of 
physicists within the capitalist seor since the - 
 crisis in science, in respe of the most crucial 
frontiers of basic physics research capitalist-seor 
funding of progress was virtually stopped to the extent 
that existing Rothschild and Rockefeller licy dared 
and could effe this. Whereas, starting with the most 
considerable relative disadvantages in respe of 
numbers of scientists and objeive material circum- 
stances of development, Soviet physics around Ver- 
nadsky launched itself forward with an ongoing, in- 
cluded methodological focus un the very crucial 
problems whose solving was predominantly **for- 
bidden" in the capitalist seor. The epistemological 



 It has been rerted to us that only recently Vernadsky's work 
has begun to be republished in Soviet colleions  but we do not, 
unfortunately, yet have dire access to that larger body of in- 
formation on this subje. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



imications of the now-famous  disclosures of L. 
Rudakov in the U.S., taken in the context of 
predecessors such as Vlasov, are in no respe a 
fortunate accident, but predominantly a lawfully 
determined outgrowth of the bias Vernadsky built o 
the foundations of Soviet physics  a bias which 
happily persisted despite the relative obscurity to 
which his reputation was relegated during part of the 
period following his death. 

The dire correlation between these crucial aspes 
of physics and litics is ironically, and devastatingly 
illustrated by the case of a failed dorine known as 
**information theory.*' Overview of this bankrupt 
dorine and its derivatives s toward the rigorous 
apparatus of formal analysis appropriate to under- 
standing the profound distinions among the three 
epistemological currents, and hence to establish a 
rigorous analysis of that nominalist outlook which is 
the essential feature of Atlanticism*s core ideology 
today. 

The dorine known as information theory 
developed ostensibly as an effort to reduce to systems 
of linear equations the processes of negative feedback 
used in control devices in military and other tech- 
nological apications typified in the form of self- 
correing aiming-control. The mathematical ap- 
proach was essentially standard on princie since the 
work of Gauss and Fourier during the early nineteenth 
century. Provided a non-linear funion, even of some 
comexity, is pre-defined, it is in princie feasible, 
by curve-fitting methods, using systems of linear 
equations, to approximate any ordinary sort of non- 
linear funion to as fine a degree of approximation as 
considerations of cost and other effort permit. From 
this Weaver and Shannon, leaning heavily on the work 
of those such as MIT's Norbert Wiener, abstraed a 
linearized dorine of information theory. 

Norbert Wiener, during the same immediate period, 
published a now-famous work, first abroad and then in 
the U.S., Cybernetics. This kernel was ermeshed 
with the reduionist methods known as * 'operations 
research," first tentatively developed during the 
period of World War I and extended considerably by 
first the British and then U.S. teams during World War 
II. Collaboration between the twentieth century's 
most rabid well-known sitivist, John Von Neumann, 
and Vienna-School economist Oskar Morgenstern, 
produced during the same approximate period the 
notorious Theory of Games and Economic Behavior. 
Out of such various ingredients, all soon centering for 
praice around the dorine of information theory, 
the stwar Atlanticist Utopians' dorine of 
^'systems analysis" was evolved. 

Relative to processes which conform epistemo- 
logically to the *'curve-fitting" apications of Gauss, 
Fourier, et aL, systems analysis works. Relative to 



 

either, notably, human behavior (except of special 
psychotic varieties), or to negentropic non-linear 
asma processes and related subje-matters, the 
methods of systems analysis are inherently bankrupt. 
The root of the inherent bankruptcy of the apication 
of ''systems analysis" to charaeristically non-linear 
processes is rooted in the rabid metaphysical ab- 
surdity of information theory itself. 

Through methods first defined chiefly through the 
work of Karl Weierstrass and Georg Cantor, it is 
ssible to reduce any system of linear equations to a 
system of denumerations, such that the location of any 
element in a "universe" determined by such sets of 
equations can be uniquely "mapped" by treating 
arrays of numbers and the sequences within such 
arrays as "mapping codes." Insofar as the elements 
and occurrences within a "domain" analyzed are 
inclusively determinable by an appropriate set of 
linear equations, the mapping-system developed can 
establish a corresndence between every ssible 
such element and occurrence and configurations of 
the coding sytem. No matter how elaborate the 
mapping system so developed, the basic epistemo- 
logical princies remain the same, and no amount of 
added sophistication or comexity within the map- 
ping system can exceed those "hereditary" epistemo- 
logical limits. 

Information theory attempted to extend this 
capability beyond its original praical basis in 
hydraulic and eleronic networks, to reduce human 
communication to the same regime. This effort was 
not predominantly the crankish inspiration of some 
few reckless eleronics specialists, but represented 
an attempt to further a proje, now commonly known 
as "linguistics," by Bertrand Russell, Karl Korsch, 
Kurt Lewin, Rudolf Carnap and others, notably during 
the s. () 

Linguistics, whose computer simulation not ac- 
cidentally corresnds only to special types of schizo- 
phrenic behavior in aual human beings (), is the 
abstraed feature of systems analysis in its at- 
tempted dire apication to human communications. 
Hence, scrutiny of the embedded fundamental 



. This Russeli-Korsch linguistics proje was nested at a number of 
thus-isoned American universities, including the Cambridge, 
Mass., area, where Korsch was principally based during that period, 
and around the University of Pennsylvania. (If Benjamin Franklin 
had lived to see Bertrand Russell and Russell's proje lluting the 
University of Pennsylvania  which Franklin founded  old Ben 
would have vomited, or, better, taken prompt remedial aion.) It is 
notable that one of the Rand Corration's associated systems 
analysts, Noam Chomsky, of linguistics and the "Pentagon Papers'* 
Nixon-destabilization-hoax notorieties, was educated in linguistics at 
the University of Pennsylvania, and is a rabidly Korschite, neo- 
Fabian MIT professor and litical elligence operative, based in 
the Cambridge, Mass. area. 

. R. Gallagher, "Artificial Intelligence," The Campaigner, Vol. 
VIII, No.  (July ) , pp. -. 







 

epistemological absurdities of linguistics exses the 
pervasive fallacies embedded in the entire Rand 
Corration and related institutions* **systems- 
analysis" approach to Questions of U.S. strategic 
sture and other topics involving human and other 
negentropic subje-matters. () 

Contrary to '^systems analysis/* the effe of tech- 
nological innovations on the development of societies 
is to transform those societies in a manner analogous 
to the kinds of concepts associated with the emergence 
of negentropic non-linear phenomena in asma 
regimes. () 

The process of social evolution  technological 
progress  readily admits of a rigorously descriptive 
thermodynamical erpretation, such that progress 
is coherently described as negentropy, an increasing 
per capita '^reducing were'* of society relative to the 
universe around it, with a necessary concomitant of 
rising energy flux per capita in both produion and 
consumption. Hence, the inventions which are the 
basis for this progress represent the crucial content of 
human communication, and have an imied 
(negentropic) thermodynamical significance. 

However, and this is crucial, the effe of progress 
in technological development is to shift the charaer- 
istic features of the economy  and social correlatives 
 in such a way that successive echs of tech- 
nological progress corresnd analytically to suc- 
cessive, different ^'geometries." This means that the 
system of linear equations which could imicitly map 
the events within the **geometry" of the society at a 
preceding ech does not determine the consequent 
events in the society for such a succeeding ech. 
However, the two societies are causally er- 
conneed by the process of extending new inventions 
o the form of extended willful praice. Moreover, 
although general scientific-technological break- 
throughs most prominently charaerize the process 
of transition, the processes include a cumulative 
constant, endemic ferment of less-influential scien- 
tific-technological and analogous discoveries, com- 
munications and praices to the same effe. 

It is the aspe of human communication relevant to 



, Lyndon H. LaRouche, "Linguistics: A Tool of the CIA's Global 
Terrorism,'* New Solidarity, Vol. VII, No.  (May , ). p. 

. This fa was first recognized by the present writer during the 
s, in conneion, predominantly, with the apication of concepts 
adduced in respe of the leading work of Riemann and Cantor to 
corre the principal included fallacies and inapicabilities in Karl 
Marx's Capital, and thus achieve a method of analysis which has been 
subsequently overwhelmingly validated empirically by the - 
detailed course of developments under the collapsing Bretton Woods 
monetary system, Reciprocally, that conceptual overview of both 
economic and physical processes was the germ for the U.S. Labor 
Party's work in developing an * 'energy dorine** and establishing a 
new approach to problems of controlled asmas. 



that process of development which is charaeristic of 
human behavior, as distin from animal behavior. 
This is the distinion of human behavior, and the 
distinion of human communication. 

Apying this to the model provided by the informa- 
tion theorist, the unit of information as he misdefines 
it contains in all forms of charaeristically human 
communication more energy and in a different way 
than the information theorists' dorine permits to be 
attributed to it. 

Analogously, in meteorology, the same error of 
fallacy of comsition is committed by most meteor- 
ologists: they see the energy in the atmospheric 
system, but do not see the existence of the organ- 
ization of the system beyond that. They have ignored 
the crucial fa of stable weather patterns (vortices), 
that the added energy which controls the determina- 
tion of the stable vortex system and its development is 
supied by the biological systems, themselves 
charaeristically negentropic, which contribute a 
small, but crucial margin of negentropy to the vortex- 
system over and above its apparent content. In or- 
dinary microphysical space, the system contains, 
similarly, more tentially-available energy than the 
field-particle ordering defines. Similarly, the paradox 
of the **big bang'* hythesis crucially demonstrates 
that a quantum of energy in the universe represents 
more energy than is attributed to it according to 
conservation of energy dorines. 

It is not simy a matter of **more energy,** but the 
fa that the concept of energy as we associate it with 
systems of linear equations is only a distorted aspe 
of aual energy, which crucial empirical evidence 
has shown to exist in a qualitatively different, negen- 
tropic form. 

What is otherwise principally involved is a different 
notion of rigorous causality than is acknowledged by 
either scholastic or nominalist dorines. 

Using, first, the exame of the different kinds of 
physical space involved in ''ordinary** and negen- 
tropic asma regimes: the particles  - elerons, 
neutrons, protons, and so forth  which exist within a 
negentropic regime also exist as particles in a lowere 
order of physical space (''ordinary" physical space). 
However, in the former, these particles behave dif- 
ferently than they do in the latter, and are included 
as determinate entities together with other kinds of 
determinate entities which do not exist to the same 
effe in the conceptions of ordinary space. 

Hence, between the two regimes, each regime is 
governed by a respeively different set of laws deter- 
mining behavior within the regime. Yet, the two 
regimes are conneed causally, since we have experi- 
mentally produced the former by aions taken in the 
latter. 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



Hence, the ordinary notion of causality is unac- 
ceptable. We can no longer think of cause as subsumed 
within a specific aprioristic or physical space, but 
must think of cause bridging two different kinds of 
physical space. Yet, we cannot discard the fa that 
the same cause which bridges two different forms of 
physical space experimentally, also operates as cause 
within the specific terms of reference of each of the 
included spaces. The primary nature of cause is there- 
fore adduced from its efficient role as the trans- 
forming of one, lowere, order of physical space to a 
higher, and at the same time that the primary quality 
of cause is defined as the negentropic ordering of 
physical space, its efficiency within each subsumed 
space of the ordering-sequence is retained as a sub- 
sumed aspe of its primary quality. 

That is precisely what occurs in the social effes of 
technological progress. Hence, although the princies 
involved have a necessary refleion in the funda- 
mentals of physics, we need not wait un their 
discovery within the realm of physics to already 
ascertain their lawfulness. The ^'thermodynamic" 
description of the histories of both human society and 
of the biosphere itself demonstrate in the most conclu- 
sive, unique way, that these are the fundamental laws 
of our universe  because we exist in that universe. 

It is that latter rigor which was the formal basis for 
the articulation of the "neo-atonic" humanist or 
Promethean outlook by Ibn Sina (Avicenna), and 
which was exicitly emoyed on a more modest level 
by the great Ionian thinkers of the pre-Athenian 
period. The recurrence of the neo-atonic or 
Promethean humanist view correlates, not by ac- 
cident, with those periods of human development and 
with individuals and groups of collaborators which 
represent the relatively greatest ferment in human 
elleual and technological progress. It is a rapidly 
developing culture, or a great creative elle, which 
finds in the sensuous reality of its own immediate 
creative experience the most overwhelming de- 
monstration of the primary role of creative innova- 
tion in advancing human existence. 

As a culture  for one reason or another  merely 
consolidates or **coasts un'' the stock of funda- 
mental innovations contributed from outside., or its 
own past, the existing hegemonic body of ideas and 
related established forms of praice predominate as 
the essentially fixed ordering of social experience. 
Here, the task of reason is sensuously focused on 
bringing order o established standards of praice, 
rather than solving problems through profound in- 
novations in concepts of general, informed, willful 
impulses for praice. Hence, in this condition, the 
dominant ideas and institutions exist as '*givens,*' as 
axiomatically self-evident entities and norms of 



 

relationship. In such circumstances, the Aristotelian 

or allonian outlook predominates as most agreeable 

to prevailing experience, and to the prevailing value 

put un both experience and the individual sense of 
identity. 

In periods of breakdown, of general degradation, in 
which the human erests and standards of a 
preceding period are violated in circumstance and in 
prevailing informed impulses for praice, under 
circumstances of moral anarchy, the nominalist, or 
dionysian, outlook and mood tend to predominate, () 

For reasons related to these considerations, the 
Aristotelian or allonian view leads fatally to the 
theologian's **ontological paradox." To the extent that 
the existing rational ordering of affairs is viewed as 
properly pre-ordained as converging un some pre- 
existing perfe, fixed form, God exists relative to that 
order only as the Creator and as the agent of miracles. 
The Creator's were as orator cannot be regarded as 
efficiently present in the created world. Hence, the 
form of the "ontological paradox" which stipulates 
that if God the Creator is omniscient and perfe, he 
gave up his omnitence respeing the further 
determination of the universe once he perfely 
created it. 

The medieval literary neo-atonic view, out of 
prudent regard for the inquisitional limits of existing 
authority, accepted the outer shell of the scholastic 
dorine of the ontological paradox, but did not submit 
to its dium respeing the ernal features of the 
process between the Creation and the attainment of 
Perfeion. Where the Aristotelian emwered man 
only with reason (rationality), but not the were to 
create qualitatively higher orders of human reason, 
the neo-atonic recognized the human capacity for 
creative synthesis of qualitatively new weres of 
reason  scientific knowledge, for exame  as the 
primary, aive human quality. 

This was not merely a theological difference, nor 
was it the principal line of division between the 
Catholic and protestant faions in the sixteenth 
century schism. There were Aristotelians (Thomists, 
Calvinists) and humanists within both the Catholic 
and protestant denominations. The difference be- 
tween the two currents, Aristotelianism and 
humanism, centered around the praical issues of 
litical economy. The humanist current, the English 
Tudor Erasmians, the founders of capitalism, and 
their co-thinkers abroad were committed to tech- 
nological progress, not merely as the necessary basis 
for economic progress, but as the natural moral condi- 



. As Holmes refused to understand, the nominalist or dionysian 
outlook and mood and the aual, rigorously definable mens tea are 
one and the same thing. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

tion of man. Ficino*s conception of man's creative 
aivity as the location of the way in which man was 
cast in the image of the Creator efficiently identifies 
the Promethean impulse of the high s of the 
Tudor period. 

The same problem is refleed in the qualitatively 
differing conceptions of freedom among the three 
outlooks. 

To the neo-atonic humanist, man's behavior was 
absolutely lawfully bound to natural law: no deviation 
was morally permissible to the will. Freedom was the 
right and moral duty of the individual to exercise 
creative aivity in behalf of the advancement of the 
fruitfulness of his own praice to the purse of ad- 
vancing the universal erest of his society, and the 
obligation of the state to prote and nurture that 
freedom through technological and other education, 
cultural enrichment, and through licensing the un- 
checked advancement of those forms of creative in- 
novation beneficial to the society as a whole. 

To the Aristotelian, freedom was essentially the 
latitude to choose between good and evil, and 
discovery was limited to a more conscious, more 
profound familiarity with a preordained, fixed 
rationality. 

Whereas humanism located freedom in man's 
were of lawful creative innovation for the general 
good, the Aristotelian located freedom as the 
canonically tolerable margin of choice within an 
existing order. Both the revolutionary neo-atonism 
and the pro-feudal Aristotelianism were humanist 
relative to their common enemy, nominalism. Both 
the neo-atonic and the scholastic accepted in prin- 
cie the absolute moral and praical rule of natural 
law, except that they defined it differently. 

The nominalist denied the objeive existence of 
natural law, and reduced praical law to a matter of 
customs, denying both absolute rationality and the 
existence of a universalizing lawful creative princie. 

What we humanists properly mean by freedom 
today is rigorously described as the lawful causality 
which ultimately determines the successive 
'^geometries" of negentropically advancing orders of 
technological praice, as we describe that above 
and below. The princie of freedom itself does not 
change, even though the successive, immediate condi- 
tions of life under its rule are negentropically altered. 

As is demonstrated sufficiently by the documen- 
tation and accompanying historical accounts in The 
Political Economy of the American Revolution, the 
humanist outlook which we are describing here is the 
same humanist outlook charaeristic of our 
republic's founding fathers, and is the determining 
feature of our nation's Constitution. We have laid out 
the case in more modern terms of reference, but the 
kernel of our approach and theirs is identical. 



Ours was founded as a nation committed to freedom 
in the humanist sense of that term. The founders of 
this nation did, indeed adopt the capitalist form of 
ownership of the means of produion and distribution, 
as the licy then deemed appropriate to the fulfill- 
ment of that licy. However, as Hamilton himself 
emphasizes, the right of property was conditional 
un the fulfillment of the humanist perception of the 
national erest. They also adopted the republican 
form of government, a decision made through a 
process of rigorous refleion on the deadly defes of 
either the monarchical or democratic form. The state 
must be led by men (and women) of exceptional 
enlightenment  rather than accidents of birth, or 
demagogues  who must be seleed for those offices 
with prudence and refleion un the candidates' 
humanist qualities of perception and condu concern- 
ing the combined erest of the present nation and its 
sterity. 

These licies did not spring miraculously from our 
nation's soil, but were the dire heritage of the Tudor 
Renaissance and the English Commonwealth which 
the English settlers brought with them to this con- 
tinent, a humanist tradition enriched by our leading 
figures' informed concern with the fruits of the 
Enlightenment. Moreover, contrary to those dupes of 
Charles A. Beard, Thurman Arnold and William A. 
Williams, who seem to forget that our forefathers 
fought a revolution for five years of most difficult and 
perilous struggle for these licies, fought against 
those very monetarist licies which the late Thur- 
man Arnold and William A, Williams esuse; these 
American licies were not some whim, some passing 
fad  some mythology. 

The erests for which our forefathers fought in 
behalf of these licies were substantial, real, tangible 
erests  as we see most clearly by comparing our 
nation's development with those nations which 
remained colonies and semi-colonies of British 
monetarist were, or for a time under the Holy 
Alliance and its successors, during the nineteenth and 
early twentieth centuries. 

These licies were not merely a preference in 
philosophy, but a philosophy which was demonstrated 
in relatively world-wide experience to be scientifically 
valid against its scholastic and nominalist contraries. 
Whenever our national government has abandoned or 
substantially violated these founding humanist 
licies, our nation's credit has been undermined, our 
national development impeded or even eroded. 
Moreover, we see in the successes, but also the more 
frequent misery and setbacks of those other nations 
ruled either by scholastic conservatism or 
nominalist radicalism (monetarism), that the prin- 
cies embedded in the ent of the founding fathers 
have been universally, praically demonstrated 







empirically in the past two centuries of world history 
 and, in fa, over longer centuries. 

Within the bounds of what the founding fathers of 
this nation adopted as humanist princies, there is 
legitimate range for disagreement on the best im- 
ementation of those princies. Beyond that foun- 
dation, we may progress  but not sidewards or back- 
wards to technological stagnation or nominalism; we 
may have compassion for the or dupes who esuse 
nominalism, but their opinions themselves we must 
hold in juridical contempt as discredited nonsense. 

These humanist princies, insofar as the princie 
of the Idea of Progress in its neo-atonic humanist 
form is a princie taken as the essence of the Consti- 
tution's drafting, were ended as expressions of a 
universal natural law. Our forefathers were not so 
miserably humble in either their elleual weres 
or conceptions, to prose that this form was a local 
peculiarity of our special national charaer. Although 
they themselves were most sensible of the aspe of 
approximation within the institutions adopted as our 
national instruments of government, they viewed such 
approximations as adopted under the governance of 
princies they properly deemed universal. 

Those princies, as they touch un foreign licy, 
do not define our nation as one competing for its 
existence against other nations as such, but as a 
nation embodying humanist princies, which is 
menaced only by wereful nations esusing contrary 
princies. If those other nations adopt humanist 
licies based on the Idea of Progress, both respeing 
their domestic order and the world as a whole, then 
there can be no real confli of fundamental erest 
among such nations sharing neo-atonic humanist 
princies. 

The Federalists* confli with the French Revolution 
did not arise because monetarist England had become 
less our principal adversary, but because the French 
Revolution, by resorting to an anarchical, democratic 
form which must be, as Tom Paine had argued and 
Milton before him, incompetent and diatorial in 
content, and because anarchy rather than progress 
was the charaer of that regime, had, in respe to 
the later words of John Quincy Adams concerning the 
England of , adopted no adequate basis for the 
prosed alliance with France on the basis of a 
community of princie. Worse, failing to base its 
relations to us on a community of princie in fa, 
France irresnsibly attempted to ace our nation in 
jeopardy vis-a-vis our principal adversary, England, 
and failing to offer us the military means to secure us 
from the imperiled strategic sition they demanded, 
instead attempted to force us o alliance by 
destabilizing our ernal order and harassing our 
foreign commerce. 

Although the mere fa of historical precedents in 



 

foreign licy does not bind a nation's subsequent 
licies  in any competent understanding of affairs 
 it happens that the thrust of Federalist hostility 
toward France in this matter was no blunder, but 
corre, both respeing our nation's most immediate 
praical erests and the notion of a humanist 
community of princie which was the ultimately 
underlying princie of our foreign licy. 

If France had pursued effeively a licy in its 
revolution which paralleled our own humanist con- 
ceptions of progress and republican institutions, we 
would have been obliged to ally ourselves with France 
in princie, although in fa we would have been able 
to pursue that alliance only as means permitted. In- 
deed, if France had pursued a sound domestic licy, 
it did not require our modest assistance for its battles 
against England on the continent. Naleon's 
degeneration, the Naleonic licies which made 
inevitable his downfall, show that the tential 
community of princie we shared with the French 
Revolution was precisely as abortive in auality as 
the Revolution's abortive reception of Tom Paine. 

Our Federalists' foreign licy was not a licy 
based on **Wilsonian" notions of geolitical concerts 
among rag-tag assortments of monetarist obscen- 
tities, petty tyrannies, and struggling republics. Our 
Federalists' foreign licy was on the surface an 
expedient licy prescribed by our weakness, but 
whose objeive, to the extent we had the were to 
express that, was for a world order among nations 
based on their praice and self-conscious perception 
of self-erests un those same humanist notions of 
universal natural law we had adopted for our own. 

These were also the leading thrusts of the Tudor 
renaissance, of the upsurge of the English Common- 
wealth. These were not merely the precedents for the 
hegemonic ideas and outlooks of our revolution, not 
something Franklin et al. had somehow picked up 
from books or gossip, but the sensuous traditions of 
humanism our forefathers, in the main, brought to the 
shores. 

We did not break with England so much because we 
had changed. We broke with England because its 
government had repudiated in form, and praice 
toward us, the princies on which its own Tudor and 
Commonwealth development had been premised. If 
England, notably beginning with the Stuart 
Restoration of , and worse, after the  ac- 
cession of the House of Orange, had not repudiated an 
impulse for humanist licy in favor of a monetarist 
licy, our forefathers would not have gone to war 
with the mother country. That break, as we have 
emphasized just above, was not caused merely by a 
difference in fundamental philosophical outlook, but 
because those differences in outlook were inevitably 







 

olerable to us respeing our most vital praical 
erests. 

Who cares to make a great fuss because the or 
babbling fool down the street esuses Keynes, or, 
even worse, Friedman? But when that same fool down 
the street pursues his follies to loot our wages, unge 
us o unemoyment, eliminate our vital social 
services, and imse diatorial rule over us to en- 
force those conditions, then his babbling becomes 
occasion for forceful remedies. 

Since at least the time of Charlemagne, European 
culture has been dominated successively by two ruling 
conceptions of a universal natural law and also by a 
third view, which denies the existence of such uni- 
versality. These are, as we have developed the notions 
thus far, Aristotelianism, neo-atonic humanism and 
nominalism. As we have already shown, these differ- 
ences in conception are not merely differences of rul- 
ing opinion  the dorine of uralism, in which these 
could be regarded merely juridically equal before 
law, as differing opinions, is peculiar to nominalism. 
In both scholasticism (specifically) and neo-atonic 
views, opinion, insofar as it expresses outlook and 
method, is either right or wrong, and when two bodies 
of opinion clash on such s not more than one can 
be properly, relatively right. 

The history of the succession of Aristotelianism and 
neo-atonic outlooks, as articulated refleions of 
social licy, social praice, corresnd to the suc- 
cession of two great lawful orders of human society. 
The first was feudal, its law best identified in terms of 
the princies embedded in Charlemagne's inventory 
and the Norman Domesday Book. The second was 
capitalist industrial development, for which socialist 
development is a special case, the latter a different 
litical instrument for realizing the essential func- 
tions otherwise embedded in capitalist industrial 
development. Nominalism arises in opsition to both 
great forms of lawful ordering, both universalities, as 
either a breakdown of lawful societies or as a sub- 
jeive failure of the praice of those societies. 

The crucial proof of the unique correness of the 
neo-atonic humanist conception of a universal 
lawful ordering was historically demonstrated by the 
way in which the preceding, feudal order collapsed in 
the processes of the Crusades and the Black Death. 

The reaionary element of Thomism, the degrada- 
tion of man in the praical world to the condition of a 
preordained, fixed rationality, is an expression of the 
charaeristics of Charlemagne's inventory of the 
realm and the Norman Domesday Book, The  is 
not the ideas refleed by such documents as such, but 
that those ideas corresnded to ruling ideas govern- 
ing social praice. Feudal law degraded the serf to a 
beast-like condition in the praical world. Not 



because the serf was badly treated and so forth, not 
for the maudlin reasons usually offered by muddle- 
headed romantics. Feudal man was epistemologically 
degraded to a beast-likeness because he was sub- 
stantially denied that which is most charaeristically 
human, the exercise of his creative mental weres to 
effe, transmit, assimilate, and commit to impulses 
of willful praice those new technologies, that new 
scientific comprehension, which process uniquely dis- 
tinguishes man self-consciously from the lowere 
beasts. 

Relatively speaking, the conditions of the feudal serf 
were not so oppressive  nor, so idyllic  in success- 
ful estates as is  variously  usually rtrayed. It is 
the praice of the successful estates which represents 
the praical reference for feudalism's ideal of itself, 
and hence the key to the scholastic's efforts to define a 
praicable form of universal law appropriate to 
feudalism. 

Materially, the number of religious holidays 
specified for the serf (in particular), and the increase 
in the number of the canonical holidays refles at one 
phase of feudalism a growing tendency for leisure, 
and cultural development within successful feudal 
orders. Crucial to this is the fa that those holidays 
principally were religious celebrations. It was only 
through the Catholic religion that feudal man essen- 
tially distinguished himself in social praice from 
mere beasts. This Catholic order was also humanist in 
stipulating and, according to law, supervising the 
obligation of the feudal order to the serf, as well as 
other aspes of rights and obligations within the 
feudal order as a whole. 

Hence, the spread of the Catholic religion to the 
heathen barbarians was in that respe a magnificent 
(in effe) litical and moral revolution in the affairs 
of heathen Europe. It created, imperfely in praice, 
that universal order of perceived natural law which 
was essential to preserving the very humanity which 
feudal forms of social praice otherwise denied. 

Hence, lest some nitwit in the tradition of 
revisionists Thurman Arnold or William A. Willams 
should arise to llute the public consciousness with 
the allegation that Catholicism was merely a folklore, 
a mythology, we must emphasize that feudal Catho- 
licism was a genuine system of universal law, rooted 
in a corresnding body of social praice, and 
eminentally praical and necessary in the most vital 
erests of humanity under those feudal conditions in 
which it developed. Moreover, although it was 
relatively anti-humanist on account of the basic mode 
of social praice, the basic constitution of the social 
order to which it was allied, and which it condoned and 
perpetuated, it was humanist in respe to maain- 
ing the conscience of the individual above that of a 







mere beast  in the religious side of feudal praice  
and through Catholicism's role in imsing the rights 
and obligations of a human identity within the praice 
of feudal social relations. 

The old feudal Catholicism failed because the social 
order to which it had egrated itself failed, and a new 
Catholicism persisted, through a neo-antonic 
humanist transformation effeed most emphatically 
within the ranks of the regular clergy and associated 
institutions of feudal elleual life. Thomas Aquinas 
has the double role in this process of being at once the 
rationalizer of the feudal Inquisition and also the most 
thorough articulator of those rationalist premises 
through whose correion Catholicism developed a 
humanism adapted to the social praice of emerging 
capitalist society. 

That is not merely an historical fa respeing 
Catholicism itself, but is crucial to European culture 
as a whole. 

For lawful reasons, the development of the neo-a- 
tonic humanist notion of universal natural law defined 
itself by adducing the epistemological charaeristics 
of the feudal Catholic law and social praice, and by 

stating Catholic universal law in that form, made a 
deliberate and fundamental epistemological revo- 
lution in the axiomatic premises of that law, to ar- 
rive at a new body of universal natural law. That is 
not merely a formal description of the elleual 
process as such, but is an historical fa of the prac- 
tical way in which Tudor England willfully initiated 
capitalist industrial development and industrial-cap- 
italist national economy. The neo-atonic humanist 
conceptions of the Erasmians associated with Thomas 
More were the knowledge, transformed o the im- 
pulses of willful praice through, most prominently, 
the instrument of those circles, which deliberately 
prescribed and instituted in praice the conceptions 
un which the Tudor institutions of industrial-capita- 
list development were premised. 

The failure of feudalism was lawful. The lawful 
failure of feudalism begged recognition of the funda- 
mental, axiomatic fallacy of the notions of universal 
natural law embedded within the ideal of feudal 
praice. 

The descriptive, approximately-defined basis for 
the collapse of feudalism is a princie which has ruled 
human existence praically since our species first 
crawled significantly above baboon-like modes of 

I 

existence of Pleistocene man. Once man ascends, 
through advancement of his deliberate were over 
nature, above the condition in which he appeared as 
but another form of animal life, man's continued exis- 
tence on the basis of so-called "natural ecology** 
ceases to be ssible. Lifting himself above the con- 
dition of beasts, he can no longer survive as a species 
by depending, as beasts do, un so-called **natural 



 

ecological" relations. Man's existence then fatefuUy 
depends un man-made conditions, un sitively 
transforming the ecology in conformity with the 
requirements of his continued existence. () 

Since the ecology man encounters at each  in 
his existence involves an essential relationship to geo- 
physical and other ecological conditions which by 
themselves afford only the preconditions for the exis- 
tence of lowere beasts, man mistakenly appears thus to 
be in desperate confli with his environment. 

This problem takes the essential form of the relative 
finiteness of what each mode of human technology de- 
fines as primary resources, Man must supersede 
these technological limitations, or the attempt to 
maain human existence at some fixed level of tech- 
nological progress must lead to exhaustion of 
relatively-finite primary resources, and the genocidal 
collapse of society through the exhaustion of the essen- 
tial conditions for maaining mankind in that fixed 
mode. 

As we have stipulated above, this technological 
progress takes the form of a negentropic progress in 
man's (descriptively) thermodynamic relationship to 
nature, for which the aive source of such technologi- 
cal advances is that creative (synthesizing) mental 
aivity associated with the discovery, transmission, 
assimilation, and transference to impulses of willful 
social praice of those discoveries which conform to 
increasing comprehension of the universal lawful 
ordering of that material universe which we must 
**thermodynamically" master. 

The bounding of European feudalism, both in 

respe of extent, and in respe of ssibilities for 
more ensive utilization of relatively local primary 
resources for agricultural development in the existing 
modes, meant that feudalism doomed itself to a 
threatened genocidal collapse of European culture  
as old Rome had collapsed before it  by virtue of its 
organic social constitution and exicit law. Although 
the role of the Bardi banking houses and others accele- 
rated, mediated that genocidal collapse in a special 
way in creating the preconditions in which the Black 
Death was inevitable, the Black Death of the four- 
teenth century is properly seen as crucial, absolute 
disproof of the kind of notion of universal natural 
law advanced on behalf of feudal relations by the 
thirteenth and fourteenth century scholastics 
(Aristotelians). 

The development of the rudiments of proto-capital- 
ist culture, neo-atonic humanism, did not occur 
simy because some bright fellows scratched about 
concoing hythetical alternatives to a failed hege- 



. Hence, the Naderite radical "environmentalist" has precisely 
the morality of a lowere beast, a parody of our baboon-like, humanoid 
Pleistocene ancestors ! 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

monic conception of universal law. The same notion of 
causality we stipulated as required by such evidence 
as the special, higher-order physical space of 
asmas, apies precisely to this problem. 

Although feudal society was nominally fixed in its 
technology, this should not be understood as an abso- 
lute fixing. Even under feudalism man is not in fa a 
beast, even though he is by and large juridically 
relatively degraded to a beast-like condition. 

The charaeristic feature of all living systems is 
negentropy. This feature of living processes is caed 
over in human development  hylozoically  in the 
form of the charaeristic ordering princie of human 
willful behavior. This involves not only the tential 
negentropy embodied in abstra conceptions of tech- 
nological innovations, but the tendency of each suc- 
cessful mode of human praice to produce a 
charaeristic social surus, a smaller or larger mar- 
gin of produ above what is required to reace the 
means of produion and consumption consumed (as 
aual or imputable costs) in the course of producing 
the whole output. As Rosa Luxemburg correly em- 
phasized, in correing Lenin's essential, charaer- 
istic blunder in economic analysis, without social sur- 
us, man would not have progressed beyond the stage 
of the paleolithic scraper. All viable forms of human 
culture (technology) are charaerized by thermo- 
dynamic negentropy in respe of the existence of a 
charaeristic tendency for social surus, in the 
sitive, self-subsisting process of self-expansion of 
that process involving the relationship of useful output 
to these inputs imputable as social costs of the pro- 
duion of that output. 

In other terminology, apying the notion of 
capitalist profit (industrial-capitalist profit) retro- 
speively as an aid in preliminary description of 
previous modes of produion, the existence of some 
form of '^profit" as charaeristic of the mode of pro- 
duion is the indispensable, charaeristic feature of 
all successful human modes of produion and exis- 
tence. 

The ^'thermodynamic" problem  which also exists 
in the more-exicitly biological form in the 
necessarily negentropic ordering of the biosphere  is 
that the limits of a successful relatively-fixed mode of 
produion are not defined by an absolutely-fixed 
mode of "zero-profit" produion, but by the fa that 
the rate of increase of the charaeristic rate of ''pro- 
fit" becomes manifestly insufficient to keep pace with 
the increasing social costs of produion arising from 
relative deetion of the existing set of technologi- 
cally defined primary resources. 

The limiting feature of societies is not that they fail 
to make some technological progress, but that the rate 
of technological progress fails to keep pace with the 



social cost effes of the deetion of the primary re- 
sources defined by existing technology. 

What therefore is required constantly is a higher 
rate of technological progress, to the effe that the ex- 
tent of defined primary resources is increasing more 
rapidly than it is being deeted in terms of pre- 
viously dominant technology. The rate of "profit  
used in the specified way as a term of description  is 
the margin of "energy" available to the society to 
advance beyond praice in the existing technological 
forms. 

Provided we emoy technology in its broadest 
imications, as proper to and demanded by the case, 
the basis for defining the general princies required 
is established. 

The most apparent problem faced by societies is the 
problem of direion of utilization of this profit. If the 
profit is direed in its realization toward those forms 
of technological change which converge on a world- 
line of increasing rates of negentropy in produive re- 
lations, then the problem of human existence can be 
solved within the framework of the institutions of that 
society. However, if the profit is diverted away from 
convergence un that world-line, the institutions 
which effe such a diversion thus dire the society 
toward its collapse. 

To the extent that one can approximate aual 
human history by the hythetical case, the progress 
of humanity is represented by a special kind of world- 
line. 

The first-order charaeristic of this world-line is 
that it represents an optimal "path" of rising negen- 
tropy, in respe to advancement of technology at an 
optimal, more rapid rate than mankind is exhausting 
"primary resources" and other preestablished pro- 
duive resources as defined by previous technology. 

This world-line does not depi something which 
happens miraculously. The mediating source of tech- 
nological progress is the discovery, transmission, 
assimilation, and informing of the general impulses of 
willful social praice of both new scientific discoveries 
and the supementary innovative tentialities sub- 
sumed by such discoveries. This mediation in all cases 
occurs through the creative mental weres and ac- 
tivity of human individuals. Hence, it is individual 
creativity (freedom) which is the aive, immediate 
"driving force" represented by the world-line. Yet, 
the ssibility of individual contributions depends 
un education, and also un those other material 
and social circumstances which foster in individuals 
the were to create and to assimilate new conceptions 
going beyond the range of previously existing know- 
ledge and related praice. Hence, the tential 
material and cultural conditions generated by tech- 
nological progress represent the necessary pre- 







conditions for the individual creative initiatives which 
must be realized as the immediate "ground-source" of 
technological progress. 

Thus, that hythetical simification of the aual 
ordering of our species history and pre-history 
represents in fa a self-subsisting sitive, univer- 
salizing princie. 

This princie is the unchanging princie, the 
charaeristic causality in the succession of human 
technological and associated social progress. The prin- 
cie itself is never altered  the princie of causality 
is unchanging. 

However, the successive societies determined by 
the aion of this unchanging princie, unchanging 
causality, have different "geometries*'  just as 
feudal and capitalist society have different primary 
self-ordering charaeristics in their appropriate geo- 
metric erpretation. It is ssible, without exagger- 
ating the argument by such resorts, to describe feudal 
society's imputable ernal litical-economic geo- 
metry as epistemologically equivalent to the ordinary 
notions of field-particle relationships in Lagrangian or 
Maxwellian physics. Whereas, a society based on the 
humanist princies of industrial capitalism shared 
among Gresham, Bodin, Colbert, Franklin, Hamilton, 
Carey, Marx, is properly comparable to the contrary 
features of higher-order physical space as confronted 
in negentropic aspes of non-linear asma be- 
haviors, as we shall show below. 

In the instance of Aristotelian or scholastic 
epistemology, we have the Euclidean form of Lagran- 
gian physics' imied "geometry" of society (and 
technology) embedded. For these cases, we have a 
pr/ori notions of a linear metaphysical basis for space, 
time, and matter (Euclidean space, time, and matter 
relationships). 

The most prominent feature, and crucial empirical- 
theoretical disqualification of Euclidean-Aristotelian 
systems is that they deny the relevance of negentropic 
charaeristics of reality, either by relegating the 
category of negentropic phenomena to the meta- 
physical or merely by obsessively denying the 
evidence. The religious Aristotelian sets the negen- 
tropic evidence considered o the category of the 
metaphysical, outside the determined system. Thus, 
by such physical-metaphysical dualism, the ap- 
pearance of ernal coherence of the physical system 
is defended. The notion of elan vital (although asso- 
ciated historically with degenerate nominalism's 
sitivist variant), parodies scholastic dorine on 
this . The evasion of the problem of scientific dis- 
covery's creative (synthetic) content is similarly 
attempted by the dorine of "uition." Radical, 
atheistic Euclidean-Aristotelians evade the problem 
by the pathetic formulation: "That hythesis is not 



 

necessary," saving the appearance of what they 
choose to regard as science by the shyster's ruse of 
canonically outlawing all disagreeable empirical 
evidence from consideration within science. 

There is a dire correlation between the emergence 
of German critical philosophy during the - 
period and the French and German development of 
the preconditions for a relativistic physics during the 
first half of the nineteenth century. The most promi- 
nent single elleual influence for both currents of 
correlated development was Immanuel Kant. Kant, 
thus situated, serves as the most efficient reference 
 for errelating the empirical and formal as- 
pes of the notion of a negentropic, relativistic 
physical space as it apies both to physics as such and 
to the distin ernal geometry of industrialist- 
capitalist and socialist development. (Although in- 
dustrial-capitalist and socialist development have 
different geometries in respe to one another, they 
have coherent geometries, and for the moment can be 
treated as subsumed within a common, distin class 
of geometries.) 

Contrary to the various professedly "neo-Kantian" 
empiricists emerging inclusively around influences 
such as Friedrich Lange, Eduard Bernstein and 
others at the conclusion of the past century, the con- 
ceptual breakthrough which defines Kant as the Kant 
was his sweeping refutation of British empiricism, 
with immediate focus un the provocative, objeion- 
able "indifferentist" thesis of David Hume. Kant's 
starting  for his comprehensive discrediting of 
British empiricism was the Aristotelian stand as 
inclusively formally typified by the physics of La- 
grange, also the stand of Leibniz, and the new 
view charaeristic of the Enlightenment  up to the 
 of rejeing categorically the stand 
exemified by Descartes and Spinoza. That is Kant's 
formal source of elleual were, and also his crip- 
ing defeat. 

Kant's achievement and were, relative to most of 
his acknowledged principal predecessors, was that he 
incorrated aively or virtually all of the most rele- 
vant empirical evidence. His defeat was that he at- 
tempted  and was the last competent epistemo- 
logical thinker to originate this approach  to fit all 
the evidence, including acknowledgement of the 
reality of man's creative (synthetic) weres respe- 
ing the realm of causally-situated social praice, 
within the ultimately-stretched limits of the Aristotel- 
ian-Euclidean world outlook. Thus, excepting his 
correlated, criping, categorical rejeion of the al- 
ternative approach conveyed through Spinoza, Kant 
assembled and sed all of the principal immediate 
epistemological problems, and thus described the 
fundamental problem of knowledge in the compre- 







 

hensive form it could then be fruitfully attacked by his 
notable successors. 

The central, and for present purses also most 
relevant feature of Kant's Critiques is that he acknow- 
ledged the formal existence of a continuous princie 
of creative (synthetic) were in man, in human be- 
havior, as charaeristic of human behavior. This was 
his stroke of genius relative to that time, the crux of 
his entire refutation of the British nominalist degen- 
eracy typified by Hume. Furthermore, Kant formally 
acknowledged the role of this charaeristic feature of 
human thought as an efficient cause in the real uni- 
verse, through the instrument of informed impulses 
for willful praice. 

However, this central fa, which properly led to the 
formal repudiation of the entire Euclidean-Aristotel- 
ian system, was then arbitrarily confined within the 
general Aristotelian-Euclidean epistemological basis 
with aid of two comementary ruses. First, Kant 
fitted the creative princie o the system he was 
attempting to repair and save by locating the origin of 
the creative (synthetic) princie as an additional a 
priori quality of the Aristotelian-Euclidean basis. 
Second, he attempted to save the notion of Aris- 
totelian-Euclidean determinism ultimately by a re- 
direing of the same ruse emoyed in the late fif- 
teenth century Marsilio Ficino's Five Questions, 

Acknowledging that the efficiency of creative 
knowledge for praice invalidated axiomatically the 
Aristotelian-Euclidean ontology, Kant created the 
empty constru of an unknowable thing-in-itself as 
the ultimate reality underlying the relatively false, 
knowable, phenomenal thing. Thus, he saved the 
Aristotelian-Euclidean system in respe to the 
knowable. Then, on the basis of this metaphysical 
trick  albeit an epistemologically rigorous trick of 
almost unprecedented elleual force  Kant 
proved, formally by means of the stulated unknow- 
able domain of the thing-in-itself, a constant state of 
non-aesthetic space-time, in which unknowable in- 
finity, the universalizing ultimate imications of effi- 
cient creative praice were resolved, in an incompre- 
hensible state which must be conceived of aestheti- 
cally as comparable to a state of the universe as if at 
rest. 

The first major elle to attempt to solve this 
fallacy of Kant direly with respe to physics as such 
was Riemann. Riemann makes this exicit through 
his purrtedly *' metaphysical commentaries** on the 
Kantian Herbart. It is traditional among commen- 
tators on Riemann to pretend they are unfamiliar with 
those **metaphysical commentaries*' or to pretend 
that such material has no dire relevance for Rie- 
mann*s * 'other work" as a mathematical physicist. 
However, as a rigorous consideration of the notion of a 



self-expanding n-dimensional manifold requires, es- 
pecially with the aid of light retrospeively con- 
tributed by Cantor, these **metaphysicar* gropings of 
Riemann's are coherent with and key to the under- 
pinnings of the greatest single physicist's discovery of 
the past two centuries. 

The Sunday-supement representation of so-called 
non-Euclidean geometries centers around a dis- 
cussion of the * 'parallel axiom" and hereditary 
features of the Euclidean system, and compares 
Gauss, Lobachevski, Bolyai, and Riemann from that 
stand. If such discussion is ended to imy that 
a relativistic physics involves a non-Euclidean geo- 
metry in that sense, then the discussion is nonsensical. 
Any non-Euclidean geometry based un such sime, 
formal alterations of the axiomatic premises of 
Euclidean geometry caes forward all the **heredi- 
tary" defes which prevent the Euclidean system it- 
self from providing the conceptual-formal basis for a 
truly relativistic physics, or from successfully 
delineating the charaeristics of the geometry of an 
aual Riemannian relativistic physics. 

It makes no difference that the formal problem so 

sed has not yet been exicitely solved, but only 
imicitly solved. The defe of the Aristotelian- 
Euclidean system and its non-Euclidean derivatives is 
that it cannot satisfy the specifications set forth, for 
exame, in the famous Cologne leure of Hermann 
Minkowski. To the extent that time, space, matter are 
conceptually defined apart from the ernal reality of 
the physical process, are defined in any respe in an 
axiomatic aprioristic way, the effort to use a non- 
Euclidean geometry to describe a relativistic physics 
is simy an extension of inherently linearized 
Aristotelian-Euclidean methods of * *curve-f itting. ' * 
As, for exame, the Einstein-Weyl program. 

The conceptions of space, time, and matter in any 
aprioristic system of qualitatively independent 
degrees of freedom (self-evidence) for an arbitrary 
geometrical (including ultra-exotic tological) 
model require that the notions of **dimensionality" or 
any equivalent notion one might wish to substitute in 
their ace, are rinsically linearized. Hence, such a 
space caes forward the crucial, **hereditary" axio- 
matic fallacy of the Aristotelian-Euclidean system. It 
cannot, inherently, for this given reason, **carry" the 
causality associated with negentropically "deter- 
mined" physical processes. 

The praical solution to the difficulty involved is 
presently provided only through dire apications of 
the notion of primary causality we have set forth 
above. Although this involves a kind of sophistication 
which stands formally outside the formal arguments 
of a Benjamin Franklin et al., it must be emphasized 
again, and understood that what we are analyzing in a 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



relatively more sophisticated frame of reference is 
identical as a working princie to the humanist 
notions of freedom, universal natural law, and the 
erconneions of the two, which were not only the 
guiding conceptions of our American Revolution, but 
conceptions then and since validated in praice. 

In a true relativistic conception, the only "axio- 
matic** princie of the conceptual system as such is 
the kind of notion of negentropy we associated with the 
notion of the world-line. We compare the rate of in- 
crease of negentropy with the required rate of in- 
crease of negentropy to maain the process as 
**simy'* self-subsisting. The relationship between 
these two rates of change of the rate of negentropy is 
the only "axiomatic" conceptual feature of the 
analytical apparatus apied. It is not measured with 
respe to a priori determinations of (e.g., clock) 
time, of space, of mass, or anything else of that sort. 
Rather the emoyed notions of time, space, mass, 
and so forth are defined relative to the process 
represented by the errelationship between the two 
rates. 

In economic analysis, each set of values defined by 
that single base-parameter corresnds in fa to a 
qualitative form of society. The necessary charac- 
teristic rate of increase in the rate if negentropy 
defines the society, and the rate of effeive negen- 
tropy associated with that society transforms the 
notion o the required notion of primary form of 
cause. 

The initial apication of that notion to aual 
processes, such as societies, biosphere, and so forth, is 
the process of mapping the subje matter in terms of 
that conceptual approach concerning causality to 
"measurement" of the qualitative charaeristics of 
lawful relationship within the whole of the domain and 
ech being exored empirically. The elaboration 
effeed through such approaches to empirical in- 
vestigation of the charaeristics of that physical 
space defines a "geometry" in the sense required. 

The further, indispensable effort involves the 
similar mapping of the successor ech of develop- 
ment in that domain, and requires the resolution of the 
two defined geometries in such a way as to show how 
the impulses erpreted according to the terms of the 
notion of the world-line accomish the transformation 
of the domain from one ech to another. 

This method of analysis is, in historical retrospe, 
apicable to every ech of human history and pre- 
history, and also to the "history" of the biosphere in 
general. It is also, obviously, appropriate to solution of 
the kinds of problems confronted by the cited 
problems of physics. 

However, respeing society, until the neo-atonic 
humanists' conscious establishment of the princies 
and licies for the initiation of what became in- 



 

dustrial-capitalist development, no form of society 
existed in which the operation of the society depended 
un the included governance of development by a 
consciousness of the constant imperative of suc- 
cessive technological progress. The society does not 
operate successfully on the basis of "blind" laws 
governing "field-particle" relationships, but un 
laws which depend un the included feature of the 
"particles' consciousness" of the constant necessity to 
willfully determine their behavior to a predetermined 
effe. He;ce, the aively-negentropic ''geometry'' of 
capitalist development! 

The notion of "freedom" peculiar to neo-atonic 
humanism, and the emerging princie of the notion of 
the republican form as the society's necessary in- 
strument, are both dire refleions of that role of 
consciousness. 

To the extent our American culture has subsided, to 
the effe that large rtions of our pulation have 
become either relatively allonians or dionysians in 
outlook and mood, it must indeed seem incredible to 
such relatively-unfortunate persons that our Constitu- 
tion, our American Revolution were determined in 
fa by broad majority commitment to fight for such 
humanist princies, such humanist outlooks and 
moods. The apllonian (Aristotelian) and dionysian 

(nominalist) each regard their moods and outlooks as 
self-evident, innate, "common sense." Hence, they 
find it incredible that the contrary to (their own) con- 
notations of terms, fas, and so forth guided our 
Federalists, as persons of a humanist outlook. 

Fortunately, humanist impulses  if not broadly 
developed for consciousness  are deey embedded 
as impulses in our trade unionists (to the extent they 
think as skilled or semi-skilled working people) and 
our industrialists, scientists, engineers (to the extent 
their perception of vital national erests corresnds 
to that experience). Thus, although the licies which 
governed the establishment of our nation have sub- 
stantially lost the degree of conscious hegemony they 
enjoyed at that time, the vital self-erests of our 
nation are more emphatically those of an industrial- 
capitalist nation than at that past time. Hence, 
although the impulses corresnding to our nation's 
vital erests are embedded chiefly in such social 
strata as our industrialists, farmers, and working 
people, and even only in a fragmented, half-conscious 
way, that sensuous perception of self-erests in such 
a fragmented form waits only to be made conscious to 
become again the efficient and hegemonic force 
consciously shaping our nation's licies and prac- 
tices. 

To neo-atonic humanists, to our nation's founding 
fathers  despite vacillations on this  by Jef- 
ferson and others  freedom never meant freedom in 
the anarchist's glosses on that term. Nor did it mean 







 

freedom of rational choice in the scholastic's sense of 
choice. On both s, the concepts of freedom and 
toleration have been so often confused that the stri 
epistemological distinions between the two distin 
conceptions has almost been forgotten. 

Toleration of violations of universal law and its 
proper derivatives is not generated as a sitive ex- 
pression of freedom. Exaly the opsite. Freedom, 
sitively understood, is the abhorrence of such error. 

We properly tolerate on two principal premises. We 
tolerate what we rightly know to be error in belief and 
in respes of praice, because the root of the were 
for freedom in the individual is not obedience, but self- 
development; for that reason, a society which is 
dedicated to developing the weres and moral per- 
ceptions of freedom within its individual members is 
advised to be as tolerant as its overall vital self- 
erests allow. We also tolerate because we fear to 
encroach on areas of ostensible deviation which may 
be, despite our momentary misjudgment to the 
contrary, a kind of deviation  e.g., '^unorthodox" but 
sitive scientific discovery  which represents the 
advancement of our culture's freedom. 

Wha t we do not tolera te in proper licy and la w is a 
dire violation of humanist outlook and methods 
which threatens vital erests as defined from the 
humanist stand. 

The ssibility of ordering a litical domain of 
freedom (in the proper, humanist perception of that 
term) has been demonstrated to be inseparable from 
the licy of ordering our affairs as a republic, and not 
a monarchy or democracy. In princie, without 
restating here fully what has been identified earlier on 
this , the ssibility of ordering an entire society 
according to an efficient notion of the necessary 
technological progress of its overall development 
demands human agencies whose consciousness of 
praical affairs is not only focused on the 

technological progress of the society as a whole, but 
which, situated in that sition of resnsibilities, have 

the qualifications of outlook, method, and efficient 
moral commitment to those criteria, to consciously 
lead the overall praice of the society from moment 
to moment with approximate effeiveness. 

The republican form is not and was not adopted as a 
form of government which must be superior to 
democracy for all time to come. John Milton is better 
than Tom Paine in including that consideration in 
argument against the adoption of the democratic 
form. The fa that an anti-humanist incompetent 
such as Jimmy Carter or, earlier an Andrew Jackson, 
could be President of the United States (by means of 
both hook and crook), is not an argument against 
perpetuating the republican form today, but a warn- 
ing of what horrors may await us if we imagine that 



the time has come when the proper purses of a 
republican form could be superseded by "pure 

litical democracy.'* 
The princie of our republic  its proper princie, 

without whose enforcement it does not funion ac- 
cording to the ent of our Constitution  is that all 
persons eleed to principal offices of our national 
government ought to be seleed by the parties and the 
mass of the eleorate as competent representatives 
of the humanist outlook. They ought to be persons 
deey committed to the princie of technological 
progress, both respeing produion as such, and 
those features of the education and associated con- 
ditions of life of the general pulation essential to 
realizing the furtherance of industrial and 
agricultural technological progress. They ought to be 
not only committed to such outlooks and methods of 
judgment, but be efficient both in perceiving the ex- 
pression of such erests in praice and in the moral 
qualities which tend to preclude violations of that obli- 
gation by deed of a or omission in the duties for 
which they were eleed. Such persons express the 
vital erests of our nation, the erests of the nation 
which otherwise impinge in a fragmentary form un 
the individual citizen's immediate and future circum- 
stances. The people, the eleorate, must refleively 
sele suitable representatives by processes of careful 
deliberation, and must judge and check those eleed 
on performance by the same processes and criteria. 

When such a centralized deliberative process, based 
in the humanist perception of the crucial role of 
technological progress, is the refleive judgment of 
our government and eleorate, as institutions of a 
republican process, that process, that sovereign in- 
strument of humanist self-government, is the means 
by which the juridical and related questions deter- 
mining the notion of freedom for praice are removed 
from the realm of anarchic conflis of contending 
opinion. Without those humanist princies, our 
republic's institutions are turned o an empty gar- 
bage can, o which any government force, chosen 
without consideration of Constitutional princies, 
may desit its peculiar refuse, and in the name of 
sovereignty, recommend such ordure as our national 
erest. 

Our republic, our Constitution, were established 
under the certain conviion of the existence of a truth, 
the truth of universal natural law as prescribed by 
humanism. It was on the authority of that perception 
of truth that the majority of the people of the North 
American English colonies adopted the Declaration of 
Independence, and later adopted a Constitution based 

un that same, freshly tested princie of truth. 
Remove that truth  that humanist princie of 
technologically-focused progress  from the Consti- 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



tution and its institutions, and the republic is turned 
o a sham, a uralisms ideological refuse-dump. () 

This humanist freedom  distin from mere tolera- 
tion  which we properly prize is identical in effe 
and ent with the more sophisticated representation 
of it we have given here in conneion with the notion 
of the primary form of causality in human affairs. 

Necessity, as most broadly determined by the rate 
of technological and related progress we require to 
maain our current condition o the forseeable 
future, demands realized scientific discoveries and 
subsumed innovations in detail which enable us to 
exceed the appetites of that necessity. To survive, we 
depend un the creative mental weres of the in- 
dividual member of society  to make discoveries, to 
communicate new conceptions, to assimilate more 
advanced conceptions, and to convey that more ad- 
vanced knowledge o the governing impulses of 
willful social praice. 

That form of exercise of individual mental creative 
tentials for knowledge and praice is the only 
essential meaning of freedom. 

Freedom is thus emphasized in respe of what the 
individual gives to the society. What the individual 
sees as freedom in what the society affords to him, is 
education, appropriate conditions of life for his cul- 
tural progress, latitude to develop and test new 
weres of creative judgment, the right to innovate in 
direions consistent with the purse of progress, and 
to enjoy the right to attempt to persuade others con- 
cerning such enterprises. 

It is both s of viewing freedom combined o a 
single notion which represents freedom in its most 
essential and comprehensive form. The society  e.g., 
the state  does not **concede*' freedom to the indi- 
vidual, but demands that he or she partake of it in the 
general erest of the state (society). The individual 



. A Federal Court system which abandons its obligation to 
measure judgments according to that truth, which bows before the 
empty fa of sovereignty or expedient arbitration, has in fa opened 
the doors to high treason against this nation and its Constitution. 



 

does not rightly regard the "constriion" on outlook 
and method of the humanist state as oppressive. For 
without general progress, the state (the society) can- 
not afford the individual members the means for in- 
creasing their capacity and expression of freedom. 

The latter is most ignantly expressed usually in 
conneion with religious belief. Each individual has 
so much life to live. When it is finished, what has it 
meant? If that individual can but contribute during 
life a succession of contributions to the general techno- 
logical and related advancement of society  
creating, transmitting, praicing new technologies  
then his or her life stands as one of immortal imr- 
tance to the society. His or her contributions represent 
the added building of the foundation of future pro- 
gress, an addition which will remain as long as the 
society progresses. Without freedom in the humanist 
sense, the individual in society has no consciously de- 
fensible premise on which to say to his fellows: "I 
have a right to live as a free man, because the ad- 
vancement of our society would be less without my 
creative contributions.** 

Hence, consider the or young raving, homosexual 
marijuana addi protesting against a fission-were 
ant in behalf of this or that obscure, tiny lowere form 
of life, who declares, *'I have the right to do my own 
thing. My opinion is just as good as yours ! " He is not a 
human being in the aive, moral sense, but only a 
or, wretched sinner who has consented to reduce 
himself to a beast-like moral condition. His passing 
would perhaps cause some to weep, not because he 
was in any moral sense a human being, but because 
his tential to have become one was so obscenely 
wasted. 

Against this background, we turn our attention now 
to the disease, nominalism. We shall see in this connec- 
tion, and in respe to certain crucial matters of 
foreign licy, the areas we have covered in the 
preceding epistemological outline have an indis- 
pensable use for most efficiently resolving not only the 
most critical and dangerous problems imsed un 
us by Atlanticist Dorine, but for solving the urgent 
questions otherwise aced before us. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



Monetarism and Nominalism 



At this , we erlate an observation 
which is not only imrtant to mastering all of 
the conceptions and included problem-subjes set 
forth in this licy paper as a whole, but also of 
probably considerable imrtance in guiding the rea- 
der to focus more surely the highly praical imr- 
tance of the preceding, unavoidably extended episte- 
mological review, in respe to grounding the more 
obviously, more visibly praical-litical focus to 
which this is direed. 

Not only the proverbial man-in-the-street, but also 
the overwhelming majority of the world's principal 
and other national litical figures, do not understand 
what are in fa the ABCs of "how litics really 
works." Respeing the arts of statecraft, certain 
aspes of the techniques of the litician's crafty the 
writer could benefit from the knowledge, experience 
and counsel to that effe from many professional 
litical figures. Nonetheless, insofar as the processes 
underlying crucial litical developments are con- 
cerned, the typical leading strata of national litical 
figures and parties have yet no rigorous insight o 
the determining ernal features of the overall liti- 
cal process. 

This may be momentarily resented by some, as 
what they regard for a moment as an insufferably 
arrogant statement of the matter. Even so, they dare 
not permanently brush our statement aside. In- 
creasingly, most notably during the recent three years 
to date, key litical strata of various faions of 
nations which presently include most of these of this 



world, have, although for the most part begrudgingly, 
recognized some special quality, some aive prin- 
cie of unusual elleual were, behind the ef- 
feiveness of the special approach to major topics of 
strategy and licy emoyed by the writer's 
associates. Notably, respeing the most crucial 
issues of strategy and licy during the past decade, 
we have been overwhelmingly corre with respe to 
the contrary perceptions of leading forces of all not- 
able faions within the United States, Western 
Europe, the developing seor, and the CMEA nations. 

This litical situation is the typical problem of 
scientific progress. 

The growing curiosity this reluantly perceived 
fa of our competence has evoked among various 
leading circles, has in turn impelled significant r- 
tions of such strata, both here and abroad, o pro- 
sing or briefly adopting various, wrong exan- 
ations concerning the nature of our litical method 
and suspeed special external sources of our unusual 
competencies. The following among those mistaken 
opinions are relevant to the broader praical  at 
hand here. 

The notion that an organization of such limited 
physical means could manifest, repeatedly, such 
striking competence concerning vital issues of U.S. 
domestic and foreign licy was so insufferable in its 
imications to many leading strata, that they more 
credulously accepted at one time or another the cal- 
culated slanders circulated chiefly through neo- 
Fabian networks, to the effe that our organization 



 







was a front for variously the U.S. Central Intelligence 
Agency, some groups of Chicago industrialists, the 
Soviet KGB, a group of Third World governments, or 
at one   among some Europeans  the Papacy. 

The toleration of such disinformational exana- 
tions" was principally governed by their consoling 

features, that they appeared to exain away the dis- 
turbing fear that our competencies might be rooted in 
special ernal qualities of our organization itself. 

The notion that a small force of '^outsiders," an 
organization with no official, significantly insti- 
tutionalized mandate to meddle in **grand litics," 
could rude hubristically o the world's ruling 
circles and demonstrate that in the main those circles 
lacked some imrtant competence, was the crux of 
this matter. 

However, even the disinformational "exanations" 
could not and did not eliminate the persisting view 
that our organization was advantaged to know a few 
things of some imrtance. Consequently, increas- 
ingly since January , there has been an overall 
increase in erest among various leading circles of 
the USA and abroad in acquaing themselves with 
our information on various matters of that sort. Such 
erest has ebbed and flowed repeatedly during the 
shorter term, but the fluuations were only an in- 
cluded feature of a widening and otherwise signifi- 
cantly increasing overall tendency. The focus of such 
erest evolved over time, away from random pat- 
^ terns respeing specific topics and kinds of topics, to 
emphasize specific foci of information, including the 
varieties of background fas, analyses, and fore- 
casts. The methodological error predominant, most 
emphatically, in the attempt to appraise our fore- 
casts, is the most efficient charaerization of the 
wrong way our organization's qualities and its 
methods of work were generally appraised among 
leading and other circles. 

A forecast involves, in customary and mistaken 
opinion, a prediion. When what is offered is seen as a 
mere prediion, the recipient of such elligence 
tends to assume that the source has either obtained 
vital information concerning the operational ent of 
the relevant agencies involved in shaping the event, or 
that the projeed conditions are deduively deter- 
mined. Such appreciations, apied to the writer's 
organization's elligence output, ultimately involve 
precisely the same kind of error otherwise prompting 
credulous acceptance of the sort of disinformation 
cited above. 

In the matter of accepting consoling disinformation, 
the credulous observer has denied, in effe, that the 
subje organization's notable competencies arise 
autonomously from some special ernal quality. In 
the miserpretation of the quality of the elligence 



 

output we represent, the miserpreter demands, in 
effe, that an unusual quality of competence be 
causally attributed to an ordinary sort of methodo- 
logical praice. 

It is the methodological blunders commonly made in 
effort to erpret and assess our forecasts which is 
most to be singled out here, for sake of the urgent 
governing, praical  under consideration in this 
licy paper as a whole. The exsure of what is badly 
mistaken in the cited two forms of misappreciation of 
our forecasts s direly to that praical . 

First, the included case in which our forecast is 
attributed to knowledge of an operational commit- 
ment of ent by the relevant influential agency in- 
volved in the subje matter of the forecast. 

From the outside, it is a standard ABC of military 
elligence competence that documentary or other 
**hard" knowledge of an adversary's or ally's ent is 
of no conclusive value respeing a forecast of the be- 
havior such institutions will pursue in praice. 
Evidence of such ent is merely a clinical fa of 
greater or lesser imrtance in forecasting, in- 
dependently of the subje's own foreknowledge of his 
behavior, how his capacities and shifting perceptions 
of self-erests will cause him to behave under cir- 
cumstances we or others variously will in part shape. 

In respe of an adversary's or ally's adopted licy 
concerning ent (provided the elligence is not 
disinformation) , the strongest value to be attributed to 
it as a clinical fa is that (even in the case of disinfor- 
mation) it refles his deliberate processes and, more 
immediately, represents a consciously-identified and 
institutionalized licy option. Since the ent is a 

conscious effort to articulate praical realization of 
an adduced self-erest, it tends to have greater in- 
fluence on the subje's behavior than equally ad- 
ducible expression of the same self-erest which he 
has not made conscious to that same effe. However, 
the ent  operational commitment or otherwise  
remains no less merely a clinical fa, an ent whose 
realization and influence will be shaped by consider- 
ations of shifting alternative capabilities and shifting 
immediate expressions of self-erest. 

In our organization's work, that appreciation of the 
quality of evidence respeing ent is caed to what 
might be seen by the outside military-elligence and 
related specialists as a radical extreme. The writer's 
organization projes no inherent trust o evidence 
of conscious ent, operational or otherwise. We 
would not tolerate basing our licies  including our 
strategical and taical forecasts  on an amateurish 
miserpretation of perceived conscious ent. 

In the second aspe of the commonace misappre- 
ciations of our forecasts, our attention is confronted 
direly with the root-problem of the Aristotelian 







 

method. In identifying it as Aristotelian for this pur- 
se, we are subsuming the nominalist method as a 
special case, the degenerate form, of the Aristotelian. 

Our immediately preceding epistemological dis- 
cussion is most direly relevant. The notion that 
litical and certain related forms of forecasts can be 
competently developed by methods of prediion is the 
core of the misappreciation to be analyzed. 

First, in respe of underlying reality, the world is 
presently governed in fa by two systems, capitalist 
and socialist. The lawful processes determining 
economic relations of those systems, the lawful pro- 
cesses governing material erests, are immediately 
of the negentropic form we contrasted to the Aristotel- 
ian, linearized litical geometry of pre-capitalist 
systems. In a world governed by capitalist and social- 
ist economies, the forecastable real consequences of 
aions taken in this ech for the succeeding erval 
cannot be determined by methods modeled un 
those emoyed for mapping according to a deter- 
ministic system of linear equations. 

To the extent that one might consider it epistemolo- 
gically feasible to use Rand Corration "gaming- 
simulation," computerized methods for matters of 
litical, economic, military strategies, the methods 
one might emoy for such praices are inherently in- 
competent. 

There are, of course, instances for which Rand-type 
methods of prediion appear to succeed. This occurs 
only when the prediion is of the epistemologically- 
computerizable form of **curve-fitting,'' or belongs to 
the degenerate case of non-linear systems, which 
apparently coincide with the linearizable form. In the 
'^curve-fitting" case of such exceptions, the effeive- 
ness of the prediion depends un appropriate pre- 
determination of the **f union'* to be fitted, a pre- 
determination which occurs entirely outside the 
'*curve-fitting" aivity itself. 

Those exceptions noted, the statement that de- 
duive-determinist and related induive ("borrowed 
deduion") methods of prediion are inherently in- 
competent stands as a clearly-defined, rigorous state- 
ment of fa. 

This s to and refles the larger fa to be con- 
sidered, that the rinsic epistemological form of the 
problem confronting us at this junure is that the 
dominant institutions of the world, including some 
currents within the Soviet leadership, funion on the 
adopted basis of a variously Aristotelian or nominalist 
set of rules, methods which are rinsically not in 
corresndence with the lawful, ''geometric," negen- 
tropic ordering of reality immediately rinsic to an 
industrial-capitalist or industrial-socialist basis. We 
shall come quickly to that . 

In the terms of reference we have cited for this 
analysis, all perceptions and judgments, most notably 



those pertaining to institutionalized licies and cus- 
toms of general praice, are either forecasts  as 
this writer judges conditions and events  or pre- 
diions. They may be either exicitly forecasts or 
prediions, or merely imicitly so. For the latter 
case, it must be recognized that the processes of per- 
ception are inseparable from a judgment-forming con- 
sulting of the willful impulses for praice. No judg- 
ment can exist without an included, determining con- 
sideration of an anticipated dissition for a definable 
range of imied praical resnses to the event or 
condition prompting the judgment itself. Thus, all 
thought anually or tentially anticipates praice  
we are considering here praices bearing on funda- 
mental erests, and has the imied significance of 
being either a forecast or a prediion. 

If the notion of forecast is associated properly with 
both the methods of analyzing the irrational ruling be- 
havior we summarized at the outset of this general 
seion, and with the prescriptions for study of negen- 
tropic societal geometries, which we developed in the 
preceding epistemological subseion, the rigorous 
distinion to be made between a forecast and a 
prediion onght to become corresndingly clear. 

It is precisely the effort to imse a degenerate 
Aristotelian method ('^geometry") un the reality of 
a negentropic "geometry" of industrial-capitalist 
forms of lawful generation of the material conditions 
of human existence  and, hence capitalism and its 
real erests  which is the casual element gener- 
ating such derived discrepancies within those geo- 
metries as depressions, monetary breakdown crisis, 
global forced underdevelopment, the Rockefeller- 
Carter energy and de-industrialization licies, the 
decisions of financier erests to imse the Ver- 
sailles reparations and later Hitler un Germany, 
and so forth. To attempt to solve the licy-problems 
created in that way by apication of the same 
methods of prediion which charaerize the cause of 
those problems, prediably leads to nothing but a 
worsening of the discrepancies being considered. 

This brings us back to the  we roduced at the 
outset of this sub-seion, and to the basis for then 
direly attacking the next two, erconneed prob- 
lems successively next to be considered in this seion 

as a whole. 

The two geometries involved in (immediately) the 
present direing of the capitalist system represent 
the causally efficient, but not prediable in- 
terreaion of two distin "universes." In the one, the 
"underlying" negentropic geometry, the real or ob- 
jeive causal relationships generating the praical 
consequences of praical aions in respe to nature 
are lawfully ordered. In the other, presently a degen- 
erated form of Aristotelian-Euclidean geometry, the 
judgments and licies informing praice are deter- 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 




Plato, left, and Aristotle, shown in a detail of The School of Athens by Raphael. 







 

mined. This is the problem to be solved, and the 
combined comprehension of this problem and its 
principal praical imications is real litics. 

Insofar as the writer and his organization develop 
forecasts, as in the form of strategic analyses and so 
forth, this contribution in itself Aaif-satisfies the prob- 
lem of real litics. We have thus examined, as from 
the outside, the combined result of the erreaing 
two geometries. Such forecasting properly defines the 
problem not only with respe to its immediate 
analytical aspe, but also the lawful imications of 
the range of alternatives which best typify the de- 
limited range of consequences which must lawfully 
ensue from not altering the present form of er- 
conneion of the two geometries forming the present 
system of events. 

Having stated the problem in that forecast form, the 
praical question, whose solution must be derived by 
the same conceptual method used in forecasting, is 
how to alter the dualistic configuration to shift the de- 
limiting, forecastable "path" of world developments 
to an effe within the range of acceptable real in- 
terests of our nation. 

This is the thrust of our organization's strategic 
analyses, including the present, admittedly and 
necessarily rather thorough thesis statement respe- 
ing a reconstruion of our nation's licy stures. 

A competent forecast is, first of all, a forecast in the 
sense we have so far prescribed. To be a competent 
and cometely litical forecast, it must inclusively 
identify those s of ervention in the imme- 
diately-developing sperum of events at which ac- 
tions within both the real capabilities and the present 
or imminent subjeive capabilities of aual forces 
can, variously, ervene to more or less **catalyti- 
cally" shift the eraions of the two geometries 
away from the pathways leading toward the worst 
variants specifiable within the forecast. These er- 
ventions may effe merely slightly shifted pathways, 
which represent a slowere approach to preconditions of 
irreversible catastrophe, which '*buy time" or which, 
preferably represent a pathway leading out of the 
pathological track altogether. The princies remain 
broadly the same for all cases. 

Since the generative feature of the problem con- 
fronting us is properly regarded as a monetarists' 
subversion of the U.S. Constitution and of the ended 
content of our nation's republican institutions, if it 
were feasible to restore the essential, aive features 
of that Federalist- Whig humanist outlook and method 
to the dominant institutions consciously so shaping our 
nation's licies, that alteration would put our nation 
and the world on a track in which all of the problems 
foreseeable during the next two to three decades 
would be imicitly soluble in praice throughout that 
period* 



That is not merely a satisfaory formal solution to 
the present and looming horrors, but the overwhelm- 
ing majority of the nation's working people, farmers, 
industrialists, scientists, and so forth have Whiggish 
erests and Whiggish impulses. However, these im- 
pulses are aborted in overall effe for lack of substan* 
tial litical institutions committed to transforming 
such impulses efficiently o their corresnding 
expressions as conscious national licies. Relative to 
the liberal and radical minority, and also the tiny 
monetarist cabal running part of the Republican 
Party and the White House and certain Congressional 
top elements of the Democratic Party, the Whiggish 
forces of our nation ( conservative Republicans and 
Democrats, farmers, traditionalist trade unions, and 
the U.S. Labor Party) represent the vital erests and 
corresnding impulses of the overwhelming majority 
of the eleorate in fa. The headlong efforts of the 

Tories to destroy  with wild foreign adventures and 
attacks on our most vital national domestic self- 
erests  those material and cultural conditions 
which represent the most urgent immediate self- 
erests of the majority, create the conditions 
respeing "thresholds" under which the old Tory 

pattern can be broken, to constitute a "Whiggish" 
humanist coalition of labor, farmers, and indus- 
trialists as the governing institutionalized form of 
national domestic and foreign licy. 

Those derived strategic princies, which have 
imications to the same general effe in most 
nations of the world today, represent real litics. 

In order to imement such a crucial strategic 
licy, we must know our enemy  immediately the 
Tory alliance of monetarists, liberals and radicals  
and must understand how degenerative influences 
have created our Tories from top to bottom of that un- 
wholesome formation. We must understand the 

development of their isonous core ideology, and 
how the insidious influence of the same ideological and 
related forces has induced our nation's fundamentally 
Whiggish majority to tolerate, for so long up to this 
time, the growing rule of such an unwholesome 
minority force. 

Thus the dire attack on the problem identified at 
the outset of this seion requires two erconneed 
steps, both indispensably advantaged by tlje epis- 

temological apparatus we have erlated for that 
purse. We must account for the development of the 

nominalist core ideology of today's U.S. liberals and 
radicals as the charaeristic outlook and method of 
monetarism. We must then demonstrate, rigorously 
rather than merely descriptively, how the geolitics- 
centered Atlanticist Dorine has developed those 
obsessional, irrational features through which it now 
hysterically pushes the United States toward the brink 
of national suicide. 







From the outside, as Western Europeans and others 
view the United States so credulously  through our 
official stures, our major Eastern Seaboard news- 
papers and leading national newsweeklies, our 
movies, our television produion, and so forth  what 

we are exsing for correion is what such Western 
Europeans and others would tend to term '*the Ameri- 
can ideology.'* It is more correly that special, 
United States' adaptation of the same monetarist- 
linked nominalism which, in different adaptations, 
has been a ruling ideology in Europe itself. In con- 
sequence of the conflis of vital erests, now in full 
flood, between the Carter Administration and Western 
Europe, Western Europeans are advantaged to see 
such faults in our apparent official ideology much 
more clearly than they dete kindred ideological dis- 
orders within their own national charaers. 

The operative phrase to be stressed in that con- 
neion is *'from the outside." 

The "American ideology" in that sense is ad- 
mittedly the charaeristic ideology of our liberals 
and radicals  what Karl Marx distinguished as the 
liberal petit-bourgeois and the radical declasse and 
lumpenproletarian social strata. Admittedly these 
strata, the pular base-forces of lowere Manhattan 
monetarism, have run amok for decades lluting our 
national institutions with tiieir ideology. Admittedly, 
they have thus compelled the working class, indus- 
trialist and other innately Whiggish, ''Idea of Pro- 
gress "-defined strata of our nation to endure such 
llution of their own and their children's moralities. 
Nominalism  empiricism, pragmatism, sitivism, 
behaviorism, cultural relativism, *'egalitarianism," 
and so forth  is litically hegemonic in those insti- 
tutions which the monetarists, with aid of their liberal 
and radical shock-troops have been able to take over 
and corrupt. However, at root, with our organic tra- 
ditions and impulses for technologically-veored 
industrial and agricultural progress, those inner 
qualities which made us the richest nation of the 
world, we are American Whigs. If this were not true, if 
liberal nominalism were not but a disease imsed 
un a national charaer which itself represents a 
contrary organic world outlook, thermonuclear war 
and other horrors would be the incurable Fate written 
o our national charaer. 

We, as a majority of our nation, are predominantly 
Whigs to the core today not simy because we bear 
the habits and impr of our great technological 
achievements of the past. We are American Whigs be- 
cause of the institutions, including our founding 
Constitution and its initial Bill of Rights, which de- 
fined our national charaer in such an ongoing way 
that even the ague of Toryism roduced by the 
reign of loutish Andrew Jackson could not root out 



 

those traditions. Even Tory Franklin Delano Roose- 
velt could not fully root out those Whiggish traditions. 
Even the frenetic Tory subversion launched with the 
inauguration of John F. Kennedy has not yet rooted it 
out of the majority of our people. It was admittedly the 
organic experience of our technological progress 
which immediately nourished and sustained our 
Whiggish impulses, but that form and scope of tech- 
nological progress itself was made ssible by the 
embodiment of the neo-atonic humanist ent of the 
Federalists and their closest collaborators, in giving 
approximate shape to that humanist outlook and 
method through the adopted instruments of our repub- 
lican form of government. 

Although it is praically indispensable to em- 
phasize that the impulse of the majority of our people 
is committed to the Idea of Progress in at least an im- 
icitly-humanist form, monetarism and nominalism 
have been the hegemonic core ideology of the 
English-speaking institutions as a whole for at least 
two centuries, and increasingly so during the past cen- 
tury. There is no aspe of culture which has not been 
significantly corrupted or even wholly taken over by 
this pernicious influence. 

For exame, our universities: 

American sociology  predominantly an outgrowth 
of the coordinate settlement house and Fabian social 
work" charitable aivities originated among the thus 
card-indexed and manipulated, labile or of London, 
New York and so forth  is worse than worthless as an 
academic subje of our universities and secondary 
schools. It is worse than bunk; it is nothing but a 
vicious form of nominalist indorination of pros- 
peive ''social-work" shock-troop recruits to the neo- 
Fabian litical elligence apparatus. 

American psychology has almost entirely sub- 
jugated the thrusts toward a competent psychologidal 
study such as those within psychoanalysis. Under the 
impulse of behaviorism, the Fabian and neo-Fabian 
litical-elligence networks have subverted our 
institutions through such coordinating centers as the 
Rockefeller-fostered London Tavistock Institute, the 
Rothschilds* and Rockefellers' so-called Frankfurt 
School and its attached (Frankfurt, BRD) Sigmund 
Freud Institute, and the Tavistock-spawned, Rocke- 
feller fostered UNO World Federation of Mental 
Health. Excepting hold-out honest praitioners, 
American psychiatry and psychological instruion 
are today becoming the most vicious form of 
quackery, downright Tory ideological subversion wea- 
ns of nominalism. 

American anthrology's degeneration from a 
former level of tolerable competence is typified by the 
unjustifiable prominent status of figures such as Mar- 
garet Mead. Using the yardstick of those several 







 

debatable but nonetheless serious efforts to establish 
anthrological competence which still existed signifi- 
cantly around some universities until the beginning of 
the s, it is instruive to note the way in which such 
decent currents have been extirpated from graduate 
departments of anthrology in universities, in favor 
of the worst features imrted from st)ciology, without 
even an effort to disguise the significance of the 
thuggery (albeit of an academic form) emoyed to 
this purse. 

Imagine the sheer idiocy of the '^cultural relativist" 
dorine forced thus un anthrology. We, an ad- 
vanced culture, whose very existence is historically 
the produ of progress from feudal and ultimately 
primitive social forms, having reached the benefits of 
such culture, in all purrted seriousness consider a 
professed anthrologist a quite sane and author- 
itative person on that topic, when he bases his dorine 
on the axiomatic assertion that the whole course of 
history which brought us up from barbarism might 
have been a mistake. That we authorize universities to 
give advanced professional degrees to such nitwits is 
truly exemary of the corruption of our institutions. 

American and world history  to the extent that 
such frauds as William A. Williams are taken 
seriously, history is in hideous condition for the same 
reasons, as is litical science generally. 

Political Economy  The granting of the Nobel 
Prize to the rabidly-incompetent Milton Friedman 
exemifies both the elleual and moral bank- 
ruptcy of most of the profession of economists. Not 
only does Friedman's scheme demand the overthrow 
of our Constitution to institute a fascist economy  of 
the type presently prevailing in collapsing Chile, 
which is criminal, but a fascist economy doesn't work. 
Moreover the specific "contribution'* for which Fried- 
man was cited in conneion with the Nobel award is 
exemary of both the fascist princies embedded in 
his economic dorine, and represents a purrtedly 
recent discovery" of a form of hyperinflationary- 
austerity which was discredited in fa most em- 
phatically by Nazi occupation licies and slave- 
labor-death-camp program of the - period. 
Even a number of the leading monetarist economists 
had earlier demonstrated that Friedman, except as a 
kind of historical accountant," is incompetent even 
by ordinary monetarist professional standards. Other- 
wise, bang a few stubborn holdouts, what is taught 
in the name of economics in our universities today is 
not economics at all, but pure, anti-economic mone- 
tarism. 

English language studies have not been left 
litically untaed by nominalism. 

Up through the nineteenth century, the notion of a 
rigorous approach to English-language disciines 
was in the condition of a confli between a **Latin"- 



Aristotelian method developed in English-language 
culture's educational programs as a st-  process 
of perversion of earlier Erasmian educational reforms. 
The latter, the philological approach, was based on 
a study of the way words change in form and usages 
within a language and language-group. Philology 
attempted to abstra this evolutionary process from 
the succession of given configuration of usages at any 
time. It set out to discover a set of princies by which 
we could both open up new dimensions of historio- 
graphy, and apy these same princies to con- 
sciously ordering our approach more finely to ongoing 
transformations occung within the living language. 

The philological approach reaced the bankrupt 
methods adopted by the radically Aristotelian ap- 
proach corrupting **Latin"-focused classicism. The 
meaning of words and syntaical forms are not pro- 
perly fixed according to some set of preordained rules 
to be dug out. As society develops, language lawfully 
undergoes transformations. The essence of those 
changes in word-meanings and syntaical forms is 
punning. 

One communicates a new idea by resorting to 
ironical use of language. This irony is diated by the 
problematic fa that words and syntaical forms, 
the available medium of communication, have estab- 
lished customary significances (not a precisely- 
determined meaning, despite the efforts of the nomi- 
nalists to legislate through diionaries, but a range of 
associated tential meanings, each* alternative en- 
hanced or repressed according to context and form of 
usage). Hence, to go beyond calling forth one of those 
established tential significances, to express a con- 
ception that is genuinely new to the speaker or 
listenter, a new meaning  however subtle  must be 
added to the existing medium. This effort depends 
principally un the uses of irony (metaphor, simile, 
hyperbole, etc.) both respeing the usage of words 
and syntaical forms. 

This defines the need to have junked the radically- 
Aristotelian '*Latin"-classical approach to language 
studies, to free the mind of the stultification of 
thought-deadening grammatical canons and nomi- 
nalist-tending diionaries. This is seen by philologists 
in the fa that all elligent communication (ex- 
cepting ordinary uses of **Hello," *'How do you like the 
weather?" "Go to the store," and so forth), all elli- 
gent use of language depends un an ultimately law- 
ful approach to breaking established rules and 
customs of speech. 

The proto-philological thrust was in fa a charac- 
teristic of early and high Renaissance humanism. 
The case of Erasmus* work in transforming existing 
language-uses through the wean of Latin and Greek 
literature  and so forth  is merely exemary. All 
the great humanist writers, including Rabelais and 







Arabic-enriched Cervantes, are "notorious" for this 
predominant feature of their great writings. Shakes- 
peare and Milton are magnificent illustrations of the 
indispensable role of word and grammatical punning 
and related forms of irony in elligent commu- 
nication. Poetry is properly the most concentrated 
expression of this princie of elligent use of 
language. 

It is not accidental that English language etry 
died, beginning with romanticist-existentialist gen- 
eral death-agony, from about the middle of the last 
century. 

There are no great ets or musicians, as ets, or 
musicians per se. There are rather great elles 
who express this through their mastery of the media of 
etry and music. 

Philology as such developed in Germany sig- 
nificantly through the influence of the mystic Jakob 
Boehme, and was advanced o a deliberate disci- 
ine by the brothers Grimm, G.W.F. Hegel (perhaps 
history's greatest punner)y and others of the German- 
Scandinavian anthrological-philological school* 
Inevitably, because of its essential evolutionist con- 
tent, its rinsic emphasis un the humanist prin- 
cie of the Idea of Progress, philology attraed the 
adverse attention of the British empiricists, notably 
their Mill-Bentham-Webb '^utilitarianism,** Fabian 
faion. A countermeasure was launched, aimed at 
stamping out the influence of philology. This was 
notably, inclusively centered around the orbit of 
Fabian nests in old Vienna. 

Approximately , Fabian litical-elligence 
operative Karl Korsch abruptly abandoned his exi- 
citly litical aivities in Germany, and began a close 
collaboration with the circles of Rudolf Carnap, Kurt 
Lewin and others of that radical-nominalist per- 
suasion, concentrating on the subje of language. 
Dire collaboration among the Korsch, Lewin and 
other circles with Bertrand Russell in the United 
States effeed a concerted thrust in behalf of 
linguistics here. The Russell-Lewin-Carnap-Korsch 
aspe of this campaign is of exemary significance. 

Russell, otherwise an evil Fabian operative em- 
bracing wickedness of sometimes the most devious 
sort undertaken in several fields, exemified for the 
purses of the linguistics proje the thrust of 
mathematical logic. The wicked Lewin represented a 
leader in the field of sociopsychological reduionist 
methods we today properly term **brainwashing.*' 
Carnap and others were radical (nominalists) 



 

sitivists, who contributed the systematic founda- 
tions for the effort. Korsch was a proven master- 
manipulator of liberal and left strata. In  of fa 
linguistics is the central language aspe of neo- 
Fabian, "Utopian" techniques of social manipulation, 
brainwashing, and allied black arts today, and 
operates chiefly on the basis of an environment 
otherwise formed by Lewinite "small group" 
methods, using "mathematical logic" as the common 
ordering tool for coordinating such "multidis- 
ciinary" operations. 

Out of this came direly not only linguistics itself, 
the effort to destroy music entirely through such 
methods (e.g., Princeton's Babbitt), information 
theory, and programmed instruion. It is neither 
metaphor, hyperbole, nor simile to identify the entire 
unwholesome mess as exicitly fascist. One should 
also note a dire relationship to the way in which the 
computer-related methods of mass manipulation and 
pulation-information data-banks are developed and 
used today. 

The Frankfurt School extension of this same 
linguistics proje to such wartime. Office of War 
Information-related nastiness as the "Radio Research 
Proje," was crucial in extending this to the ranks of 
journalists. Neo-Fabian networks, erseing the 
journalism schools of our major universities, and 
coordinated through agencies associated in part with 
the Russell Sage Foundation, are the produion line 
for today's corrupt journalist liberal-to-radical shock 
troops. It is these Fabian journalists who do the detail- 
work in creating a coordinated atmosphere of lies and 
twisted fa  which has become recently such a 
monstrous feature of the role of certain leading 
pred and eleronic media in corrupting our institu- 
tions. These are notable instruments in disrupting the 
Constitutional processes of government by means of 
scenario-coordinated hoaxes, in which such des- 
picable "journalists" perform a key role. 

So, even such a purrtedly "alitical" domain of 
academic life as English language instruion (and 
language-instruion generally) is thus and in other 
ways permeated with the influence of the linguistics 
dorine. Linguistics, and such gimmicks as "speed- 
reading," cultivate the emphasis on an in-fa- 
schizophrenic approach to the use of language. By 
such ruses, the elligent use of language  its 
cognitive essentials  is either outlawed (in the most 
radical approaches) or merely tolerated. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The Macro Approach 



We turn to the state of the mathematical physi- 
cal sciences last in this series, because our rele- 
vant observations on that area lead us direly to for- 
mulating the principal  to be made for tracing the 
history of nominalist influences systematically, 

Neo-Fabian subversion is confronted with an in- 
soluble problem in the case of the physical sciences. 
Since experimentally linked methods tie dorine 
immediately to the impa of universally lawful 
processes, it is imssible to sustain basic scientific 
development of industrially emoyable technologies 
under the dire rule of the sweeping epistemological 
fraud feasible in the so-called "social sciences*' and 
"arts/* Here, granting purely hythetical extensions 
of **pure mathematics*' along lines of '^mathematical 
logic," and including the schizophrenic fantasy life of 
certain branches of **pure tology,** the Rockefellers 
have failed thus far in their dogged efforts to brain- 
wash the Creator. 

Although the nominal subjes of the corrupted 
**social sciences'* and **arts"  i.e., people  are also 
real, human beings are capable of being induced, 
under appropriate circumstances, to regulate their 
behavior according to the diates of a delusion. .Non- 
living processes, lacking the were of consciousness, 
are deprived of such advantages of mental aberration. 
Hence, people can be induced, within limits, to defy a 
lawfully self-erested ordering of their behavior in 
favor of a delusion-linked arbitrary set of artificial 
rules of behavior. This does not invalidate the violated 
real laws of the processes involved. Rather, 
depressions, wars, famines, biological catastrophes of 
extreme forms, assert the operation of the violated 
laws even to the remedy of the extinion of the 
violators. Within the range of tolerated absurdity so 
defined by law, absurdity can charaerize behavior 
to the extent required to make today's rampant 
delusions called university liberal arts ausible to 
their perpetrators and to a significant number of 
dupes. 

Mathematicians  pure mathematicians  under 
conditions of isolation from physics can be driven 



insane rather readily. Physicists, colleively, cannot 
 as long as they pursue the praice of physics as a 
scientific aivity oriented to lawfully-demonstrated 
workable results in the real universe. Hence the 
Copenhagen School, the Solvay Conference, and 
similar ironical phenomena. Niels Bohr could be a thug 
against Erwin Schrodinger and others, but to the 
extent he was a physicist, he had to be a praicing 
physicist. Hence, on the one side, Bohr served his 
financial backers as a credible skesman in the ef- 
fort to halt the progress of basic science at its most 
crucial . However, within the bounds which thug- 
Bohr and his associates helped to imse un general 
scientific progress, physicist-Bohr, working within 
such bounds, had to remain in large the physicist he 
remained  if in morally reduced degree. 

For such delimiting reasons, the roduion of 
nominalist ideology to the domain of the physical 
sciences involves the halting of scientific progress in 
some direion, and the reification of the pretext for 
that halting o the form of a ''sitive" dorine of 
the nominalist form. Nominalism can funion within 
the house of praiced physical science only as a 
statement concerning those aspes of the universe 
o which the rigorous aivity of basic scientific 
work has been prohibited. 

The "indeterminacy dorine** associated with 
Werner Heisenberg exemifies this. Epistem- 
ologically, Heisenberg's autobiographical allusion to 
the elleual influence of Fries is relevant. 

Fries, whom Hegel honors with extreme generosity 
by giving Fries one-half of a short sentence within his 
three-volume History of Philosophy, was among those 
collateral professional frauds who set themselves up 
as exicators and correors of Kant. These were 
persons justly held in obscurity beside such more 
notable Kantian epigonoi as Fichte, Herbart, and 
beside even retailers of the diluted varieties of Kant- 
ianism which trickled o early-nineteenth century 
Concord, Massachusetts. Fries, who would not be 
notable at all, if part-time pro-fascist aivists of - 
 such as Heisenberg had not picked him out of his 



 







well-deserved obscurity, is regrettably notable as one 
of the many **angle-triseors'' who sought to 
"comete" the Kantian system by shysters* tricks, 
purrting to show that within the stretched- 
Aristotelian Kantian system they had found a clever 
way to reify the gap between the phenomenon and 
thing-in-itself o a causal princie. In this way, they 
claimed to themselves the miracle of having known 
the unknowable. 

This shyster's trick is epistemologically identical 
with the content of the Heisenberg ''indeterminacy 
princie/* A mere praical difficulty (albeit a large 
one) of then-existing approaches to experimental 
physics, was reified o a permanently sitive 
existence. Rather than leaving the matter to the 
discovery of a cometely fresh approach to ex- 
perimental access  as high-energy-domain coherent 
ion-beams suggest today  Heisenberg's ^'princie" 
professed to reduce to ridicule (and an aborting of 
funding and other means to praice science) anyone 
who dared to prose to cross that borderline. 

That is a classic case of the way in which radical 
nominalism (e.g., sitivism) is roduced within the 
house of physical science. Close off an avenue of vital 
experimental work, and arbitrarily roduce an 
ideology to defend that baer, imsing nominalist 
ideology direly on the corpus of science for this 
purse. 

The further provocative feature of pseudo-Kantian 
Heisenberg's trick is that already Immanuel Kant had 
defined the problem in a way which proved, at least, 
the idiocy of Heisenberg's methodological argument. 

The classical problem of micro-physics, in par- 
ticular, is a dire and obvious carry-over of the 
Aristotelian method o these investigations. Seen, 
and properly so, in that aspe, the conneion be- 
tween this feature of physics and the problem key to 
the rise of nominalism in ruling institutions is most 

usefully situated. 

The continuing central crisis of physics  and liti- 
cal theory has been the paradoxical notion of the 
particle-field relationship. First, the case for physics. 

This is not a difficulty which cropped up for physics 
only in conneion with the work of Maxwell during the 
nineteenth century. Isaac Newton was exicit in 
emphasizing the epistemological-physical absurdity 
of the problem he roduced as the heuristic ruse of 
"aion-at-a-distance." At the time Newton resorted 
to that ruse, in the effort to articulate the evidence in 
terms of the Aristotelian-Euclidean system y the 
physical reality of the field-particle problem had been 
firmly established by the work of William Gilbert, 
Johannes Keer and others. Later, Maxwell himself 
exicitly referred to the prevailing conceptions of 
physical science as so-called physical science, em- 
phasizing the epistemological problem of the method 



 

of abstraing the "ernal relations" of an isolated 
aspe of the overall process for analysis. 

This is emphatically not to suggest that the crisis in 
science might have been avoided if, perhaps, two 
apes had dropped on Isaac Newton's head at a 
certain moment. Newton himself did the right thing 
under the circumstances. It was those damnable 
Newtonians, Newton's empiricist epigonoi, who more 
or less suppressed Newton's own warning concerning 
the inherent flaws of his system, who are chiefly to be 
blamed for the problems allegedly contributed by the 
persisting authority of Newtonian-Lagrangian 
physics. 

There are two immediately relevant aspes to 
Newton's epistemological problem. First, the 
Aristotelian-Euclidean system of representation 
(linear determinism) was the only formal approach 
culturally available at that time. Secondly, the at- 
tempt to supersede this linearized formalism through 
experimental physics approaches is categorically 
delimited by princie to experimental work mediated 
through breakthroughs respeing the ("in- 
finitesimal") microphysical and ("infinite") 
astronomical scale of physical phenomena. Granted, 
the epistemological solution to that class of conceptual 
problem existed empirically at that time, but only 
with respe to the measurable consequences of 
human creative syntheses on the thermodynamical 
transformations of entire economies, not for biology 
otherwise, and not for the praice or theory of physics 
qua physics. 

Now that we have taken Isaac Newton himself off 
the hook in this matter, we can, in good conscience, 
develop the approach we require to the problem of 
nominalism, by turning the observation just made in 
defense of Newton about one-hundred-eighty degrees. 

In physical science, it is man who condus experi- 
mental investigations. Not abstra man, but men and 
women who, as experimenters, are also culturally 
representative of particular societies. This is to em- 
phasize that a "purely objeive knowledge" of 
physical processes, a knowledge independent of the 
subjeivity of human knoweres and experimenters, is 
an absurdity. This does not mean, as shallow elles 
might obje, that science is therefore capable only of 
subjeive guesses concerning universal laws. The 
empiricists and other varieties of nominalists who 
insist on holding to such objeions merely demon- 
strate that they have missed the whole  con- 
cerning science itself. 

The human race was engaged in technological pro- 
gress long, long before Thales. Under those relatively 
primitive, lowere forms of social life which represent 
the course of human progress prior to the Ionian 
period, technological progress happened because 
people are human, and thus create new knowledge 







 

which is extended to praice. The fa that such in- 
novations represent new knowledge was undoubtedly 
known in that sense to more primitive cultures  not 
to confuse genuinely primitive cultures in the line of 
social evolution with those nooks and crannies of 
nineteenth and twentieth century anthrology which 
mistook degenerated forms of societies for modern 
exames of primitive ones. We stress that until the 
period of about the seventh through fifth centuries 
B.C., science did not exist as science. Granted, we can 
look back un the development of abstra forms of 
technical knowledge among earlier Egyptian and 
Mesotamian cultures, and call such artifas 
elements of scientific progress ; we are entitled to do 
so only if we recognize that it is our modern analysis of 
those artifas which brings them within the body of 
our science. 

Science, as the case of the Ionian philosophers un- 
derlines, is a consciousness of science as a princied, 
lawfully ordered form of creative aivity, direed to 
effeing technological advances in specific aspes of 
knowledge as by-produs of a principal effort 
direed toward discovering the fundamental ordering 
princies of man's universe. Not the universe without 
man, but the universe in which man*s lawful mastery 
of its domain is the  of reference for determining 
the notion of order. If we can scientifically look back to 
pre-human, pre-biological eras of earth and the 
galaxies, that is ssible only on the presumption of 
the coherence and continuity of past existence with 
man's present ervention in the same universe 
today. 

Science is therefore essentially neo-atonic 
humanist epistemology. Science is a matter of 
discovering the ordering princies generating the 
succession of creative human discovery of the laws of 
the universe in general. 

Science is indeed concerned in particular with the 
appropriateness of a formulation as a prediion or at 
least a forecast of experimental behavior of some 
aspe of its work. It is also indeed concerned to 
establish consistency among such formulations, to the 
effe that the entirety of domains of overlapping 
experimental subjes provides for consistent predic- 
tions and forecasts. Those are included aivities of 
scientific work, but they are not science. 

No number of isolated experiments as such could 
prove a single princie of scientific knowledge. 
Science is not the abstraion of praical experience 
in any such sense of *'common law*' aggregates of 
localized behavior. The essential feature of all 
scientific work is the rigorous formulation of hy- 
thesesy most notably those hytheses we associate 
with so-called crucial experiments. It is the disciin- 
ing of the scientific mind to ave at the sing of such 
crucial-experimental hytheses, with a forecastable, 



direed sitive advance of scientific knowledge as a 
result of either sitive or negative experimental 
results, which is the core of science, which is epis- 
temology. 

Every scientist knows  but most laymen do not  
that it is a rigorously demonstrated princie that no 
amount of statistical knowledge gained from ordinary 
experiments can, in itself, disprove or prove a single 
hythesis. Any person who imagines that science is 
statistical-experimental method is, relative to the 
professional praice of science, a raving imbecile. 

This does not mean that highly significant statistical 
results of a properly defined experiment or observa- 
tion do not have authority for science. They do, but 
that authority is situated outside any cocktail-hour 
dorine of "science is statistics." The authority is 
embedded mediately in the theory of experiments 
itself. The governing princie of all the useful and 
authoritative features of the theory of experiments is 
that these restriions concerning the design of experi- 
ments and observations are a dire refleion of es- 
tablished fundamental princies of science. We tend 
to accept significant experimental results on condition 
that the experiment has been **struured"to conform 
to standards of coherence and consistency with **back- 
ground" laws of the universe. 

The  emphasized is that science-in-general is 
not a summation or other sort of abstraion of some 
common features adduced on the authority of a brick- 
laying architeure, based in isolated experimental 
findings concerning local evidence. Exaly the 
reverse. An experiment is not better than the appro- 
priateness to the aual laws of the universe  as 
universal laws  of the conceptions which govern the 
design of the experiment. 

If aggregations of local experiments cannot ssibly 
add up to science, where do we obtain the empirical 
evidence on which to base the notion of science? This, 
as we shall show, exains the reason the particle-field 
paradox of science exists, and why that same fa is 
crucially symptomatic of the lawful processes govern- 
ing the historical process of development of the 

nominalist form of core ideology. 
The question we have just sed concerning science 

is imicitly answered by stating that Keer, not 
Galileo, is the **father" of modern physical science. 

The significance of Keer*s approach  without 
which the useful physics work of Galileo would have 
proven nothing for science  is that Keer based his 
empirical-theoretical investigations on a crucial- 
experimental study of a relatively-universal subje 
matter, the lawful ordering of man's observations of 
the relationships among the known bodies of the solar 
system. Without Keer, Galileo's physics work could 
not have contributed anything notably meaningful to 
the main body of science. By proving the universality 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



of an ordering princie within that aspe of man's 
study of the solar system, Keer established the basis 
on which Newton and others, by direly inverting 
Keer's (and other) princies o the corresnding 
form of Newton's princies, could incorrate other- 
wise inconclusive findings of a Galileo to produce the 
hythesis, based on Keer's universal princies, 
through which Galileo's useful work could be re- 
examined in terms of experimental hytheses ap- 
proximating a crucial experiment. 

The case of Keer is heuristically ermediate 
between the matter of the localized experiment and 
the more fundamental problem it symbolizes. 

The proof and empirical source of the authority of 
science is that the progress of a society, effeed 
through a relatively deliberate ordering of its pro- 
duive and related technologies, effes the basis for 
an increase in the pulation at a higher per capita 
standard of gross output, and moreover establishes 
the preconditions for an acceleration of the further 
rate of such advances. It is the embodiment of the 
universality of a mode of technological and related 
advances, in the relative universality represented by 
that society's mastery of nature, which is funda- 
mental. What is crucially proven is not that the exist- 
ing mode of produion and correlated praices are 
sound  that may also be proven, but that is not the 
vital . What is proven is that the charaeristic 
way in which the society, overall, orders increases in 
its thermodynamic mastery of nature is effeive, and 
that therefore the way in which new knowledge is 
being ordered is in corresndence with the lawful 
ordering of the material processes the society is 
mastering. 

That is the only proper imication of the truism that 
the fundamental proof of human knowledge is the con- 
tinued existence of man. 

The development of science in the specific form it 
erupted from neo-atonic high Renaissance human- 
ism, during the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries, and 
the fa that it was a produ of neo-atonic 
humanism and its radiations, is a matter of the con- 
ditions under which precisely those humanists located 
the creative process of mind as direly embodying 
the primary ordering-princie in human existence 
and progress. They thus created the conditions under 
which Aristotelians and others contributed to scien- 
tific knowledge, but science is nonetheless entirely a 
creation of neo-atonic humanism. Science is the 
deliberate epistemological mastery of the ordering 
princies charaeristic of the synthesis of those 
hytheses^ notably crucial hytheses, which, ex- 
tended appropriately to experimental form, generate 
an overall accelerating progress in a society's 
knowledgeable, deliberate mastery of the universe 
and its included processes. 



 

It is hythesis, not experiment which is the 
essence of science. The content of science is not that 
experiments succeed in producing useful results. The 
content is the successive ordering of hytheses and 
corresnding experiments  essentially the 
universal-empirical ordering of hytheses  to the 
effe that the progress of scientific knowledge has a 
sitively direed quality toward increasing society's 
produive and related weres over nature. 

The Aristotelian or nominalist, because he is fac- 
tionally and epistemologically anti-humanist on this 
, cannot acknowledge that essential feature of 
science, because to do so would be to overthrow the 
most fundamental, charaeristic axioms of his 
adopted outlook and method. Hence, to the extent an 
Aristotelian or nominalist may be in fa a useful 
scientist, he is epistemologically a bastard  he 
exists, but without acknowledged parentage. 

The historical princie most emphatically to be 
adduced from these considerations is that the only 
authority for empirical knowledge existing in any 
society is delimited to those alternative charaeristic 
forms of the allonian, promethean and dionysian 
outlook specific to the society in whose context the 
empirical investigation is made. 

This restriion is most fundamentally defined in 
terms of the charaeristic ordering of social praice 
within that society (its geometry), and further 
delimited in particular, subsumed respes by the 
kinds of experimental praice accessible to the forms 
of technology existing and coming o existence in 
that society. All human knowledge, just as the special 
case of science refles necessarily the most funda- 
mental and broadly apicable ordering princies of 
all human thought, is historically specific to the 
universalizing circumstances (geometry) under 
which it comes o being. 

One cannot, as a hythetical gifted individual, leap 
out of one's society, and "scientifically" study the 
universe deus ex machina. 

Although this historical restriion delimits the 
quality of human knowledge in any society relative to 
other societies, the charaeristic world outlook of any 
successfully developing form of society is an adequate 
basis for real, universal knowledge in terms of the 
kinds of knowledge appropriate to that society. 

If we, today, can appear to leap above that 
restriion relative to preceding societies, that is be- 
cause of those circumstances of modern development 
which enable us to make the kind of approach to prob- 
lems of knowledge and society we represent here. 
Because of the development of industrial capitalism, 
with the included, egral lawful feature of a con- 
scious ordering of advancing technology, and because 
of the breakthroughs which biology and physical 
science have made toward achieving a coherent body 







 

of hylozoic scientific knowledge, we today can adduce 
the causal princie we set forth earlier in this seion, 
that is, the notion of a permanent princie of negen- 
tropic causality generating both the events within two 
successive geometries and the development of a 
successor geometry out of aions originating in the 
former. 

The paradox of the Bardi and Peruzzi  the Italian 
bankers who, as the Rockefellers and Fuggers of yore, 
most direly caused the genocidal Black Death of the 
mid-fourteenth century  is exemary of the imi- 
cations of the particle-field paradox within social 
processes as such. It is the same particle-field para- 
dox we confront in physics: the two analogous pat- 
terns have a common origin in the geometry of the 
societies which create both such paradoxes. 

The lewd irony of the Bardi and Peruzzi is that their 
emergence was a refleion of the development of 
proto-capitalist conditions within feudal Europe, 
during the great feudal breakdown-crisis pularly 
known as the Crusades. Those Italian bankers, ex- 
pressing the proto-capitalist shift toward alienable 
property forms linked to embryonic growth of tech- 
nological progress in urban centers, were the most 
wereful accomices of the anti-capitalist faion. 
The subsequent cases of the Fuggers, of the Amster- 
dam bankers from the middle of the seventeenth 
century, of the British East India Company, the 
Barings, the Rothschilds, and the Rockefellers, all 
express the persistence of the same princie of 
degeneracy expressed by the Bardi-Peruzzi case. 

The classical name for this specific degeneracy is 
heteronomy. The same heteronomy, which is 
systematically defined as the essential feature of evil 
in rigorous Aristotelian argument, and defined to the 
same categorical effe by neo-atonic humanism, is 
the charaeristic, axiomatic premise of nominalism, 
and the axiomatic premise of monetarist praice and 
dorine. Hence, epistemologically, what both 
Christian currents of humanism define as evil, 
nominalism, and monetarism are respeively only 
different facets of the same degeneracy. 

There are three now classical attacks on the 
problem of heteronomy in modern thought. The first 
convincing attempt at a coherent analysis of the 
problem was accomished in the Netherlands: 
Benedi Spinoza, notably in his Ethics, and the great 
humanist paer, Rembrandt, by showing the face of 
evil in his ^'Syndics of the Cloth Guild," The second is 
the systematic analysis of heteronomy from a 
stretched Aristotelian stand by Immanuel Kant, 
most notably in the concluding seion of his Critique 
of Praical Reason, The third, resolving the ap- 
proaches contributed by both Spinoza and Kant, is the 
rigorous notion of alienation as anually developed 
successively by G.W.F. Hegel and Karl Marx, 



It is to be emphasized that Hegel's and Marx's 
rigorous conception of alienation has no cognitive 
conneions to the uses of that term by Frankfurt 
School and other Fabian and neo-Fabian corrupters of 
its usage. 

Since Kant situates the problem within the stretched 
framework of Aristotelian geometries, it is his term 
and his analysis which afford the preferred  of 
departure for an historical analysis of the problem. 
Hence, Kant's notion of heteronomy is the  of 
reference we have roduced here. 

The Cartesian humanist, Spinoza, located the 
problem of heteronomy in respe to what he termed 
^'fiitious knowledge." The significance Spinoza gave 
to the formal aspe of the problem is that localized 
knowledge is inherently wrong; and also that the at- 
tempt to bring thought o agreement with ordering 
princies governing such localized misapprehension 
of reality forms the lawful basis for generating evil, 
behavior contrary to the prescriptions immanent in a 
universal, lawful ordering. Because Spinoza's method 
was hylozoic, his notion of ''fiitious knowledge" also 
meant an insight o a lawful generation of a con- 
tinuum of "fiitious" or evil praice in the suc- 
cession of human affairs. 

The crucial formal defe in Spinoza's effort to 
advance neo-atonic humanism was that he at- 
tempted to resolve the problem in terms of reference 
of an Aristotelian-Euclidean epistemology. His causal 
princie was not Aristotelian-Euclidean, but he at- 
tempted to use his princie to make a revolution with- 
in the stretched formal premises of the Aristotelian 
system. Hence, the formal result was a linearized 
attempt to represent a model for the kind of negen- 
tropic continuum which he demanded. 

That was not an idiosyncrasy of Spinoza's. The 
Erasmian Thomas More exhibits the identical 
problem in the conceptual ordering of his Utopia, Any 
effort which adopts the notion of an Aristotelian-like a 
priori ordering of the preordained formal lawful 
framework of ordering, as Ficino typifies such neo- 
atonic humanists' errors in his Five Questions, must 
lead to a Utopian ethical method of the type best exem- 
ified by Ficino, More, and Spinoza. The proper 
judgment of this problem does not lead to discarding 
of Ficino, More, Spinoza, et al,, but to adducing the 
generative princie ordering their creative thought, 
by examining the imications of their efforts under 
the condition that the crucial, Aristotelian restriion 
on the formal representation of their hytheses is 
removed. 

That is by no allowable view merely a problem of 
humanist philosophers. It is also the approach 
uniquely demanded for understanding the pre- 
Tudor Renaissance and the charaer of the founding 
American institutions associated with the Declaration 







of Independence and Constitution. In each case, with 
respe to a self-consciousness of the necessity and 
form of the generative licy outlook and method they 
represented, the authors of the Tudor and American 
revolutions were charaeristically neo-atonic 
humanists, and self-consciously so regarding those 
features of the humanist outlook we have defined as 
crucial. However, in the course of the effort to trans- 
late these self-conscious impulses of outlook and 
method o the formal specifications of institutions, 
they were confronted with the obstacle of a culturally 
determined, caed-forward Aristotelian dorine. 

This epistemological contradiion within the fram- 
ing of, for exame, our Constitution, does not warrant 
the outrageously fraudulent conclusion that the Con- 
stitution is therefore so ambiguous respeing outlook 
and method that the question of the cited ent can be 
relegated to mere mootness. On the contrary, the 
founding fathers exicitly precluded such outrages 
with such key phrases as '*In order that ... to in 
every aspe of their definition of the controlling 
purse which must govern the apication of each 
formally specified feature. The essential feature of the 
frauds perpetrated by such Fabian and neo-Fabian 
revisionists as Thurman Arnold and William A. 
Williams is to demand a comprehensive discounting of 
just such crucial Constitutional specifications of out- 
look, method and empirical criteria of appropriate- 
ness. 

It is relevant to proof of our principal  to er- 
late here an observation of the refleion of this 
same problem in the philosophy of constitutional and 
subsumed law. Constitutional law, whether literally 
so or otherwise, is merely the institutionalized 
expression of the praical impulse of a governing 
epistemological outlook, and is itself an egral 
feature of the charaeristic geometry of societies. 
The notion of Law as a subje unto itself is isonous 
nonsense  as the methodology of nominalist evolu- 
tion of law under Weimar led direly and consistently 
o the irrationalist nightmare of Nazi judicial and 
related praices. 

Accordingly, it is an included charaeristic fraud of 
the Aristotelian scholastic dorinaires that they at- 
tempt in the main to define an ernally consistent 
continuity of evolution of law from Roman through 
feudal through medieval o modern law. Similarly, 
the preparatory background for empirical arguments 
in behalf of revisionist subversion of our Constitution 
is the attempt to similarly fuse English Common Law 
o the corpus of U.S. law. The outrageous fraud 
embedded in any such fallacy of comsition in legal 
dorine and praice, is that the successive bodies of 
law which they so recklessly rtray as the process of 
praical perfeion of a supra-historical spirit of 
purely abstra law, represent successive societies 



 

which are separated from one another by sweeping 
revolutions respeing precisely the most funda- 
mental ordering princies of constitutional and 
subsumed law. 

Roman and feudal law have fundamentally different 
generative axiomatic premises in the law as a whole. 
The thirteenth century Edwardian reforms represent 
a breaking , separating the generative princies 
of preceding feudal from those of subsequent 
medieval law. Tudor law represents, similarly, an 
axiomatic break with the most essential features of 
pre-Tudor law. Although the generative law em- 
bedded in the American Revolution is most 
significantly rooted in Tudor and Commonwealth 
legal revolutions before it, the reason for the 
American revolution was that the st- degenera- 
tion of English law in its axiomatic features had pro- 
duced an irreconcilable separation between the funda- 
mental generative conceptions of law between the 
separating litical bodies. 

There is of course a different sort of genuine con- 
tinuity in law than is recklessly prosed by radical 
scholastics and revisionists. The most efficient 
method of accounting for this is provided by our 
conception of the causality bridging successive geo- 
metries. A revolution in respe of the '^axiomatic" or 
charaeristic ordering princies of social praice 
does not abruptly dissolve the old world and create an- 
other de novo. It rather seizes un the salvageable 
and useful institutions of the old order as it, in a 
parallel, if epistemologically dissimilar fashion, 
appropriates the material domain it has inherited 
from the old. 

Karl Marx's classical analysis of this fa respe- 
ing his professional background as German door of 
law is his treatment of the effes of the transforma- 
tion from feudal to capitalist law on estates which 
continued a feudal form of local relationships within 
the context of a capitalist ordering of law. The ro- 
duion of the princie of alienable property, pro- 
hibited in that form by feudal law, broke asunder the 
rights of the serf with respe to the obligations of the 
lord, and transformed both the praical and legal 
relationship of the estate itself to the society as a 
whole. During the process from the early medieval 
roduion of the proto-capitalist princie of 
alienable property forms, to the recent obliteration of 
all notable feudal relics but the transformed vestige of 
**rent," at each  feudal vestiges of law have 
existed in statute and custom, but the constitutional 
princie governing the settlement of conflis be- 
tween capitalist and feudal erests has determined 
the capitalist erest (predominantly) as the ordering 
princie governing the evolution of the law in general. 

Under feudal law, the governances of the relations 
of produion and persons were comementary, and 







 

essentially concentrated, within the relative autarky 
of the estate. The estate was bound to regularly 
deliver a fixed rtion of its produ as detailed to the 
overlord, and to supy from the estate's surus pro- 
duion military and other services. With the ro- 
duion of lawful usury, and an increased demand of 
the estates for commodities produced outside the 
estate, notably for military technology, and the in- 
creased dependence un permanent bodies of hired 
armed men, the maenance of the estates depended 
increasingly un funding enterprises through debts 
to bankers. Although this had been endemic under 
feudalism, including Charlemagne's institutionalized 
use of the Jews for this funion, the process of ex- 
pulsion of the privileged Jewish usurers in behalf of 
the Lombard bankers charaerizes the breaking 
 at which the egrity of feudal law was qualita- 
tively overthown. The dependency un financing 
of feudal debts to Lombard bankers and similar 
finances, transformed the ordering princie of the 
economy of the feudal estate from a fixed system of 
the feudal type o an estate governed by the prin- 
cie of profit, profit in the disguise of (principally) 
military enterprises and the debt service obligations 
aced un the estate by such praices. 

This was the general circumstance in which the 
heteronomic phenomenon of the Bardi and Peruzzi 
occurred. 

Restriing our view of feudalism to those 
charaeristic features which are generative both 
with respe to its breakdown-crisis and the con- 
trasting circumstances of capitalist development, the 
significant s are summarily these. The feudal 
social surus produ was charaeristically em- 
bodied in the role of a surus pulation of estates in 
military and associated enterprises establishing new 
estates. 

This was not a tentiality of the feudal system, but 
its driving charaeristic. The technology of feudal 
produion essential to maaining that system, to 
maaining feudal estates, was a mode of produion 
which produced and required a charaeristic surus 
produ for its continuance even on a relatively fixed 
scale. This surus produ was embodied signifi- 
cantly in an enlarged feudal pulation. 

Economically, an eighth century "Club of Rome** 
would have prescribed, the way to avoid growth of the 
feudal system would have been to keep the feudal 
pulation at a fixed level by eating up the surus 
rtion as meat. The feudal system was not only an 
economic system, but a form of human society  
which could not tolerate such inhuman praices or 
their equivalent within Christendom without first pro- 
scribing the viim as a heretic or other * 'felonious" 
lawbreaker. 



The fixed range of rates of technological advance- 
ment allowed within feudalism, combined with the 
relatively finite external and ernal boundaries for 
expansion of the European feudal system represented 
historical boundaries which, when closely ap- 
proached, inevitably precipitated a breakdown of 
feudal society itself. The Crusades were the form of 
this breakdown. Although the puerile, romantic litera- 
ture and aneotes covering that period emphasize 
the Palestine Question, the Crusades, as an institution, 
represented the degeneration of the feudal process of 
expansion o an orgy of economic cannibalism and 
autocannibalism. 

The Albigensian Crusade, not trips toward 
Jerusalem, is the proper prototype for the Crusades as 
a whole. 

The growing new source of wealth during that 
period was the **proto-capitalist" urban development 
associated with the Hohenstaufen licy of such deli- 
berate development in various parts of the Holy 
Roman Empire, including parts of present-day 
Germany as notable exames of this building of ur- 
ban centers. This Hohenstaufen licy's confli with 
the old feudal order  made famous by the setback to 
human progress compaed at Canossa  was the 
basis for the emergence of those margins of new kinds 
of wealth on which creatures such as the Bardi and 
Peruzzi founded the beginnings of their financial 
were. 

Through the emergence of small but marginally 
decisive commerce around the developing urban 
centers of Europe, Europe-wide banking emerged 
through a symbiotic relationship to the papal treasury 
and the colleion of papal revenues (Peter's Pence) 
from all regions of Europe. The small margin of ac- 
tual capital advanced to the indebted feudal nobility 
for their monstrously usurious and more usuriously 
refinanced debts, focused un the produs of the 
urban center's trade and produion. Hence, the issue 
of credit by an Italian banker to a tentate in some 
distant locality of Europe took the form of credit 
against means of payment required in large part for 
delivery to relatively local urban centers. Excepting 
the refinancing of old debts  which was essentially 
the same fiitious swindle then as the Eurodollar 
market is today  this arrangement provided the 
basis on which pieces of paper coordinated by the 
Bardi could control the flow of critical margins of 
wealth throughout most of Europe. 

With its profitable association with the papal 
treasury, the charaer of the Bardi shifted from an 
original basis in produive aspes of proto-capitalist 
produion and trade, o a basis in the extraion of 
the surus  and much of the basic capital  of 
feudal estates. The more this debt system ate o both 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



surus and the basic **capitar' of feudal estates, the 
more savage became the cannibalistic crusading 
against one's neighbors. 

In consequence, much of the feudal nobility were 
turned o raving Friedmanites. To increase the 
profitability of the estates, holidays were slashed, 
ratios of work on the serf's ot were reduced in favor 
of work on the lord's ots, while the exaions from 
the serf's ot were increased. This labor-ensive 
driving-down of the biological and cultural conditions 
of life of the serf was comemented by a phenomenon 
modally unlawful to feudalism  unemoyment!" A 
growing ratio of the serf and other peasant pula- 
tions was driven o vagabondage. The attempt to re- 
finance old debts still further, the increased impulse 
for feudal cannibalism, produced the preconditions for 
the Black Death. 

The mode of feudal produion charaeristically 
involved a significant, determining margin of social 
surus. However, the primitiveness of the agri- 
cultural mode and the fragmentation of the feudal 
society economically o estates meant that ebbs and 
flows in the conditions of agricultural produion led to 
famines, which occurred periodically over much of 
feudalism, and local famines erupted frequently 
under conditions in which suruses existed in 
reasonably adjoining regions. The overall driving 
down of the biological and cultural conditions of life of 
the serfs and other peasants, the growth of vaga- 
bondage, and the ensified looting of the basic 
''capital" of the estates, produced a condition of 
breakdown in the system at many s. This break- 
down is analogous to what erupted later in the jac- 
queries, peasant wars and so forth during the period 
from approximately - under conditions 

produced predominantly by the Bardi's most notable 
successor bankers, the Fuggers. Under such 
biological and economic conditions combined, one 
additional blow to a litical-economic system (to 
apy the term in an inclusively retroaive fashion) 
suffices to set off a general biological catastrophe. The 
Black Death was the principal feature of just such a 
general biological catastrophe. 

This process of crisis-linked degeneration of the 
feudal order represented in praice the most ugly and 
profound violation of the Christian ordering of a 
universal feudal law. Every human right, every 
established vital erest prescribed by law was 
successively violated and then made a dead letter or 
repudiated in the effort to save the system of feudal 
estates under conditions of maaining debt obliga- 
tions to the Lombard bankers. 

This overthrown system of Christian universal law, 
the law which Thomas Aquinas (principally) made 
rational (conscious) at the  the breakdown was 



 

already in progress, was in fa in corresndence 
with the universal erest of humanity under feudal- 
ism. Feudalism lacked a consciousness of the causal 
princies which determined that to be the case, but in 
the form of feudal Christendom, it attempted to define 
those norms of general (lawful) praice and in- 
dividual condu and method of willful praice which 
coincided empirically with the universal self-erest 
of the society and its individual members  under the 
constitutional princie embedded in such notions as 
Charlemagne's inventory of the realm. 

The deliberate violation of such princies of uni- 
versal law, the denial of the properly efficient 
authority of universal law, was and is nominalism. 
That is the essence of the issue between Thomas 
Aquinas and the regrettable William of Ockham. 

The form of the breakdown in respe to universal 
law was that the feudal lords, the papal treasury, and 
the Bardi and Peruzzi defined their apparent short- 
term special erests as the primary erest of 
society. Wherever that perception of special primary 
self-erest conflied with a contrary princie of 
universal self-erest, universal law, they denied and 
crushed that aspe of the law. This is the essence of 
heteronomy. 

By extending that empirical observation from the 
exemary case of the Bardi and papal treasury to the 
isolated individual in the most obvious way, the 
generality of the problem of heteronomy is properly 
sed in the terms Kant considered it. The individual, 
governed by a narrow, ''fiitious" misperception of 
immediate self-erest, sets himself o opsition to 
the general (universal) erest. Behaving in such a 
"rugged individualistic" way  as recommended by 
Atlanticists from Theodore Roosevelt onwards  he 
inevitably not only defies but subverts the general 
erest, with ultimately disastrous real consequences 
even in respe to his misperceived "fiitious" self- 
erest. 

From this consideration it ought to be amy clear 
that the problem of heteronomy embodies the crucial 
problem of law in general. 

Leading institutions, seminal elleual in- 
fluences, can perceive and define the licies which, 
in turn, define the vital self-erests of a society. 
Thomas Aquinas attempted to do so, if in fa 
retrospeively, for feudal society. Benjamin Franklin 
sitively nurtured the emergence of the association 
of the men who comsed our nation's Declaration of 
Independence and Constitution. Such perceptions and 
licies, on condition that they are appropriate to 
what natural law prescribes for that form of society, 
represent the basis for the primary funion of law: to 
inform the willful impulses for praice of the society 
and its individual members, concerning those 







 

outlooks, methods and aions which corresnd to the 
erest of the society. 

More must be done, because of heteronomy. Those 
heteronomic impulses of individuals contrary in effe 
to vital erests must be prevented from significantly 
damaging that general erest. These problems must 
be categorically defined, to the effe of informing 
willful impulses against such individual or *'special- 
erest group" aions. Where such informing by 
itself fails to prevent heteronomic violation of 
essential licies, the heteronomic aion itself must 
be efficiently checked. Where heteronomic aion has 
damaged the general erest, society must a to 
prevent consequent damage through the already- 
triggered consequences of such aion (not to 
"repair" the past). 

Once the problem of heteronomy is defined as we 
have outlined it above, such a description of the tasks 
of law is almost a deduive truism. The problem left 
unsolved by the mere description is that the 
description, if taken by itself, tends to leave the door 
open to * 'social contra" perversions of the notion of 
general erest. 

Historically, for the case of the founding of our 
republic, it might be imagined that the tentiality of 
perversion was left open, if only in a formal sense, by 
the ambiguous significance of John Locke*s literary 
influence. Locke, from a different stand than the 
radical Hobbes, represented for eighteenth century, 
English-speaking culture the classic reference on the 
problem of heteronomy. From their reading and 
discussion of Locke, our eighteenth century founding 
fathers had two. opsite ways to proceed in taking 
Locke's perception of heteronomy o account. They 
could proceed as they did; they defined the general 
erest from a neo-atonic humanist stand, and 
treated heteronomy as a subsumed problem within 
law. Alternately, they might have  as they did not  
started from the basis of Locke's treatment of the 
problem of heteronomy toward a '*social contra" 
notion of constitutional government. 

We have demonstrated that the stand of the 
founding fathers, and of the majority of the pulation 
which suprted them, was derived from that of the 
Tudor Renaissance: technological progress in respe 
to both produion and pular education. We have 
shown that this central, generative princie of our 
republic, the princie for which we fought a 
revolution against Great Britain, was rigorously 
related to corresnding conscious conceptions of 
natural law. The generative princie of the Con- 
stitution and our republic was the recognition that the 
neo-atonic humanist perception of man's nature and 
his necessary relationship to the lawful ordering of 



universal natural processes were in lawful agree- 
ment. The fulfillment of that princie by our nation 
as a whole was therefore recognized to be the es- 
sence of our nation's universal self-erest, and the 
basis for determining the proper concepts of and 
fulfillment of the proper erests of the individual 
citizen. 

Our Constitution does not have a social-contra or 
''uralist'' approach to constitutional law. The 
argument that our nation is a constitutionally 
* 'uralist society" is nothing but outright fraud and 
swindle. 

As Justice Holmes observed to his corresndent 
Laski, the eccentricity called '^uralism" was at 
that time (correly) attributed to the pragmatist 
William James. Holmes emphasized that (even from 
his own relatively great distance from the con- 
stitutional outlook and method of the founding fathers) 
he couldn't swallow the novelty of James's 
"uralism" dorine. 

The deeper notion behind James's eccentric doc- 
trine of "uralism" was not of course over- 
whelmingly original to James. James's was a new 
effort to re-disguise and to smuggle in the same 
shopworn, rabid-Tory underlying dorine which 
charaerized the administration of Andrew Jackson. 

The early broad social basis for Jacksonism, as 
Nancy Spannaus emphasizes in her roduion to 
The Political Economy of the American Revolution, 
the weakest large social base of the American 
Revolution, was the farmer situation. Excluding those 
mercantile and financial erests which were 
outright Tory pro-monetarists, the marginal farmer 
was the chief ernal litical (heteronomic) problem 
of our eleorate itself for as long as our eleorate 
was predominantly rural. Later, this changed. As 
American agriculture progressed, the technologically 
advanced farmer producing for market developed an 
individualized outlook approximating that of the small 
industrialist. It was the more primitive farmer, 
eking out an asocially "independent" existence 
scratching at the dirt, the meanness of his cir- 
cumstances dominating his social outlook and 
behavior, who was the embodiment of Jacksonian 
heteronomy and anti-humanist currents within larger 
seions of the eleorate. In the establishment of our 
republic, as Spannaus outlines, a strenuous edu- 
cational-litical campaign was launched by 
Franklin and others to bring the majority of American 
farmers of that period o suprt of the urban 
"Whig" alliance of industrialist and labor forces. It 
was that sort of marginal farmer, us lumpenized, 
hence more viciously heteronomic, strata of our urban 
pulation who have represented the tential 







broader base for Toryism in the eleorate. () 

For millions of tential readers who are in their 
middle fifties or older at this time, it is ssible to pin 
down the litical image of the American farmer and 
related matters by drawing un the writer's own 
autobiographical resources in a way which direly 
echoes knowledge to the same general effe among 
millions of mature citizens throughout the nation 
today. 

Those of us with this source of knowledge from 
within family and related experiences, to the extent 
that we leap above the fiitiously defined prejudices 
and so forth of more narrowly perceived family 
outlooks as such by comparing the inside knowledge of 
family experiences with source materials and 
relevant knowledge of the litical history outside the 
family experience, have a tential special advantage 
in direly accounting for the way in which the Whig 
impulse was embedded in our own generation, and 
thus, imicitly also of the way in which our 
generation variously did and did not transmit that 
same organic outlook to the next generation coming 
after us. 

Although the writer rightly abhors the methods 
emoyed in the "oral history" efforts  because the 
CBS and other apications of that method are 
heteronomic and in fa anti-historical in the mode of 
prompting recolleions  it is one of the uncometed 
duties of our mature generations to our sterity to 
capture and convey their special access to the inside 
of the life of the American pulation during the 
period from the middle of the nineteenth century o 
the s and s. 

The following remarks are direly to the  of 
the above paragraph of the text in that way, and illus- 
trate the more general  imied by this autobio- 
graphical footnote. 

Like many now mature Americans born during 
approximately  or earlier, the writer*s ernal 
family experiences as a child and youth immediately, 
consciously reached back o approximately the 
s and s  to our grandparents* grandparents. 
Although memories transmitted of great-great- 
grandparents are inevitably colored within the ac- 
counts embedded in family licies and related 
considerations, on condition that such transmitted 
information was checked by some objeive research 
of a source-material sort (letters, daguerreotypes, an 
alertness concerning the existence of official and 
semi-official records from statistical records, 
newspaper files and so forth bearing un the period 



. Nancy B. Spannaus. ''Uncovering the Treason School of 
American History," in Spannaus and White, eds., The Political 
Econom yoftheAm erica nRe volu Hon , p p .  - , 



 

of the s forward), and this combined, cross- 
checked material with some rigorous historical 
knowledge otherwise, what is transmitted within the 
family provides the sensuous element which makes 
that rtion of our history real to those who maain 
the habit of situating it in the context of broader 
sources of knowledge. 

One of the dominant figures in the writer's childhood 
and early youth was a paternal grandfather, Joseph 
LaRouche, who had left the oppressive herlands of 
rural Quebec during his own youth to become a 
moderately significant inventor and technician 
principally occupied in the development of our shoe 
manufauring industry, and a well-traveled technical 
representative of the United Shoe Machinery Cor- 
ration in Latin America. This grandfather 
represented the technological traditions within the 
writer's household, exemified by the often-cited fa 
that this grandfather had built one of the first radio 
receiving sets in home use in the city of Lynn, 
Massachusetts. The maternal grandfather, the 
Reverend George Weir, had immigrated to Fall River, 
Massachusetts from Scotland, at the age of two, a 
migration which aided his own father, a professional 
Scots dragoon by family tradition, to volunteer with 
the First Rhode Island Cavalry. The brother of this 
dragoon, Captain William Weir, also a part of the 
family tradition, captained one of the first New 
England-built steamship voyages to make the South 
America run. 

The Reverend Weir had been won to the ministry 
during his youth, had moved to Columbus, Ohio, 
initially to assume a skid row ministry, and then to 
become  until his death after World War II  an 
aive and retired minister of the United Brethren 
denomination in many localities in Ohio. The family's 
deepest penetration o American history came 
through this writer's maternal grandmother, Martha 
Wood Weir, of a Delaware County Ohio Quaker family 
whose conscious inner-family traditions went im- 
mediately back to her father (an aive figure in the 
Ohio ^'underground railway" movement) and her 
grandfather, the Reverend Daniel Wood, a John 
Woolman Quaker from the Carolinas and an 
acquaance and strong admirer of Henry Clay. 

If millions of Americans of the writer's own and the 
preceding generation look o their own experience, a 
similar sort of knowledge to similar effe is located. 

The writer's childhood (spent mainly in his 
Rochester, New Hampshire birthace) and youth 
(spent mainly in Lynn, Massachusetts) centered 
about these two grandparents and the related trips to 
Ohio and Massachusetts where were the high s of 
family life and consciousness during his first ten 







 

years, and only less dominant a feature during the 
s. For this period, the writer's surviving 
recolleions of relevant considerations are presently 
vivid (although in retrospeively diminishing 
number) back to the age of five. 

The Reverend Weir in particular was a most in- 
telleually aive representative of what it meant to 
be a minister in many parts of Ohio during his aive 
ministry over approximately the - period. To 
be such a minister during that period was to be a kind 
of local litical figure in the present sense of the 
term, imately concerned with the crises and other 
deeper features of the ernal lives of parishioners, 
drawn o every crisis affeing communities at the 
social erface of the farmers and the industries. The 
dominant feature of the Reverend Weir refleed to a 
child and youth was his blending of history, firsthand 
historical source knowledge, and broad contemrary 
experience o the conscious shaping of praical 
moral outlooks and decisions. ^ 

This impr of the two grandfathers determined 
charaeristics of the writer's more immediate family 
life, such that the moral continuity and associated 
historical method encountered separately in the 
parental and grandparents' homes made the latter  
especially to a child  a bright enrichment of the 
former. 

To have merely experienced how one's parents have 
raised one is to assimilate blind prejudice. To see 
through one's grandparents how the values of one's 
home have been shaped, determined, is to become 
conscious of those values as something created, rather 
than simy existent. It is to become conscious of a 
process creating the values according to which one's 
life is immediately governed, to become conscious of 
the process through which those values were adopted 
as a de fao body of family ^'constitutional law." 

To also have the advantage of grandparents who in 
turn emphasize their consciousness of the way in 
which their own values were determined, is to begin to 
become self-conscious of one's existence, rather than 
continuing to view it in the infantile, Aristotelian way 
as nothing but the order of things as they mysteriously 
are. The infantile Aristotelian view accepts the "way 
things are," and, at most, attempts to find some 
rational exanation of why that **system" is either 
entirely right (allonianism-Aristotelianism) or 
irrationally rejes it as **all wrong" (dionysian). The 
self-conscious outlook, most efficiently acquired by 
the child through grandparents who manifest a self- 
disciined sense of the developmental features of 
their own history, becomes an awareness of how the 
ordering of the individual's immediate life was 
historically generated. 

In American history, it is the nineteenth century 
which is distinguished as that part of our national life 



which is thus both sensuously accessible to our mature 
generations, and that accessible part of our sensuous 
knowledge which encompasses our nation in an aspe 
of that process of development during which its 
organic values were further embedded in the core of 
our pulation. 

The writer's specific form of advantage on this 
account respeing the overall social-litical history 
of our people is that the blending of the experience of 
the American immigrant families and of the Quaker 
settler families of the late seventeenth century, was 
the background of reference in which this self- 
conscious outlook on the history behind the eyes of 
others was early developed as the governing method 
of social experience. 

Respeing childhood first insights o the farmer 
question, between New Hampshire and Ohio, most of 
the Quaker, United Brethren and many of the Baptist 
families known to the writer during childhood were 
farmers, as were most of the writer's own maternal 
forebears. At the same time, the contrasting social 
experience was the writer's immediate identification 
in experience and outlook with the more immigrant 
side, the industrial, the technological. From the still 
conscious experience of childhood onwards, this in- 
terface between the farmer and the immigrant- 
emphasizing urban aspes of our culture was a 
shary defined erseion of two distin varieties of 
American world outlook, both respeing the overall 
outlooks as such and the notable differentiations 
within each. This was the conceptual basis for the 
writer's mature experiences with farm and rural 
strata during the s. 

Hence, to this writer, as to any other person 
similarly advantaged, the historical differentiation 
among rural pulations of America between the 
individualism of the technological oriented, proudly 
competent farmer and the wretched heteronomy 
charaeristic of the '*or farmer" is a clear and 
incontestable litical or otherwise protolitical fa. 
We understand the lumpen social basis of Jacksonian 
Toryism. 

Situating that approach to understanding the 
American farmer historically  using the materials 
and methods of history to understand how people 
come variously to view the world as they do in fa  
also immediately defines a broader, more imrtant 
 of immediate pertinency. 

To be an American in any morally acceptable un- 
derstanding of that profession, is to be self-conscious, 
along the lines we have set forth, of the process by 
which the present United States was generated. The 
method for attaining that profession competently is to 
rigorously check the most ensive searching of the 
sensuous knowledge of one's immediate family life 
and grandparents along the exemified lines, against 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



so-called objeive historical evidence outside the 
immediate family experience and family in- 
terpretation of its experiences in the larger society. 
By extending that empirical approach to the most 
immediately accessible materials, to the study of our 
American Revolution, its European roots and its af- 
termath, one becomes what an American'* properly 
is, in the only useful and acceptable sense of that term. 

That rigorous form of historically rooted self- 
consciousness within our eleorate is the only secure 
foundation for reproducing a general eleorate ap- 
propriate to coherent perception of our proper 
domestic and foreign licies. 

The litical and related organic tentialities of the 
American people are not genetic  we represent in 
origins every imrtant race, nationality and culture 
on earth. They are not geographic  South America, 
for exame, had equal geographical tentialities. 
Our geography was assimilated o the process that 
was America as emphatically as our pulation 
assimilated so many kinds of immigrants. It is not an 
* 'Anglo-Saxon tradition"  in our Revolution we 
founded a nation by rejeing the axiomatic features 
of the then-dominant Anglo-Saxon outlook. 

To be an American is to be a part of that historical 
process, first brought to our shores by neo-atonic 
humanist currents from England, the Netherlands 
and France, which Benjamin Franklin and his 
collaborators made self-conscious to our litical 
forebears, during especially the periods from ap- 
proximately  through the adoption of our republic. 

The work of Franklin and others, seizing un the 
appropriate impulses embedded in principally the 
urban pulation of the North American English 
colonies, but also impulses more weakly developed 
among most of our farmers, work condued over half 
a century of litical and related education and 
organizing efforts, generated among our litical 
forebears a new and more advanced litical world 
outlook. 

Organically, the development of this self-conscious 
outlook was premised in the tentiality represented 
by the humanist impulses transmitted to our shores 
from Tudor and Commonwealth sources. However, 
the Federalist  and Whig  litical outlook was not 
merely the conscious sime affirmation of such 
impulses, in no sense a *'social contra" agreeable to 
the immediate, heteronomic expression of such im- 
pulses. Those impulses were the tentiality through 
which Franklin's original conception of a litical 
outlook was embedded in those same thus- 
transformed impulses, transforming those impulses 
o a new quality of universally-oriented national 
willful impulses for praice. 

The charaeristic feature of the work of Franklin, 
the Federalists, the Whigs, and Lincoln's Republicans 



 

was the combating of the wrong, heteronomic ideas 
which the people would have ^'naturally" developed 
under the condition their judgments were shaped 
heteronomically, on the '^fiitious" basis of local 
circumstances. The charaeristic feature of the 
educational process leading o our Revolution and 
the establishment of our republic was the success of 
Franklin and others in showing how a heteronomic 
erpretation of impulses was in reality in praical 
opsition to the fulfillment of individualized goals in 
terms of consequences for the colonies and nation as a 
whole. The need for unity of aion and purse of the 
colonies, the need for unity of aion and purse by 
the nation, in opsition to the localized, heteronomic 
erpretation of the imperatives of those same im- 
pulses, was the charaeristic method by which 
Franklin and his collaborators convinced, first, the 
industrialists, then the urban labor movement, and, 
lastly, the majority of the farmers, to reje their 
individualistic blunders, in favor of understanding 
that the aual fulfillment of their proper individual 
erests depended un subordinating those ''fic- 
titiously" misdireed impulses to those impulses' 
proper expression in terms of the universal erest. 

It was that process which won the majority of the 
eleorate to adopting the notion of the universal as 
primary. It was that alteration of the informed willful 
impulses for praice of the majority of the American 
eleorate during the decades-prolonged process 
leading to the establishing of this nation, to that effe 
 to the adoption of the universalist outlook on the 
impulse for technological progress and self- 
development of the individual within technological 
progress, which became thus the embedded national 
charaer, transmitted through such impulses o the 
molding of our early institutions. 

To understand that, and to coordinate that 
knowledge sensuously in respe of one's self- 
consciousness of the origins of one's personal history, 
is to be an American in the proper, meaningful sense 
of the term. It was the persistence of that universalist 
perception of national and subsumed individual in- 
terest embedded in our nation's founding institutions, 
whose persisting influence  even in face of Tory 
subversion  accounts both for all our successes as a 
nation and the Whig outlook still organically em- 
bedded in the impulses of the majority of our people. 

America succeeded as it did during the last quarter 
of the eighteenth century, because the forces centered 
around the high Renaissance-like genius of Benjamin 
Franklin represented by far the most advanced 
litical thinkers in any part of the world  as the 
contrasting failures of the French Revolution aptly 
illustrate. Because that, the most advanced litical 
conception existing in the world, was made conscious, 
and in turn, embedded consciously in the willful im- 







 

pulses of the founding eleorate, those conceptions 
and impulses generated institutions and instruments 
which governed the American Revolution and the 
Constitution's founding of our republic. 

It is in that light that we may understand more 
exaly the significance of pragmatist John Dewey's 
assertive repudiation of universal values at the end of 
World War I, and of the same consistent expression of 
American Toryism in Beard, Arnold, Williams, 
Roosevelt, Kennedy, and the Carter Administration. 
These persons are not Americans, but the grotesque 
refleions of an alien social disease of heteronomy 
which has isoned the body litic. 

It is within that same context that the philo- 
sophically fascist film Roots is to be appreciated. 
The black American is not an epiphenomenon of 
Africa or of his black skin (except as our culture has 
bestialized the black American by distinguishing him 
litically as black). He is not an heir to the 
degenerating forms of the seventeenth to eighteenth 
centuries* African cultures, already in collapse, an 
African collapse and degeneration toward bestiality 
aggravated by the disruptive effes of the Arab slave 
traders even before the imrtation of slaves o this 
continent. The black American is an American by 
right and his historically determined American 
charaer. The fascist charaer of the film Roots is 
not accidentally associated with the fa that the 
leading neo-Fabians (e.g., Marcus Raskin) are 
professedly * 'philosophical fascists,'* and their 
associate Professor Noam Chomsky is thoroughly a 
philosophical fascist of precisely the genre Marcus 
Raskin has professed. 

As Spannaus emphasizes Turner's part, it was this 
same feature of American life which Theodore 
Roosevelt brought o the White House, in the form of 
his open admiration for the wretched Jacksonian 
heteronomic romanticism of Frederick Jackson 
Turner. 

James' *'uralism," the liberal's parlor parody of 
the **rugged frontier individualism" of Frederick 
Jackson Turner, of Charles A, Beard's fraudulent The 
Economic Interpretation of the Constitution, are 
elements of the same period in which monetarist in- 
terests, working chiefly through the cover of the 
Democratic Party, broke up the vulnerably in- 
dividualistic pulist-labor alliance at its or farmer 
base in the southern states, with the heteronomic 
** Jim Crow" dorine and licy. The Tory traditions 
of Martin Van Buren and Andrew Jackson were built 
un thus with Fabian guile from about the turn of the 
century, to the purse of cultivating a pular base in 
the less humanist rtions of the eleorate, for the ef- 
fort to discredit and subvert the U.S. Constitution by 
various means. The emphasis was on denying the gen- 



erative ent embodied in the Constitution, to allow 
for the insertion of a contrary, **social contra" in- 
terpretation. 

There is no credible escape from the clear constitu- 
tional fa of natural law for our Tory opnents. Both 
the scholastics and the neo-atonic humanists, and 
their continuations of the seventeenth and eighteenth 
century Enlightenment, were in agreement on the 
princie that the proper licies and self-erests of 
societies were prescribed from the stand of natu- 
ral law. Excepting the nominalist currents converging 
un British empiricism, this conception of the essen- 
tial unity of litical law and natural law in terms of a 
unifying epistemology was the hegemonic conception 
of European culture's capitalist development from the 
Tudors and litiques through approximately the 
middle of the nineteenth century. One can profess that 
the U.S. Constitution does not rest un the generative 
princies we have identified, only by either outrightly 
lying, or by resorting to the kind of lying emoyed by 
Thurman Arnold et al., by deprecating what are in 
fa the governing princie of U.S. constitutional law 
as mere folklore and myth. 

Strip constitutional law of that kind of generative 
princie, and the law immediately becomes degraded 
**by reaion formation" to the **force of sovereignty'* 
amorality of the Holmes tradition. Having emptied 
U.S. constitutional law of its essential content, as 
Holmes' method does, the emptied Constitution is left 
waiting for some scalawag to fill the void with what- 
ever litical refuse a credulous majority of the elec- 
torate might be manipulated o tolerating. 

The subversion of constitutional law epitomized by 
the succession of the Holmes and Arnold dorines was 
not original to the experience of the United States. It 
was, as we shall see, an indispensable corollary of the 
geolitical metaphysics at the basis of Atlanticist 
Dorine, which in turn was an outgrowth of British 
foreign licy developments from the eighteenth 
century onward. The '^concert" method emoyed by 
the British in fighting the Naleonic Wars and in 
establishing British hegemony over all Europe at the 
Treaty of Vienna, the '^Atlantic Community" and 
concert of regional geolitical blocs prosed by 
Roosevelt (Lippmann), are a dire expression o 
foreign licy of the same amoral social contra 
dorine. 

The sociology of heteronomy involves two distin 
categories of problems. At the top of society, the 
problem is those heteronomic institutions which en- 
force the primacy of some special (heteronomic) self- 
erest at the expense of a universal erest as 
defined in conformity with natural law. At the bottom 
of society  and often, literally the case  there are 
those social strata which are disassociated from a 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



sitive conneion to those aspes of produive 
development which express the society's development 
according to natural law's determination of its 
universal self-erest. 

In capitalist society, those strata which are 
sitively situated include skilled and semi-skilled 
workers, technologically advanced farmers, scientists 
and related technicians, and industrial capitalists. 
The relatively disassociated broad strata are 
variously the lumpenized and semi-lumpenized strata 
lacking a sitive sense of personal social identity in 
conneion with the produive process, non- 
technology-oriented petit-bourgeois strata, and 
enraged declasse strata of various social origins. It is 
not accidental but strily lawful that the latter strata 
represent the natural constituency of fascist 
movements. 

Hence a republic must be In effe a litical rule by 
those social strata which represent the closest 
association with the sitive universalizing aivities 
of society, through representatives who represent the 
institutionalized elleual representatives of such 
strata. 

A proper republic has inevitably many features 
which appear to lend credence to its opnents* 
description of it as constitutional ** diatorship by an 
elite." It is by constitutional prescription the chosen 
elite, predominantly skesmen for those social strata 
which identify themselves praically and most im- 
mediately with the universal form of national erest, 
who in fa best govern. They rule by using govern- 
ment and law to check the heteronomic tendencies of 
the less moral strata, and by governing in the 
universal erest of the society as a whole. However, 
they are not an elite in the heteronomic sense of a 
special erest which sets itself o opsition to the 
general erest. On this, John Milton is clear and 
corre in his form of presenting the argument. Tom 
Paine is clear to mainly the same effe, as are all the 

notable Federalists and. in the balance of his 
presidential praice, Thomas Jefferson. 

The more general and fundamental rule of law is 
that in whatever form is most appropriate to both 

natural law and the form of society, those must govern 
who are relatively the most efficiently sensible of the 
universal form of the national erest in respe to the 
nation as a part of the natural law-ordered process of 
human society. What must be governed for is the 
developing and informing of the general willful im- 
pulse for praice of those licies which serve the 
erest of the nation and humanity according to 
natural law. What must be governed against is the 
anarchy and treason of heteronomy. 
We are not in any sense justifying enlightened 

constitutional diatorship  although that would be 
preferable to **social contra" forms of fascist 



 

^'democracy" our neo-Fabians would establish. We are 
engaged, at this  in our building a conception in 
this seion, in looking backward to the European 
roots of the American Revolution. In such an un- 
dertaking, it is not permissible to imse the litical 
notions appropriate to modern (st-Renaissance) 
capitalist (or, socialist) society on earlier forms of 
society with different charaeristic **geometries." To 
establish a valid conception of causal relations con- 
neing our American Revolution and its sequelae to 
its predecessors, we must respe the reality of the 
specific ^'geometry" of each. For this work, a causal 
conception of the sort we have defined earlier is in- 
dispensable. That causal conception must at once 
account for the ernal relationships in successor 
societies of different "geometries/* and also com- 
prehend the generation of the one out of the other. 

The concept of litical freedom appropriate to 
capitalist (and socialist) development uses an old 
word, freedom, but imparts a qualitatively new 
litical meaning to it. Political freedom in the 
modern sense of its proper usage assigns to the in- 
dividual member of capitalist (or, socialist) society a 
hubristic quality of world historical resnsibility and 
influence over the course of events previously peculiar 
at best to ruling strata of society. 

This freedom is not "freedom" in the sense of the 
moral autarky of isolated individuals  not 
heteronomy. It is freedom to change the entire world 
through the specific means of contributing to 
universalizing forms of progress in its technological 
and related forms of charaeristic praice. 

In capitalist and socialist society, that form of 
litical freedom is not something the state reluc- 
tantly surrenders to the individual  freedom is not 
toleration. On the contrary, it is something the state 
demands from the individual in the perceived general 
erest of both the immediate society and humanity 
in general. The were of capitalist (or, socialist) 
society is delimited by the quality and prortion of its 
individual citizens who approach those distinions 
epitomized in the extreme by the idea of the great 
scientific discovery. 

The related litical problem confronting the state 
is that it cannot predi what specific sitive in- 
novations in knowledge for praice are to be fostered 
before the time those innovations are discovered and 
established as valid, a process effeed through the 
initiatives of individuals. The state can only promote 
the conditions of developing and realizing creative 
discoveries, and foster the litical and related con- 
ditions under which such initiatives will flourish. 

Hence, as we have noted earlier, the difficulty of the 
uneducated observer in distinguishing between gen- 
uine litical freedom and mere litical toleration. 

This notion of litical freedom developed by neo- 







 

Platonic humanism is unique to the modern era, 
erupting as the impulse for a form of government 
within the licies of the Tudors, and uniquely con- 
solidated as the entire licy of government with the 
American Revolution and the processes leading to the 
adoption of the republican form under the Constitu- 
tion. We justly prize it today, because it is lawfully 
essential to the ernal "geometry" of modern soc- 
iety. 

Such a modern notion can be projeed randomly 
un the past only in cheap historical novels, not in 
serious inquiry. 

That essential qualification made, a capitalist 
republic is essentially, properly, a class diatorship- 
in-fa of licymaking by the industrialist and labor 
strata, in the respe that the immediate erests of 
these two classes taken as a whole are the primary 
generative basis for evolving licies and praices 
which are consistent with such a Constitution as ours. 
ThiSy as we shall see in the concluding seion, is an 
indispensable view of our own republic as we turn, in 
particular, to defining sound foreign licies 
respeing our relationship to a Soviet republic which 
is constitutionally a class diatorship of its labor 
movement. '^Diatorship'* in this sense does not 
mean **diatorship*' in the commonace un- 
derstanding of "totalitarian regimes," It means a 
determination of which class erests diate the 
evolving licies and praices of the nation in terms 
of the ent and forms specified as the republic's 
constitutional princies. 

An industrial-capitalist republic is the diating of 
those licies by representatives of the conscious 
erest of industrial-capitalist development as a 
whole, in which the erests of the labor movement 
are the partners and immediate broader social base of 
the leading role of industrial capitalists as such. 
However, a capitalist republic, because it depends 
un litical freedom, as we have defined it, as the 
source of the strength of the republic, provides the 
same categorical individual litical freedoms it 
affords to its diating class erest to the members of 
the other social classes. The question of diatorship, 
used in this proper way, is not a matter of individual 
"freedom" (toleration) or non-"freedom" in and of 
itself; it is a matter of the instruments and institutions 
through which the constitutional commitment of the 
republic is upheld in the formulating and im- 
ementing of licies affeing the republic's vital 
erests. 

A reader might obje, "But that is not *dic- 
tatorship' as I understand the word at all. Why con- 
front a pular prejudice concerning a word in this 
unnecessary way?" 

First, looking backwards, it is imssible to trace 



the succession of societies and their included litical 
varieties of representation without locating the 
generative imications of the fa that every society's 
licies are diated, under various governments, by 
specific erests which are predominantly the 
agencies and erests of specific classes, groups of 
classes or faions of classes. Immediately, we cannot 
competently comprehend the ernal problems of the 
United States today unless we recognize that the 
republic has been usurped by a diatorship of 
monetarist erests, to the disadvantage of variously 
industrial capitalist, agriculturalist, and labor's 
erests. For the immediate future, we cannot 
establish an effeive foreign licy toward the Soviet 
Union or any other foreign government unless we base 
the proper criteria of our foreign licy viable, 
sovereign republics  on a more rigorous un- 
derstanding of the content of the institutions and in- 
struments of government than current general opinion 
has so far acknowledged. 

A deservedly classic case of heteronomy is provided 
by Wallenstein's army of the Thirty Years War. 

The Hapsburg degeneration of most of Europe  
mediated through the refinanced debts to the Fuggers, 
Netherlands bankers and their kind  had already 
returned Europe, following a period of late fourteenth 
and fifteenth century recovery and growth following 
the Black Death, o the kinds of conditions tending 
toward those which had created the Black Death. The 
previously cited peasant upsurges (jacqueries) in 
France, the Martin Luther-fostered mass-slaughter of 
rebelling peasants in Germany, illustrate how far this 
process had proceeded by the first and second quar- 
ters of the sixteenth century. It was under the more 
aggravated conditions created by the continuation of 
European economic decay that a routine sort of 
Hapsburg dynastic swindle erupted o the general, 
genocidal war which raged in central Europe for 
thirty years from  to . 

The charaer of Wallenstein's army is key to that 
phenomenon. 

Although the protestant leaders who defended and 
led the German peasants of the early sixteenth cen- 
tury were honest protestants, at that  Martin 
Luther himself was not primarily a religious leader, 
but a religious figure who had become also a conscious 
pawn and litical agent of the Fugger and related 
erests. Hence, Luther could earlier opse the 
papacy for looting Germany, and yet, consistently, 
suprt the destruion of entire seions of the Ger- 
man economy by the Fuggers. In that respe, Mar- 
tin Luther of the period following the Diet of Worms 
was consciously a "litical elligence" agent, of 
a monetarist-feudal faion, whose crimes in that re- 
spe rank in princie with those of Joseph Goebbels. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 








 

As Christopher White demonstrates in his ground- 
breaking study of Colbert in The Political Economy of 
the American Revolution, () the fairy tale told to 
credulous schoolchildren, of ** religious" wars between 
Catholic and protestant ** ideologies*' is fraud. Within 
the process of litical differentiation of faional 
forces, alliances with or against the litical were of 
the papacy or with respe to a national Catholic 
litical faion of the moment, there was an im- 
rtant undercurrent of aual protestant develop- 
ment which asserted itself under the conditions 
provided by the fa of the schisms, but the formal 
sit within Christendom was litical, occuring for 
reasons as varied as the comexities of labile six- 
teenth and seventeenth century litics determined. 
Fundamentally, overall, the schism in Christendom 
was immediately prompted by the circumstances of 
Hapsburg accession of Charles V, and the bloody 
fashion in which Hapsburg looting brought the 
humbled papacy to its knees in a vile parody of 
Canossa in reverse. 

For litical reasons, at the outset of what became 
the Thirty Years War, the Austrian financial situation 
of that moment did not favor the creating and 
deoying of the sort of regular military forces 
required to win the battle over succession to the 
Kingdom of Bavaria against the forces of the 
protestant German princes led by the Count of 
Palatine (modern Pfalz). The principal credible force 
allied with the Hapsburgs was Bavaria, which had an 
acceptable military establishment by the standards of 
the time, but which forces the prudent Bavarian ruling 
house declined to deoy to aces remote from the 
defense of Bavaria itself. In such circumstances the 
Hapsburgs commissioned the adventurer Wallenstein. 

Wallenstein's attempted solution to the problem 
represented by limited regular forces was to recruit a 
rabble of economic decay*s vagabonds as an auxiliary 
force of irregulars to take their pay principally in the 
form of loot from subjugated areas. This Wallenstein 
swarm of looting vagabonds had the military effe of 
destroying the logistical bases from which regular 
military forces could be ordinarily deoyed. The 
fragile equilibrium of the German economy, under 
conditions developed by over a century of Fugger and 
related debt service looting, collapsed wherever the 
Wallenstein's swarm of human locusts overran it. 
They butchered the livestock, gobbled up the seed 
grain, and raped and murdered with dionysiac 
abandon  exhibiting thus the inherent tentialities 
of our contemrary North American and European 
Maoists and similar neo-Fabian human refuse. The 



. Christopher White, **Jean-Baptiste Colbert and the Origins of 
Industrial Capitalism," in Spannaus and White, eds., The Political 
Economy of the American Revolution, pp. -. 



survivors of such depredations themselves became 
looters, and all the armies in the field soon relied un 
similar taical and logistical licies. In the 
destruion of society, the swarms of cannibals 
multiied. Once that process was initiated, it was self- 
perpetuating until rtions of the *'excessed" pu- 
lation were reduced, and France*s Richelieu then er- 
vened to bring the obscene Hapsburg mess to a halt. 
That sort of bestial degradation is what people are 
ultimately capable of  then, earlier, and again  
whenever the princie of governance by a universal 
sitive princie of natural law is overthrown in favor 
of the ultra-democratic *'do your own thing" in- 
stitutions of a litical Wallenstein. That is what law 
properly means by the mens rea, the rinsically 
criminal mind. Weather-terrorist Mark Rudd, for 
exame, is rinsically a criminal mentality by that 
standard, as is the Weather-terrorist group's original 
patron and mentor, Marcus Raskin of the Rockefeller- 
Kennedy machine's neo-Fabian Institute for Policy 
Studies. That is also the significance of recognizing 
the slum as the breeding-ace of the criminal mind. 
Although the slum has no exclusive claims to that 
funion  as the cases of Mark Rudd and Marcus 
Raskin illustrate at first glance  it is the fa that the 
slums are rinsically seedbeds of rabid heteronomy, 
which exains the phenomenon and illustrates how 
this princie of mens rea is to be apied to criminals 
of other historical social origins. 

Refeng to what often at first appears as inex- 
icable irony to the naive observer  that Rocke- 
feller and associated erests have wittingly created 
terrorism and slum riot-tentials by various covert 
and semi-covert operations  as we summarized ear- 
lier, the most efficient, rule-of-thumb overview of that 
phenomenon is that in this way the Rockefeller forces 
have followed the precedent of Wallenstein, in at- 
tempting to mobilize a horde of social decay's vaga- 
bonds as the battering ram of chaos and terror, to 
undermine opsing forces which might not otherwise 
be successfully confronted by straightforward deliber- 
ative (e.g., parliamentary) confrontation of opsing 
licies. 

More commonly, as in the case of the lawless fron- 
tiersman who is the Turneresque hero or anti-hero of 
our ^'westerns" and our *'feudal," *'Roman" and 
^'prohibition gangster" parodies of those ''westerns," 
the pervasive, endemic problem of heteronomy is an 
ermediate condition *'this side of the law," or just 
slightly outside the bounds of lawful outlooks. The 
relevant movies and TV dramas rarely attempt to r- 
tray the criminal as he was and is in real life. At the 
most, he is rtrayed as a **mad dog" with no inner 
personality. More commonly, among the principal 
dramatis personae, he is a "sympathetic charaer," 
engaged in reconciling his deeper goodness with an in- 







auality-unexained propensity (^'weakness") for 
perpetrating *'bad deeds'' and ''keeping bad com- 
pany/* The significance of such "entertainments** lies 
not in the fiional charaers of the drama  who 
never did nor could have existed as represented  but 
in the heteronomy of those outwardly peaceful, law- 
abiding folk who are purrtedly being entertained. 
Their criminal impulses are being afforded a fantasy- 
expression, a safety valve. What they patronize as 
entertainment reveals their inner selves. 

The problem of the criminal's mind is that he does 
not efficiently know right from wrong. He may know 
of a proscription, but this proscription he sees only in 
its penal imications (if that), and not in respe of 
such knowledge being conneed in a meaningful way 
to his willful impulses for praice. The problem is 
more exaly illustrated by refeng to those neo- 
Fabian ''social work" programs of "prison reform,*' 
in which "radicals'* working in "in-prison** or "out- 
patient** halfway house "sensitivity group" pro- 
grams, "liberate" the felonious personality by condi- 
tioning him to an "attitudinal change*' in outlook. 
Through such "reform," the felon sees his problem as 
one of "struggle against oppression.*' Since the neo- 
Fabian "radicals*' steering this work, either as licy- 
makers, administrators of programs, or operatives, 
are themselves advocates of philosophically fascist 
radical advocacy of heteronomy, the only ssible 
effe of such  to use ain words  "brainwashing" 
of the criminal's mind is to weaken the last categori- 
cal form of moral restra which has heretofore 
checked his behavior. 

The same neo-Fabian dorine has been deoyed 
through the psychological and social work professions 
concerning analogous reforms of our "mental health" 
programs. Since insanity (psychosis) and acute 
neurosis are a special expression of heteronomy, the 
effe of the neo-Fabian radical's "reform,"  stop 
"oppressing" the insane by telling them that they are 
insane  has the effe of reinforcing the mental dis- 
order in the manner demonstrated by the case of 
Heidelberg Mental Patients' Colleive. In that experi- 
mental program, the hard core of about two hundred 
ordinarily afflied young mental patients were 
turned o a "liberation movement*'  modeled un 
the "lesbian feminist movement" lines. This lawfully 
produced the hard-core psychotics who made up the 
initiating bulk of "expendables" of the Baader- 
Meinhof terrorist gang, and some of the worst cri- 
minal elements within the West German Maoist or- 
ganizations (KPD, KBW). The effe of such "re- 
forms," as in the cited case of penal reforms  and 
also "halfway house sensitivity conditioning *' of drug 
addis  by making heteronomy a sitive litical 
princie through fostered "reaion formation,*' des- 
troys those residual, fragile resources on which the 



 

psychotic and acute neurotic depend for their - 
tential recovery. 

It may be true in an imrtant sense that society 
creates its criminals, its lunatics, and its drug addis. 
However, to be a criminal, a lunatic, a drug addi  
including a heavy marijuana user  is to step morally 
outside human society. These as are not immora/ be- 
cause of existing laws. Laws do not in and of them- 
selves make behavior immoral, but only illegal. The 
criminal and lunatic are immoral persons, because 
they have disassociated themselves morally from the 
human race. The drug addi, the heavy marijuana 
user, have willfully rejeed the very essence of hu- 
manity respeing themselves  the sacred egrity 
of their mental creative tentialities. They have 
stepped outside society o heteronomy. They have 
permitted themselves to be degraded o the in- 
human condition of moral outlaws. It is not only in- 
sufficient, but hideously immoral to leave the matter 
of criminality, lunacy and drug addiion at the  
of accounting for "how social conditions made me so.*' 
It is imrtant for society to understand and corre 
such problematic processes, to the extent of its ability 
to do so. However, if the individual criminal, lunatic or 
drug addi uses that same analysis to argue, "there- 
fore, I am a..., and that is my fate,*' such argument 
amounts to moral suicide. Such an individual is 
morally dead. 

It is only another step to reaion formation, to step 
beyond the immorality of such indifferentism, to pro- 
se that "since society has made me this way. 
society must accord to my determined nature the 
same degree of rights of self-expression as everyone 
else's.** That is the criminal mind made conscious, the 
true wensrea. 

Insofar as efficient law and morality coincide, the 
litical approach to such cases of the criminal mind 
is obvious in princie. The broader problem, the 
more difficult problem confronts us in those cases in 
which the same reaion formation in behalf of heter- 
onomy is made lawful through vicious discrepancies 
between the law and morality. Once a heteronomic 
impulse contrary to the nation's and humanity's most 
vital erests is aced within the body of efficiently 
lawful praice or, worse, allowed to diate the for- 
mulation and imementation of governmental and re- 
lated licies, then the full litical hell of heteronomy 
confronts us. It is the legalizing of such immoral 
(heteronomic) reaion-formation impulses which is 
the key to the topical problem of this seion as a 
whole. 

In the case of the degeneration leading o the 
Black Death of the mid-fourteenth century, the 
stretching of the tolerated, relatively small margin of 
Jewish usury to its reacement, rampant Lombard 
usury, is the most obvious aspe of the breakdown of 
the morality of the feudal order. 







 

First, to understand this , one must ac- 
knowledge the truth about the European Jew. The 
European Jew was not a produ of some, in fa, half- 
mythical religious society associated with what is 
called Palestine. Such notions are historically pure 
bunk. The European Jew was created by Christen- 
dom. Since by law a Christian could not engage in 
usury, but since feudalism required the occasional 
emoyment of the usurer, the feudal Jew was created 
by Christendom from out of the ranks of that strata of 
Levantine small merchants and peddlers which 
featured the followeres of Philo et al. as the social 
element of that commerce most notable to an observ- 
ing Christendom. It was in this way that Christendom, 
having a small but definite need for services outlawed 
within the ernal, feudal order of Christendom, 
seized un the strata most appropriate to that func- 
tion and defined the Jew by law (e.g., Charlemagne's 
laws concerning his Jews) as having a special right to 
exist juridically outside Christendom. It is not only 
famous rabbis who fabricate real howlers of a pilpul; 
Christendom's creation of the feudal Jew was itself 
one of the fabulous pilpuls of European history. 

The existence of the praice of usury by feudal 
Europe's Jewry did not represent a tolerant violation 
of the lawful prohibition against usury, but exaly the 
opsite. It was a ruse to make that princie of law 
ironclad within Christendom itself. 

It is only necessary to refer, additionally, to such 
other relevant features of feudal law as the regulation 
of the preconditions and conditions for wars within 
Christendom. 

From our outline of the feudal economy as a system, 
it is immediately clear enough why those two aspes 
of law  concerning usury and wars within Christen- 
dom  were indispensable to the vital erests of the 
feudal order as a whole. Loosen those laws widely 
enough and the resulting outbreak of heteronomy 
would itself be sufficient to bring the feudal order o 
the sort of collapse we have summarized. It is also 
clear that the duty of the papacy and the associated 
princes of the Church was not merely to enforce these 
laws with respe to form, but also with respe to the 
purse of the la w. 

In that respe, the problem of law is immediately 
analogous to that for the case of the Tories' monetarist 
subversion of the U.S. government. 

This is not to imy that the preservation of the la ws 
of Christendom could have saved the feudal order. 
That would have been neither ssible nor desirable. 
The  is that it was the wrong specific aspes of 
the law of Christendom which gave way to develop- 
ments. Rather than abandoning feudalism to save the 
law, the core of the law was sacrificed in the attempt 
to save a decaying feudalism. The consequence of 
this abandonment of the princie of universal natural 



law in ordering the social and economic transform- 
ation was the rule of heteronomy, in the form of the 
cited alliances and de fao litical diatorship of 
bankers and feudal forces. It was the reaion form- 
ation to the violation of law, the Inquisition, which 
destroyed the Church of feudal Christendom from 
within, and accelerated those tendencies for schism 
which refleed at the outset the defense of the prin- 
cie of universal law within the law of Christendom, 
against the deepening nominalist corruption of the 
papacy and princes of the Church. The morally empty 
dorine of the princie of papal sovereignty (papal 

infallibility) was crucial to this process. 

That granted, we are not concerned to exore 
further in this location the question of precisely how 
Christendom might have avoided the genocidal path it 
took from the thirteenth century onward, but to define 
the relevant princied features which shaped the 
subsequent course of history. The litical dia- 
torship of the feudal reaion and the papal bankers of 
that period established the twofold pattern, which 
simmered throughout the later fourteenth and fif- 
teenth centuries and erupted in the same essential 
form in the Fugger-Hapsburg institutions of the six- 
teenth and early seventeenth centuries. As White 
outlines in his cited dissertation on Colbert, the 
ideological and litical institutions embodied in the 
Fugger-Hapsburg alliance were continued in a new 
adaptation by the Amsterdam bankers of the seven- 
teenth century, and took over control of the British 
monarchy and government during and following 
. () 

It was that current against which our litical 
forebears fought the American Revolution, and in 
opsition to that that our Constitution and republic 
were in stitu te d. 

It was the litical diatorship of that same institu- 
tion of nominalism over Great Britain and later our 
government which made most of the world a hell 
during the late eighteenth, nineteenth, and twentieth 
centuries, as the ideological predecessors of the 
British monetarist-nominalist faion had made 
Europe a hell since the twelfth century. It was that 
same Tory ison of monetarist nominalism which 
has subverted our institutions and theatens to unge 
us o a new '*low-energy,*' **deindustrialized" hyper- 
inflationary austerity grand parody of the biological 
catastrophe of the mid-fourteenth century, and which 
impels us to the brink of an early general thermo- 
nuclear war for whose war-aims no nation has in fa 
an objeive sitive erest. 

Next, finishing two critical subsidiary s, we 
will have assembled the apparatus to direly attack 



. White, op. Cit, pp.  ff.,  ff.,  ff. 







the imications of Roosevelt's geolitical meta- 
physics. These two s are: by what weird process 
does a Rockefeller become a capitalist, and what is 
the way in which this heteronomic monetarist current 
both unconsciously and consciously aves at its per- 
ception of its vital self-erest in propagating empiri- 
cism as the ideology of monetarist brainwashing of the 
ruled? 

Although the Rockefeller monetarist erests, like 
the Rothschilds, Barings, Fuggers, and Bardi before 
them, are not an outgrowth of industrial capitalist im- 
pulses, the cuckoo's egg, the Rockefeller current, is 
for the moment litically and economically a part of 
the capitalist litical class nest. The monetarists 
represent a lawful, anti-capitalist tendency 
established within the capitalist litical class. This 
paradox is not an outgrowth of the princies of in- 
dustrial capitalist development, but an outgrowth of 
the way in which capitalism has in fa developed 
through monetarist diatorship over the credit and 
the governments of the dominant capitalist nations. 

This problem has two erdependent features. 
Accounting for the exa location of that erdepend- 
ence resolves the apparent problem. 

In the first aspe, monetarism emerged in 
European history as a pre-capitalist institution, with 
all its independently charaeristic praical and ideo- 
logical features formed prior to capitalist develop- 
ment. Furthermore, there is an unbroken continuity of 
institutional development of monetarism from the 
thirteenth century through the present time. Hence, 
monetarism, both in princie and in institutional fa 
cannot have emerged out of natural forms of in- 
dustrial capitalist development, () 

However, in its governance of proto-capitalist and 
capitalist economies, monetarism as a form of litic- 
al subversion and diatorship has seized un an 
ernal feature of industrial capitalist forms of accu- 
mulation as the major added source of monetarist 
wealth and were. That conneion is the erseion 
and erdependence of the two distin processes 
under conditions of monetarist forms of capitalist 
society. 

As we have emphasized earlier, above and in other 
published locations, the charaeristic stand of 
monetarism is not profit in the industrial capitalist 
sense, but rent in the sense of the alienation of feudal 
wealth  ground rent. The aion of monetarist instit- 
utions un the capitalist system is to convert capital- 
ist income o that feudal-decay form of rent. 

The principal means by which this transformation 



, E.g., the historical fallacy of the conventional dorines con- 
cerning capitalism as growing o imperialism. 



 

of profit o ground rent occurs is through a major 
aspe of debt service. 

The formal problem initially confronting most 
readers is that two funionally distin kinds of debt 
service occur in fa in the same apparent and law- 
fully institutionalized form. 

Industrial capitalist finance extends credit and 
equity capital as ^'venture capital*' for the develop- 
ment of the produive forces. In the industrial 
capitalist form of capitalist economy, the combined 
repayments of that advanced credit and distribution 
of profits originate from the gross profits of newly 
produced real wealth. Excepting that rtion of in- 
terest and ^'dividends'* absorbed as personal con- 
sumption of the capitalists, the repaid loans and 
profit-distributions are normally recirculated by 
capitalists as new venture-capital loans and equity 
investments. In this aspe of the matter, there is no 
determined conversion of wealth o ground rent. 

However, the same ostensible juridical features of 
capitalist law prote that further aspe of total debt 
service and related payments which are a conversion 
of wealth o ground rent forms. 

The feudal, or ground rent moment of debt service 
and nominal rent as such, is epistemologically and 
analytically associated with the creation of fiitious 
capitalizations. For this purse, the usage of '*fic- 
titious*' in Spinozan ethics and the usage of the term in 
monetary-economic analysis are epistemologically 
identical. This usage of '^fiitious'* is rigorous, and by 
no means merely descriptive, or approximate. 

To define the concepts used in a preliminary way, 
we now first consider the problem of fiitious capital 
in its localized aspe. The preliminary definitions we 
reach in this first step are rigorous in princie, but 
the notion of the scope of the conception of fiitious 
capital so attained is merely an approximation of 
what we then must define comprehensively. 

Fiitious capital most narrowly and immediately 
signifies that the magnitude of a capitalist society's 
total nominal wealth has been enlarged by a margin 
fur which there exists no corresnding prortional 

value of real wealth in the form of existing or con- 
sequent tangible commodities of capitalist and house- 
hold and related consumption. For exame, it is 
properly axiomatic that a venture-capital advance of 
loan or equity capital which fails to mediate the ex- 
pansion of produion of tangible commodity wealth is 
destroyed in value by that failure. It must be written 
off. To retain such capital **on the books*' is to create 
fiitious capital. 

Our investigation verges closer to the most relevant 
feature of the problem for the case of resale markets 
in real estate. In the industrial capitalist form of 
rental (and equivalent) income from produced and 







 

developed real property, the rental and equivalent 
income is properly bounded in its outer dimensions by 
the inclusion of an "average rate of profit" in incomes 
otherwise apicable to the produion and main- 
tenance costs of creating and maaining that real 
property. In the resale and related, speculative real 
estate praices, rental and equivalent forms of 
revenues are based on an included fiitious appre- 
ciation of the real property involved. High rental in- 
comes and monstrous capitalizations of decayed ren- 
tal properties are the typification of this problem. This 
is analyzed in some historical detail for New York 
City and related cases in the writer's textbook. () 

In such cases of apying an *' average rate of 
profit" to a combined real and fiitious capitalization 
of an * investment." the discrepancy between the net 
of total rental (and equivalent) income and the 
"average rate of profit" on the real rtion of the 
capitalization is pure ground rent. It is the same 
princie, apied to analogous forms of fiitious 
capitalization of the total mass of nominal wealth in a 
capitalist economy, which is the location of the 
problem in general. 

The general form of that same problem enables us 
to locate the  at which the monetarist erests 
loot ground rent massively from the economy as a 
whole. 

That identifies the phenomenon, but not yet the key 
to the way in which this monetarist cancer seizes un 
and operates within a capitalist economy as a whole. 
We now identify that crucial feature of the matter in 
two steps of successive approximation. 

The first  to be understood is the indispensable 
role of the state in providing a monetary system for 
capitalist development. Without a credit system (and 
associated monetary system) created and maained 
by the government, no capitalist economy did or can 
funion. Corresndingly, a faion which seizes 
control of the government's fiscal and monetary role 
has thus gained the were to determine the economic 
course of capitalist development and, through that 
were, to seize overall litical control to an increas- 
ing degree. 

Capitalist produion (industry and agriculture com- 
bined) has two primary economic comnents. The 
first are the prime costs associated with ant, 
materials, and labor. The second is the profit rtion 
of commodity real output remaining after these costs 
have been dedued. Considering capitalism from the 
stand of the circulation of its produion, and 
viewing this in terms of the capitalist produion and 
circulation process of an economy as a whole, the 



. Marcus, Dialeical Economics ^ pp, -, -, 



following apparent problem of circulation is imme- 
diately presented. 

The purchasing were put o circulation is ap- 
parently limited to the value of the prime costs of 
produion (and administration) advanced for that 
produion. On premise of this presumed fa, sundry 
lunatics have insisted that capitalism has an inherent 
"buy-back problem" concerning the rtion of total 
produced wealth represented as profit. Some of these 
lunatics have prosed, persistently over the past 
century and a half or so, that the solution to this (non- 
existent) "buy-back problem" is to have the state 
pr a supy of money equal to the troublesome 
margin represented by profit, and distribute such 
**funny money" through the pulation. More 
"radical" lunatics have proclaimed: "Eureka! Aha! 
Don't you see! This proves that we must eliminate 
profits!" The problem does not exist in reality; 
moreover, any effort to "solve" such a non-existent 
problem has the same sort of merit as a "remedy" as 
surgically removing healthy organs successively from 
a patient in stubborn treatment of a non-existent 
disease. 

What is wanted to prevent such a kind of problem 
from tending to arise is the extension of credit by some 
agency, an agency with such credit resources, as loan- 
capital to the capitalists against the margin of real 
commodity-wealth corresnding to profit. 

The classical procedure for accomishing this is 
the issuance of government bonds, or, preferably, the 
issuance of government bank notes desited with 
national and, through it, other major banks as the 
basis for loans to industries and agriculture for the 
circulation of the margin of real wealth involved. 
There is nothing equivalent to "funny money" or 
anything of that sort in the latter alternative  
provided appropriate licies govern the distribution 
of such loans. The money has been issued against 
viable security. That security is first of all the 
produively invested real wealth against which the 
loans will be made. Secondly, that security is im- 
icitly endorsed by the fiscal were of the govern- 
ment. 

The propriety of such credit issuance is based on the 
economic princie that the real-commodities margin 
corresnding to the absolute profit in the economy 
represents useful margins of capital goods and 
household-and-related consumption. The consumption 
of capital goods expands the scale and quality of 
household commodities by produive labor's 
households (principally as wages) produces extension 
of the quantity and quality of produive labor. By 
apying extended produive labor to extended 
produive capacities, the amount of wealth 
represented by profit is more than reproduced. The 







repayment of credit advanced out of the expanded 
income thus generated secures the credit issued 
through the mediation of government, including the 
margins of debt service to the credit system returned 
out of the profit margins of expanded produion. 

Of the additional money put o circulation by the 
government's '^ervention/' the rtion of currency 
anually added to general circulation, through 
realization of the profitable margin of commodity 
wealth as investment in the enlargement of produc- 
tion, becomes the margin of expanded monetary base 
required by the expanded margin of prime costs, an 
expansion effeed by enlargement of the scale and 
quality of total produion. 

As long as the margin of waste and non-optimal use 
of real total national income tolerated within the 
process is absorbed within the margin of aual, ab- 
solute (national) profit, the effe of such diversions of 
wealth is to corresndingly slow the rate of growth 
below its tential. However, as long as this waste, 
^'shrinkage** of absolute profit, is not capitalized as 
fiitious wealth, no other problem results. No in- 
flationary tendency results from such government 
monetary aivity. 

On the contrary, the tendency of such credit ex- 
pansion is deflationary. A healthy monetary system of 
a capitalist economy is always associated with a 
secular decline in price indices. This aspe of the 
matter leads direly o the second approximation of 
the immediate inquiry. 

As long as capitalist development is governed by the 
princies of technological progress, the realization of 
profit as extension of the produive forces includes 
substantial realization of more advanced produive 
technologies. The increased average energy flux per 
capita in produion and household-and-related 
consumption signifies a relative cheapening per 
capita rate of total output by measure of the values of 
the per capita rate of total output of the preceding 
period. 

This has a twofold consequence. 

In respe to the capitalist economy taken as a 
whole, this deflationary tendency is nothing but pure 
advantage. Not only does it provide the indispensable 
basis for raising the material and cultural conditions 
of life of the pulation, but, relative to current real 
reacement values of capital formation, it con- 
tributes to the acceleration of the rate of absolute 
profit for the economy as a whole. 

However, relative to the nominal, back-capitalized 
valuations of held-over rtions of fixed capital and 
inventories, the margin of deflation represents a 
shrinking (discounting) of such held-over values. As 
the ratio of such capitalized, held-over nominal values 
becomes large in respe to the capitalization of the 



 

value of current real output (rising organic com- 
sition" of capitals) , the real gain in the rate of profit 
from new technologies tends to appear as the cause for 
a larger loss in nominal capital than such profit in- 
creases represent. 

The attempt to evade discountings of overvalued 
*'bad*' capital transforms the margin of nominal 
overvaluation o fiitious capital. The continued 
accumulation of fiitious capitalizations leads to a 
turning , at which the apparent effes of 
technological progress represent a threat to large 
rtions of total nominal holdings. This leads to a 
decline in the ratio of real investment, in favor of 
speculative movements of incomes from one part of 
the economy to another. Even without other com- 
ications, that process, roducing increasing ten- 
dencies toward relative stagnation o the process of 
real investment, causes a corresnding degree of 
apparent "overproduion'* in the economy as a whole 
 and the other phenomena of a capitalist cyclical 
crisis. 

It is to be stressed, as a corollary of this im- 
mediately preceding discussion, that under the con- 
ditions in which the orderly deflationary discounting 
of inflated nominal capital holdings occurs, as well as 
the process of technologically veored realization of 
the largest rtion of absolute profit as extended 
reproduion in balanced development of the 
produive forces, it is imssible for the capitalist 
system to experience any form of devastating ernal 
problems in its economy. 

It was Karl Marx's systematic estimation, in his 
four-volume Capital, that the capitalist economy was 
incapable of disciining itself litically to meet those 
two conditions. Marx's specification of the necessity 
for socialist transformation is that the vital erest of 
a capitalist society required such a transformation at 
the  that capitalist litical refusal to meet such 
requirements represented a major threat to that vital 
erest. That vital erest is represented by the 
conditions of extended investment of real absolute 
profit we have just specified above. Although, as we 
have already shown earlier, Marx was incorre 
historically in analyzing the totality of the causes for 
this litical difficulty within capitalist society, his 
location of the industrial capitalists' susceptibility to 
such a litical incompetence is direly relevant to 
understanding the Rockefeller problem. 

The key word is heteronomy, or what Marx terms 
the ''anarchy" of capitalist accumulation. 

Insofar as the capitalist litical class defines its 
licies in terms of the national economy taken as a 
whole, in terms of increasing the rate of absolute real 
profit through technologically veored extended 
reproduion, the capitalist system has no immediate 







 

ernal flaw relative to the mode of produion or to 
the republican form of capitalist society. However, 
insofar as individual capitalist erest is fiitiously 
defined as that of defending the fiitious nominal 
values of fragmented private holdings (capital), this 
heteronomic impulse direly conflis cumulatively 
with the vital erests both of the society and of the 
vital class erest of industrial capitalists as a whole. 
Excluding for the moment the aggravation of the 
problem by monetarists' forces, it is that iieteronomic 
impulse which is the dire and sole cause for the 
existence of an ordered depression-cycle within in- 
dustrial-capitalist economy. 

Although the Federalists did not understand the 
systematic imications of this problem, they clearly 
perceived the phenomenon itself, and prosed 
sitive provisions for coping with such a threat to the 
vital national erests. This recognition of the 
phenomenon was not accidental; as economists, the 
leading Federalists were in princie far advanced 
beyond a dishonest Adam Smith or muddled David 
Ricardo, and had studied the danger in conneion 
with the American struggle against the form of the 
problem represented by British monetarism. As 
Spannaus rerts, Thomas Jefferson prosed a 
periodic repudiation of debts as national licy; 
Jefferson was clearly sensible of the problem in fa, 
but clearly not of its proper remedy. Alexander 
Hamilton moved in the direion of the approximate 
solution on several counts. This writer and his party 
embodied the thrust of that **Hamiltonian*' solution 
within the programmatic materials advanced during 
the - course of the  Presidential campaign, 
and have amified on that since in respe to the 
prosal for establishing a Third National Bank. 

Provided the instrument of national fiscal and 
monetary roles is in the form of a national bank along 
**Hamiltonian" lines, the heteronomic impulses of 
individual capitalist ownerships can be rigorously 
countered by the combination of the national bank's 
categorical credit licies and government tax and 
related fiscal licies. As a praical matter, such a 
government licy is the means for efficiently dealing 
with all of the major aspes of the problem in the 
terms we have defined it. 

Individually, many capitalists would tend to howl 
heteronomically; colleively, they would mely 
cheer. That irony, that difficulty, properly recalls our 
discussion of Federalist approaches to heteronomy 
during the last half of the eighteenth century. It is not 
adequate to attempt to use simy the were of gov- 
ernment to enforce a licy in the vital erests of 
the nation as a whole. This is litically essential to 
transform the viable mere individual impulses of the 
viable litical strata o a conscious form of individ- 



ual corresndence with the proper, universal form 
of expression of such impulses  just as Franklin, 
Adams, Paine, Hamilton, and Madison did in their 
campaigns for unity of erest and aion by the 
colonies, against the heteronomic evils of the Con- 
federation, and for the Constitution and the republic. 
The proper expression of the real universal erest 
corresnding to the viable individual impulse must 
be made conscious, so that that willful impulse for 
praice is transformed from its heteronomic to uni- 
versal form in the individual 

Once that essential litical task is cometed, the 
''repressive" cast of government aion in behalf of 
that princie exists only in respe to the olerably 
stubborn heteronomic exception. 

That is not merely an illustration of a princie. It is 
a statement of a prosed approach to forming imme- 
diate licy, appropriately to be imemented as soon 
as the Congress impeaches the Carter Administration 
 which it will find acceleratingly strong and num- 
erous motives to accomish  and the nation secures 
thus the return of its most precious stolen property, 
the Executive Branch of government. This approach 
outlines what we must do to get out of the present 
deadly mess. 

The systematic monetarist corruption of an indus- 
trial capitalist economy can now be described. First, 
the monetarist institutions establish a foothold of insti- 
tutionalized legality for their praices of extraing 
ground rent massively from the economy. This 
focuses historically un the capitalization of ground 
rent in agriculture, and in urban and other real estate 
speculation. It also focuses historically un govern- 
ment debt. It buys o the government debt, and 
creates a discount market for such debt instruments. 

By seizing control of a government's dire and im- 
icit dependency un ernational financial mar- 
kets, and a national economy's dependency un in- 
ternational credit, monetarist financial were is con- 
centrated at those two erseing s of vulner- 
ability of a national economy's fiscal and credit 
system, which enables those monetarist forces to 
manipulate government fiscal and credit licies, de- 
grading the government to a mere partner  usually a 
junior partner in fa  of the monetarist forces which 
have established control over the spigot of national 
credit. 

By controlling the * 'wholesale" credit markets, 
reducing local credit institutions increasingly to mere 
corresndents of major financial centers in their 
loans to government, industry and agriculture, and by 
creating controlled markets in investment banking 
and the secondary equity and bond markets, the 
monetarist oopus reaches o the gut of industry 
and agriculture. The monetarist money centers are en- 







abled to force accelerated fiitious capitalization of 
industrial and agricultural assets  through such 
levers as loan-asset-ratio licies. By oligoly in the 
operations of investment banking, by controlling the 
flows of capital on which investment banking depends, 
and by controlling the financial licies of mortgage, 
equity and bond markets, the monetarists force a self- 
feeding growth in ratios of debt-linked fiitious 
capitalization throughout industry and agriculture. 

By such means, the debt-equity ratios in industry 
and agriculture are accelerated. This increases the 
rate of monetarist extraion of ground rent from the 
economy in the form of debt service from industry and 
agriculture. By extraing growing ratios of the total 
absolute profit of industry and agriculture in this way, 
they strip industry and agriculture of the margin of 
were decisive in controlling the flows of capital gener- 
ated  the capital goes out increasingly to the mone- 
tary forces, from whom the industrialist and farmer 
must then beg use of that same produion-generated 
capital in the form of a loan, through which to increase 
the ratio of ground rent extraion. 

This aspe of the matter is crucial to understanding 
the **anti-capitalist" licies of the Rockefeller-allied 
Roosevelt administration. 

To make the  clear, we should briefly consider 
how the writer, as President of the United States 
would regard revenues from taxation of produion 
and personal incomes. The revenues would circulate 
through the national bank (e.g.. The Third National 
Bank), and would be the reserve basis for a corre- 
snding mass of loans at prime erest rates in the 
order of a prime rate of two percent to industry, con- 
struion, transrtation, and agriculture. Although 
the writer does not anticipate that he, as President, 
would increase the effeive tax rates ^ he does end 
as detailed in earlier publications, to consolidate the 
federal, state, and local tax praices on a vastly more 
simified basis, and to use a uniform licy of federal 
distributions to state and local governments, together 
with using the national bank to get state and local 
governments  at last  out of the private market's 
security-issuing business. One of the associated 
funions of such a fiscal reform would be to con- 
centrate the flow of tax-related debits through the 
national bank, to make the national bank the major 
credit and monetary were  inclusively preventing a 
fresh, usurpation of government fiscal and monetary 
weres by a syndicate of monetarist erests. 

Roosevelt, monstrously comunding Colonel 
House's offenses, did the exa opsite. His fiscal and 
monetary measures weakened the economic were of 
industry, agriculture and the local income-recipient, 
in order to increase the financial were of the lowere 
Manhattan-centered monetarists. What may have 



 

been, in one respe, an increasing of the tax bite for 
federal income purses, was condued in the 
manner to use these increased revenues to increase 
the were of the monetarists with sums extraed as 
taxes from industries, agriculture and personal in- 
comes. The taxpayers' own money was used, as bank 
debits, to buy the heavier chains the monetarists put 
un them. 

By imprisoning the individual industrial capitalist 
erest within this arrangement  which, in fa, 
Roosevelt merely exacerbated  the already existing 
heteronomic impulses of industrial and agricultural 
capital were later ensified in the extreme. The 
relationship between corrate finance  for pro- 
duion, marketing, and refinancing  was so ef- 
feively regulated by the controlling influence of the 
wereful monetarists, that the nominal valuations of 
corrate erests later skyrocketed toward the 
heights of fiitious capitalization and, soaring still 
higher, became the immediate nominal erest of the 
corrate entity, a heteronomic erest contrary to 
its vital real erest. 

An individual corration has no available remedy 
for this situation. Government does. Were I President, 
with a sensible Congress and appropriate suprt 
from industrial and trade-union forces, I could solve 
the problem of the present crisis figuratively over- 
night. Let the values of equities subside to corre- 
sndence with **seeking" their real valuations, and 
convert the honorable rtion of the financial debts 
o nonvoting equity so that it may join the floating to 
reach ultimately whatever levels are established by 
general economic recovery. 

There are other forms of this approach. Which alter- 
native form would in fa be used will be decided by a 
litical process of aving through negotiation at the 
variant most agreeable. 

Who is to say it can't be done? Provided the in- 
dustrial, labor, and agricultural erests are suf- 
ficiently agreed, and the President and Congress do 
their duty, there is no efficient legal obstacle in the 
Constitution or in the litical body of the nation which 
cannot be overcome. As Hamilton and others make 
clear, it was the clear ent of the authors of the 
Constitution  including Jefferson  that the govern- 
ment has precisely such constitutional weres re- 
speing the nation ' vital erests. 

A few years ago, even given the Constitution as it is, 
such a prosal would have been imssible to proje 
except as a hythetical measure. 

Admittedly, today, there is a minority of those who 
will howl for a while as such things are prosed, 
'*What about the value of my investment?" 

The writer has heard or is otherwise familiar with 
exaly the same objeions from stockholders and 







 

creditors in numbers of cases of vastly ovepened 
corrate bankruptcies. In such cases, a certain 
amount of time and effort is required to convince the 
howlers that the debatable issue is not whether they 
are going to get a hundred cents on the dollar  
**Buddy, from this financial shambles, you couldn*t 
get a hundred cents on the dollar in a million years!*' 
 that the only praical question is whether to go for 
^'closing the jo down," and getting two cents on the 
dollar from the liquidation, if that, or choosing a 
financial reorganization and settling for stned 
payments to the order of twenty cents on the dollar. 

On past performance, it will require some time and 
effort to get those fas o the mental processes of a 
number, representing a minority, of most-affeed 
groups and individuals, but the fas to be faced will 
only get nastier with delay, as in all such bankruptcy 
cases, and the stubborn ones will come around as soon 
as they have *'abreaed out" their agony of antici- 
pation over the book losses. To put the same  
summarily: in matters such as these, many people 
refuse to face reality until reality clouts them over the 
head, in the form of a massive crisis-outbreak. 

In the case of a bankrupt economy, such as the 
present financial condition of the U.S. economy, one 
might hythetically liquidate to pay the creditors. 
That is, sell off real estate, machinery, equipment, 
inventories, and sell the people o slavery for what 
the market will bring. So far, even the Rockefellers 
haven't quite prosed that openly. Alternately, as is 
sometimes done in financial reorganization, one can 
run the ant o the ground as the way to squeeze the 
maximum payment out of a firm being destroyed in 
that way. That latter is more or less what the Rocke- 
fellers have demanded of the world. 

What David Rockefeller proses for the USA, in 
particular, is in praice what Hitler did to Europe  
loot it, including, globally, '^liquidating" the ''useless 
eaters" as an economy measure, all to keep up the 
nominal values of the bankrupt Rentenmark and 
Mefo-bills. We have already outlined the imications 
of David Rockefeller's scheme. Such ultimate vio- 

l 

lations of natural law are not ssible in moral law or 
under our Constitution  only hangable traitors would 
persist in the attempt to put Rockefeller's program 
o effe. 

We cannot close down the world's economy. Nor can 
we run it down in the sort of process of low-energy de- 
industrialization the Carter Administration is com- 
mitted to attempting. The world's economy  the 
"corration" in question  is tentially an economi- 
cally sound prosition, provided we run it up toward 
full capacity levels, with a heavy emphasis un real 
capital expansion and technological advancement. 



We cannot ha ve economic recovery and try to main- 
tain the ''egrity" of the present monetary struc- 
ture. 

The proper short-term nominal value of the U.S. 
economy is whatever level of float of nominal equity 
values at which low-erest government credit 
direed to industry and agriculture will automati- 
cally set o motion the industrial capitalist mech- 
anisms of self-feeding economic growth and pros- 
perity. What the subsequent values of various present 
capital holdings will be two, three, five years from 
now will be determined by which seions of pro- 
duion and finance best adapt to the climate of 
general economic recovery. 

These illustrations of the matter have been ro- 
duced for a double purse. This is the proper ace in 
the writing to ace these observations on needed 
changes in licies. In certain respes, the prosals 
and associated analysis usefully provoke an array of 
objeions. In the main, those objeions aggregate to 
a sperum of fears, suspicions and resentments, 
which taken as a whole is eminently prediable. All of 
the notable objeions of that sperum involve a 
significant fallacy on the part of the objeor. By 
sting up such emotionally charged views we have 
established the appropriate preconditions of con- 
sciousness for resolving those vital issues of licy- 
making. This is the  of the writing to provoke 
them; each of them involves the cited problem of 
heteronomy direly or in respe of one of its princi- 
pal byprodus. Thus, **to the extent that that ob- 
jeion seizes you, it can be demonstrated to your con- 
sciousness in such sensuous terms of reference how 
Rockefeller has seized you in his psychological grip, " 

The grip of monetarism and its nominalist core ideol- 
ogy un industrial capitalist societies is not some 
mere abstraion, to be easantly exained away. 
Peoe do not a viciously, persistingly against their 
own vital erests by influence of a mere casual 
misperception of fas. Only when heteronomic im- 
pulses have been transformed o corresnding 
reaion formations can such phenomena persist on a 
broad scale of obsessive behavior over extended 
periods, in the fashion of the history of the duration of 
the present - monetary breakdown-crisis 
process. 

For the viims of such obsessions, it is unavoidably 
painful to confront the truth, even at the  that the 
nature of the crisis permits them no alternative. 
Circumlocution  trying to talk one's way easantly 
around the problem, diomatically avoiding the 
"loaded issues"  could not succeed, by virtue of the 
charaer of the situation. The hard truth has to be 







sed direly by resnsible leaders, and without 
equivocation, which means evoking and hitting 
direly at painful topics which are by no means 
merely tender corns. 

Among capitalists and trade unionists alike, the 
most prominent issue  expressed with somewhat 
different emphasis, of course  is, **What about my 
savings?'* Although the objeion so identified ap- 
pears ausible at first glance, everything imrtant 
behind the question is sheer indefensible fallacy. 

We have already dealt, just above, with the overall 
fallacy of the assumption that the ^'savings" can be 
saved as a whole at current nominal values. As a 
matter of licy  a combined consideration of 

national economic erests and relevant litical 
considerations  we must defend the institutional 
egrity of industries, farms, and of those financial 
institutions of credit and desit which the industrial 
capitalist economy requires. We must also certainly 
prote individuals' savings up to a certain ceiling 
level. This was comprehensively covered in the 
writer's widely-circulated draft of the prosed 
Emergency Emoyment A, 

Otherwise, two s direly settle the remaining 
faual issues involved in the objeion. 

The significance of '*your savings'* is: what do they 
represent for your future? Would you prefer to **get 
every nickel" of such nominal holdings secured for the 
moment, and go through - at minimum  an un- 
precedented economic collapse, or would you accept 
whatever financial reorganization procedure is 
necessary, on condition that these mean an immediate 
and extended future in what in fa will be the greatest 
economic boom in history? 

The second  to be emphasized is that any losses 
refleed in a financial settlement negotiation today 
do not represent anything **taken away" now. Rocke- 
feller and Company have already robbed these 
amounts ; the apparent losses involved in financial re- 
organization merely confront the objeion with the 
present reality of that past looting and deceptions. The 
only way anyone is going to defend today's **hundred 
cents on the dollar" is by continuing to be among a 
very few at the head of the line when the general panic 
strikes. **If you insist on your 'hundred cents on the 



 

dollar,' that panic  or far worse  is what you are 
gettingfor 'your money.' " 

More broadly, more significantly, the objeion 
refles the more or less conscious and more ob- 
noxious perception that, while nearly everyone else 
would have to suffer monstrously to make that 
ssible, that is permissible as long as "I get mine 
first." This is precisely the kind of objeion the 
founders of the republic faced in the breakdown of the 
economy of the Confederation. It should not be dif- 
ficult for the objeor to discover rationally  as his 
litical forebears, the eleorate that adopted the 
Constitution and republic did  that the idea that his 
individual erest is something that can be served 
despite and at the expense of the general erest is a 
delusion. 

The fear of "big government" is a less ense and 
less broadly sed objeion than the agony of antici- 
pation over **my savings." Most notably, "big govern- 
ment" is equated with "regimentation." The writer 
covered most of this in major papers widely circulated 
during the  eleion campaign. Those aspes of 
the matter, concerning the elimination of the properly 
objeionable oppressive features of the present 
government organization need not be elaborated 
again here. What is notable and ironical is that those 
same much-looted persons who endure every imagin- 
able degree of brutally oppressive centralized 
authority through the Federal Reserve System and its 
controlling monetarist weres in private hands be- 
yond their control, so often obje to transfeng that 
were from a few hands to the control of their own 
eleed representatives. 

Broadly, the argument against financial reorgani- 
zation or a National Bank today is identical to the 
argument made against the republic, the Constitution, 
and the National Bank two hundred years ago. 

This is aptly illustrative of the way in which the 
monetarists erse the heteronomic tentialities of 
private ownership, to make fiitious, nominal wealth 
the obje of perceived heteronomic self-erest, 
succeeding to the  that those thus-seized persons 
a persistently, viciously direly against their most 
vital individual erests by aing against that univer- 
sal erest on which their real individual erest 
depends. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The Micro Approach 



SO far, in developing this , we have consid- 
ered the matter of litical impulses from the 
stand of the universal, of overall causes and 
overall consequences, situating the particular in- 
dividual and his heteronomic tendencies as anti- 
universalist impulses, as included exceptions to the 
rule of reason in respe of the whole taken as 
primary. Now, we must reverse the approach. We 
must momentarily put aside the telescope for the 
microscope. 

As we shift the  of empirical focus to the 
''molecular" aspe of ernal United States li- 
tical and proto-litical life during recent decades, we 
are properly confronted with two erconneed con- 
ceptions respeing the way the proto-Whig and proto- 
Tory differentiation in social-litical tendencies is 
expressed. In respe of the first, we can rigorously 
distinguish two charaeristic classes of individual 
impulse, a distinion which broadly accounts for the 
associated tendencies. In respe of the second, we 
discover that the quality of the two impulses is not 
only different in sense of litical imications, but in 
a more profound respe. It is as if the proto- 
Whig quality of impulse were appropriately measured 
in "grams" and the proto-Tory in "acres." In fa, 
the qualitative distinion of the impulses is 
epistemologically more profound than that first il- 
lustration imies. 

The Whig impulse is, as we have emphasized 
repeatedly before, empirically found to be relatively 
predominant among skilled and semi-skilled working 
people, technology-proud farmers, scientists, 
engineers, and industrialists. It is recognized as 
converging un a sense of personal moral identity 
involving a commitment to contribute to the 
achievement of "newere, better, and more" by the 
society as a whole. It is ontologically a proto-humanist 
impulse. Developing new weres of problem-solving 
which are demonstrably in dire or effeively im- 
icit agreement with a broader comprehension of the 
laws of natural processes, is the adducible praical 
imication of that impulsion. 



To contrast this impulse with its opsite, the proto- 
Tory, it is not ssible at first to do other than extend 
the analysis of the proto-Whig impulse another step. 
This, as we shall show, refles the "ontological" 
differences in quality of the two opsing tendencies. 
The superficial aspe of the matter is that they are 
funionally contrasting as diverging tendencies, 
causing different consequences in the same "ernal 
configuration" of litical behavior. That first glance 
suggests that causes which so a in an opsite man- 
ner must be therefore different forms of the same 
"ontological" quality of causation. This judgment is 
proven to be entirely wrong. 

The relatively raw, proto-Whig impulse has in itself 
no "rationally "-associated praical notions of a 
corresnding universality. That is its taical 
weakness, but also, as we shall demonstrate, its 
tentiality for merit. The proto-Whig does not 
"rationally" pre-define a corresnding universal 
order beyond the axiomatic prescription that that 
order must be in agreement with circumstances of the 
more fruitful expression of the bare impulse itself. 

The proto-Tory impulse is immediately charac- 
terized by imicit goals for generating a "Utopian" 
kind of universality. This is the charaeristic feature 
of the liberal and corresnding radical impulse. This 
gives the liberal and radical proto-Tory a certain 
immediate tential for taical advantage over the 
proto-Whig, in the respe that the proto-Tory can 
more readily adopt licies based on what appear to 
him to represent "universalizing" goals. It would be a 
profound error to imagine that therefore the proto- 
Tory has an epistemological advantage, in the sense of 
being more immediately susceptible to a universalist 
outlook. His universalities are always, and lawfully 
so, convergent un "Utopias" of the degenerate- 
Aristotelian or nominalist form: they are paradises of 
historically purseless heteronomy. 

These "paradises" are usefully compared to certain 
types of children's games. 

"Let's ay cowboys and Indians." 

"Okay. I'll be the captain who brings the soldiers." 



 



PEF=T(o)®Bi(o)X. E)EM@ E^SD@M 



*'No, you be the Indian chief/' 

"Wham you be?" Sourly. 

**The boss of the cowboys.** 

**It's your turn to be Indian/' Morally indignant. 

Mother ervenes: **I think it is your turn to be the 
Indian/' addressing her hosting son; **Freddie was 
the Indian yesterday." 

Although the child*s development, just because it is 
development of mental and related weres for com- 
prehending the **outside world" and natural 
processes, contains a tendency for associating an 
inner, preconscious sense of identity with that aivity 
of self-development  hence, making him a tential 
American Whig in that respe, he is also still a child. 
As a child, he caes forward the need for infantile 
security. 

He must have ''recreation"  relief from creative 
mental life, relief from being a useful, produive 
person in the "outside world." This need for recrea- 
tion is not the same as a true adult's recreations, in 
which the monotony of relatively routine produive 
work is left briefly for the freedom to exercise one's 
mental-creative processes in a more concentrated 
way  as we shall emphasize. It is not merely recrea- 
tion in the more inclusive sense that governs the phen- 
omena of childish recreation such as those games. 
Toryism is the desire to leave the world of reason for 
the comforts of an infantile way of living. 

In this, we are confronting real litics at its 
"molecular" roots. 

The infant and child are properly diminishing 
degrees of dependency on the infantile condition, a 
thrust of progress toward becoming morally a part of 
the "outside world." The infant exists as the family 
provides, and controls his or her family environment 
by propitiating  principally  the parents, who are 
the providers. Food, and so forth, are not needs 
realized in consequence of the infant's and young 
child's rationally willful aions on the real world. 
These childish needs are met typically through the 
parents. Furthermore, the child projes its own in- 
fantile, propitiatory comprehension of ernal family 
relations un the parents' relationship to the larger, 
"outside" world. 

As the child matures, the developing individual 
assimilates increasingly a rational sense of cause- 
and-effe as being the universal, lawful ordering of 
events in the "outside world/' This necessarily 
focuses on non-social aspes of his experience: 
making things work. It is by turning his focus away 
from social errelationships to objes and processes 
which are not governed by opinions, which cannot be 
propitiated, that the child is able to apy his weres of 
pre-conscious, concept-generating insight to the 



 

notion of lawful processes operating independently of 
the heteronomic wills of eraing individuals. 

The dichotomies involved in the child's mental life 
on this account are exhibited by inappropriately 
propitiatory behavior toward objes. The child 
breaks the toy that "stubbornly refuses" to "obey" his 
desires. The frustrated child within the adult machin- 
ist breaks a tool against the machine, out of 
frustration. The enraged child within an adult 
smashes the public telephone "because" the telephone 
conneion "refused" to funion as desired, or 
because none of the coins were returned from the 
incometed long-distance call. We say, noting such 
aberrations, that the person has behaved irrationally. 
Such irrational behavior in adults emphasizes the 
 that one enters adulthood either because one has 
grown o it, or because one has been thrown o it, 
or because one has been thrown o it at the  that 
the process of growing o adulthood has not yet been 
cometed. It is the epistemological dichotomy be- 
tween the propitiatory, false notion of "universal 
causation" by the infant and by the infantile aspe of 
the personality, and the opsite real notion of a 
universal lawful ordering of causal relationships, 
which rigorously accounts for the charaeristic 
irrationality-rationality dualism of the overall be- 
havior of the growing child, adolescent and adult. 
This is the root-molecular issue of real litics. 

The corresnding feature of this dichotomy is the 
way in which these two impulsions  infantile- 
propitiatory and adult-rational  are linked to 
corresndingly opsite tendencies in the in- 
dividual's location of a sense of identity. The infantile 
aspe of the personality locates identity in terms of 
the propitiatory dependency sense of being "my 
mother's child/* "That is the real me," is exemary 
of this world outlook and correlated notion of sense of 
identity. The individual who is thrown o adulthood 
usually accepts the painful obligation to funion in the 
"outside world," according to rules whose aual or 
imied rationality confli with the propitiatory 
outlook of the infantile personality, his or her "real 
me," which he or she locates as "behind" and "un- 
derneath." The "outer-world" or quasi-rational or 
rational aspe of personal behavior is essentially a 
persona, a living mask, the praical erface be- 
tween the "inner me" and the adolescent or adult 

funioning in the "outside world." 

The relatively true adult is not-accidentally typified 
by the person who has an untaedly adult-rational 
relationship to parents and siblings, uncluttered by 
"background noise" representing the propitiatory 
tendencies and conflis of childhood. Although sur- 
face appearances to this effe are not infallible 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



 

guides, what they imy is sufficient for our purses 
here. The inner change which makes such an adult 
transformation ssible is the individuars locating in 
the experience and a wareness of the were of crea tive 
insight of his (pre-conscious) mental processes, his real 

sense of social identity. 

This required qualitative change in the personality 
is dependent un not only an experience of such 
creative weres, but a twofold confidence in those 
weres. He must be confident that those creative 
mental weres are an ordered, reliable instrument for 
mastering comprehension for praice of a univer- 
sally-lawful ordering of the world, and must also be 
confident that this quality in himself is what makes 
him properly useful and imrtant to his society. 

It is inevitable that this adult tentiality is most 
readily associated with creative accomishment in 
the physical sciences. The normal case of the 
developing chiXA apies. The physical sciences are a 
more accessible focus for psychologically tolerating 
the notion of a universally lawful ordering in nature. 
The focus does not yet require abandonment of the 
infantile sense of identity, but rather permits the 
exercise of a rational-creative capacity, without im- 
mediately bringing the aual or tential scientist's 
infantile identity heritages o dire confli with 
the inquiry. Similarly, creative promise among 
mathematicians tends to show early, chess masters 
usually begin as prodigies, as do gifted musicians, and 
so forth. A person otherwise a monstrously infantile 
personality can be a famous chess master or a pure 
mathematician and so forth. 

Rationality with respe to social processes nor- 
mally develops later, with the were to accept the 
rationality of physical processes otherwise holding an 
ermediate sition. This normal pattern is lawful. 

The charaeristic identity crisis of the creative 
mathematician and physicist is the most relevant. 
**Will my mind stop producing new conceptual 
breakthroughs  will I *go dead,' are my creative 
days over?** As the late Dr. Lawrence Kubie and 
others have demonstrated, as far as they have 
progressed in this respe, a once-creative individual 
in the sciences and so forth loses that developed, ac- 
tive creative were only as neurotic-infantile aspes 
of the identity overwhelm the creative moment. The 
wereful need to gratify a threatened sense of the 
**real me's'* infantile sense of propitiatory identity 
becomes so insistent that it subordinates the creative 
(pre-conscious) moments. 

For exame, as peer-relationships among scientific 
workers become irrationally **competitive,'* the 
sibling-confli **mechanisms** predominate in 
relations with one's peers and subordinates, and 
propitiatory behavior toward (surrogate parents), 



superiors, patrons, and so forth takes over in- 
creasingly. Scientific investigation, rather than being 
problem-solving-direed in reality, becomes goal- 
direed to solving the problem of sibling-rivalries and 
propitiation. 

In such and analogous circumstances, the infantile 
aspe takes over the personality even in its creative 
efforts, effeing a pre-conscious recung nightmare 
of oedipal **noise,** and erruptions which preclude 
that sort of sustained concentration-span un which 
the pre-conscious synthesis of rigorously defined 
hythesis-concepts depends. The former promising 
scientific worker seems to have lost the old were to 
"think through*' problems in a sustained way, of 
building a concentrated focus on all the imications in 

the broadest terms. 

The shortening of the concentration-span limits his 
weres of insight to conceptions, hytheses depen- 
dent un building systems of imication in terms of 
a narrowere range of focus on the ''ernal relations" 
surrounding the topical area of the defined problem. 
He loses the were to leap outside the problem as 
formally defined, to ''outflank" it, with "brilliancies," 
to solve the problem by redefining the entire set of 
"ernal-relations" imications in a broader way 
than the problem has been viewed before. He is, as he 
fears, "going dead," his creative days are over. 

Such breakdowns among creative scientific in- 
telles have been almost the rule, rather than the 
exception. The external causes are numerous, but are 
generally, as external or circumstantial causes, of the 
general princied sort we have identified by the 
foregoing illustrative discussion. The real cause is not 
those circumstances which bring on the collapse of 
creative weres, but the vulnerability un which 
those circumstances a to produce such an effe 

The true, matured scientists are those who tend to 
immediately agree, on the basis of their experience as 
creative scientists, with the rigorous epistemological 
definition of science we set forth earlier, above. They 
have developed a self-consciousness of the reliable 
princies of ordering governing their rigorous ap- 
proach to the formulating of crucial hytheses. 

They may not have "gotten inside" their pre- 
conscious processes, in the sense of making those 
processes accessible to consciousness direly. 
Rather, in the usual case of the (relatively rare) true 
scientist, they have mastered the "black box' ' which is 
their mental creative were as they consciously know 
it. They have demonstrated the lawful approach 
through which to set those processes o motion to 
produce the forecastable required sort of result. 

They have also gone further than that in itself; 
they have conceptualized the proven "rules" for 
"operating the black box" of mental creativity. 







Rather than merely accepting those rules as 
**knacks," **rules of thumb,'* sets of procedures, they 
have conceptualized that array of '^procedures** as 
they would any other topic of empirical scientific 
inquiry. They have apied the methods of creative 
physics discovery, to develop a creative insight o 
the empirical evidence of the funioning of their own 
creative mental processes. This evidence readily 
admits of the methods of crucial hythesis  on 
condition that the crucial hythesis is tested in the 
appropriate empirical way  in the produion of 
**more wereful*' crucial hytheses and proven 
experiment concerning the subje matter of physics 
or analogous praice as such. 

That process, of making the ^'deoyment'* of 
mental creative weres for scientific work a subje of 
scientifically ordered conscious deliberation, is 
epistemology, the basic ordering tool of creative 
scientific work. 

It is that epistemological view of one's creative 
weres, and a state of mind converging un such a 
view, which establishes the basis for confidence in the 
reality and imrtance of one's pre-conscious creative 
weres as the aive princie of one*s personal social 
identity, one's proper moral identity in the world. This 
sensuously grounded demonstration of the proper 
nature of one's identity is the highest expression of 
and paradigm for the individual who has entirely 
grown o becoming an adult  rather than being 
either merely thrown o, or half-grown, half-thrown 
o that condition. 

The infantile identity is a * 'particle" identity. The 
infantile identity does not see itself as an aive 
process, but as ultimately a fixed, self-evident par- 
ticle, of preordained, fixed axiomatic kinds of needs. 

This difference between the particle-identity and 
process-identity of the infantile and adult personality 
has two most relevant imications for the problem of 
understanding the Whig and Tory impulses. First, the 
different way recreation funions for the relatively 
infantile and relatively adult individual. Second, the 
epistemological imications. These aspes are 
resolved through understanding their underlying 
identity. 

To the individual who remains infantile at core, the 
rational behavior demanded by praical funioning 
in the "outside world," is essentially a persona : "It is 
not the real me; it is my profession, my occupation  
merely my social self." 

The persona is like the child's father, another 
person; it is the person the child (infantile **me*') 
must propitiate in order to obtain goodies from the 
outside world. Thus, the adult father of the household 
(persona), puts on the other personality "at home**  
being, alternately both in the father-role (persona) 



 

and the role of the father's child (infantile "me") with 
respe to himself. Hence, the ordering of maages 
around this duality of comementary and reciprocal 
father-child dind child-mother roles. The father, in his 
outer-world funions, is "father'* to both his children 
and his chilcf-wife; the mother is "daughter" to her 
husband respeing his outer-world role, and is 
"mother" to him and their children in all matters of 
"family life" (inside the house, family affairs, social 
events of a family overtone, etc.). Relative to family 
life, the wife is the conneion to the "outer world" for 
both her husband and her children. (Hence, for such 
cases, the crisis of the unemoyed adult man, whose 
wife assumes the role of "breadwinner," i.e. father.) 

Popular forms of recreation funion for the needs of 
the infantile "real me" as an escape from the strain of 
being the persona. The child ays after school. This 
caes over o school, university and adult- 
speator srts. Entertainment is attuned to the 
"geometry" of the heteronomic infantile self. The 
infantile self requires escape from the lawfulness of 
the "outside world" o a parody of the outside world, 
in which the lawful ordering is determined as a fan- 
tasy world as it might be if the universe were ordered 
according to the propitiatory "geometry" of the in- 
fantile sense of "real me." 

Recreation of this sort, by assuaging the anxiety of 
the infantile self, by allowing a "safe" social area of 
expression for the desire of the infantile self to take 
over the personality, to order its thoughts and so forth 
according to the "geometry" of infantile outlooks and 
"needs," relieves the tension, and thus quite literally 
re-creates the person's capacity to "throw himself" 
once again o effeively concentrated service of the 
persona-ro\e. 

Insofar as infantile recreations perform that func- 
tion, they perform an unavoidable social funion. 
Recreation of that sort permits society to perform its 
day-to-day funions. As adults perform their persona- 
roles of fathers and mothers, the world is fed, housed, 
clothed, and battles for defense of the national com- 
munity's erest are fought. 

As long as infantilism is socially tolerated only 
within the prescribed bounds of such recreation, and 
as long as that moral distinion between recreation 
and reality is rigorously enforced by the society, the 
appropriate degree of such "safety-valve" fantasy- 
aivity helps society to accomish the persona- 
associated funions on which the perpetuation of 
society depends. 

The problem is not that the persona-associated 
aivities are not real. The problem is that except to 
the extent that the infantile identity "within" locates 
its persona qualities as in its essential self-erest  
which is what we properly mean juridically by the 







 

designation of a moral adult person, a rational adult, 
otherwise the individual does not believe in the reality 
of that identity as his or her "real self.'* The loss of the 
persona  loss of profession, protraed unem- 
oyment, or the standard "ego-stripping" praices 
of a behaviorist "group therapy** brainwashing 
session  degrade the individual o conditions of 
infantilism (heteronomy) known as the professions, 
personae of the criminal mind, the lunatic, the fascist, 
the Maoist, and so forth. 

For the true adult, the opsite sort of recreation is 
required. The narrowness of a specific funion in the 
world is rinsically disagreeable to the proper, 
fullsome exercise of the creative mental processes. 
Even though the occupation, the profession, may 
direly, sitively express creative weres in a most 
appropriate particular fashion, to the greatest 
sitive consequences, and so forth, the unavoidable 
narrowness of focus of task-oriented efforts within 
society*s division of labor in all fields is in confli with 
the relatively far-ranging overviews on which the 
creative process depends. The limitation of a defined 
problem to the equivalent of a narrowly defined set of 
praical ernal relations  most frequently 
unavoidable, even necessary in the produive process 
and related matters  is ultimately abortive in effes 
on the mental weres' capacities unless some relief is 
afforded. The normal chief recreation charaeristic 
of the skilled worker, the scientist, the engineer, the 
skilled farmer, the industrialist, is therefore science, 
or a different aspe of science. 

The distinion between the two forms of recreation 
becomes a hideous moral problem in those forms of 
purrted entertainment which attempt to bring a 
scientific-recreational topic within the terms of in- 
fantile-ordered recreational forms. Science as 
recreation  and we are obviously speaking not 
merely of what is ordinarily narrowly called physical 
science  is "outer world"-direed in its praical 
imications; ordinary, pular entertainment must 
not be. Thus, when real issues of the present and 
future are made the content of recreations adapted to 
the norms of pular entertainment, the effe un 
children and other more "suggestible" audiences and 
participants is  as is sometimes comained to be the 
case  to foster heteronomic, even criminal behavior 
by those strata in the outside-world behavior. "Only 
mature audiences" is a prescription in the right 
direion on this account, excepting that it overlooks 
the prortion of raving infantile identities evoked in 
the context of "recreation"-identified audiences 
among those over  years of age. 

The epistemological imication of this immediate 
same  is best brought o view by resuming our 
- synthetic case history of the developing adult who has 



reached the  of maturation of becoming a 
physical scientist. At that , he has the basis for 
using his accomishments, his sense of identity as 
having become epistemologically a scientist, to serve 
as a "fixed base" of strategic deoyments to attack 
the core of his identity problems. He now has the sense 
of adult identity, and the epistemological apparatus 
with which to competently attack the problem of 
social processes, to bring his comprehension of social 
processes within the conceptual scope of natural law. 

Positivism and associated forms of radical 
behaviorism have purrted to do just that, but they 
do so under the barbaric banner and rallying-cry of 
"science is statistics." The problem of the sitivist 
"Wallenstein" and his vagabond swarm of behaviorist 
"statisticians'* is that he and his execrable horde of 
computerized hoodlums represent a viciously anti- 
scientific, in fa infantile epistemological  of 
view. 

The relevant issues of distinion have already been 
settled conclusively enough in building up the con- 
cepts to this  through preceding successions of 
sub-topics. We have already defined the principal 
ernal features of the process by which an aual 
scientist competently attacks the empirical domain of 
social phenomena. We mean that approach and 
nothing else. Moreover, not only is the approach we 
have defined the only admissible approach to social 
processes, but as we have shown, this is the approach 
represented in the entire sweep of development of the 
scientific and neo-atonic humanist outlook from 
Thales, through Ibn Sina, through Roger Bacon, 
Ficino, Keer, and so forth to the present time. 

What we have added, in the more immediate 
probing of the inner development of the adult per- 
sonality, is to bring to the surface the aual kinds of 
processes within the great elles which have 
produced their discoveries and related achievements. 
Moreover, just as the outlook of Benjamin Franklin 
not-at-all accidentally coincides in crucial features of 
licy outlook with our own, so in the entire sweep of 
the development of great human thought, the ernal 
features of the conscious articulation of the arguments 
of such elles overwhelmingly corroborate the 
piure we have just rounded out  respeing the 
formal and psychological essentials of creative, 
scientific insight and outlook. 

The successive progress of European humanist 
thought, through the scholastic (Aristotelian) and neo- 
atonic, represent successive phases, successive 
echs in the upward progress toward adulthood by 
humanity as a whole. Both represent  putting aside 
for the moment the reaionary aspe of the great 
Thomas Aquinas  the struggle to lift the individual 
and society out of the bestiality of the infantile, 







heteronomic self, and not merely to make the persona 
more efficiently rational, but to make such a perfeed 
persona the entirety of the human sense of identity. 

This is otherwise vividly underlined by the ongoing 
struggle of Christendom as a whole. Putting aside the 
misdireions, the rubbish, and so forth, the Christian 
effort respeing the war of good against evil has 
always and properly premised its combat on the 
certay that the evil within the world was also the 
extension of the evil within the individual. The good 
was properly defined, at least in respe of the overall 
working approach, as the agreement (atonement) of 
the individual's informed willful impulses for praice 
with the necessities of universal law in respe to the 
real world. The enemy, evil, was always the suscep- 
tibility of the rationally informed human will, in- 
formed of universal erests and necessities, to 
heteronomic impulses (desires). These are rightly 
associated with the fiitious imperatives of a 
miserpreted, because localized, immediate, sen- 
suous self-erest. It was the animal-likeness of the 
baser aspe of man, his propensity to behave as an 
animal does, to see nothing but some local sensuous 
self-erest of the moment, or to ace that 
heteronomic imperative above the consciousness of 
universal imperatives. Hence, Christendom located 
the **flesh" as the mediation of evil, because its 
locality was the ostensible lure of heteronomy by 
which the evil one (heteronomy) within the individual 
took control. 

Such religious notions of Christendom, however 
inadequate the systematic insight involved, persisted 
because the argument was efficiently grounded in 
empirical evidence. Christendom's evolution, from 

what Aquinas (most notably) adduced as schol- 
asticism (Aristotelianism), to neo-atonic human- 
ism, does not alter that focus, but represents rather 
a qualitative advance both in understanding of 
natural law, and in respe of moving away from the 
reduionist, Aristotelian '^geometry"  from what 
we today properly describe as the field-particle 
paradoxical notion  to a non-Aristotelian, neo- 
atonic ''geometry" based on recognition that the 

human identity was not a self-evident particle, but an 
individuated process. Imicitly, with respe to social 
praice, Ficino's Five Questions already rigorously 
solved the field-particle paradox, by defining the ef- 
ficient causal relationship between the individual (as 
a process) and the **field," the development (per- 
feion) of the society as a whole. 

From what we have already developed, converging 
on this , in this writing so far, the case is made 
clear and conclusively so. There is no admissible 
degree of mystery why those conceptions appropriate 
to physics today were first developed in thrust and pre- 



 

liminary conception in epistemology and neo-atonic 
litical movements, or why the process by which this 
occurred and the initiation of physical science was 
accomished by the same neo-atonic currents. The 
fusion of the epistemology, which is the **transfinite" 
reality of the subsumed details of what is naively 
regarded as science per se, to the empirical reality of 
the social process, is the (hylozoic) scientific world 
outlook as a whole. The development of this outlook is 
originated only, ever freshly, by those individuals who 
have developed in themselves that epistemological 
outlook on their own fruitful creative processes which 
we described above. It is not sufficient that such indi- 
viduals know this epistemology empirically, as we 
prescribed such conditions for knowledge. That know- 
ledge must also be emoyed as the basis on which 
they **wrench" the notion of their deepest personal 
identity away from the infantile particle-thing the 
immature person regards as '*the real me," to locate 
their sense of fundamental personal identity in the 
creative process, and its ongoing weres, which is the 
core of their creatively direed aivity in society. 

What we had already detailed respeing the 
epistemological-ontological distinions between the 
Aristotelian and neo-atonic conceptions of the 
universe becomes obvious, once the crucial additional 
 we have just developed has been aced in that 
focus. The method of Thomas Aquinas attempted to 
inform the infantile *' monad" self  the infantile self 
 and defined his notion of natural law according to 
the geometry of the field-particle outlook, an outlook 
rooted in the axiomatic presumption of the self- 
evidence of the pre-ordained, self-evident ''particle- 
self." Both the formal-epistemological and the 
historical-praical aspes of the problem, as we 
have already developed those s, account for 
every other derived feature of the problem as a 
whole. 

Within this framework, the problem of under- 
standing the lawful imications of the epis- 
temologically ("ontologically") asymmetric Whig 
and Tory impulses is solved. These impulses are 
respeively tendencies toward and away from 
mature humanity. The first, the Whig impulse, cen- 
ters un the effes of emphasizing the praical, 
creative side of human technological progress as the 
quality of the persona, and hence of the values 
refleed o private mental life as the qualities of the 
self's development to be emphasized. The second, the 
Tory impulse, is correlated with those personae which 
emphasize the non-produive side of life, in which the 

infantile fantasy-life spills over more easily o the 
form of that "outer world" social praice. 

The were un which produive praice depends 
from within the individual is the mental-creative pro- 







 

cesses of problem-solving in terms of empirical 
problems which do not submit to the neurotic forms of 
social persuasion, do not submit to the influence of 
infantile opinion and propitiatory tricks. (Hence, the 
manic elation of the infantile self when the television 
is induced to resume proper funioning in the after- 
math of a kick.) The praical circumstances of social 
life of the produive person, the person who counts 
success as solving the technological problems of 
produion, are a favorable, forcing circumstance for 
cultivating not only the use, but the personal-identity 
imrtance of the mental-creative weres called o 
use. 

The corollary of this princie goes direly to the 
perjorative connotations of *'womanish." The woman, 
as a person cultured to become a housewife, is condi- 
tioned to assimilate "feminine" qualities, qualities 
which coincide with the "daughter-mother" identity- 
relationship of the wife to the "father-child" of a hus- 
band who goes o the outer world to earn the family's 
bread. Even if she acquired mechanical and related 
skills  traditionally, at best, suspiciously unfeminine 
 her controlling sense of social identity is that of 
housewife or tential housewife. Thus, it appears 
that women do not have the inclination for scientific 
work and so forth that men do. As women have moved 
increasingly o the outer world, it has been pre- 
dominantly o professional and other occupations 
which are relatively more agreeable to the kind of 
infantile world outlook otherwise culturally imsed 
as "femininity." They are either, as unskilled em- 
oyees, channeled o the most routine produion 
work, or o surrogate mother roles in teaching, 
babysitting, social work, and so forth, or o adminis- 
trative occupations and those liberal arts professions 
which are steeped in agreeable features of prevailing 
present circumstances and content with the infantile, 
or propitiatory social outlook. 

This problem, that women in general have been pre- 
vented culturally from developing the relative 
maturity more accessible to so-called "male roles," 
represents a monstrous form of oppression within the 
culture, and at the same time a monstrous litical 
problem. The fa that we deny to half of our elec- 
torate the circumstances of oprtunity for social 
maturity we afford relatively speaking to the male 
half, is a ison in our republic analogous to, if by no 
means so severe, as was holding our black labor force 
in chattel slavery. Hold women in relative cultural 
backwardness, as we still do, and the nation's vital 
erests will tend to suffer as a result whenever the 
consequences of this oppression are "paid back to us" 
by, for exame, reaionary, infantile impulsions 
from within the woman eleorate. 

The eleion tallies are by no means the only im- 



rtant ace in which the vital erests of the nation 
are tentially  and sometimes anually  
threatened by the marginal effes of the cultural 
backwardness relatively imsed un women. The 
problem of the relatively greater backwardness of 
"the wife in the family" is a matter of notoriety in the 
history of the labor movement, and by no means con- 
fined to that sphere. 

This problem was illuminated most shary by the 
st- mobilization of the present "feminist move- 
ment." Apart from the obvious reforms rightly, even 
belatedly demanded by this ferment, the "radical 
feminist" element isoning that movement as a 
whole showed exaly how the backwardness imsed 
un women leads inexorably, under appropriate 
influences and conditions, to a hideously fascist world 
outlook among the declasse strata. The "Id rampant" 
of the "radical feminists," especially a hard core of 
proselytizing lesbians, denounced "male elleual 
aggressiveness," in preference for the irrational 
existentialist impulses purrted to be the morally 
superior "feminine" qualities. 

The distinion between the Whig and Tory impulse 
is demonstrated to be lawful, and not properly 
mysterious. 

The Whig impulse, associated with the praical 
side of contributing to technological progress, is 
epistemologically a sitive impulse because it draws 
un and sets o praical motion the individual's 
mental creative tentialities. It is those mental- 
creative tentialities which are the driving element 
of the impulse. We see direly not the driving element 
itself, but its predicates, or, to use psychological 
terms, the developed cathexes of developed willful 
impulses for praice. Although the driving element is 
thus empirically transfinite with respe to the 
behavioral dissitions it orders, it is nonetheless the 
charaeristic feature of the phenomenon as a whole. 

The Tory impulse is ostensibly "goal-determined" 
because the goal is the pre-existing infantile fantasy 
life of the Tory. The goal is to imse that fantasy 
un reality. The model for the fantasy is family rela- 
tions among parents, siblings and others within the 
family, neighborhood and school life of the infant and 
young child, shading o the cathexes of infantilism 
acquired in that period of adolescence which pre- 
cedes being thrown o the outside world. Hence, the 
charaeristic feature of the Tory impulse is "con- 
cert," "uralism," and "egalitarianism," all ac- 
comodations to the central axiom of the whole affair, 
''that's mine!" 

By ing, as we are doing here, to the "mole- 
cular" root of the proto-Tory impulse, we exse the 
psychodynamics of a wide range of litical and proto- 
litical phenomena. In this specific consideration, we 



have emphasized the accessible dire evidence from 
the United States during recent decades, using that 
evidence not to effe a *iocalized** induive general- 
ization, but to aid us, that evidence considered 
together with other appropriate evidence, in develop- 
ing a crucial . The included result of such an 
approach is to afford us an enriched method of ap- 
proach to all comparable features of the history of our 
European-and-Mediterranean-littoral , years of 
culture. 

Although the rigors emoyed in our approach are 
representative of the crucial method appropriate to 
such resulting sitive knowledge concerning broader 
areas of history, the immediate empirical api- 
cability of the result is best defined for the narrowere 
area of investigation emphasized within the evidence 
emoyed. Consequently, we can make rigorous state- 
ments concerning broad features of other aspes of 
the history of our European cultural development, but 
we are still limited in respe of the most detailed, 
specific apications, to the narrowere range of em- 
pirical evidence we have emphasized. Hence, we are 
emphasizing the proto-Tory impulse as it has occurred 
in or affeed the United States' history, most em- 
phatically the recent decades to date. 

For the moment, as we describe the charaeristics 
of the proto-Tory impulse, our statements are direed 
in purse to the most recent generations in par- 
ticular, even though they have more or less analogous 
imications for other historical aspes of the same 
European culture viewed more broadly. 

Our generations of proto-Tories desire, at bottom, a 
society charaerized by models of those fantasy 
family and family-orbiting relations the proto-Tory 
liberal or radical wishes his infantile, childhood and 
adolescent family, neighborhood, and school life 
might have been. Hence, Toryism (liberalism, 
radicalism) is essentially rnographic, incestuous, 
and pederastic. This *'goar* is the only purse em- 
bedded in the impulse. The aive element of the 
impulse itself borrows from neurotic dreaming, and 
from rnographic fantasy life generally, those kinds 
of changes of ** scenario" details through which the 
neurotic (or psychotic) mind searches recurrently for 

a scenario** in which the dream  he hopes  finally 
becomes ''satisfying.** 

This underlying impulse of the proto-Tory and Tory 
takes a specific litical form by the same sort of 
"mechanisms'* the individual neurotic emoys in 
building fantasy scenarios. The neurotic mind in- 
terprets the scenarios of movies, TV dramas, *'soap 
operas," and journalists' work as fantasy scenarios 
created by script writers and by news editors and 
news writers. 

The contemrary prevailing standards of **news- 



 

worthiness*' in most United States' leading news 
publications* praice is the conscious exoitation of 
the princie of the audience's fantasy-building ac- 
tivities, to mold ''public opinion" in Tory direions. In 
general, contrary to common perceptions, this mani- 
pulation of our pular entertainment and "news** 
institutions does not operate effeively by a single 
distorted "story" or article, or even a few lying news 
rerts. It operates through broad, cumulative effe, 
through the biases represented by overall seleion of 
topics and treatments according to overall editorial 
formulas. It is guided to the effe of creating an 
ideological environment of fantasy, to the effe that 
"public opinion" in the main is "steered" o certain 
direions in colleive overall trends in private 
fantasy-building. 

The suggestible mind uses the scenarios supied to 
it as models for rebuilding its own private fantasies. 
This has two, erconneed features of imrtance 
here. Respeing the ernal mechanics of private 
fantasy-building, the entertainment and "news" 
stimuli represent "suggestions"  like the 
suggestions of a new boy in the neighborhood for a 
"stimulating" improvement in a become-boring mode 
of aying "cowboys and Indians." The fa that the 
individual knows that a massive audience is being 
similarly stimulated with such neurotic suggestions 
makes the fantasy credible to him as the kind of in- 
fantile game which society as a whole might consent 
to ay. 

Even if our mass entertainment and most influential 
TV news, news magazine, metrolitan press, and 
wire-service agencies did not have a conscious licy 
concerning such methods of molding "public opinion," 
the same mechanisms would nonetheless tend to 
operate. Beginning with Fabian Sidney Webb's en- 
thusiasm for the tentialities of utilitarian dorine 
as a wereful means for mass brainwashing of public 
opinion, through the er-war Lippmann  New 
Republic-centered  dominant modes of '^public 
opinion"-shaping, through the "Radio Research" pro- 
je, the combined outgrowths of World War II stra- 
tegic psychological warfare methods, and the Tavis- 
tock-Roper-Gallup-Has methods of manipulating 
"public opinion," the now-Rockefeller-centered neo- 
Fabian faion has pragmatically shaped the neurotic, 
heteronomic tentialities of entertainment and news 
produion o a coordinated deliberate instrument of 
mass brainwashing, whose coordination itself is ef- 
feed by the "scenario princie." 

The credulous person imagines that a journalist, 
editor or TV produions official who is uncovered as a 
"CIA agent" must therefore be engaged in spying, 
assassination operations, and such particular offenses 
against pular sensibilities. Such aivities may 







 

occur as a subsumed feature of the **taed connec- 
tion." However, the most significant a the **CIA 
agent" in the media does as such an *'agent," is 
nothing more than what Walter Cronkite, MCA, and 
Katharine Graham do to you publicly every day of the 
week. They shape entertainment and news rerting, 
to the effe of cumulatively building a total en- 
vironment of fantasy, through which the direed 
evolution of the pulation's private fantasy-building 
molds the **sub-struure" of a majority of **public 
opinion." 

Within such a broader background-context in 
general patterns of mass entertainment and news 
licies' effes, exicitly '^litical scenarios" of the 
same **formula"-quality are roduced to targeted 
rtions of the broadly conditioned pulation. The 
result is converging sets of shared fantasy models, 
models converging un the genre typified by Orwell's 
Animal Farm, , or the Orwellian Clockwork 
Orange. The groups of persons gathered around 
convergence un such a specific litical fantasy 
come to represent an organized litical tendency, 
which operates according to debated scenarios 
variously recommended as the means to bring the 
dream-condition o effe in reality. 

The Atlanticist Dorine is the form of the fantasy 
adopted among the leading litical and associated 
strata of the monetarist faion. Although these cir- 
cles coordinate the indorination of '*public opinion" 
with malignant deliberateness, they extend to the 
broader public nothing but the same kind of viimiza- 
tion which operates un themselves. The **dream 
merchants'' are themselves living in a nightmare. 

We can now identify one of the most crucial aspes 
of the Atlanticist Dorine. The proto-Tory impulse is 
a flight from reality. It flees in search of a dream, to 
superimse un and thus drive away the hated 
reality. The transformation of such private tendencies 
o a shared litical fantasy, o the socialized 
institution of the commitment to such common efforts, 
is in the striest sense of the psychological disciine 
a reaion formation. Toryism  from the Atlanticist 
Dorine at the top to the liberalism and radicalism of 
the suprting core ideology  is essentially a 
reaion formation against reality. 

As we have summarized the conneions involved so 
far, we have the following. 

Through catastrophes and related acute crises, the 
human race's viable strains of culture have formed 
governments (or the equivalent) governed by the si- 
tive perceptions contributed by an initiating few, of 
the imications of natural law which account for such 
monstrous cumulative failures of general human 
praice. Through catastrophe, through related grave 
crises, the broader mass of the pulation establishing 



such viable forms of government have (in fortunate 
outcomes) recognized both the follies of their hetero- 
nomic condu, and the propriety of the sitive 
perceptions of natural law advanced by the initiating 
elleual-litical forces. 

The most broad and conspicuous evidence of this 
process is provided by the history of Christendom as 
Christendom. It is the anguished recognition in the 
general pulation of the hideous consequences of 

colleive sin (heteronomic behavior), which has 
caused (among other variants) those sitive ex- 
osions of religious revolutions through which the 
pulation brings itself willfully under the constras 
of moral la w in its religious expression. 

The produs of great religious upsurges of the 
history of European Christendom all fall exclusively 
o one of three categories: Allonian, Promethean, 
and Dionysian. They are corresndingly conserva- 
tive, creative, or heteronomic. It is the first two which 
are the law-building currents, and the third which 
represents a society reaing to crisis by going 
morally insane. In modern European Chirstendom's 
history, we know these three respeive currents of 
outlook and method as scholasticism (Aristo- 
telianism), neo-atonic humanism, and nominalism 
(empiricism-pragmatism-monetarism). 

The charaeristic of the first two is the persuasion 
that the heteronomic impulses of the individual will 
must be driven out of efficient social praice 
generally, to within the supervised bounds of 
"molecular" family and private-mental life. 
Heteronomy is thus bounded within ernally ordered 

local areas of human aivity, areas defined as local- 
ized areas of toleration; hence, the scholastic doc- 

r 

trines pertaining to the canonical ordering of ernal 
features of the designated areas of relatively 
**privatized" toleration. 

The instruments by which the governance of recog- 
nized universal natural law are effeed have been the 
church and the state. 

As a consequence of the kinds of corruption of the 
church charaeristic of the period approximately 
 A.D. through the mid-seventeenth century defeat 
of the Hapsburgs, and that period's division of the 
church o faions deoyed against government and 
natural law, the princie of the separation of church 
and state was rightfully established as a spreading 
licy, depriving the church in particular of any 
secular authority, either parallel to government or in 
respe of dire representation in either government 
or the delegation of the funions of government. 
Despite that proper outlawing of the secular authority 
of the church in concrete, the useful princies behind 
the earlier ordering of Christendom w^ere preserved 
through the instrumentality of constitutional republic. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The churches themselves were retained as proteed 
institutions of constitutional republics, to the purse 
of retaining their contributing moral influence on 
behalf of universal law against the sin (heteronomy) 
which was the common enemy of the church and state. 

The cited decisive focus of Franklin and others in 
combating heteronomy (sin) within the colonies and 
nation exemifies the princie we have cited. 

Governments based un conservative or humanist 
litical revolutions in morality and law represent in 
effe an instrument by which people colleively en- 
forces un itself behavior in conformity with reality, 
imsed un the heteronomic impulses of the indivi- 
dual and parochialized, localized "self-erest** (sin). 

As governments oppress sin (heteronomy), they are 
oppressive to the heteronomic (infantile) sense of 
personal identity. They are properly oppressive in the 
sense that government properly "oppresses" 
burglary, murder, drug-peddling, arson, and "op- 
presses" lunatics by submitting them to custodial 
supervision. The weres of sovereignty properly given 
to the instruments of government unfortunately are 
also abused to oppress non-sinful tendencies, as the 
participation of the feudal conservatives in suprting 
the Inquisition attests. 



 

Radical conservatism, as in the feudal exame, 
ultimately brings about the preconditions for the 
catastrophes and crises which are the consequence of 
the failure to continue the course of technological 
progress. 

In consequence, the term "oppression" acquires 
two meanings with respeively opsite and irrecon- 
cilable imications. When a crisis brings about the 
collapse of an old order, the self-discredit of the old 
law so accomished also brings about  one hopes  
a new sitive thrust in behalf of universal natural 
law. to reestablish the rule of lawful government. 
Unfortunately, the breakdown of the old law also 
weakens, the established checks against the tential- 
ities of rampant heteronomy. Since the excessively 
conservative government oppresses both humanist 
(abuse) and degraded impulses (lawfully) through the 
same instruments, the oppressive charaer of the 
instruments is commonly misattributed as the com- 
mon quality of oppression. 

A dire comparison of the successful American 
Revolution with the failed French Revolution for the 
- period, and again, the - periods of 
American and French crises, ably illustrates the 
princies involved. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The Hapsburg Disease 



The great danger to a society ordered according 
to princies of universal natural law is that the 
checks against heteronomy will erode. Under such 
erosion and breakdown of the aive princies of 
universality embedded in proper constitutional law, 
the **oppressed" forces of heteronomy are aided to 
revolt against reality. The present treason of neo- 
Fabianism, with all its charaeristic *'countercul- 
tural,'* **local control," and anti-technology features, 
is a moral breakdown paralleling that underlying both 
the Wallenstein phenomenon and the processes of 
Germany during the - period. 

The degradation of law itself, typified by the evil 
work of the radical nominalist Carl Schmitt under 
both Weimar and the Nazi regime, isoned the 
German judiciary in a way which made the  
**Hitler Revolution's*' rapid evolution o the Nazi 
regime ssible  a tradition which, unfortunately, 
persists as an unerrupted strong current in the 
BRD judiciary and legal profession presently. The 
same process has been occung in the U.S. law 
through the successive Holmes **force of sovereignty" 
and the Thurman Arnold Fabian-and-neo-Fabian 
phases. The Weimar-Nazi and U.S. degeneration of 
the rule of constitutional princies of law are common 
predicates of the rule of lowere Manhattan-centered 
monetarism. 

The corruption of the constitutional institutions of 
the republic at the top has corrupted the law and 
unleashed the forces of the **Id" in the base of society. 
This degeneration of the U.S. eleorate was ac- 
celerated by the climate of moral anarchy of prohibi- 
tion and the s, and accelerated willfully in the 
extreme with the inauguration of John F. Kennedy. 
The mentally unstable Jimmy Carter, with the related 
bestiality of his Administration generally, expresses 
the "revolt of the Id," the threatened imminence of a 
new, global unleashing of the **Wallenstein syn- 
drome." 

This hideous outcome expresses the essential 
princie of all nominalism. Nominalism is, as we 
have said, epistemologically a degenerate form of the 
Aristotelian outlook and method. The mere forms of 



Aristotelian **geometry"  the field-particle paradox 
 persist, as a decaying human body retains the 
formal distinions of the living person. The life has 
been taken out of the Aristotelian order, the human 
quality of the Aristotelian order, the rule by rational 
governance in terms of universal natural lawy the 
governance by the princie of submission of the 
heteronomic impulses to the universally lawful 
exigencies of reality. 

The degenerate John Dewey, repudiating 
**universals" in his Reconstruion in Philosophy, 
expresses that charaeristic distinion of nominal- 
ism which lawfully leads toward fascism and equiva- 
lent horrors of the **Id rampant." 

Nominalism, by virtue of the way in which the infan- 
tile mind builds successive **scenarios," begins  
epistemologically  by clinging to certain of the 
forms the morally dead have inherited from the living. 
It retains the outward habits of rationality. Eighteenth 
century Humean empiricism self-consciously typifies 
that initial phase of moral degeneration. As long as a 
monetarist-ruled capitalist society is unable to rid 
itself of the imperatives for technological progress, 
that exigency of reality checks the progressive decay 
of nominalism, forcing nominalists to be contained 
within the formalities of rationality to a corresnding 
degree. As monetarism is able to force society to 
break away from technological progress, in 
preference for other things (the primacy of ground 
rent, ^'quality of life"), and to thus take on a boldly 
'*countercultural revolution" aspe, the moral decay 
accelerates in the direion of irrationalist fantasies 

typified by the film Clockwork Orange, 

We did not exaggerate in the least, earlier, in 
classifying the Copenhagen dorine in physics as 
epistemologically fascist. Until approximately the 
middle of the nineteenth century, no elligent body of 
leading scientific opinion would have tolerated the 
presumption that there was an axiomatic distinion, 
or even an approximation of such a distinion, be- 
tween litics and the so-called physical sciences. The 
Carter Administration's ** environmentalist" and 
**energy" licies have reminded us of the truth, if 

 







that were necessary. The exoitation of a conceptual 
difficulty at a crucial  in experimental physics* 
progress was the basis for hauling o physics  from 
external nominalist philosophy and method  a 
dorine which established a foothold for over- 
throwing the most fundamental princie of physical 
science as a whole: the princie of coherence in the 
universal ordering of nature. () 

In respe of Werner Heisenberg*s association with 
this development, the relevant  is not that he was 
either persona grata under the Nazi regime or that his 
associations with the fascist movement in Germany 
dated from the end of World War L The significant 
thing  for which Heisenberg is epistemologically less 
offensive than the contemrary von Weizsacker  is 
that Heisenberg, as he himself emphasizes in his auto- 
biographical writings, emoyed the same philo- 
sophical conceptions impelling him toward the st- 
war fascists as the rationalization for his defense of 
the kernel issue of the Copenhagen dorine. Heisen- 
berg's significance is not that he was the cause of the 
corruption of physics in this way  Niels Bohr was 
much more culpable  but that his stwar writings 
afford us invaluable insight o the Copenhagen doc- 
trine as seen by a leading insider. 

Logical sitivism was not merely an extension of 
British empiricism o physics  that sort of 
corruption had been long in progress before the s. 
The Copenhagen dorine represented something 
beyond mere empiricism; it was a reaion-formation 
assault, in princie and associated efficient praice, 
against the very kernel of scientific method. 

The case of the Copenhagen dorine illustrates the 
qualitative distinions within nominalism between 
classic British empiricism and its outgrowth, fascism. 
The typification of philosophical fascism is that 
variant of nominalism called logical sitivism. 

It is not accidental that Old Vienna of the pre- 
period should have special notoriety in this con- 
neion, nor that the philosophical fascism of so many 
notable Nazi refugees from Old Vienna (o the 
United States' universities and so forth) should have 
been comemented by the fa that Nazi Austria was 
in the main more Nazi than the other parts of Hitler's 
Germany. The qualitative distinion between British 
empiricism of the classic type and fascist logical si- 
tivism is that it is the specific distinion of logical 
sitivism to represent the qualitative transformation 
of the nominalist's irrationality o its corresnding 
reaion formation. The fascist imications of Rudolf 
Carnap, Kurt Lewin, Bertrand Russell and other 
radical empiricists generally, illustrate the princie 



, By acing an exclamation  where a question mark was 
required. 



 

for which Vienna-flavored varieties of logical si- 
tivism were a special case. 

If many of these philosophical fascists objeed to 
Hitler's Nazism, that objeion refles predominantly 
the consideration that Hitler's fascism was to the Kurt 
Lewin's: "somebody else's fascism, not mine.** It was 
not a hostility of philosophical outlooks, but a differ- 
ence premised in narrow erests of proprietorship. 

It is cruel, but necessarily cruel to emphasize that 
Hitler's Nazism did not accommodate itself to the 
imrtant role of Jewish fascists. The native 
Romanian fascists of the s were exicitly and 
emphatically Zionists in both domestic and foreign 
licy. The indigenous Hungarian fascists of the s 
were not specifically anti-Semitic in either domestic 
or foreign licy. Italian fascism was not anti-Semitic. 
Although anti-Semitism is endemic to backward pea- 
sant and urban lumpen social strata in all countries 
with a perceptible Jewish small business and landlord 
pulation, the cases of the right-wing Israeli and the 
U.S. Jewish Defense League forces only underline that 
there is nothing '^genetically" anti-Jewish in fascism 
as such. It was merely a proprietary peculiarity of 
Nazism that a German philosophical fascist such as 
Dr. Kurt Lewin was compelled to pursue his profes- 
sion in another country, the United States. The funda- 
mental distinion between the philosophical fascists 
who remained with the Nazis, and those who left Ger- 
many and Austria among the ranks of the refugees, 
was essentially a matter of the distribution of job 
oprtunities within the fascist philosophical pro- 

V 

fession globally. 

The case of Old Vienna of the late nineteenth cen- 
tury and first half of the twentieth is that no great 
former center of European culture epitomized so 
hideously the conditions of national moral decay. 
Thus, it provided all the ingredients  to the extent 
that Berlin, for exame, did not, nor Frankfurt  
favorable to the most execrable elleual produc- 
tions. 

As Rosa Luxemburg indicated, the Czarist Russian 
Empire was a paragon of humanist vitality by com- 
parison with the rotting carcasses of the Austrian and 
Ottoman engrossments. The worst features of British 
colonial licies were embedded in the Austro- 
Hungarian Empire's cultural-relativist dorine of the 
' * cone ert of nationalities . ' ' 

Historically, Austria had developed as the southern 
parallel to Brandenburg and Prussia within the old 
Holy Roman Empire. It was the Ostmark  one of the 
**marcher lord" duchies, areas of military and 
colonization operations of the German pulation 
against non-German cultures to the east. Later, 
together with the kingdom of Hungary, it had become 
the marcher lord bastion against the Ottoman Em- 







 

pire's encroachments. As Germany proceeded to 
collapse and fragment overall, as a result of the 
erosion and defeat of the Hohenstaufens' role and 
were, the Ostmark emerged from the shambles as 
the Osterreich  Austria  and in course of time 
came under the merged Burgundian-Hapsburg- 
Castilian house of Hapsburg, and the Hapsburg's 
patrons, the Fugger-dominated system of wereful 
monetarist bankers. 

In the course of the combined feudal collapse and 
struggling proto-capitalist emergences of the period 
from the end of the thirteenth through middle of the 
seventeenth centuries, and especially from the fif- 
teenth century, this historical freak known as Austria 
became a major aspe of the growing were of 
monetarist forces  Italian bankers, the German 
bankers typified by the south-German Fugger were, 
the Netherlands bankers, and  following   
growing City of London influences. From the close of 
the fifteenth century through the middle of the seven- 
teenth, these monetarist weres and their litical 
partners, the bucolic obscenities known as Castile and 
Hapsburg Austria, were the horror and shame of all 
European culture, the principal mediating source of 
every monstrosity European culture endured during 
that period and has inherited from that time down to 
the present day. 

The Hapsburgs were originally produs of that area 
of south German culture from which they as well as 
the Hohenzollern and Hohenstaufen houses had 
originated, an historical curiosity  but not an 
historical accident  which aids the historian in 
focusing on the divergencies expressed by the 
histories of the evolution of those houses as they 
shifted their base of were away from their locations 
of origin. The sixteenth century Hapsburgs incorra- 
ted three ruling houses under the Hapsburg name: the 
Austrian Hapsburgs, the blight formerly known as the 
fifteenth century House of Burgundy (Charles the 
Bold), and the social cancer which the fifteenth 
century house of Castile-Aragon had become under 
the evil guidance of Ferdinand. Those latter two added 
elements of the Hapsburgs ayed a key part in 
shaping the history of Europe. 

The notable features acquired from Castile-Aragon 
and Burgundy persist as outstanding charaeristics 
of the Austrian Hapsburgs and Old Vienna down to the 

days of the Adlers, von Mises, the **energeticists** 
around Ernest Mach, Rudolf Hilferding, and Parvus 
sub-agents N. Bukharin and Riazanov. They account, 
on the one side for the presence of such sitive fea- 
tures of Vienna as Mozart, Beethoven, Schubert, and 
Hugo Wolf. They account for such fruitful personali- 
ties as Ludwig Boltzmann and Erwin Schrodinger. 
They account for the moral tragedy of the gifted but 



elleually aborted Gustav Mahler. They account 
for the evil represented by Arnold Schonberg, the 
Vienna Circle, and the appropriateness of Old Vienna 
of the s and early s as the headquarters for the 
Rockefeller-created and always fascist-headed Inter- 
l organization. 

Charles V, the first Hapsburg monarch of Spain and 
the or fool the Fugger*s finance put o the st of 
Holy Roman Emperor, was a creature pathetically 
ruled by his conceptually petty (if grandiose) dynastic 
delusions. He was elleually only slightly above a 
modern scion of John D. Rockefeller II. He was there- 
fore more easily ruled by the cabal of monetarist 
bankers, led by his patron, the Fugger house, who con- 
trolled the skyrocketing Hapsburg debt, and the spigot 
of credit through which Charles's dynastic enterprises 

were molded. 
It is the Burgundian and Castilian features of the 

Hapsburg charaer which are notably relevant, as 
differentia specifica, to the Hapsburg side of Haps- 
burg licy in general and in Austria in particular. 

The fifteenth century House of Burgundy controlled 
the rtions of (principally) France and Switzerland 
then known as Burgundy proper, and also had 
dynastic control over Alsace-Lorraine and parts of the 
Netherlands. The special charaer of the Burgundian 
palace was its sharp contrast between the bestiality of 
its nobility and the magnificence of the predominantly 
Flemish paings and musical culture, which 
decorated the palace in accompaniment to the swinish 
gustatory festivities of the anachronistic Burgundian 
nobility and knighthood. The military and litical 
charaeristics of the fifteenth century Burgundian 
rule were a monstrous parody of the worst heritages 
from the feudal order at the beginning of the 
millenium. Under Charles the Bold  so known for the 
hideous aroma of his morality  the most precious 
cultural accomishments of humanist Europe were 
**patronized" not as art, but as some mere Rockefeller 
of today patronizes and exhibits an art for whose value 
 apart from market-price  he has neither 
knowledge nor capacity of perception. 

The hideous things done to and by Spain during the 
sixteenth century were not the inventions of Charles V 
or his psychologically unbalanced son, Philip II. They 
were the resulting Fuggery of the Hapsburg inheri- 
tance of the Castilian institutions molded by the wily 
Ferdinand of Aragon  the grandson of a converted 
Jew who launched the Spanish inquisition against the 
Jews. 

Prior to Ferdinand's successful manipulation of his 
own maage to Isabella  and the systematic 
elimination of Isabella's siblings from succession to 
the throne of Castile  Spain's ruling social strata 
were roughly assorted o cultured merchant and 



IFD)F=T®®B[i@x. PEM© EI^^ 




Dionysos, ancient god of wine, and modem symbol of the nominalist and Tory world outlook, shown with female 
worshippers on an Attic vase of the fifth century BC, 



noble families, refleing the sitive influences of 
Moorish and humanist culture and thought, and a 
backward, anachronistic assortment of bestial 
creatures who formed the hard core of the Castilian 
Reconquista. Under Ferdinand, not only were the 
existing agricultural and proto-industrial-capitalist 
achievements of Spain looted, principally to meet the 
debt-service obligations on funding the Reconquista, 
but this disgusting atavistic parody of feudalism 
known as the Reconquista was built o the savage 
force which, comemented by the ensification of 
the bestial Inquisition, destroyed the ernal 
economy and culture of Spain and many other coun- 
tries under Spanish control, to the  that the 
healing of those wounds has not yet been cometed in 
many of the areas to the present day. Ferdinand of 
Aragon ranks as perhaps more evil than Adolf Hitler 



in the properly written annals of modern history. It 
was the Castilian institutions assembled and set o 
motion by the evil Ferdinand which made the name of 
Hapsburg Spain so justly, so profoundly despised by 
every informed person of conscience from that day to 
the present . . . especially those of Spanish cultural 

descent. 

Charles V, the focus of a kind of animal cross- 
breeding of the pedigrees of Austria, Burgundy, and 
Castile, bequeathed to his house's immediate 
sterity the institutional qualities thus dragged in 
with the dynastic bedroom antics. This was the 
dynastic self-image which settled un Vienna, and 
remained there even after Richelieu and Mazarin 
undertook to resume remedial aions left undone by 
Louis XL 

As Christopher White details the crucial problems 







 

involved, Richelieu and Mazarin moved in the right 
direion, as did Colbert more emphatically and with 
profoundly better understanding after them. Unfor- 
tunately, the subsidence of the Fuggers and the 
collapse of Antwerep, while eminently deserved and 
useful in itself, merely produced the continuation of 
the monetarist problem in the personages of the 
Amsterdam bankers. The ague of monetarism 
undermined the English Commonwealth  attacking 
from Cromwell's blind side  eroded England under 
the Restoration Stuarts, and direly took over the 
British throne with the accession of the morally 
decayed House of Orange, The continuity of Austria*s 
relationships to European monetarist were persisted 
throughout these institutional adjustments. 

In the **x-rated" imate relations between the 
monetarists and ducal and royal bucolics, the titled 
obscenities depended un the monetarist financiers 
for their debts and the additional credit for dynastic 
enterprises. The financiers depended, in turn on the 
'^patents" and analogous privileges through which to 
pursue their erests within sundry domains, and 
un the funions of the debtor tentate as an armed 
debt-service colleor. This arrangement erlocked 
the two weirdly-mated creatures in a special sort of 
litical-economic symbiosis. The atavistic litical 
and social features of the dynastic order became the 
ernalized self-erest of the financiers. 

The case of Hapsburg Austria epitomizes the lit- 
ical basis for the emergence of what later became the 
geolitical dorine. The heritage of Hapsburg rule 
led, subsequently, to the lawfully developed pre- 
conditions most favorable to the special form of 
philosophical fascism suppurating from within the 
ranks and peripheral orbit of the "Vienna Circle.'* 

Economically and litically, the alliance of bucolic 
relics and monetarist financiers reduced the defini- 
tion of nations to the same "geometry" confronted in 
the infantile mind's heteronomic fantasy-perception 
of family and family-orbited relationships, () 
Nations, to this infantile outlook, have no acknow- 
ledged significant ernal qualities but those required 
for the fantasy scenario. The mental outlook of the 
monetarist financier is comparable to pre-adolescent 
girls aying with a set of dolls, building a doll-ay 
scenario. The result is broadly analogous to a kind of 
"uralist" or "social contra" image of nations, in 
which the monetarist-aristocratic agreement is the 
underlying aive element of the "contra" involved. 
Heteronomic nations' qualities are deemed those of 



. A clinical study of the Rockefeller family meetings during the 
lifetime of John D. II, including the kinds of clinically significant 
influences contributed by the boys' mother Abby, would be instruc- 
tive to similar effe. 



agreeableness or disagreeableness to the purses of 
the "contra." Once the aive princie  the 
ground rent princie  is put out of view, and one 
then attempts to account for the order determined by 
the ground-rent-generated licies, the reduionist 
approach to describing that abstraed order is the 
geolitical dorine. 

The lawful comement to the metaphysical doc- 
trine of geolitics is cultural relativism. Formally, 
cultural relativism is pure empiricism: it is moral in- 
difference respeing the ernal qualities of cultures 
as modes of attempted realization of vital human in- 
terests. The praice of British foreign licy, most 
emphatically beginning with William Pitt the Young- 
er, was defined in the reaionary Adam Smith's 
Wealth of Nations  a feature of that book which lurid- 
ly exses the dishonest motives governing its overall 
elaboration of contents. The confli between the insti- 
tutions of industrial progress and semi-republicanism 
which the British urban classes predominantly prized 
for England and Scotland, were totally out of 
corresndence with the conscious foreign licies of 
the British government. The stench of Pitt's adopting 
the tentate of Zanzibar as the "British agent of in- 
fluence" for the East African littoral, the restoration 
of collapsing relics of barbarism throughout the col- 
onies and semi-colonies, are exemary of the im- 
morality of British foreign licy. The attempted 
justification of propping up such hideous relics with 
aid of British naval and other forces is the praical 
basis for the dorine of "cultural relativism." 

The odious foreign licies praiced by Pitt and 
defended by Adam Smith  the foreign licies 
against which we fought our American Revolution  
were turned, by reaion formation, o the dorine 
of cultural relativism in the same way that nominalist 
heteronomy is transformed o fascism. It is not sur- 
prising that all fascist philosophy and litical doc- 
trines are axiomatically cultural relativist  doc- 
trines of the axiomatically genetic or cultural- 
traditional determination of "national charaer- 
istics" and "racial charaeristics." 

The ground-rent outlook projes o the view of 
nations a quality which the reduionist metaphys- 
ician purrts to discover in that nation once the fa 
of the ground-rent determination has been ignored. 

Since the monetarist denies in governing licy that 
technological progress is the source of wealth, he 
erprets all aspes of economy from the stand 
of ground rent. 

This  of view was systematically articulated by 
the rabidly pro-feudalist current among the eigh- 
teenthcenturyFrenchPhysiocrats,whoerpretedai>- 

solute profit as ground rent and attributed it to meta- 
physical qualities in nature taken as a fixed domain of 







fixed categories of primary resources. This is also the 
same rabidly pro-feudalist outline expressed by the 
Club of Rome's **Limits of Growth" quackery, and the 
axiomatic thesis un which the ill-conceived National 
Environmental Policy A has been transformed by 
comicit courts o a systematic destruion of the 
United States' most vital ernal erests. 

The concept of ground rent is charaerized by a 
corresndingly feudal-throwback definition of pri- 
mary resources. The economic approach of mone- 
tarists to industry and agriculture, as well as to the 
development of the labor force, is also brought under 
the same consistent ground-rent erpretations. The 
economic quality and material erests of nations 
are, consistently, defined according to the ^'economic 
geography" of a ground-rent erpretation of pri- 
mary and analogously defined resources. 

British colonialism thus produced and required the 
following notable ideological charaeristics; () a 
broad, categorical denial that the Idea of Progress 
refleed any necessary or proper sitive princie; 
() the dorine of cultural relativism; () the 
projeion of the dorine of ground rent to the con- 
ceptions of the determining erests represented by 
''economic geography." This was comementary to 
the little girls' doll-aying approach to the princies 
of foreign licy, the notion of a ''concert of weres." 
The weres were defined as embodying a heteronomic 
combination of litical (national cultural peculiar- 
ities) and material (economic geographical) essential 
s of self-erest, and an induively-defined 
common erest in the perpetuation of the **game" 
defined in the doll-aying scenario termed the ''con- 
cert of forces." 

This same hideous, infantile geolitical-concert 
dorine, which is the essence of Roosevelt's (Lipp- 
mann's) Atlantic Dorine, was otherwise the ernal 
dorine of the Hapsburg Austro-Hungarian Empire. 
The Hapsburg ononarchy, and its immediate bureau- 
cracy, was the reified instrument, the litical "con- 
cert" made flesh. Vienna, otherwise part of the 
Austrian nation, was at the same time predominantly 
something superimsed un Austria, the nesting 
ace of the supra-Austrian Hapsburg imbecility. 
Otherwise, the Empire was not a nation, but was 
predominantly anti-assimilationist in its litical, cul- 
tural, and economic licies. The only commonality of 
this Hapsburg Imperial bestiary of nationalities on 
exhibit was the Hapsburg "concert of were" itself: 
the concert of ground rent, the concert of the Imperial 
Army, the concert of the superimsed Imperial 

bureaucracy. 
A lapsed-time movement of consciousness from the 

fifteenth century stench of the gustatory revels of 

Burgundian Charles the Bold's court, to end of the 



 

eighteenth century Vienna must evoke a cry of "Deja 
vu!" On the walls of the Burgundian palace hung 
many of the greatest humanist paings of that time; 
the great Orlando di Lasso and his peers were obliged 
to perform for this miserably boorish audience. In 

Vienna, around the Hapsburg imbecility, one hears 
Mozart  whom the city fathers of Vienna consciously 
and systematically murdered by economic measures 
 Beethoven from Bonn, the looted artistic treasures 
of Italy, and so forth and so on. The Hapsburg bestial- 
ity colleed living art the way a pathetic Nelson 
Rockefeller colles pre-Columbian relics, a John D. 
Rockefeller III oriental art, and a David Rockefeller 
beetles. 

Stupid Naleon Bonaparte, who had the were to 
do better, omitted eradication of the Hapsburg obscen- 
ity during his conquest of Vienna. Naleon urinated 
un the imperatives of history; he established thus a 
licy which led fatefully to the crushing of not only 
Naleonic France, but the tentialities of both the 
French nation and of all of continental Europe. Nal- 
eon had learned nothing essential from Gresham, 
Bodin, Richelieu, Mazarin, and Colbert, nothing from 
the rich, crucial-experimental experience of the 
American Revolution. Naleon's stupidity, and 
London's were and guile, enabled the propped-up 
Hapsburg corpse to lurch on throughout the nineteenth 
century. 

The end of this Hapsburg cancer of European liti- 
cal life became visible in the wake of . By then, the 
House of Rothschild was fully in charge of the history 
of continental Europe, a  of no minor imrtance 
in the subsequent course of ernal Austrian and Vien- 
nese history. 

Baron James Rothschild, to whose despicable 
person we have had occasion to allude earlier, cannot 
be said to have overlooked the pseudo-feudal cultural 
tradition acquired with his branch's acquisition of an 

aristocratic title. It may be emphasized without exag- 
geration that the entire Rothschild crew were obses- 
sive freaks on the subje of acquiring aristocratic 

titles. Nathan's branch in Great Britain aced the 
gaining of a title (through Lord John Russell, the 
wicked grandfather of the evil Bertrand) only second 
to looting the British economy of ground rent. Having 
bought and paid for Austria's Metternich (and a 
Metternich mistress provided by the Rothschilds), 
they had no difficulty in satisfying such desires for the 
Austrian branch. The German (Frankfurt am Main) 
branch gained a sort of aristocratic dignity through 
Rothschild protege Bismarck  although some griind- 
lich Prussian bureaucrat "taed" the honor by omit- 
ting the standard cross, creating a special Hofjuden 
branch of the order in question. 
The condu of Baron James in the case of Heinrich 







 

Heine affords a foretaste of the Rothschild, and later 
Rockefeller praices toward talented scientists and 
other elleuals in Europe (and elsewhere) general- 
ly. The Rothschilds and Rockefellers colleed people 
the way a nouveau riche Mrs. Malaprop colles art 
objes. This is most relevant to the cases of the 
Frankfurt School's founding, and the influences of 
financial and related patronage operating in decaying 
Old Vienna. 

Heinrich Heine, one of Germany's greatest in- 
telles, and its greatest et, was born to a well-to-do 
Jewish family of Hamburg, incidentally notable for its 
association with the London-conneed Hamburg 
House of Salomon Heine. Living in exile in Paris, 
Heine attraed the lust of Baron James, who was ob- 
viously determined to have the great et by hook or 
crook  emoying both deorable methods to secure 

this goal. 

Heine was entitled to a legacy, which, had he receiv- 
ed it as was his due, would have enabled him to func- 
tion independent of corrupting influences of patron- 
age. Baron James, sensible of this tential obstacle 
to his desire, used his influence with the management 
of Salomon Heine to block Heinrich's receipt of such 
sums, and added the influence of the Hamburg Heine 
family to push Heinrich o the patronage of Baron 
James. Even Heine's ironical insults of Baron James 
before other guests in the Baron's house, did not en- 
able Heinrich to escape the desire of the unwanted 
patron. 

Hence, permitting himself to be snared by this Roth- 
schild scenario, the great Heinrich Heine ebbed inevit- 
ably o the moral deqay and self-repudiation which 
charaerized his miserable last years of life. 

Some foretaste of the nature of the moral decay of 
nineteenth century Old Vienna was exhibited in 
London circles of the beginning of that century, in the 
degeneration of English ets  and etry, and the 
reception given to Beethoven's music during the 
period of its initial presentations there. 

England has  not accidentally  not produced a 
decent comser since the deaths of Purcell and Wil- 
liam Byrd, subsisting thereafter by imrting (princi- 
pally) German musicians. () During the period 
Monteverdi, Buxtehude, Schiitz, and Bach were ef- 
feing a sweeping revolution in music  never to be 
superseded significantly in fundamentals except by 
Beethoven himself, English music and etry, which 
had been the cream of European culture during the 
Tudor period, briefly resurging during the seven- 
teenth century, unged o decay. Dryden, Pope, and 



. Just as English paing looted Italy. 



their logical outcome, David Hume's Hannoverian 
Scottish empiricism, were on the order of the day. 
English etry recovered slightly, once again, in an 
outburst of what was then a kind of neo-classicism 
typified by Keats and Shelley, but excepting that 
aborted episode in English literature, the British 
culture was overall on the way downhill. 

The literary code for the decay in British cultural 
morality was a radical erpretation of a widely 
circulated sixteenth-century Italian booklet entitled 
**The Courtier." In opsition to the profoundly im- 
passioned ^'conception of man and nature" which 
Shelley properly attributed to the periods of the 
Tudors and Milton, the British **uppah clawsses" af- 
feed a rabidly amoral diffidence  a stiff upper lip, 
presumably as compensation for lack of funion in 
other aspes of the person. The flatulent stench of 
dilettantism respeing everything but were and 
colleion of ground rent, became the preferred s- 
ture of an eminently respeable personage. Art should 
be **clever," "witty" ( in the deorable sense of that 
term), "amusing," and broadly achieve approval as a 
"nice little effort"  but it must not violate the prin- 
cie of psychological distance which rabid dilettant- 
ism prescribed. One is therefore not astonished by the 
banality of the published criticisms of Beethoven's 
works by the London press of the early nineteenth 
century. 

Granted, even the aristocratic dilettante often had 
strong concealed passions concerning were and 
ground-rent matters, but even in those few ense, 
bestial preoccupations, it was preferred form to pre- 
tend to be bored even by one's own obsessive am- 
bitions. There is happily a lawfully determined under- 
current of "American Whiggery'* in the British people 

 as the Rockefellers have lately noted with dismay 

 but it was formerly considered obligatory to sup- 
press such tendencies as "lowere class" egregiousness. 

The influence of City of London-centered finance in 
reenforcing the already bestial impulses radiating 
from the Hapsburg relic were accelerated by the 
circumstances following . 

After the - period, the influential, rich in- 
telleual life of pre- German culture overall al- 
most collapsed. Intelleual life retreated from all 
areas of inquiry but produion and the physical 
sciences. It was this, which was not only a German 
phenomenon, which produced the now century-old 
myth of the dichotomy between science and litics. 
As we have noted, the monetarist faion never 
adopted such a distinion. The monetarists rightly 
regarded science as the litical enemy of monetar- 
ism, because of its crucial funion in promoting the 
Idea of Progress. Just as the rabid Carter Administra- 
tion so recently attempted to negotiate a halt to fur- 



ther necessity for ernal scientific progress in the 
USA and Western Europe, by demanding that the 
Soviets agree to halt militarily relevant scientific pro- 
gress, the Rothschilds and Rockefellers have at- 
tempted to check science by various means, including 
cooptation and control of leading scientists through 
the sort of patronage Baron James Rothschild im- 
sed un Heinrich Heine. The credulous viims of 
the monetarists, however, submitted to the delusion 
that science and philosophy had been somehow 
separated on proper grounds of princie. 

The efforts of the Ernst Mach-linked **energet- 
icists'* to demoralize Ludwig Boltzmann, and the hid- 
eous campaign against Boltzmann's student Erwin 
Schrodinger by the foul pack of scientist-mercenary 
consciences led by Niels Bohr, are exemary of what 
was in progress in late-nineteenth century and early 
twentieth century Old Vienna. 

The elleual belongs sociologically to the petit- 
bourgeois stratum. A descendant of the feudal el- 
leual, the elleual in capitalist society funions 
(exists) modally as a house servant of either the state, 
the industries, finance, commerce, or the labor move- 
ment. The exemary elleual institutions, the uni- 
versities and research foundations, typify that '*house 

servant*' status. 

The contrasting great tential of the elleual  
unlike the ordinary petit-bourgeois  is that, at best, 
his circumstances and requirements of training oblige 
him properly to tend to develop an overview of society 
in its totality, both in extent and historically. Occas- 
ionally, in exercising such qualifications, he or she 
may rise to sitions of great executive were or 
related influence in industry, government or other 
institutions, and may otherwise develop a praical 
independent basis for personal identity in scientific 
work. Historically, as with the elleuals who creat- 
ed the American Revolution and established the 
Constitution and republic, the essential erdepen- 
dency between science and praical litical-economic 
affairs are blended o a praical expression of their 
proper commonality, as the epistemological outlook of 
humanism. 

Without such praical qualifications, the petit- 
bourgeois qualities of Uriah-Heepish house servants of 
patrons and emoyers predominate. Without exper- 
iencing scientific development in ideas and praice, 
the petit-bourgeois exists under the most contemptible 
of psycho-social circumstances, relative to the skilled 
worker, technology-proud farmer, or industrialist. 



 

Short of outright fascism, Old Vienna epitomizes the 
worst of all ssible moral influences for elleual 
life. The prevailing Hapsburg culture embodied in the 
extreme: antipathy to Progress; ground-rent-deter- 
mined forms of reduionism in respe of litical 
and social relations; rabid cultural relativism; and 
the infantile fantasy-life outlook lawfully refleed in 
the banality of Viennese Operettas, There was no be- 
lief in universal law, but only degenerate-Aristotelian 
habits, habits themselves in aggravated moral decay. 
With the eruption of **energeticism,'* science was 
being turned o an immoral parody of itself. Musi- 
cians struggled to perpetuate a culture without the 
moral outlook indispensable either to fruitful original 
comsition, or even a competent performer's insight 
o existing musical comsitions from a more fruit- 
ful past. As Boltzmann, Schrodinger, and the musicol- 
ogist Schenker epitomize, as the abortive efforts of 
Gustav Mahler and Sigmund Freud epitomize, the 
people of Vienna were not yet uniformly morally dead 
overall, but the advanced decay of a culture that had 
lost all purse for existing was sweeping over the 
majority like a moral bubonic epidemic. 

In the effort to rationalize this stink of the moral 
graveyard o Voltaire-Candide's '*best of all ssible 
worlds," decayed British-Viennese nominalism per- 
formed the a of reaion formation which pro- 
nounced moral imbecility a virtue, and thus estab- 
lished logical sitivism and its cognates as a dorine 

of philosophical fascism. 

It was the effluvia of this rotting elleual culture 
of Old Vienna which the Rockefellers transanted, 
one nesting pair of Vienna and Vienna-oriented 
emigres o each crucially situated university in the 
United States, there to a like cholera cultures, to 
spread their specific forms of philosophical fascism 
o every branch of liberal arts and even o the 
physical sciences themselves. This elleual pus 
from Old Vienna, abetted by similar moral refuse 
from the pre- Rothschild-founded and Rockefeller- 
funded Frankfurt School of Karl Korsch circles, is 
presently the hegemonic current throughout academ- 
ic and other institutionalized aspes of the liberal arts 
professions in the United States, 

It is through the sitive infeion with this vile doc- 
trine and its derivatives that an increasing prortion 
of our nation's professionals, and the liberals they in- 
fluence, have been transformed o shock-troops for 
fascist ideologies throughout the res of our leading 
institutions. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 




Benjamin Franklin, the founder of our country. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 



THE NEW 
FEDERALIST 
FOREIGN POLICY 







 

At the outset of this licy analysis, we emoyed 
the Lippmann - U.S. Foreign Policy 
and U.S. War Aims as a most appropriate axis of 

reference for examining the imication of the Atlanti- 
cist Dorine, and for identifying the fraud un which 
the enunciation and rationalization of that dorine 
have been necessarily premised throughout the pre- 
sent century since the reign of Colonel House and his 
mouthpiece Woodrow Wilson. 

We illustrated, in terms of the strongest praical 
relevance, the fa that the  has been reached at 
which it is no longer permissible to regard the Atlanti- 
cist Dorine merely as a grave error. The Atlanticist 
Dorine is, as we have demonstrated, the imsition 
of the special erest of a relatively tiny cabal of low- 
er Manhattan-centered financier erests un our 
nation, an imsition contrary to our nation's most 
vital erests, and which is in treasonous subversion 
of the constitutional princies un which our repub- 
lic was founded. 

Yet, despite that wicked subversion of our vital in- 
terests and institutions, it might have appeared in ear- 
lier times that we could have tolerated this usurpation 
as England so long tolerated the similar subversion of 
its institutions from the - period onwards. 

We have shown that the outer limits of toleration 
have been far surpassed. The skesmen for the 
Atlanticist faion, who have stolen our nation's 
Executive Branch and subverted our federal courts, 
are committed to keeping our nation on a collision 
course toward early, suicidal catastrophes. The most 
obvious of those catastrophes is the growing immi- 
nence of a general thermonuclear war with the War- 
saw Pa nations, a war in which the first day's extinc- 
tion of between  and  million estimated citizens 
epitomizes a virtual extinion of the United States as 
a funioning nation. That war danger is by no means 
the only principal catastrophe to be considered. The 
erests grouped for the moment around David 
Rockefeller are committed to the effort to attempt to 
secure a relatively short period of stnement of 
their insoluble bankruptcy, by putting both the United 
States and the entirety of the '*non-Communist world" 
through a hideous form of bankruptcy-liquidation pro- 
ceedings  systematically grinding down and scrap- 
ping our produive capabilities, reducing the major- 
ity of the human race to a brutalized rubble, in the 
effort to afford David Rockefeller and his associates 
the proceeds of the sale of scrap. 

The Rockefeller ^'environmentalist" licy  a l- 
icy of slashing energy consumption and general 
closing down of the world's industrial and agricultural 
tential  can only create in a relatively short time 
conditions on a global scale analogous to those which 
produced the genocidal famine and epidemics of 



fourteenth century central Europe  a global biolo- 
gical catastrophe during the course of the s whose 
consequences would be far, far worse than even those 
of a general thermonuclear war. If we unleash the 
destruion of industrial development tentialities, 
and at the same time imse a hyperinflationary 
austerity un the savaged general pulations of the 
OECD and developing nations, the conditions of 
biological deetion of human and livestock pu- 
lations, the low-technology deetion of agriculture, 
will produce successive waves of famines, epidemics 
and sylvatics which, in the absence of massive indus- 
trial produion to corre this, will probably lead to 
the early extinion of most of the human species and 
generate irreversible biospherical conditions ending 
the ssibility of future human life on this anet. 

These fas are so obvious, as fas, to persons and 
circles advantaged to know as the Rockefellers are, 
that we can no longer tolerate either the Rockefeller- 
centered Atlanticists, or the illusion that they repre- 
sent merely another wicked oppressor of the sort our 
race has known and tolerated too often during the 
past. The licies which the Rockefellers and their 
allies are pursuing obsessively are contrary even to 
the most vital human erests of the Rockefellers and 
their immediate allies, not only for the long run, but 
for the immediate future. It is no longer admissible to 
regard the Atlanticists merely as wiclced; they are 

colleively insane. 

That latter fa obliged us to go behind the immed- 
iate fas compelling such a conclusion. In light of the 
decades over which the majority of this nation  in- 
cluding forces adequate to have stopped the Atlan- 
ticists long before this  tolerated Atlanticist rule, we 
must account both for the obsessive irrationality of the 
Atlanticists and the processes which impelled the rest 
of us to tolerate Atlanticist rule for so long. It has been 
indispensable to locate those vicious weaknesses in 
ourselves which account for the perpetuation of Atlan- 
ticist rule; unless we recognize and remove those 
chains un our will, we, our nation, will soon die. 

Since our urgent objeive is to bring an end to 
Atlanticist licy, the rule by the Atlanticists must be 
ended to accomish that. Who, then, shall rule? A new 
licy, a new governing litical force must be 
promptly instituted. 

The same background considerations which ex- 
sed the reasons for the Atlanticists' colleive in- 
sanity and the nature of our self-degrading toleration 
established the firm basis for siting the alternative 
licies and the specifications of the new ruling liti- 
cal forces we urgently require at this immediate junc- 
ture. 

In such an undertaking, it would have been con- 
temptible to presume that the solution to those pro- 







found issues which have perexed so many for so long 
might be solved with the addition of a few pular 
atitudes to an array of superficially erpreted 
fas. Nor could the required analysis be accom- 
ished even by well-meaning, dedicated and elligent 
people on a moment's notice. It could be done only in 
the tradition of Benjamin Franklin, who dedicated 
decades of self-development respeing the vital is- 
sues of that age, decades of constant litical and 
scientific efforts in that committed direion, to bring 
forth the coherent set of princies and collaborators 
through which the American Revolution was under- 
taken and fought, and our Constitution and republic 
established. 

That observation is indispensable to a proper liti- 
cal insight o the propriety of our preceding coherent 
erweaving of science, constitutional law, theology, 
and historical evidence, to exse the roots of the im- 
pulses which divide our pulation between a Whig 
majority centered around industrialists, trade 
unionists and technology-proud farmers on the one 
side, and a wicked and insane Tory minority of mone- 
tarists, liberals and radicals on the other. () 

It is proper to state, in the same conneion, that 
humble Uriah Heeps make successful embezzlers, but 
they could never amount to anything useful in litical 
crises. The unique sition of advantage enjoyed by 
the present writer in this indispensable present under- 
taking is indeed unique and that special competence is 
not accidental. 

This writer has been enabled to supy the vitally 
needed contributions included in this licy study be- 
cause he has consciously prepared himself and his 
immediate associates for this kind of task over a peri- 
od of twenty years, and because he was advantaged 
to make such an undertaking by the special benefits 
contributed to him by both an American family and 
the Whiggish influences imparted to him by the Amer- 
ican refraion of European culture in general. () 

In the tradition of  yes !  Thomas Aquinas, Roger 
Bacon, Marsilio Ficino, Thomas Gresham, Johannes 
Keer, Jean Bodin, Rene Descartes, and Benjamin 
Franklin, this writer  drawing un the massive 



. It is not the writer's dissition to be such a weak-livered opr- 
tunist that he would avoid giving public credit to Vice-President Spiro 
Agnew for adopting the * 'silent majority" outlook. Agnew may have 
been wrong in various things, but not in that perception. 

. It is the corre, but too often misunderstood corollary of that 
same  that what is said is inseparable from who is saying it, and 
that the relationship is reciprocal: who determines what is said, but 
what is said defines the who. Everything stated to an imrtant  
expresses an autobiography, but the praical imications of what is 
stated is the meaning of the autobiographical content. Everything 
significant has a history which caused it; to understand the causal 
processes expressed by history means to understand the significance 
of its outcome. 



 

augmentation of resources contributed by his asso- 
ciates  is defining what United States licy and its 
ruling litical force must be. 

He is doing what a competent President of the 
United States ought to be doing under the present 
circumstances. The obligation of national leaders  
whether as President or in the alternate sition pres- 
ently occupied by this writer  is to lead, as Benjamin 
Franklin led. That is the essence of the institutions and 
instruments of a constitutional republic. 

To lead is not to cultivate cheap and easy pular 
agreement through demagogic sturing according to 
the winds of superficial currents of pular opinion. A 
President whose addresses and licies are shaped by 
Gallup or Has lls, the contrived public opinion of 
the Washington Post, New York Times or Newsweek, 
or last night's television news broadcasts, is unfit for 
eleion to the honorable office of dogcatcher. To lead 
is to fulfull the vital erests of a nation with respe 
to the most rigorously shaped foresight o the im- 
mediate and longer-term consequences of licies, 
aions, and inaions. A leader must be, in that sense, 
a '^philosopher king"  with the qualification that we 
Whigs abhor anything smelling of monarchy. 

For the obligations of leadership, the knowledge 
that is required is not properly defined by what acci- 
dents of current opinion rtray as sufficient know- 
ledge. The required knowledge is that knowledge 
indispensable for effeively forecasting the conse- 
quences of alternate approaches to the charaeristic 
problems of that nation and the world in that time. 
Heretofore, over this century, the standard of re- 
quired knowledge has been defined in terms of de 
fao acquiescence to the national and world order re- 
sulting from the consolidation of Atlanticist rule over 
this nation. The accepted standards of knowledge 
have correlated with a toleration of treason, and a 
fateful downhill slide o our present national and 
global predicaments. 

During the preceding two decades, this writer was 
of a different persuasion in elaborated outlook than 
most of our nation's leading circles. He foresaw the 
lawful course of a developing disaster, and forecast 
that process of crisis in terms which have been entire- 
ly vindicated by the subsequent two decades* develop- 
ments. Although the writer's starting- was that 
commitment to the Idea of Progress which he shared, 
as a governing impulse, with a majority of his fellow 
citizens, the unfolding disaster and the further expe- 
rience of its lawful developments demonstrated that 
such fellow Whigs were not emoying, and to a 
significant degree, did not ssess, the perception of 
kinds of knowledge indispensable to seeing through 
and correing a process leading to disaster. Hence, 
the divergence between the fa that his aions were 







 

premised un the same Whig impulses and imicit 
goals as a majority of his fellow citizens and the 
separation between his licy opinions and those of the 
overwhelming majority. 

Fortunately, in consequence of an appropriate 
fusion of the religious and scientific commitments 
transmitted o his early development, his sense of 
personal identity was premised in the moral cer- 
taies of knowledge rather than the heteronomic 
seduions of prevailing opinions. Consequently, the 
commitment to develop the necessary knowledge 
through which to realize the Whig impulse became for 
him a governing and impassioned commitment. 

In the course of this past two decades, approximate- 
ly a decade ago, this personal effort was extended o 
the development of an association built predominant- 
ly of gifted young people who typified the elleual 
cream of our nation's young adults of the late s 
and early s. Since , the extraordinary qualities 
of personal charaer and creative elleual 
achievement embodied in that broader association 
brought the writer and his associates o increasing 
contiguity and later collaborative discussions with 
leading circles in our nation and abroad. This latter 
process, paralleling and errelated with our deepen- 
ing influence with broad layers of our nation*s working 
people, farmers, and accomished scientists, shaped 
the U.S. Labor Party and its associated aivities o 
a significant litical institution both in our nation and 
abroad. 

During the period from the spring of , and espe- 
cially during the last months of , the U.S. Labor 
Party became in fa an egral part of an imminent 
Whig coalition of anti-Atlanticist majority forces with- 
in the United States. That coalition, now approximate- 
ly at the threshold of coming o being, represents 
the identifiable charaeristic strata we have already 
noted to this effe: conservative Republican and 
Democratic parties' Whigs, litical Whigs outside 
those parties, the major trade-union forces, tech- 
nology-proud farmers, the black and hispanic working 
Americans who justly aspire to full participation in a 
new wave of accelerated technological progress, 
scientists and engineers who wish to be scientists and 
engineers in fa, industrialists committed to rebuild- 
ing the nation and the world with the instrument of the 
*'high technology" which we, the other OECD nations, 
and the CME A nations joly represent. 

The special historic obligation of the U.S. Labor 
Party at this junure is to provide those conceptions 
which afford appropriate unity of licy and effort to 
the Whig coalition which must become the new 
Federalist rnovementy the ruling litical force of our 
republic. The U.S. Labor Party, like Benjamin Frank- 
lin, like the initiating founders of our nation, must 



unite the Whigs by conneing the purse embedded 
in Whig impulses to that national licy which repre- 
sents a conscious and efficient realization of such a 
common imicit purse. 

That historic obligation has become a reality  
rather than only a tentiality  through the expe- 
rience of the months from August of last year to the 
present time. Those various Republican, Democrat, 
trade-union, industrialist and other American Whigs, 
who as late as last December still regarded the U.S. 
Labor Party's evaluation of the Carter danger as 
exaggerated, have increasingly professed themselves 
astonished by the precision with which the Labor 
Party forecast the monstrousness now emanating 
from the Rockefeller's captive Carter Administration 
and the federal courts. This, combined with the impul- 
sion of a desperately bankrupt David Rockefeller 
to violate the thresholds of countervailing reaion to 
his evil demands, has situated the Labor Party in cir- 
cumstances of whose precedents in our nation's histo- 
ry we are so visibly sensible. 

The long-simmering renewed battle between Amer- 
ican Whig and American Tory now verges un the 
threshold of an irrepressible confli. The quality of 
crisis which breaks through the lag in historical 
developments, the crisis which makes the knowledge 
of irrepressible confli sensuous to broader forces, is 
now un us. Unless we defeat the Carter energy, 
hyperinflationary austerity, and related foreign l- 
icies, our nation will die  either by thermonuclear 
holocaust or biological catastrophe. The trip-wire of 
fateful, irreversible decision has been struck. Now we 
must move  or die. 

The nation must move with the U.S. Labor Party  
or die mewling in its own cowardice. 

The writer does not know in advance what exa 
consequences that will have for the future status of the 
Labor Party itself. He does not know, for exame, 
whether the Whig coalition will ele him to the Presi- 
dency, or on what precise basis that ssibility might 
occur if it were to occur. What is certain is that the 
Whig coalition must quickly become the ruling liti- 
cal force  and that that includes a congressional 
aion modeled in a legal sense un the inelegant 
precedent of the Tories' own **Watergate" caper. The 
weres of the Congress are the vital constitutional 
bastion remaining to us to save the nation, a Congress 
which in turn must be moved in adequate prortions 
by a mobilized Whig eleorate. In this course of 
events, respeing the Labor Party we only know with 
certay that we are a key initiating elleual 
litical force in catalyzing the necessary licies and 
instruments o being. 

The key to that present, vital historic obligation of 
the U.S. Labor Party is the developed body of ap- 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



propriate knowledge represented in the preceding 
seions of this present licy study. That conceptual 
overview  or, at least the essence of it  represents 
the necessary fresh and freshly enlarged expression 
of our humanist, American Whig heritage, which is in 
turn the indispensable foundation in knowledge for the 
criticism and shaping of our licies and instruments. 
It is for this present crisis- that that body of 
knowledge was developed, and it is in the process of 
developing that knowledge  principally through the 
mediating role of the writer and his associates  that 
that knowledge has been shaped o the form ap- 
propriate to the specific needs of this crisis as this 
crisis has in fa developed. 

That is nothing but a fresh illustration of the princi- 
es of scientific progress in general, and an illustra- 
tion of the proper course of real litics. It is the un- 
derstanding and exercise of true, lawful freedom by 
the creative individual, through the broadening of con- 
certed efforts of creative personalities, that the dis- 
covery, transmission, and assimilation for informed 
willful praice of necessary enlargement of the body 
of knowledge is accomished. 

The foreign and domestic licies of the United 
States have only one admissible axiomatic basis: the 
fundamental erest of humanity is expressed by 
technological progress as the common licy of a 
world comsed of sovereign, viable republics. 

The praical expression of that single axiomatic 
premise is those measures which are appropriate to 
a twofold resolution to, first, sitively, foster the 
fulfillment of that princie, and, second, to contain 
and check the contrary impulses of persons and 
nations insofar as such wrong impulses threaten the 

fulfillment of that licy in our nation or globally. 

Those coherent precepts of princie and praice 
must be established as licy and understood as the 
governing erpretation and original ent of our 
constitutional law. 

That licy and law is elaborated in two respes. 
First, our people, our institutions, and other nations 
must be informed of the proper imications of our us- 
age of the terms ^^technological progress'* and **sov- 
ereign, viable republics.** Second, we must situate 
that outlook, that method, that licy, that funda- 
mental princie of law, in respe of the present and 
forecastable national and global circumstances to 
which that licy, that law is to be presently apied. 

The central feature commonly underlying the 
notions of * 'technological progress** and '^sovereign, 
viable republics,*' is the notion of litical freedom 
peculiar to the neo-atonic humanist tradition in- 
clusively embedded in the establishment of our own 
republic. Although this rigorous notion of freedom 
governs our condu respeing those liberties proper- 



 

ly associated with toleration, our notions of freedom 
and toleration are respeively distin, in no sense 
erchangeable notions in the apication of licy 
and law. 

Freedom is rigorously defined as that process of 
self-development and expression of the kinds of crea- 
tive tentialities within each human individual which 
are pularly typified by great scientific discoveries. 
It is the discovery, transmission, and assimilation of 
willful impulses of useful praice of new knowledge 
on the initiative of creative individuals, which is the 
sitive expression and content of freedom, and it is 
that were of creative advancement which the law 
must foster and for whose expression it must provide 

appropriate liberties. 
The comement of the notion of freedom is science. 

From the stand of law, new knowledge is not any 
sort of novelty which may erupt from this or that in- 
dividual. There are rigorous, accessible, empirical 
proofs which absolutely distinguish nonsensical or 
destruive novelties from fruitful advances in the 
direion of human knowledge for praice. 

These methods of proof, although rigorous and cer- 
tain, involve the difficulty of princie that it is not 
ssible for a nation and its relevant institutions to 
predetermine in every case the soundness or unsound- 
ness of a novelty at the  of its first presentation. 
Although scientific knowledge enables us to pre-locate 
the areas for new, fruitful conceptions for praice in 
such a way as to exclude obvious nonsense and evil, 
within those pre-locatable areas of fruitful new 
developments, the law does not and must not rude. 
Hence, in respe of novel ideas and praices, the law 
defines areas of toleration, which become the domain 
of corresnding individual and related liberties. 

Toleration has two proper objeives. Since the 
basis for the sitive expression of freedom by the 
individual is self-development, and not obedience, 
individual and related behavior known to be wrong 
and even tentially olerable if broadly extended, is 
tolerated within limits. The guiding princie is the 
same one appropriate to the rearing of infants, chil- 
dren and adolescents. We tolerate as much as the 
public erest can praically endure. This does not 
signify that we withhold efficient criticisms, or that 
we do not express preferences in praical ways. This 
extends to our discrimination among crimes, mis- 
demeanors, and civil offenses. 

Whereas we tolerate, concerning immature citizens 
and eng adults, to allow for imied oprtunities 
for self-development, our toleration (liberties) re- 
speing ideas and praices representing new know- 
ledge concerning forms of behavior and licy has a 
different view. Society is obliged, in its own vital in- 
terest, to discover which innovations have merit. This 







 

requires not only communication of new ideas as 
ideas, but exorations of ideas in terms of praice. 
Hence, while society tolerates negatively a certain 
amount of known sin, it tolerates sitively in those 
areas of innovative aivity, new ideas, set aside for 
the initiation and initial testing of discoveries. The 
sitive content of this aspe of toleration is exem- 
ified by the propriety of funding scientific and anal- 
ogous researches whose specific praical outcome is 
yet unknown. The indicated competence of the effort is 
the basis for defining the scope of the area of tolera- 
tion and privilege. 

The lawful definition of technological progress can- 
not be blind to the thermodynamic erpretation of 

the secular trends of human technological progress 
from the Pleistocene to date. We know, and the law 
would be morally imbecilic if it professed to evade the 
authority of such fas, that human progress depends 
un the following erdependent thermodynamical- 
ly described conditions. 

It is an established historical fa that the notion of 
an existing sperum of essential primary and related 
resources, including man-made improvements in 
nature, is determined by the mode of produive and 
related technology prevailing in each immediate 
ech of society's development. If the technological 
mode is fixed at any preestablished level, the mere 
continued existence of a society in that fixed or ap- 
proximately fixed mode must lead to a relative dee- 
tion of primary and man-made resources, leading 
toward the material and social decay of that society. 

The immediate, overall feature of human progress 
is therefore necessarily those advances in the prevail- 
ing mode of technology which, in effe, increase what 
is conventionally termed the ''reducing were" of the 
society with respe to the existing condition of nature 
as a whole. This is expressed by an increase in the 
average per capita energy flux through both pro- 
duion and household and related forms of consump- 
tion. 

This increase in what is conventionally understood 
to be the relative negentropy of a society relative to its 
preceding, lowere average technological level, in- 
creases the required rate of negentropic further 
development. 

This rate of tential increase in negentropy is ex- 
pressed in capitalist and socialist litical forms of 
industrialized development in terms of the absolute 
profit of national and global industrial and agri- 
cultural produion. 

This profitable rtion of industrial and agricultural 
produion is represented by the comparison of the 
industrial and agricultural tangible and produive- 
labor cost-inputs of produion with the mass of pro- 
du resulting, as output, from produion, on con- 



dition that the produced produ is consumed in turn 
as inputs to the same effe for new produion of at 
least the same negentropic efficiency. The balance of 
input-costs and output-produ in those terms, mea- 
sured in respe to national and global economies 
taken as a whole, is the absolute profit. 

It is the 'investment" of at least the major rtion 
of that absolute profit in the enlargement and techno- 
logical advancement of the produive process which 
transforms tential increases in negentropy o 
realized increases in negentropy. 

The indispensable negentropic results are achieved 

chiefly in two erconneed ways. The allocation of 
absolute profit, and maenance and materials costs 
to emphasize relatively more advanced, established 
technologies increases the resulting average techno- 
logical level of produion. The reenishment of the 
stock of existing more-advanced technologies by still 
more-advanced technologies, contributed through 
science and engineering, is the indispensable basis for 

the continuation and advancement of the process of 
realization of absolute profit to effe sustained tech- 
nological progress. 

This demonstrates the thermodynamical imica- 
tion of effeive new forms of scientific and engineer- 
ing contributions. The thermodynamic content of ad- 
vances in fundamental and apied scientific know- 
ledge is the increased negentropy they represent in re- 
spe to their universalizing effes in the develop-, 
ment of the produive process. 

This historically demonstrated fa concerning the 
necessity and imications of technological progress 
defines its own lawful bounding conditions. Since the 
creative tentialities of the individual human mind 
are the primary cause and driving force of human pro- 
gress, progress depends un the ordered develop- 
ment of these advancing weres in the individual. The 
role of education direed to that effe is most ob- 
vious. Less obvious at first glance, but fundamental, it 
is the general material conditions of life, work, and 
leisure, the culture of the pulation, which represent 
the indispensable preconditions for progress. As a 
society advances technologically in respe to pro- 
duion as such, the source of future progress would 
tend to evarate unless the constantly rising 
material costs per capita of producing, nurturing, and 
maaining individuals were met. 

That set of irrefutable fas is the basis for the 
notion of a body of universal natural law, both with re- 
spe to science and technology as such, and with re- 
spe to social processes and governing ideas and laws 
concerning both society as a whole and its egral 
funion of accomishing technological progress. 

The historical fas so identified, respeing our 
species' upward progress from the baboon-like culture 







of the Pleistocene period, define man, our species, as 
expressing a self-subsisting and universalizing si- 
tive princie. Man's deliberate development of his 
weres is the means by which he deliberately provides 
the tential basis for the increase of his weres to 
progress still further. 

That is the unique and fundamental distinion 
between man and the lowere forms of life. That is the 
ordering princie which distinguishes rigorously be- 
tween higher and lowere forms of human society. 

It is also the unique princie on which the sacred- 
ness of the individual human being is established on a 
praical basis. Every individual represents the 
tential to initiate, transmit, and assimilate for 
praice new technological and other indispensable 
new knowledge. That knowledge, added to society 
through the efforts of such individuals, represents a 
tential and permanent advancement in the develop- 
ment of the human species as a whole  an immortal 
and universal contribution. 

It is a corollary princie of universal natural law 
that a society which repudiates progress degrades its 
members to the moral condition of a lowere beast. It 
has repudiated and suppressed that quality which 
uniquely distinguishes man morally and praically 
from the lowere beasts. 

This view of man, its crucial proof arising from the 
study of that produive praice un which his exis- 
tence and culture depend, establishes the epistemoiog- 
ical outlook which is the body of universal natural law 
in its broader aspe, that aspe which is immediate- 
ly the proper ordering of knowledge respeing man in 
all respes, and which is the only proper basis for 
laws of nations. 

The existence of man, which is the result of the 
labors of generations over millions of years, and of a 
secular upward sweep of technological progress 
during the most recent ten thousand years, is in itself 
a universal proof of the epistemological quality of the 
ordering of the laws of the universe. The direed out- 
come of human innovation, viewed in the indicated 
thermodynamic frame of reference, has proven the 
appropriateness of that direedness of creative scien- 
tific and equivalent discovery to increasing mastery 
of the universal ordering of the universe. By abstra- 
ing from the erdependent conceptual and praical 
aspes of that overall progress, we are enabled, with 
increasing effeiveness through further progress, to 
define the aspes of the ordering of scientific 
hytheses created by individuals with respe to the 
ordering of that technological and related praice 
which in turn represents a rising rate of negentropy in 
man's overall relationship to nature, effeed through 
the universalizing conneion of the entire society to 
nature as a whole. 



 

We are thus enabled to probe o our own individual 
natures, to the corresnding qualities of institutions, 
and to discriminate between those direed princies 
of thought which lead to increasing human perfeion 
 which we call good, and those traits of mental and 
social life which abort progress or worse  which we 
call evil. That is theology, but it is also science, and it 
is the only tolerable perception of the ordering prin- 
cie of law. The law which does not recognize that as 
its governing truth is a morally imbecilic praice of 
law. 

With nations which consciously and efficiently 
govern themselves by such princies, the United 
States has a community of princie. With nations 
which praice laws and licies to such effe without 
consciousness of the princies involved, the United 
States must cooperate on the basis of agreement in 
praice. With nations which lack either degree of 
qualification the United States has a licy of 
toleration or abhorrence, as praical considerations 
of national and global vital erests determine. 

The same princies govern United States domestic 
licies. Among the identified, clearly demarcated 
conditions, there are ermediate degrees, each de- 
fined by a kind of resolution of comex praical 
arrangements; for such cases the erlations of 
United States foreign and domestic licy, law, and 
praice appropriate to such ermediate conditions 
ought to be sufficiently clear for needs of apication 
to concrete cases as confronted. 

Natural law, the proper governing law of the law of 
the United States, does not regard nations or individ- 
uals as equal in respe of equal rights to express their 
ostensibly charaeristic impulses. Law properly 
gives to each nation and individual the tential right 
to enjoy equal rights, but the nature of those rights is 
defined for the advantage of the moral individual. The 
immoral nation or individual has the right to behave in 
the way afforded for a moral individual. We define the 
rights and liberties of freedom and toleration for 
moral persons, and then extend those same rights 
insofar as vital erests permit to all other individ- 
uals. That is the long and the short of the princie 
involved. 

If evil  for exame, a Ralph Nader demanding 
destruion of our nation's vital erests  demands 
that it has equal rights to realize its desires and per- 
ceived self-erest with the scientist, engineer, trade 
unionist concerned to develop our produive forces, 
then we say to Ralph Nader: Evil is not equal to good 
before the law. The same rule apies to foreign l- 
icy. 

For exame. The nation of Mexico, like Brazil, has 
a substantial foreign financial debt outstanding. Some 
of this indebtedness represents useful goods delivered 







 

to Mexico in good faith on fair terms. Another rtion 
of the debt represents the fiitious capitalization of 
old debts, and similar questionable origins. Shall we, 
as the United States drawn o U.S. citizens' claims 
against Mexico, declare simy that a **debt is a 
debt?*' That would be moral imbecility. Should the 
credit of a National Bank of the United States be 
deoyed to guarantee a U.S. exrter's delivery of 
capital goods and related installation services to a for- 
eign nation for a viable development purse? Ab- 
solutely. Should the credit of the United States be 
hythecated to the International Monetary Fund or 
some like institutions to bail out the fiitious capitali- 
zations some U.S. citizen has piled up through the 
Cayman-Bermuda off-shore Eurodollar swindle? 
Absolutely not. Not to make such lawful distinions 
would be moral imbecility. The law must not be based 
on the mere formalities of fiions, in either national 
or foreign matters, but on the content of the issue, the 
morally defensible aspe of ent refleed in the fic- 
tions of law. 

For exame. Federal court decisions respeing 
enforcement of the National Environmental Policy 

A. It is a fa that the session of the U.S. Congress 
which passed that particular abomination was insen- 
sible in the main of the ent and imications of the 

legislation itself. That, unfortunately, has been 
commonly the case. Nonetheless, it is admissible in 
law to consider the negative ent of Congress, By 
any stretch of the imagination, can it be construed to 
have been the will of Congress that our vital national 
erests in produive development, emoyment, 
and so forth should be systematically savaged through 
court aions, in the way we have witnessed through 
the cumulative effe of patterns of federal and other 
court decisions? 

Either the courts perpetrating such a construion 
of the legislative ent are perpetrating a fraud re- 
speing any reasonable construion of ent in fa, 
or they are violating the Constitution by arrogating the 
weres reserved to the legislative branch. It is the 
ain duty of the other constitutional branches of 
government to nullify such violations of the Constitu- 



. We do not deny that the Supreme Court and federal courts have a 
specific were of de fao taw-making authority. However that 
authority is delimited to and generated by the specifications and clear 
ent of the Constitution. This is categorically delimited to matters in 
which legislators or executives have overstepped a constitutional 
boundary in form or praical effe, or in which matters direly 
affeing the ent of the Constitution for praice must be decided in 
the absence of subordinate sitive law for that category of praical 
issue. The federal courts, aing under the clear ent of the Consti- 
tution obviously must be equally sensitive to the omissions of law in 



tion by the courts, and to remove those judges who 
manifest a pattern of such tentially impeachable 
offenses. () 

The princies of licy and law just summarized 
are eternal They are the expression of the primary 
driving force of natural law, the primary causal force 
in human development which generates the proper 
ordering of successive evolutionary developments 
within society. 

The princie of sovereign, viable republics is also a 
universal princie of present natural law, but is 
historically specific to the modern period of European 
culture*s development up to the present time. A feudal 
republic is an absurd contradiion in terms; the 
present cultural development of the general pula- 
tion in the most advanced nations neither warrants a 
pure democratic form nor would an existing pula- 
tion be capable of effeively adapting  through a 
reasonable period of trial-and error  to a pure 
democratic form if it were bestowed un them. The 
arguments of John Milton and Federalist Tom Paine 
against the follies of democracy are appropriate in 
princie to the present circumstances. For the 
present, the republic form agrees with the universal 
praical requirements of natural law; but, it is 
not an eternal princie, rather a specific form 

bounded before-and-after by preceding and future 
developments. 

Naturally, numerous liberals and radicals will howl, 
shriek and stamp their feet in objeions to this. 
Respeing their objeions, it is most emphatically 
the fa that their sort continues to exist in excessive 
prortions that absolutely prohibit a workable pure 
democracy. Hence, in princie, their objeions have 
no competent standing before the law. In praice, we 
Whigs are the overwhelming majority, who must and 
who will govern. We shall keep the U.S. Constitution, 
follow it in accordance with its original ent, and we 
shall keep the republic  and, so, for the immediately 
foreseeable future, any Tory's objeions to this licy 
must remain moot. That settled, the liberals and radi- 
cals should stop their noisemaking, the better to follow 
a lesson they sorely require. 



imrtant matters aced before them as to the improprieties of 
enament and apication of law. 

There is no such proper use of weres in the kinds of decisions we 
have denounced. Not only was there no competent premise in the 
attributable ent of Congress to enable the consequences against our 
vitai erests those decisions involve, but the "legislative initiative'* 
of the court aion was on the same  in dire violation of the 
ent of the Constitution. Whether on grounds of folly or a revis- 
ionist's malice against the Constitution, such a pattern of decisions 
contrary to our vital national erests is the clearest basis for 
removal of such judges. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



 ► 



Sovereign Republics 



The specific notion of sovereign, viable republic 
we most urgently require for immediate praice 
is most efficiently defined by proceeding immediately 
at this  to the crucial  of United States 
foreign licy, our relations with the Soviet Union. We 
shall proceed by first examining those relations from 
the stand of the notion of a republic, and then 
continue o the principal praical topics of our 
foreign licy. That latter accomished, we shall then 
focus, in conclusion, on the urgent alterations in the 
organization and funioning of the U.S. Executive 
Branch required by considerations of licy and law in 
the foreign-licy context. 

For reasons of simifying the discussion. United 
States foreign licy will be treated as if the writer 
were President of the United States. His temperament 
does not generate any personal ambitions of that sort 
as a matter of private ambition. For the moment, the 
writer simy knows of no one else with the special 
personal qualifications that office requires at this 
junure. () This approach simifies the discussion, 
in the respe that it is much simer to state the 
licy and law in the way the writer would serve it 
than to constru a general case for a *'Mr. X'* of un- 
known special style. 

The broadest  to be made concerning the Soviet 
Union ought to be clear enough  to the  that a 
Walter Lippmann. were he alive, would agree that far. 
On condition that we remove the lunatics' hands from 
the Executive Branch of our government, the aions 
and inaions of the United States and Soviet Union 
are going to shape the global litical and economic 
environment of other nations for decades to come. As 
these two weres a to common purse or in opsi- 
tion, so the fate of people throughout the world will be 
largely determined. 
At that , we immediately part company with 



, About three years in office, to comete an impeached incum- 
bent's term, would probably be about the minimum-maximum range 
of tenure before this writer desired to advance to the comforts and 
leadership duties of a sixtyish elder statesman. 



the non-hythetical Mr. Lippmann of his writings and 
even the most amiable among his fellow-Atlanticists. 
We are not nominalists. We will not spin out geoli- 
tical schemas of Atlantic communities, China-Japan 
spheres, Asian blocs, Soviet orbits, or other such 
childish doll-aying. Our foreign licy proceeds 
from the stand of reference of community of prin- 
cie, not customs, geography or any such alternate 
metaphysical droolings. It is the ernal charaer of 
the Soviet state that mainly shapes our Soviet foreign 
licy. 

From the stand of fundamental United States 
licy and law, as we have specified it, we have a 
fundamental community of princie with the Soviet 
republic in respe of both national and global licies 
of technological progress. The sticky s are pri- 
marily questions concerning the ernal charaer of 
the Soviet republic, and secondarily, the imications 
of the ernal charaer of the Soviet state for the 
litical content  and ent  of Soviet foreign 
licy. Concerning the secondary issue, we shall say 
for the moment that the spere of a Communist 
bogeyman sneaking out from Moscow by night to take 
over the world is just that  a  we shall return to, 
but which we put aside for the moment in order to 
focus entirely for the moment on the issue of the Soviet 
republic itself. 

First, let us say a number of very uneasant things 
about the Soviet Union's ernal life. Let us not fear to 
risk exaggerating here and there in estimating the de- 
gree of awfulness which formerly prevailed or 
presently exists. By taking such things at their ssi- 
ble worst, we have put the  in the discussion- 
framework suited to a rigorous foreign-licy con- 
sideration. 

The  Bolshevik, or ^'Oober" Russian 
Revolution seized the centers of urban litical were 
of a war-wrecked and chaotic relic of Czarist were. 
Even under the best of circumstances  for exame 
the - period of Czarist Russia  the Bolshevik 
inheritance would scarcely represent a socialist trans- 



 







 

formation leaping upward from the apex of European 
civilization. The cultural level of the general pula- 
tion, the broader social infrastruure, were hideous. 
What the Bolsheviks inherited in  was worse. 

The irony of Czarist Russia was that its then fairly 
recent sition as a focus of major industrialist capital 
investments had bestowed un a few centers some of 
the greatest industrial ants in Europe. Yet, the 
majority of the workers emoyed  like the Russian 
army  were former peasants. Socially, otherwise, 
Russian urban culture was top-heavy with cosmo- 
litan or semi-cosmolitan elleuals and pseudo- 
elleuals  of which a majority were attached to 
the Liberal, Menshevik and other litical opnents 
of the Bolsheviks. Under the stress of the erventions 
of the st-Oober period, the Bolsheviks were 
reduced  at the top  to a handful of left-Menshevik 
and Populist offshoots and themselves, immediately 
suprted by a cadre and semi-cadre of skilled and 
semi-skilled workers and non-commissioned officers 
(primarily), and beyond, the brutalized Russian 
masses of worker semi-peasants and the gray, 
brutalized mass of the peasantry itself. The agri- 
culture of  was already suffering the effes of 
levies of peasant conscripts o the meatgrinder of 
the Czarist and Kerenskiad's infantry. The Brest-Lit- 
ovsk peace and other calamities made the 
agricultural crisis acute. Without Poland, the 
economy of Great Russia's industry was surgically 
cut in two. The already war-weary industries of  
were exhausted by lack of maenance supies by 
- and the war mobilizations. Most of the best 
cadres of the soldiery and ants died exemary 
deaths of military leadership on the Red Army's 
battlefields. Within the highest ranks of the Bolsheviks 
themselves there were the Karl Radeks, the N. 
Bukharins, the Riazanovs and numerous others with 
long-standing pedigrees as Parvus sub-agents or 
otherwise involved in various ways with the Anglo- 
Dutch-headed elligence networks. 

Significantly through the influence of Karl Radek 
and others, the Communist International was reduced 
to a shambles by . The sapped Soviet republic was 
doubly isolated, mooting seriously the looming proba- 
bilities of its early extinion by combinations of in- 
ternal shortages and various external erventions. 

Through the influence of the Bukharins and others, the 
delay of vital industrial development, industrializa- 
tion which should have been begun by no later than 
-, almost ruined Soviet ernal and tential 
foreign credit, unleashing an ernal inflation  - 
creating the basis for the draconian bitterness of the 
subsequent colleivization process. From the end of 
 and beginning of , the Soviet leadership pre- 
pared for the invasion from Nazi Germany it knew to 



be inevitable, and rightly estimated would be 
launched probably with the overt or covert aid and 
insistence of the British-led Western weres. 

From the outset to the present  without further list- 
ing the principal relevant, horror-ridden s of 
background  the Soviet republic has been a gason 
economy, struggling to balance the obligations of a 
modern great were's military establishment against 
the thrice-repeated (st-, st-, st-) 
effort to build a modern industrial economy from the 
combined catastrophes of inherited backwardness 
and war-caused rubble. This economic development 
 us the prortionally monstrous burdens of the 
military on capital-goods produion  was ac- 
comished by the most stringent means to which a 
modern economy can resort: savage primitive ac- 
cumulation. 

To make matters worse, although the leading 
Bolsheviks were dedicated and increasingly praical, 
they were, after Lenin's death litical amateurs by 
Marx's or even Rosa Luxemburg's standards, and 
excepting the gifted Preobrazhensky, not a single 
known leading figure ssessed any genuinely original 
theoretical-economic competence. 

Although Soviet experience and technological and 
cultural development have created a broad, even 
impressive basis for government and industry, the 
Soviet institutions of **official Marxism-Leninism" 
are predominantly a bad joke which the CPSU has 
perpetrated un itself and credulous admirers from 
abroad. This contrast between Soviet military 
strategic excellence and the emerging world 
hegemony of the Soviets in basic physics, on the one 
side, and the litical amateurism of the majority of 
the Soviet Politburo, on the other, are present ex- 
pressions of the irony which has charaerized Soviet 
development from the beginning. This litical 
ingenuousness, aggravated by pretenses of Kremlin 
**dorinal infallibility" on those same topics, has 
caused the Soviets to pursue even otherwise corre 
and commendable efforts of ernal development 
often in the crudest litical fashion. 

Although significant circles within the Soviet leader- 
ship and the CMEA countries have moved way beyond 
the blundering Oblomovism which sils Soviet lead- 
ership perceptions overall, the dismal heritage of 

the past is to this day an imrtant  and, at this 
moment, a tentially most dangerous element in the 
situation. It is that aspe of Soviet life which the 
Atlanticists have so recklessly miscalculated in their 
wishful appraisals of the Soviet leadership. Oblomov 
will retreat and retreat, as pragmatically as Henry 
Kissinger might reasonably desire, until a threshold is 
crossed. Then, Oblomov, a Russian romanticist who 
knows only retreat and attack in the realm of litics, 







attacks, loading the attack with all the savagery of 
pent-up resentments accumulated during the 
preceding retreat. 

When a people is to be called un to make 
sacrifices to the extent of heavy burdens of primitive 
accumulation or equal weight of constras un the 
exercise of individual liberties, the critical litical 
consideration is that the resulting conflis with the 
real self-erests of those who sacrifice must not be 
pushed o an alliance with the heteronomic anti- 
social impulses formerly contained under the accep- 
tance and institutions of law. The role of the founders 
of our own nation in the condu of the American 
Revolution is exemary. The only effeive, sitive 
litical force to which government can appeal under 
such circumstances, is to make the universal erest 
a sensuous comement of the informed willful im- 
pulses for praice of those who must make the 
sacrifices. 

This princie does not admit of frauds. A republic 
must not demand sacrifices which are not in the uni- 
versal erest in fa. The lack of corresndence 
with the ^^exanation*' and the reality of the 
measures must tend to be expressed in outbreaks of 
heteronomy. Either this heteronomy is defleed 
against an adopted adversary  to divert it away 
from the government licy, as in the Nazi and other 
notorious cases  or the heteronomy must erupt 
against the government itself. Either leadership calls 
forth the "Whig impulse," by prosing licies con- 
strained by competent agreement with humanist 
princies, or what one gets is the **Tory impulse.'* 

The epitome of Soviet leadership violation of that 
princie of litics is the disgusting dorinal 
assertion, *'We have reached Socialism and are now 
on the way to Communism.*' What utter rubbish! 
What utter fraud! Unfortunately, a fault not peculiar 
to the Soviet institutions, once such proprietary im- 
becility becomes anoed with the authority and 
glosses of canonized precedent, all the forces of Hell 
must come down before the relevant piece of lunacy is 
unstuck from official licy. 

It is one thing to prose that the Soviet Union is 
constitutionally a socialist republic, and an altogether 
different prosition to say that the Soviet Union is 
qualitatively a socialist society. When Soviet officials 
use such demagogic sleight-of-hand as a lever of at- 
tempted inspiration of the Soviet worker, the lawfully 
cumulative result is incredulousness, and, if the utter- 
ance is believed, developing contempt for the idea of 
socialism itself. **If this deprivation and sacrifice is 
socialism, what in hell do I care about the CPSU 
leadership!" Whereas, if the truth were told ainly, 
and if the description of accomishments represented 
those accomishments for what they represent in 



 

fa, the reaion is, **We're making impressive pro- 
gress, but it's turning out to be a long way to get 
there." Whipping up the troops by suting the dumb 
official line, ultimately  or sooner  estranges the 
troops, and makes a rotten, muddle-headed hack out 
of the litical organizer. 

The colleivization case is notoriously exemary. 

Any self-respeing farmer can be induced to 
**save." Build a livestock, secure improved fertilizers, 
machinery, develop improved grains, and so forth. 
Farmers will tend to ant higher-yield -day corn in 
regions with a safe -day growing season, and such 
understandable stubbornnesses, but the princie of 
*'saving" every competent farmer understands, and 
will resnd to, given the proper approach and proper 
performance by those resnsible for the campaign. If 
the farmer remains somewhat stubbornly slow in 
coming around to a proper licy  it is such prob- 
lems that define the profession of competent leaders. 

Granted the circumstances of - Russia, the 
head-on collision with the peasantry was broadly 
understandable. The Bukharin licy (not-acci- 
dentally coinciding with the grain and petroleum 
erests of Anglo-Dutch financier erests in par- 
ticular), by frittering away the precious time needed 
to effe a competent agricultural reform aimed at 
qualitative technological progress, was most signi- 
ficant in causing the subsequent colleivization to 
proceed as it did. However, on the basis of Soviet of- 
ficial rerts, one adduces that to this day the agri- 
cultural seions of the CPSU and state have still not 
learned the litical ABCs of an agricultural program. 

Those who have knowledge of the way in which 
Anglo-American litical elligence operations have 
targeted **tential dissidents" within the CMEA 
countries know empirically, without really under- 
standing why, how these litical blunders of the 
Soviet leadership (in particular) foster the litical 
conditions in which such an incidence of tential 
litical-elligence targets occurs. But for the 
litical incompetences to which we have referred, 
those litical-elligence operations would have 
found the CMEA countries an unprofitable target for 
building Mr. Brzezinski's networks. The litical 
class-for-itself princie is the ABC of Karl Marx's 
method, but from the visible aspes of predominant 

Soviet praice and the awful nonsense officially 
issued in the name of *'Marxism-Leninism," the Polit- 
buro as a whole hasn't the barest sense of the term's 
imications for praice. 

The higher incidence of heteronomic ferment 
produced by this combination of circumstances 
naturally attras the attentions of Soviet ernal 
litical security forces. Part of the problem, the most 
significant part overall, is the produ of the gason- 







 

economy circumstances under which the Soviet 
republic and other CMEA nations have existed since 
their establishment. The rest is the significant aggra- 
vation of the "objeive*' roots of the problem by 
Communist leaderships* litical blundering. All 
things taken o account, the Soviet republic is 
qualitatively a gason economy with, to this writer's 
knowledge, an unknown degree of corresnding in- 
ternal litical security praices to match the gar- 
rison economy. 

To the extent that a greater or lesser want of 
republican liberties exists within the Soviet republic 
for these reasons, the wretchedness, like the material 
deprivations incurred, is unquestionably deorable. 
As President, I would be concerned with improving 
these ernal Soviet conditions to the extent improve- 
ment is required. The lesser question, which shall we 
review first, is What should we do about it? The more 
significant question, respeing the basis for United 
States foreign licy toward the Soviet Union, is how 
this affes the charaer of the Soviet Union as a 
republic. 

Even acknowledging the genuine atrocities the 
United States has to its credit  notably including 
Chile  it is proper and obligatory of a U.S. President 
to truthfully rert on such matters to the Soviet 
leadership and to the people of the United States. At 
present, the only non-hycritical way of stating such 
opinions is to emphasize the Soviets, too, have a few 
nasty features of their ernal life. It is obscene to 
compare an Eastern European government to the 
horror of Chile. It is a matter of stating relevant li- 
tical fas, not running a bogeyman competition. 

By stating such things  which we are obliged to do, 
whatever we may have waiting to be exsed in our 
own closets  the matter is aced on the table. Fas 
are fas. Beyond that, the question is what do we do 
about it? 

The Soviet Politburo will immediately resnd with 
a few suggestions concerning Mr. Brzezinski and 
similar creatures, whose aivities are by no means 
irrelevant to any ensifying of the aivities of the 
ernal litical security institutions of the CMEA 
countries. The Soviets might, in the same vein, offer a 
few pertinent suggestions to the same effe con- 
cerning blacker aspes of the editorial licies of 
Radio Free Europe. () 



. We must, in that conneion, appreciate that the technological 
stagnation and the degeneration of the military establishments of the 
OECD countries under "utopian" strategic licies has reduced the 
imrtance of Soviet spies in the "West," while increasing the 
premium on NATO spying and related aivities in the CMEA nations. 
We have diminishing little worth the effort of a spy to attempt to steal. 
The Atlanticist bunch hasn't had a genuinely original strategic idea  
good or bad  since Henry Kissinger's  articulation of the doc- 
trine of "brinkmanship." 



As even the White House basement's Tories running 
the **human rights" campaign themselves know fully, 
it is the United States government's turning up the 
screws of the **Cold War" which is the most imrtant 
variable slowing down the expansion of liberties with- 
in the CMEA countries. () It would be through the 
creating for the Soviet Union  to the extent that our 
erests and licies permit this  of a non-aversive 
outward climate, especially in respe to Western 
Europe and the United States, that the areas of tolera- 
tion we call liberties would be increased in the rele- 
vant nations. To the extent that the United States 
government condus or tolerates aversive external 
and penetration-disruption operations within the 
CMEA nations launched from within the NATO coun- 
tries, it is hycrisy for the government and leading 
press of the United States to lie to the citizens of the 
United States concerning the causal conneions in- 
volved. 

On the outside, for the credulous, duped U.S, con- 
servatives, such as former Representative and Presi- 
dent Gerald Ford, and also for the majority of the 
duped U.S. citizens and residents of recent Eastern 
European extraion involved, the **captive nations" 
front-organization is essentially what such a front- 
organization is prescribed to be  a litical cover 
and a trick to be ayed un the credulous dupes who 
don't know by whom or why they are being used. On 
the inside. Underneath and behind the layers of dupes, 
the captive nations" network is an ernational 
fascist organization, coordinated through Interl, 
and comsed of first and second-generation opera- 
tives of the Nazi SS and Canaris Abwehr Second 
Division (the so-called *'Brandenburger Division"). 
These Include the Canada-based Ukrainian Nazi 
network, comsed of Nazi Waffen SS and Branden- 
burger Division war-criminals and their immediate 
descendants. These include the Buenos Aires-based 
ernational Nazis' Ustashi network, including 
leaders, some resident in the United States, who are 
wanted in Yugoslavia for war crimes which rank in 
deeds perpetrated by individuals as the most hideous 
of the World War II period. 

This inside aspe of the **captive nations" opera- 
tion is direly affiliated to Interl under the **cover" 
of Interl's fiive authority for processing er- 
national searches for wanted Nazi war criminals. 

That is standard operating procedure. To run 
massive ernational drug-smuggling networks, the 
networks are run through the agencies which have 
nominal prime authority for investigating drug net- 



. Cf. "How the White House Manufaures 'Soviet Dissenters' " 
and accompanying case studies in Executive Intelligence Review, 
Vol IV, No.  (Feb. , ), pp. -. 







works. The **under investigation" fiion is then used 
to ward regular, unwitting lice agencies off er- 
ference with the drug-network operations. To run an 
ernational network led by wanted Nazi war 
criminals, the network is run through the organization 
which has the delegated authority to investigate such 
persons and groups. To run massive arms-smuggling 
operations across borders in small private anes, 
unmarked C-'s and so forth, from Hartford, Connec- 
ticut through various parts of the United States, 
through Mexico, o Guatemala, and s south, the 
cooperation by the National Security Agency and 

Interl is vital. 

This inside operation of the ''captive nations'* 
racket ermeshes with other aspes of the Nazi and 
the Nazis' Vichy fascist networks, including the South 
American-Spain network coordinated by Hjalmar 
Schacht's son-in-law, the recently deceased Colonel 
Otto Skorzeny, and the Vichy French fascist network 
known as the OAS, us major elements of Israeli 
elligence. This network overall erfaces official 
government erior and other ministries in various 
nations, chiefly through those sub-departments of 
government which coordinate with Paris Interl 
headquarters. It is relevant to the predominantly 
fascist pedigrees of the Interl base network that the 
Rockefeller-created Interl organization was headed 
by Austrian fascists at the outset, then by Nazi SD 
chiefs Heydrich and Kaltenbrunner, and at the end of 
the war was ''reconstituted" under the direion of the 
Rockefellers' attorney, Allen Dulles, acing the In- 
terl organization under the direion of some of the 
same Nazi officials who had inclusively participated 
in such wartime Interl operations as the Nazi round- 
ups of Hungarian Jews and gypsies for extermination. 

This Interl network is the "hard" or "wetwork" 
side of the ernational network which runs not only 
illegal drug and arms smuggling operations, mer- 
cenary armies' aivities, but also the bloody side of 
every terrorist operation and many assassinations 
throughout the world. In terrorist operations, Interl, 
with its immediately associated elements within 
government agencies, deoys the terrorist aion 
itself and also manipulates the lice agencies 
deoyed against the terrorists. 

This operation is presently run with computer- 
coordinated assistance. The criminal and non- 
criminal investigatory operations of many national 
governments are modernized through the develop- 
ment of central, semi-"real time" computer files. By 
virtue of the Interl-linked agencies' dire access to 
such computer files, Interl has a degree of barely 
visible control over local law enforcement conditions 
in two ways. It represents elligence of a sort in- 
valuable to the deoyment of terrorist operations. 



 

and affords Interl and its collaborators means to 
screw up the anti-terrorist aivities of both local 
lice agencies and even the principal ernal 
security and elligence forces of national govern- 
ments. This computer network is ernational, in- 
terfacing not only under the control of Paris-based 
Interl, but also with such relevant organizations as 
the Rockefellers' WorldWatch Institute, which not only 
computer-monitors pulation control and hunger- 
and-famine information globally, but also engages in 
coordination of ernational terrorist information. 

This network operates, obviously, in such a way that 
vast operations can be more or less efficiently 
deoyed with a relatively minimum degree of "need 
to know" by the resnsible executives and other 
emoyees of the sub-elements making up the network 
as a whole. 

Comementary to the "captive nations" and other 
nominally right-wing covers, the principal cover and 
an additional operations erface of the Interl 
networks is represented by the neo-Fabian oopus, 
most efficiently identified by McGeorge Bundy's old 
Kennedy days sidekicks, Marcus Raskin and Richard 
Barnet. Here is an aspe of the matter where official 
gross litical imbecility by certain leading Soviet 
Politburo strata comes o sharp focus. 

As a consequence of a very successful elligence 
operation run against top Soviet strata during the 
Kennedy period, as noted by published accounts of the 
writer's associates, the majority line of the Politburo 
switched away from the corre litical elligence 
estimate of the Soviet military elligence  that the 
Rockefellers were the main source of the war danger 
 to the imbecilic dorine that the Rockefeller- 
Fabian lowere Manhattan erests were the 
"realists," and that the U.S. ernal war danger 
emanated from the vaguely defined, so-called "mili- 
tary-industrial comex." The Rockefeller-controlled 
key unit in and around the leadership of the Com- 
munist Party USA is inclusively relevant, as is also 
some of the background of the  Missile Crisis and 
the Kennedy assassination preparations within 
various parts of North America. This change of 
Politburo majority line coincided with the develop- 
ment of an ongoing dire'line of semi-official liaison 
between elements of the Politburo and David Rocke- 
feller and Richard Barnet. 

The termination of the Richard Lowenthal- 
snsored, Eric Gerlach-direed Sozialistische 
Politik "editorial board" during the - period  
an editorial board including notably Trotskyist 
leaders Ernest Mandel and Pierre Frank  coincided 
symptomatically with a sweeping Kennedy reorgan- 
ization of the Anglo-American ernational litical 
elligence, establishing the neo-Fabian network 







 

created by the Rockefellers' Kennedy machine as the 
central coordinating agency globally for those aspes 
of operations run under variously liberal and *ieft** 
covers. 

Principals in this drastic reorganization were 
McGeorge Bundy, Robert Kennedy, and revisionist 
Thurman Arnold of the law firm of Arnold and Porter. 
The key operatives assigned to head up the new er- 
national "liberar' struure included, most prom- 
inently, Marcus Raskin and Richard Barnet of the 
Institute for Policy Studies! Abruptly, a number of 
old right-wing social democrats were transformed 
through ''miraculous conversions" o raving 
liberals or skesmen of newly born left-wing social 
democratic currents  the case of old Allen Dulles 
protege, Riccardo Lombardi of the Socialist Party of 
Italy is exemary. An assassination effort was 
launched against General de Gaulle  by the 
reorganized network. The same ernational deoy- 
ment was the wave of "wetwork" which killed Italy's 
"Gaullist" industrialist Mattel  a Rockefeller foe on 
the petroleum issue  and which same deoyment 
ironically set up the circumstances of the death of 
John F. Kennedy himself. 

These aions of that period, us such affairs as the 
attempted destabilization of the Konrad Adenauer 
faion within the West German government, marked 
a qualitative shift in overall strategic profile by the 
Rockefeller-centered forces, including, notably, their 
operations against the Soviet Union and CMEA 
countries. 

This included a reorientation of elligence and 
related capabilities in the Soviet Union and Eastern 
European countries, premised on the overall effort of 
building up David Rockefeller's "Trojan Horse" 
within the CPSU Central Committee and Politburo. 
Georgii Arbatov's relationship to David Rockefeller 
and Richard Barnet during the recent years is the 
visible erface of what is at present a short fuse 
leading o general thermonuclear war. 

The overall effes of this st-, Interl-IPS- 
centered operation against the CMEA countries was 
ultimately to force the Soviet and allied ernal 
security forces to ensify their surveillance and 
associated aions. Soviet leadership litical 
stupidity concerning the neo-Fabian "realist good- 
guys" and the "industrial-military-comex baddies" 
aggravated the CMEA countries' ernal litical 
security problems through the added feature of chaos 
and confusion contributed by the bungling Soviet 
leadership itself. This feature was aggravated by 
increased ability of the neo-Fabians to "launder" 
black operations through Eastern European capitals 
and Havana  notably the Prague-Havana run, and to 
spin off this successful deception of the Soviets and 



Cubans o numerous developing-seor countries 
with a friendly litical relationship to the Soviets and 
Cubans (e.g. Eldridge Cleaver in Algeria) . 

This latter arrangement went to the  that 
nearly every neo-Fabian left-fascist creep who later 
gained a publicity image as an anarchist or Maoist 
youth-movement skesman during the s and 
early s had his "left" credentials "laundered" in 
significant part through the "Venceremos" and 
related pilgrimages to Cuba. The "trip to Cuba" was 
the cover for various "miraculous conversions" o a 
"left heavy" sture. This IPS-focused operation 
against the Soviet Union and other targeted socialist 
countries was the principal cover for the "un- 
dergound railroad" networks operating to develop 
the Jewish and other "dissidents" ferment in the 
Eastern European nations, using the old Parvus- 
trodden "Northern Route" through Olof Palme's 
Sweden. 

This is by no means to argue that all dissidents in the 
Soviet Union are produs of this Interl-IPS- 
Rockefeller operation. 

First, there are endemic anti-socialist dissidents  
based principally in seions of the farmer pulation 
and the so-called professionals. If the IPS-Interl and 
comementary operations also feature such 
professionals, the operation has thus capitalized, 
lawfully, on the sociological area of greatest endemic 
tential for developing agents. The litical stupidity 
of influential seions of Communist leaderships 
generates several kinds of dissidence by itself and 
aggravates that which would otherwise tend to exist. 

There are also various sorts of pro-Marxist dissi- 
dents. Some are not fiively dissidents, because they 
are among alternate faions within the Communist 
parties, and thus are either dominant faions, notably 
as part of the "hard line" currents or their allies 
against the Oblomovist currents, or in the opsition 
within the leadership. Others are fiively dissidents 
because their opsition to the leadership  critics for 

I 

corre or wrong reasons, or a mixture of both  has 
put them outside the party's "family" orbit. This is 
aggravated by bitternesses from the s and st- 
war Stalin purges, and comicated by the litical ec- 
centricities endemic to a de fao controlled social- 
elleual environment. 

From the stand of republican notions of 
universal law, we are obliged to examine the endemic 
dissidence from within the Soviet Union in particular 
by the same methodological standards we properly 
apy to our own ernal constitutional law's ap- 
ication. The sovereign and auxiliary institutions of a 
republic properly check heteronomic impulses at the 
 of a praical threat to either vital erests as 
such or a credible praical threat to the egrity of 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



the constitutional law and its institutions. The same 
institutions may otherwise abuse their lawful weres 
to deprive individuals and groups of the proper liberty 
to develop and express innovations. In United States 
licy proper we distinguish qualitatively between the 
two kinds of ostensible oppression both domestically 
and in our foreign licy. 

In respe to lawfully proper containment of the 
liberties of criminal elements, and other heteronomic 
elements, we will not obje to the fa of such op- 
pression by other republics. Our tential criticism in 
such matters is delimited by concern for the 
humaneness of the methods and praices emoyed. 
The obje of the proper oppressive apications of law 
is to check the heteronomy while preserving to the 
praical extent ssible the tentialities for good 
within the person. We prosecute the sin, not the sinner 
 to the extent that such distinions are ssible in 
praice. The obligatory objeive of the penal law is 
correion, to save the sinner if ssible. 

In respe to the abuses of the law, insofar as the 
Soviet Union violates those liberties imicit in its 
proper constitution as a republic, we abhor such 
abuses  no matter how many kindred or even far 
worse abuses exist in our own backyard. On this, we 
oblige ourselves afresh to focus on the key issue: the 
charac ter of th e Soviet repu blic . 

However, our stand in this matter is not the 
merely sitive law in and of itself. We reje ab- 
solutely the dorine of *'force of sovereignity'* 
associated with Justice Holmes. Rather, we judge 
sitive law from the stand of the proper higher 
authority of natural law  as is prescribed, in fa, in 
the exicit ent set forth by the authors of our U.S. 
Constitution. It is not the constitutional law of the 
Soviet republic as it is, but what it must be from the 
stand of rigorous apication of natural law that 
is our constant  of reference for licy. 

Our foreign licy toward the Soviet Union con- 
cerning matters of its citizens' liberties is twofold. We 
recognize, first of all, the conneion between the 
aversive conditions fostered by agencies which it is 
our resnsibility to control, and the effes of this 
aversive condition un the ernal life of the Soviet 
Union. Some of these aversive conditions involve 
aivities whose combined charaer and objeives 
are abhorrent to us in any case. These we 
categorically check under any circumstance. These 
aversive conditions also include elements which are 
determined by the form and content of relations 
between our two countries. These vary according to 
the distinguishable degrees of the sperum from 
adversary, tential adversary, to agreement based 
on community of princie. We adopt the con- 
sequences of such aversive conditions created and or 



 

maained by agencies properly under our control as 
peculiarly our lawful resnsibility. In these matters, 
the relevant aions of the United States are dire and 
autonomous. 

In the second category, the issues of humanity and 
of categorical abuses of proper Soviet law are among 
those ernal affairs of the Soviet republic which 
properly lie within the province of the United States' 
foreign licy. To the extent that they bear un the 
assessment of the ernal quality of the Soviet 
republic as a republic, such considerations properly 
color the determination of our foreign licy toward 
the Soviet Union. How we approach such ernal 
aspes of the Soviet republic in praice is deter- 
mined by those broader, subsuming considerations 
which arise immediately in the effort to determine 
whether or not either a tential or present basis for 
agreement to community of princie is to thus define 
the generative outlook of the United States' Soviet 
foreign licy. 

In any case, there are certain things we will not do. 
We will not tolerate aions by agencies under our 
control or by private agencies of U.S. citizens or 
residents whose methods, purses and consequences 
are abhorrent to us. Otherwise, the fa that the 
princie of sovereign, viable republics is an 
associated fundamental princie of U.S. foreign 
licy, does not mean that we adopt the nominalist 
absurdities of a Walter Lippmann (Roosevelt), by 
demanding an establishment of capitalist litical 
institutions within the Soviet Union, or the scrapping 
of the proper constitutional princies and institutions 
of the Soviet republic  to the extent we regard it as a 
republic in fa  in favor of that anti-republican, 
**uralist" obscenity which our own rabid Tories 
demagogically herald as **pure democracy!" We are, 
under no circumstances, going to prose to the Soviet 
leadership that it transform itself o a Tory freak 
show merely to gratify the lunatic's sensibilities of our 
neo-Fabian liberal-radical minority. 

In approaching the overall question of the United 
States' Soviet foreign licy, we begin, we have noted, 
with the truism that the United States and the Soviet 
Union are the **two great weres," whose respeive 
influences and mutual relations will determine the 
fate of every other nation for decades yet to come. 
Contrary to the revisionist Tory Walter Lippmann 
(Franklin Roosevelt), we cannot approach this 
crucial, central question of United States domestic 
and foreign licy by those childish doll-aying 
methods which spill out the various speculative 
scenarios corresnding to various hythesized 
forms of role-aying among the two great weres. We 
start from the apicable conceptions of natural law, 
as exemified by John Quincy Adams' stress on the 







 

dorine of community of princie. We would not 
make binding alliances or ^'concerts'* with evil weres 
simy because they are wereful. 

We do not ignore such realities of were. As our 
founding fathers attempted to do, when princie is 
frustrated by want of means, we maneuver within the 
framework of operating were, to effe those results 
which on balance shift the correlation of global forces 
to the advantage of a subsequent realization of prin- 
cie. Our method of maneuver under the governance 
of princie is '*Clausewitzian.** 

Consequently, as we approach the problem of 
United States Soviet licy within the framework of 
the imications of the cited truisms, we are fore- 
warned at the start that the inquiry involves the in- 
dicated distinions of governing princie and 
maneuver. First, we do what the Atlanticist Dorine 
refuses to permit in U.S. foreign-licy deter- 
minations, we start not from the question of were, 
but princie. Our fundamental licy toward the 
Soviet Union is based entirely un what that nation is 
shown to be from the standard of natural law. Any 
alternate approach is immoral, childish doll-aying 
with the fate of humanity. 

The central conceptual difficulty confronting the 
U.S. eleorate  who must adopt our foreign licies 
through their representatives  is that the Soviet 
government emoys the terms "republic** and 
"diatorship*' erchangeably. In an earlier seion 
of this licy study, we identified the semantic con- 
fusion surrounding the two opsite meanings at- 
tributed to the term "diatorship,** advising that the 
notion of the U.S. Constitution as establishing a 
"diatorship**  i.e., a democratic republic!  was 
indispensable to the effort to establish rigorously 
grounded common denominators in ernational law 
for defining U.S. Soviet foreign licy. Now, that  
in the study has been reached. We must now define 
what the Soviets invoke by their use of "diatorship.** 
We shall do that by passing beyond the formalities of 
legalistic abstraion, to ground each  made in a 
-by- comparison of the United States and 
Soviet republican norms. 

Before unging o that aspe of our inquiry, two 
preliminary observations must be made, so that those 
considerations can be kept in the back of the mind, 
contributing their guidance to the appreciation of the 
s being developed. 

First, the separation of the eleorate and the legal 
professionals respeing the governing concepts of 
basic law is an olerable state of affairs in a viable 
republic. Although legal professionals are required, 
their proper funion is to elaborate the princies of 
law o a body of scientifically ordered praice 
respeing the comexities of the law's apication. 



The attorneys and courts, through deep familiarity 
with both the governing princies of law and with the 
comexities of its sitive elaboration and apica- 
tion in detail, perform an indispensable funion in 
maaining coherence between the case in  and 
the law as a whole. Extensive knowledge of the law 
and conceptual outlooks matured through legal 
praice are indispensable to accomishing this in 
praice. 

The related, aggravating problem is that pular 
outlooks mistakenly view the law in the infantile 
terms associated with the worst conceptions of "case 
law'* or "common law.** The notions of law are 
degraded o pragmatic  e.g., morally imbecilic  
approaches toward an axiomatic dorine of "social 
contra,** rather than the ent and subsumed 
specifications of constitutional princie under natural 
law. Under such influences, the general eleorate's 
pularized misconception of the law as an evolving 
"case-law** body of "common law'* represents a 
toleration of sweeping subversion of the fundamental 
princies of our Constitutional republic. We are not a 
nation of common law, but a constitutional republic  
our litical forebears fought an American 
Revolution, and a number of other imrtant and 
hazardous struggles, to establish such a fundamental 
distinion between United States and British law. 

To the extent that we did, indeed, carry forward 
chunks of English law o our legislation and prac- 
tised law, this does not warrant the misjudgment that 
such historical fas justify the conclusion that our law 
is permissibly defined as a kind of "uralistic" co- 
habitation of both constitutional and common law 
traditions. Just as the thirteenth century Edwardian 
reforms in basic English law in princie transformed 
the content of all previously existing feudal law ac- 
cording to the princie of alienation roduced, so the 
funion of the legal profession under our Constitution 
is to sort out those aspes of customary law, and so 
forth, which respeively do and do not conform to 
constitutional princies. This sorting-out process 
properly affes not only the formality of the 
customary law, but transforms the governing ernal 
ent of those aspes of the customary law which 
survive the sorting process. Even though the formal, 
outward aspe of the fiions of retained customary 
law may appear to be preserved, the governing princi- 
e of ent embodied in the fiion is either trans- 
formed o agreement (coherence) with constitu- 
tional ent, or the perpetuated law must be an 
abhorrence from the constitutional stand. 

The Constitution's clearly defined ent, and the 
shaping of the institutions of our republic, prohibit the 
modification of the ent of the Constitution through 
evasions by way of the molecular processes of evolu- 







tions in pular opinions and customs. The princied 
distinion of a constitutional republic, such as our 
own was founded to be, is that no qualitative change in 
the governing institutions and law may occur except 
through a preceding, forced process of refleion un 
the imications of the change respeing the body of 
natural law un which our Constitution and its ent 
were themselves premised. The Constitution, taken by 
itself and in the context of the process of its author- 
ship, adoption and initial imementations, provides 
avenues for profound alterations in respe of sub- 
sumed institutions and instruments, but it prohibits 
such changes except by refeng the question back to 
rigorous and specified forms of deliberation modeled 
un the processes by which the Constitution and 
republic were themselves established. 

This difference was, in significant part, the reason 
why our republic succeeded whereas the earlier 
Cromwellian Commonwealth collapsed. John Milton 
is the best source of insight o that problem. This is 
the same Milton whose account of the reasons for the 
failure of the Commonwealth profoundly influenced 
the informed strata of our American Revolution, and 
which influence was reicated through them o the 
broader eleorate. The English Commonwealth 
failed through a combination of attributable 
problems, but those problems proved the efficient 
mediation of its destruion because the notion of a 
republican, constitutional form was not accepted by 
Oliver Cromwell et al. when forcefully and correly 
prosed (principally) by Milton. The collapse of the 
English Commonwealth  paralleling in princie the 
Tory subversion of our own law and related institu- 
tions  is a forceful empirical demonstration of the 
horrors which await modern nations when the princi- 
e of constitutional law is ignored or subverted by the 
pragmatic-evolutionary ''constitutionar' erpreta- 
tion of case law. 

By attributing the governing princies of law to the 
merely-sitive law and pragmatic perceptions of 
case law, the chaos which is then regarded as law 
becomes an incomprehensible and disorderly com- 
exity to the general eleorate. Such a state of af- 
fairs is an abomination  and must be rigorously 
terminated. 

It is necessary for the competent funioning of a 
democratic republic, such as the United States was 
established to be, that the princies of universal 
natural law be efficiently, consciously perceived by 
the general eleorate. This is our own view, and the 
emphasized outlook of the founders of our republic, 
both the Federalists and Thomas Jefferson. Beyond 
the indispensable role of education to technological 
progress, those who wrote our Constitution, those who 
won the eleorate to adopt our Constitution and 



 

republic, emphasized that the eleorate cannot be 
competent eleors  and would become a menace to 
the republic and their own vital erests  unless 
they are educated to the condition of competence to 
comprehend the imications of those princies of 
natural law. 

Our republic and the adoption of its Constitution 
were accomished by communicating the notions of 
natural law to the eleorate, effeed in terms of the 
empirical correlatives of natural-lawful princies 
respeing both the imications for the nation as a 
whole and the way in which the vital erests of the 
nation determined the fulfillment of the vital erests 
perceivable as self-erests of the individual and his 
sterity. The Constitution and the founding institu- 
tions and instruments of our republic were adopted by 
the eleorate because their empirical appropriate- 
ness to the apication of natural law had been demon- 
strated by the nation 's leaders. 

In a democratic republic, those same princies and 
methods must be ever-maained. The eleorate 
must know the formal, literary terms to be used in 
common as the princies of natural law and their 
derived institutional forms of apication. However, 
those words would remain merely vague ideas unless 
the meaning of the words were grounded empirically. 

It is not permissible for a present generation to 
revere an institution merely as traditional. Ingenuous 
respe for tradition is merely blind prejudice, not 
comprehension. Obedience to traditional forms is the 
parentis and law's oppression of the evil tentialities 
of infantile behavior in the immature and in the in- 
stance of the eng adult. Each present generation of 
the eleorate must be enabled to prove, from the 
stand of natural law, that the rule of universal 
natural law is necessary today^ and must understand 
both the history of institutions, and their presently 
continued or outlived appropriateness from the stand- 
 of the same outlook and methods emoyed by 
our nation*s founders. To this end, an informed will is 
not represented merely by a person who has learned to 
recite approved formulas in a canonical way. An in- 
formed will  the informed will of the eleorate of a 
democratic republic  requires that knowledge be 
made sensuous for the will. 

As we compare the institutions respeively appro- 
priate to the United States and Soviet republics, our 
included concern is to make the princies of our own 
institutions sensuously comprehensible to the elec- 
torate, and to those leaders, at all levels, who have the 
duty to inform the eleorate respeing the lawful 
determination of its vital erests. 

The second  to be kept prominently in the back 
of the mind is our use of norm . 
We are not using that term in its empiricist's or 







 

pragmatist's sense  not in the behaviorisms sense. A 
constitutional republic  which, as we shall see, both 
the United States and the Soviet Union are  is not a 
fixed state of perfeion, but an embodiment of a 
governing ent, an ent projeed o institutions 
and instruments, which are direed in turn toward 
the ongoing realization of successive resulting im- 
provements in the quality of human existence, human 
perfeion. The ended effe of the adopted institu- 
tions and instruments represents the appropriate 
content of **norm" as we emoy that term here. The 
norm is not properly a fixed state un which to 
converge as the goal of some Utopian perfeion. It 
represents the mode in which the institutions and 
instruments are ended to affe in turn the way in 
which new conditions of the society are deliberately 
evolved. 

At this junure, neither the Soviet republic nor the 
United States conforms entirely in praice to its re- 
speive constitutional norms. Hence, it would be fruit- 
less to attempt to base United States Soviet foreign 
licy un a merely-descriptive comparison of their 
ernal features at this junure or even to date. For 
this purse, we must define the United States in 
terms of what is becoming in the course of resuming 
its constitutional republican development. We must 
compare that process of becoming with a twofold 
approach to what the Soviet Union is efficiently in the 
process of becoming. To put the first  most 
crudely  as Walter Lippmann did, in effe, in - 
  is the Soviet constitution a fraud or an efficient 
ent? We must examine this, first, by comparing the 
Soviet constitutional ent as it is with the 
corresnding norms proper to our constitutional 
republic. We must then qualitatively refine that 
perception of the Soviet Union as it will change under 
the influence of the self-erested licies which the 
United States, as a capitalist constitutional republic, 
will be obliged to develop and pursue in the 
foreseeable course of present world developments. 

We shall now proceed by taking up first the Soviet 
use of the term ^^diatorship of the proletariat." In 
view of the wretched quality of the output circulated in 
the name of **official Marxism-Leninism,*' we shall 
not take the Soviets literally on the . From the 
stand of their own relevant literature, they do not 
in fa know the meaning of the term in question. They 
have merely borrowed the term from Karl Marx, by 
way of V,L Lenin (principally), and have attempted, 
without much perceptible success, to exain the asso- 
ciated significance of the institutions and instruments 
which Lenin (most notably) embedded o Soviet 
organic praice. Respeing the conception itself, we 

must turn direly to Marx, and then judge on that 



basis how Soviet organic praice does or does not 
corresnd to the proper significance of the term. 

The further, broader appropriateness of the term 
'^diatorship,'* as Karl Marx emoyed it, is that it is 
a most useful conceptual tool through which to develop 
a fresh, richer insight o the princied features of 
our own republic. In this conneion, it must not be 
imagined that, because Marx's usage offends con- 
temrary pular prejudices concerning the term 
itself, that Marx's usage was either inappropriate in 
general or an exaggeration. Although that usage of the 
term appears to be merely metaphorical and hyper- 
bolic from the stand of today's ill-educated 
diionary writers, Marx approached this from the 
stand of his professional qualifications as a quali- 
fied door of law. 

The notion of a republic, notably from Dante 
Alighieri's De Monarchia, through John Milton, 
through the founders of our republic, is premised on 
knowledge of the confli between universal and 
heteronomic perceptions of the vital self-erests of 
both humanity in general and nations in particular. 
The obje of a republic is not to establish the rule of 
the few wise over the many ignorant  although that 
appearance will tend to arise. The obje of the 
republic is to mobilize the good within the individual 
citizen to rule over the evil within himself. Hence, and 
correly so, the same founding fathers who rigor- 
ously separated the church and state, appealed to the 
wisdom of the neo-atonic currents of (then) 
protestantism as the inspiration and authoritative 
wellspring of the notions of a republic. Not that 
Christian neo-atonic humanism was originally any- 
thing but a Catholic force: the American colonies and 
young republic were protestant, and appropriately 
seized un the specific communality of wellsprings 
presently at hand. 

The good, as we have developed that  in some 
detail, is evoked within the individual in respe of 
locating the agreement between his true self-erest 
and the universal self-erest of his society. That 
lawful self-erest is the necessity of technologically 

centered progress and the development and exercise 
of that litical freedom within himself, which is the 
source of the were of society to fulfill its need for 
technologically centered progress. It is by conneing 
such universal knowledge to the individual's informed 
willful impulses, and by creating common institutions 
which are the aive embodiment of that relationship, 
institutions shaped according to that governing ent, 
that the good within the individual is embodied within 
those institutions, and returned to him as the benefits 
generated by such a universal ordering of the domain 
of his private affairs. 







That is the essence of our republic and our Constitu- 
tion. 

The specific feature of our republic  a democratic 
republic  was made ssible for the same reasons 
that our American Revolution succeeded where the 
French Revolution failed. The special qualities of the 
American people of that time were that they were by 
far the most literate pulation of any nation of the 
world, and that, beyond the centerpiece of literacy, 
the family Bible, John Milton, John Bunyan, Shakes- 
peare and so forth, were the typically humanist 
sources of their informed outlook. This would not have 
sufficed but for the leading role of newspaper 
publisher, scientist, and litical organizer Benjamin 
Franklin. The Franklin and Franklin-influenced press 
of the American colonies  morally opsite to most 
of the dominant national news media of the United 
States today  represented the most vigorous ex- 
pression of the humanist outlook with respe to the 
empirical conditions of life of our litical forebears. 
It was this informed eleorate which made ssible 
the establishment of a democratic republic. The 
people could be trusted to constitute themselves as a 

general eleorate. 

The cruelest heritage of colonialism and semi- 
colonialism in many parts of the developing seor 
today is not that the majority of the pulation has 
been denied the habituated experience of democracy, 
but rather that it has been denied the development of 
the competence to rule themselves in their own vital 
self-erests. It is imssible to establish a viable 
democratic form of republic on the basis of an elec- 
torate steeped predominantly in the most marginal 
forms of agriculture, barbaric-like tribalist atavisms, 
and massive vagabondage and unassimilated urban 
lumpen pulations. 

The relationship of our largely-corrupted major 
national press to the seething Tory minority, the 
masses of liberals and radicals and the included 
lumpenized constituencies, illustrates the same 
princie. Their vicious heteronomy as at the 
moment as a large degree of imperviousness to the 
influence of reason. **I don't understand that; I only 
know what I must immediately get for myself." Such 
heteronomic Tory fools are morally and elleually 
far beneath the American general eleorate of the 
late eighteenth century. They are funionally 
illiterate respeing natural law, and easy prey for 
any wicked demagogue who chooses to tug them  
first this way, then that  by their foolish noses. 

In notable historical precedents  some appro- 
priate, some not  notably from Greek and Roman 
republican history, the rallying of a pre-capitalist 
pulation in behalf of a vital general erest was 



 

embodied in the form of a diatorship  a pularly- 
established diatorship. That notion of a pularly- 
established diatorship is in an imrtant sense a 
kind of historical precedent for a capitalist republic. 

A republic is a kind of lawfully ordered process by 
which a designated general eleorate periodically 
seles  and impeaches!  its diatorship. For 
modern purses, the case of the Cromwell diator- 
ship within the English Commonwealth is the model 
clinical case of reference for the principal reasons a 
pularly-constituted diatorship can go wrong. The 
Cromwell case of a failed ent shows how that ent 
must be developed to a degree beyond Cromwell's 
limited, one-sided farmer's perception, and what 
indispensable checks must be built o the weres 
and regulation of the diatorship. 

Hence, the form of the notion embedded in our 
republic, the usually misunderstood notion that ours is 
a government of law, not men. 

The ingenuous and miseducated individual per- 
ceives that slogan to signify a government by laws, 
rather than Law. The misperception leads to the 
degraded notions of sovereignty associated with 
Justice Holmes. Positive law is man-made, and 
represents a government by men. Natural law is man- 
discovered. The perception of natural law properly 
determines its appropriate praical expression as 
constitutional law. Although constitutional law is man- 
made in one respe, it is not man-made in the same 
sense as ordinary legislative forms of sitive law. 
The authority of legislative, or ordinary sitive law 
in general, is properly specific within the bounds of 
constitutional law. It has in and of itself no rinsic 
moral authority. By contrast, insofar as constitutional 
law is an efficient instrument of man-discovered 
natural law, that ostensibly man-made creation 
caes forward consciously the corresnding degree 
of moral authority from natural law. 

It is constitutional law, insofar as the constitutional 
law is aively conceptualized in respe of ent and 
content from the stand of natural law, that 
represents The Law for purses of the republican 
conception of a government of law, not men. 

Only valid discovery bearing either un the 
inappropriateness of constitutional law to natural law, 
or a valid discovery of qualitative significance con- 
cerning universal natural law, have the admissible 
moral authority to alter constitutional law. () 
The additional general problem of diatorship, 



. It is ssible on princie for man to alter lawfully natural law 
itself. However, that involves the most advanced conceptions, which 
do not invalidate, in any case, the ent of the  as we make it 
above. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

beyond what we have developed to this , is that 
different social classes and faions of classes have 
charaeristic self-erests which are out of 
corresndence with, or alternately in relatively 
greater agreement with the vital erests of whole 
societies. By one means or another, in one specific 
litical form or another, these broad constituent 
forces within a society, either individually or in 
combinations, establish the rule of their perceived 
self-erest as the determining influence (diator- 
ship) on licies and praices of government. That is, 
in itself f neither good nor bad. 

All modern forms of government are class diator- 
ships in that sense. 

In the United States at this moment, we are mainly 
under the executive diatorship of the monetarist 
faion associated with David Rockefeller. We ought 
to be, instead, under the diatorship of an alliance of 
industrialist, trade-union and farmer litical er- 
ests  otherwise our government cannot be in corres- 
ndence with the ent of our Constitution. 

The Soviet Union is under the diatorship of the 
Communist Party, a party sociologically based on the 
industrialist and labor strata, us an agricultural 
comnent. The fa that this Communist Party is 
made up of elements which corresnd to industrial- 
ists, labor, and farmers in the United States 
distinguishes the Soviet from the U.S. constitutional 
republic primarily only in the essential feature of 
public ownership of the principal means of produion 
and distribution. 

We shall shortly turn to examine that distinion 
more shary from the stand of law. First, we 
shall round out the discussion of diatorship. 

Avoiding the fuller discussion the subje of dic- 
tatorship subsumes, no fallacy of comsition arises if 
we now delimit our attention to the notion of diator- 
ship as apicable to democratic forms of republican 
government. 

At the one extreme, a democratic republic involves 
the rule of government by a sociologically determined 
perception of the erest of the nation as a whole. 
Relative to contrary impulses within the general 
eleorate, this social bias in governmental licy and 
related matters represents the diatorship. At the 
other extreme, we have the proteion of the in- 
dividual rights and liberties of all citizens, and within 
that area, the smaller, subsumed area of the suffrage 
rights of a defined general eleorate. Overall, the 
weres of the diatorship and the princied nature of 
the rights and liberties of the citizenry are properly 
defined by constitutional law. Within the same con- 
stitutional framework, the rights and liberties of the 
eleorate include a defined process of deliberation in 



the seleion of governing representatives by the in- 
dividual as of the eleorate. 

The corollary topic for this set of fas is the wide- 
spread delusion that a democracy is less diatorial 
than a republic. This was fought out for the cause of 
the republic by John Milton (unsuccessfully), and was 
fought out (successfully) by Federalist Tom Paine on 
behalf of the authors of the Constitution as a whole. 
Milton and Paine were absolutely corre in recog- 
nizing that a democracy's flaws were inherently in- 
jurious to the vital erests of the nation and the in- 
dividual liberties of the citizens. Because of the im- 
maturity of the development of the pulation (as the 
large minority vote for Jimmy Carter attests), and the 
inadequacy of that pulation for the institutions and 
instruments of a dire eleion of government en- 
tirely by local erest, a democratic form of govern- 
ment must degenerate o an unprincied govern- 
ment of demagogues. The ebbs and flows in govern- 
ment de fao ^^constitutional'* licy inherent in such 
a heteronomic arrangement are contrary to the 
service of a persisting self-erest of the nation as a 
whole, and thus develop the basis for the most vicious 
diatorship, by wereful demagogic self-erests 
aying un and cultivating the very heteronomic 
impulses within the eleorate which it is the essential 
funion of government to check. 

It is a fraud to suggest that a democratic republic 
deprives the citizen of any rights or liberties he or she 
would properly enjoy under a democracy. Rather, a 
constitutional republic compels the citizen to go 
through the refleive processes of reason respeing 
the general erest before he is permitted to exert his 
will effeively to alter imrtant institutions and 
instruments of the republic. The proper view of the so- 
called "checks and balances" within our own constitu- 
tional forms is absolutely not that they a to balance 
off confliing heteronomic tendencies; their ent 
and proper emoyment is to force a rational and 
knowledgeable refleion un the general erest in 
terms defined by the essential conneion between 
na tural la w and constitutional la w. 

In all respes, the ent of constitutional law  and 
the subsumed question of the efficiency of institutions 
and instruments with respe to that ent  is the 
only competent basis for comprehension and apica- 
tion of constitutional law. It is on precisely that vital 
 that the Tory subversion of our government and 
law is revealed in its sharpest focus. 

The question of the weighting of influence over in- 
stitutions by various classes and faions of classes 
(and we are continuing to speak of a democratic 
republic) is the location of the expression of diator- 
ship. The commitment of our Constitution and 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 




John Quincy Adams, who articulated the notion of community of princie' ' to describe the fundamental tenet 
of the foreign licy of the United States ' Federalist Founding Fathers. 



republic from the inception to the princie of tech- 
nologically centered progress is the most essential of 
those aspes of our constitutional law which properly 
give precedence of weight (today) to the influence of 
industrialists and the labor movement. The quality of 
the Constitution and republic in this respe is not 
embedded merely in the Constitution's formalities as 
such, but in the circumstances of the American 
Revolution in which these institutions and instruments 
were established. It is the commitment to the Idea of 



authors of the Constitution 



which had itself been 



Progress by the founding eleorate 



not only the 



shaped in its outlook by the issues and course of the 
American Revolution, which is decisive. 

The litical diatorship of industrialists and labor 
(coinciding with that of the smaller pulation of tech- 
nology-proud farmers), is not effeed by acing 
industrial capitalists and labor leaders in government 
sitions. That may occur, but that is not the  to 
consider. A democratic republic is charaeristically 
(best) led by the predominance of a certain type of 
elleual cast in the tradition of the founding 







 

fathers. These were and should be elleuals who 
have made a profession of organizing the opinions and 
persons of forces of the general eleorate, in behalf of 
a princied demonstration of a sitive conneion in 
consequences between a general national erest and 
the immediate, proper self-erests of the individual 
citizen. In a republic in which technological progress 
in industrial development is the charaeristic realiza- 
tion of the general erest, as in the case of the Ameri- 
can Revolution and the founding of the republic, the 
general erest is most immediately expressed in 
terms of the erests of industry, industrial labor, and 
technologically-progressive farmers. Today, as scien- 
tists and engineers tend toward becoming, and must 
become an increasing prortion of the general 
eleorate, that aspe of the sociology of the elec- 
torate develops a new quality of imrtance. It is the 
concerted expression of the more immediate per- 
ception of self-erest by industrialists and labor 
which as  properly  like a litical battering ram 
in shaping the opinions and determining the pre- 
nderance of forces (under fortunate circumstances) 
throughout the eleorate. The heteronomic ten- 
dencies more charaeristic of the non-technologic- 
ally-oriented petit-bourgeois and lumpenized strata 
are made to become relatively imtent before the 
concerted forces represented by the mobilization of 
the two pro-development classes' forces and their 
allies. That is the way diatorship properly funions 
under the constitutional law of our democratic repub- 
lic. It is the so-determined perception of national self- 
erest, represented as the prenderant (not the 
only) eleed force within institutions of government, 
which is the essence of the proper funioning of our 

constitutional law. 

As should already be imicitly clear, the con- 
ceptual problem most often encountered, the source of 
the loss of elleual capacity to understand our 
constitutional law and institutions, is the reduionist 
 of view which (heteronomically) mislocates the 
self-erests of the eleorate '^uralistically." 

In such wretched, anti-humanistic outlooks  most 
common to our disoriented liberals and radicals  the 
nation is conceived as a Tory freak show. 

If you are black-skinned, or have a hispanic back- 
ground, or are a woman, or live in a slum, and so forth 
 ad nauseam  it is the perception of neo-Fabian 
dorine that your membership in any such categories 
defines your self-erest in an axiomatically different 
way than that of any other persons not sharing the 
precise set of distinions which are thus defined as 
erseing your condition to be embodied in your 
person. In that specific respe, the neo-Fabian 
dorine is identical with the Nazi dorine of 
Volksgemeinschaft and its corollaries. It was nothing 



but that neo-Fabian*s fascist dorinal definition of 
''democracy" which the unfortunate Representative 
Barbara Jordan presented in her principal address to 
the  New York City Democratic Party Convention, 
Contrary to Barbara Jordan and her mentors, 
neither the human race, nor the pulation of the Uni- 
ted States, is a carnival freak show or a zoo. 

Many of the conditions un which the neo-Fabians 
premise their zoological specifications of micro-con- 
stituencies' self-erests represent conditions 
which  while existing  are abhorrent to us. Shall 
we keep slum dwellers in slums, so as to defend the in- 
tegrity of that constituency? Do black-skinned citi- 
zens, then, desire a separate black drinking fountain, 
a separate black lavatory, a black seion set aside in 
the rear of the bus, so that the separate needs of blacks 
can be thus celebrated? What sort of bestial swill was 
duped Barbara Jordan  however thoughtless- 
ly  prosing in fa? She was prosing, in one re- 
spe, to turn the White House itself o a freak 
show  but let that pass without further comment 
once the lawful conneion is noted. 

The  of considering Barbara Jordan's cited, 
pro-fascist aberrations is that the bestial imications 
of her formulation express in hideous detail exaly 
why Tom Paine defended the constitutional republic 
against the obscenities inherent in the ill-advised con- 
temations of a democracy. It is not ssible to iden- 
tify the rights and liberties of a nation's human beings 
in the form of litical institutions better adapted to 
the perpetuation of a litical freak show. The law of 
the republic respeing the rights, privileges and fun- 
damental self-erests of its citizens is hostile to those 
kinds of distinions among human beings which 
would be proper to the classification of varieties of 
monkeys and baboons. 

On behalf of law, we recognize the industrialist e- 
rest. Similarly, we recognize the farmer erest. So, 
we recognize the erest of labor. So, we recognize the 
rights and erests of our geographic litical sub-en- 
tities, as institutions indispensable to our economy 
and our citizens as a whole. So, we recognize the obli- 
gation to right injustices, to moderate inequities of pri- 
vilege  insofar as such distinions ta the essen- 
tial rights and liberties of the citizen as a citizen. These 

are the essential, derived expressions of our general 
national erest. We do not recognize these ''special 
erests" because they are special erests. We re- 
cognize special erests only as they are a meaningful 
refraion of our national erest according to natural 
law and its constitutional expression. No other sort of 
special erest has any rightful standing before law, 
and it is incompetence and fraud to profess the con- 
trary. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



U.S. Soviet Policy 



Our erest, thus, to summarize again as back- 
ground to the Soviet corollaries, is what we have 
set forth before. Our only primary erest according 
to natural law is that notion of progress for which tech- 
nological progress is the most charaeristic and 
determining feature. The only specific erest which 
we acknowledge as fundamental within that context is 
the princie of the constitutional republic as the only 
efficient instrument for the sitive expression of 
litical freedom and for the regulation of toleration 
as agreeable to the praical circumstances of our 
nation and the world at this  in the progress of 
self -development of our species. 

The primary distinion in constitutional law be- 
tween the United States and the Soviet Union is that 
U.S. law defines private ownership of the basic means 
of produion and distribution as an area of sitive 
forms of litical toleration, whereas the Soviet con- 
stitution brings those same areas entirely within the 
dire administration of sitive law. All the other 
proper aspes of essential distinion between the two 
republics are historically determined corollaries of 
that central distinion. 

Not only is that the primary distinion within the 
constitutional law of the two, respeive republics. It is 
the feature of constitutional distinions on which all 
imrtant litical differences between those nations 
have been  rightly or wrongly  premised. Con- 
versely, hythetically or anually, under the condi- 
tions in which the Soviet constitution defends capital- 
ist liberties within the United States, and the United 
States Constitution dires our nation to defend self-in- 
terestedly the alternate litical form in the Soviet re- 
public, all the organic premises for adversary or - 
tential-adversary relationship between the two 

nations evarate. 

Furthermore, if that acceptance of the specific, sub- 
sumed constitutional distinions between the two 
states is mutually accepted, and also the United States 
and Soviet Union are constitutional republics in 



presently efficient ent, under such conditions the 
Soviet foreign licy of the United States is based on a 
comm unity of princie. 

Our immediate objeive, in this sub-rtion of our 
inquiry, is to determine, as a matter of princie and 
fa, whether the reestablishment of constitutional 
government in the United States subsumes the condi- 
tions and preconditions under which such a com- 
munity of princie might be direly established or 
approached. 

What we have just stated concerning the kernel of 
the problem  in the way in which we have stated that 
 imicitly solves all of the princied, generative 
problematics of our nation's Soviet foreign licy. 

The problem immediately associated with that im- 
ication is that up to this , neither a majority of 
the representatives and eleorate of the United States 
nor the corresnding forces of the Soviet Union have 
properly comprehended the fas un which such for- 
mulations must be premised. In this the writer is not 
speaking of the United States under Tory rule  in 
which case war between the two weres is irrepress- 
ibly imminent; he is writing as a skesman for the 
*new Federalist" or Whig majority forces of our na- 
tion. Even after eliminating Tory control of our gov- 
ernment, neither the Whig majority of the representa- 
tives and eleorate of our nation, nor the corresnd- 
ing forces in the Soviet Union have yet assimilated the 
form and degree of rigorous insight o this problem 
to a efficiently according to the proper imications. 
This we must promptly corre. 

The most prominent of the associated difficulties is 
that the representatives of the indicated forces in both 
republics have committed, in the main, the recung 
fallacy of prejudice which we have systematically de- 
fined in several locations above. That is to emphasize, 
they have viewed the existence of the distinguishing 
constitutional institutions of their nation more or less 
as self-evidently traditional They have not under- 
stood the inner, aive content of those institutions as 

 







 

(primarily) lawfully determined. They view those 

institutions as if they were to be defined as self-evident 
particles. 

To describe those prejudices in their worst expres- 
sion on both sides: 

In the United States, there persists a strong tenden- 
cy among the ingenuous to regard the institutions of 
capitalist ownership in terms of the progress of prime- 
val capitalist germs dated more or less from the Crea- 
tion. They know neither the fa, nor the significance 
of the fa that modern industrial capitalist forms 
were established by choice during the sixteenth cen- 
tury. Although that choice of capitalism had, in some 
part, the effe of bringing order out of chaotic proto- 
capitalist eruptions on a small scale beginning ap- 
proximately the thirteenth century in England, the 
roots of an order of law appropriate to creating indus- 
trial capitalist litical forms of ownership date from 
sixteenth century Tudor England. The layman does 
not know, or at best does not understand the imica- 
tions of the fa, that the establishment of the Constitu- 
tion and republic of the United States represented the 
first time in history that the institutions of industrial 
capitalist litical forms of ownership were secured in 
terms of a coherent body of constitutional law  that, 
which cannot be overemphasied, the American Revo- 
lution was an industrial capitalist revolution against 
British * 'pseudo-feudal" monetarism. 

Not understanding that the industrial capitalist 
forms of ownership were willfully established for a 
universal, lawful purse, it follows that ignorant pro- 
capitalist prejudice, viewing capitalist litical forms 
as merely traditional, attributes the good within those 
forms to be derived from an axiomatic capitalist form 
of '^rinsic goodness," and thus foolishly regards the 
absence of such special litical institutions as neces- 
sarily evil. 

Ignorant Communists' prejudice returns the comi- 
ment, so to speak. Although such Communists genu- 
fle before Marx's stipulation that industrial capital- 
ist development has been a great step forward in hu- 
man development  because this statement is attri- 
buted variously to Karl Marx and V.I. Lenin  they do 
not believe it. 

We are not speaking of Communists as a whole. The 
rule-of-thumb dividing line between elligent Com- 
munists and Soviet and leading fools calling them- 
selves "Communists*' is represented by the ongoing 
faional difference of approximately two decades to 
date, between those Soviet and Eastern European 
forces which regard the Rockefellers as exemifying 
the Soviets' adversary within the United States, and 
those or fools who suprt agreement for praice 
alliances with the **realist" Rockefellers against the 
**military-industrial comex/' 



The Soviet **Tories" associated with the Arbatov 
Dorine regard what Marx and Lenin defined as the 
progressive force within capitalist development as the 
adversary, and ally themselves with those anti-indus- 
trialist forces whose hegemony is the immediate 
cause and proper motive for socialist transforma- 
tions. 

What monstrous fools they are, those Soviet 
''Tories. Seized by their abominable stupidity, they 
profess themselves to be pursuing peace, when in 
praice they are contributing, from their side, to the 
preconditions for irreversible impulses leading dire- 
ly and early o general thermonuclear holocaust. 

To account for the insanity of Communists who sup- 
rt the lunatic Arbatov Dorine, one has to recog- 
nize principally the carry-forward of pseudo-feudal 
Physiocratic attitudes of peasant hostility against in- 
dustrial development. The stinking litical mess of 
Soviet agriculture, and those Communist Party strata 
who defend such bungling or who ally with the bung- 
lers, is the centerpiece of the problem. 

The agricultural budget for the projeed new Soviet 
an exemifies the way in which issues of Soviet do- 
mestic and foreign licy are ermixed. Granted, 
the lag in the technological development of Soviet 
agriculture is a crucial ernal problem, the principal 
ernal bottleneck of the Soviet economy. In that re- 
spe, the agricultural budget within the projeed 
Soviet Plan appears to concur with what this writer 
has prosed to the Soviets and others as a  of 

emphasis under the terms made ssible by a new 
monetary system. However, there is a stratum within 
the Soviet leadership which foolishly views this same 
remedy in a way direly opsite to the analysis and 
prosals made by this writer. 

Oblomov denies reality  because Oblomov, a 
Russian kulak in his sociological heart, is Oblomov. 
Oblomov says: "Forget all these litical-economic 
realities of the outside world  which, since I do not 
choose to understand them, cannot be of much prai- 
cal imrtance for Great Mother Russia's ernal af- 
fairs." Oblomov insists: "We must ignore such mat- 
ters  which are above my head  to the extent s- 
sible. Great Mother Russia must deal with the agricul- 
tural problem as a purely ernal matter." It is essen- 
tial to smell the stink of the kulak mentality in this, to 
thus comprehend how deey this streak of narrow, 
heteronomic kulak "shrewdness" penetrates o cer- 
tain Soviet strata. 

How, then, does "shrewd," fantasy-ridden Oblo- 
mov see the problem of the projeed Soviet an? 

Kulak-Oblomov sees the agricultural problem as a 
matter of competition against the Soviet industrial de- 
velopment programs. Since Soviet industrial develop- 
ment has been enslaved not only to military impera- 







lives, but also the associated economic-strategic cir- 
cumstances of Soviet life, it is these two aspes of 
Soviet development which Oblomov sees as his fac- 
tional obstacles within Great Mother Russia. These 
military programs and the stress un technological 
progress of industry are what shrewd," stubborn, 
foolish, heteronomic Oblomov views  oh, so kulak- 
shrewdly!  as his faional problems. 

Oblomov is all the more deey embittered by the 
comas which the military and industrial forces 
say  most uncharitably  concerning the admini- 
stration of the agricultural seor. 

The industrialist  of view says : * 'What good is it 
to simy increase your allocation under the an? We 
agree with the objeives and the imperatives; there 
is no issue on that part of the matter. It is your bun- 
gling litical maladministration of the problem to 
which we obje. You have made your incompetence a 
bottomless sinkhole o which we ur tens of billions 
of rubles  and what do we get? 

**We give you traors. We have spent billions devel- 
oping traors with the same technology we use for 
Soviet tanks, which tanks are the best in the world. 
What then is the fate of these traors, once we deliver 
them to you? It is the same thing with everything else. 

'*Do not instru us that the peasant is stubborn. We 
know the Soviet peasant better than you do; from 
where do you imagine that Soviet industry recruited 
its labor force  perhaps from the pages of Das Kapi- 
taI 

**And what do you do? How do you attempt to induce 
the peasant to improve his produion on the state 
farms? You turn him o a NEPman! You transform 
the cooperatives and colleive farms o a grotesque 
parody of feudalism  you dire the peasant to work 
so many hours on the colleive's **estate," and so re- 
tain so many hours for his own, private, NEPman's 
patch. Is the traor maained then? No, our pea- 
sants, who you in your idiocy have turned back o a 
caricature of feudal agricultural relations, flee from 
the state seor as quickly as ssible, to save their 
time and energy for their little serfs* patches. What do 
you know of socialist produion? You have not yet 
reached the level of capitalist produion ! " 

The military skesman echoes this! '*The same 
peasant who can not maain a traor under your di- 
reion is an excellent tank operator and maenance 
specialist, and does many similar duties very well in 
the Red Army." 

Oblomov seethes with bitterness. He is enraged, not 
because such justified insults are often said publicly, 
but because he knows that the industrialist and mili- 
tary skesmen are thinking such cruel things. 

Oblomov is a Bukharinite. Not necessarily, in the 
main, because he is a conscious descendant of the 



 

- Bukharin-Tomsky-Rykov faion, but be- 
cause his sociological outlook makes him a spiritual 
heir to that tradition. 

This is relevant to that fa that Soviet ''hard-li- 
ners" are self-identified as Stalinists, The thematic 
key to that self-identification is the Stalin-Bukharin 
sit over the First Five Year Plan. Sociologically, 
from a ''Western" stand, Stalinism is viewed 
mainly in terms of the hystasized resultant of the in- 
termixture of confliing sociological tendencies with- 
in the Soviet leadership as a whole. Throughout the 
shifting patterns of correlations of social tendencies 
within the Soviet leadership, what the foreign obser- 
ver tends to see is not the process, but its expression in 
the shifting patterns of a kind of overall Soviet "bi-par- 
tisan foreign licy." To the shallow-thinking obser- 
ver of the "Western" world, the significance of today's 
Stalinism is locatable in the Stalin-Trotsky fight. To 
understand the reality of the matter from the inside of 
the Soviet Union, one must see the issue in terms of the 
underlying fight between E. Preobrazhensky and N. 
Bukharin. The methodological blunder we are exs- 
ing in this conneion is the blunder of taking a deter- 
mined phenomenon as if it were a distin thing-in-it- 
self, and making the result an attributed consequence 
of a corresnding, fiive homogeneous causal im- 
pulse. 

It is that duality within Soviet leadership which has 
determined to date the lawful recurrence of patterns. 
In this respe, the Bukharinite - period's 
succession by the ferocity of colleivization, and the 
succession of wishful confidence (that Hitler was not 
yet ready to attack) by the - launching of the 
Red Army's juggernaut counteroffensive, typify the 
same pattern which lawfully operates today. It is the 
wishful stupidity of the overconfident Atlanticists, 
who imagine that David Rockefeller and Richard 
Barnet have the Soviet Politburo permanently by the 
nose, that will inevitably repeat the old pattern as 

World War III. 

Oblomov's essential charaeristic is to attempt to 
deny the existence of erconneions between Mother 
Russia's relationship to the "outside world," and 
what are foolishly defined as the relatively autarkical 
ernal relations of Great Mother Russia's family 
household. When it is made sensuously apparent to 
him that the "outsider" is direly engaged in at- 
tempting to rape Mother Russia, the same, ordinarily 
withdrawn Oblomov flies o an uncontrollable nat- 
ionalist rage. 

It is the dependency of the industrialist sociological 
current on litical blocs with the Oblomovist-cen- 
tered, more backward strata within the Soviet party 
and state apparatus which brings a duality o the de- 
termination of Soviet foreign and domestic stures. 







 

and o the propaganda sture which the leadership 
presents as the **line'* to both the foreign and domestic 
pulations. 

Neither Stalin nor Trotsky are clear-cut exames of 
either social current  hence the absurdity of those 
influential strands of U.S. Soviet foreign licy analy- 
sis which attempt to shape the fas to fit the Stalin- 
Trotsky fiion. 

L.D, Trotsky was the son of a relatively well-to-do 
Russian Jewish peasant family. This was a personal 
basis in experience which aided Trotsky in shaping 
strategic licy for the Civil War period of the Red 
Army's development, and which aided him in adding a 
valuable element to the **scissors" theses otherwise 
developed by E. Preobrazhensky. () That contribu- 
tion was Trotsky's valid litical insight o the dual- 
ity of the litical comsition of tendencies of the 
Russian peasantry, and the necessity of winning the 
peasantry to a performance-credible licy of '*sav- 
ing." 

The broader significance of this same  is that 
although Trotsky was a brilliant litical thinker, 
these were the accomishments of his persona  to 
the extent that he could never overcome the persisting 
nightmare of his confliing heteronomic peasant out- 
look. For similar reasons, he could never independent- 
ly master the essential features of theoretical eco- 
nomics or science generally  although his brilliant 
persona-side enabled him to rationally acknowledge 
and assimilate such contributions by others. 

For psychologically lawful reasons, Trotsky's psy- 
chological weaknesses reduced his tentialities to 
that of at best a "number two man/' Although his crit- 
ical stand, insofar as he was not thinking from 
the stand of assuming primary resnsibility for 
imementing a licy, appears  because of its fre- 
quent brilliance  to be the competence of a tential 
successor to Lenin, Trotsky could no more be a leader 
of that sort than a goldfish can prevent itself from con- 
tinuing to swim in tight circles when dumped from its 
customary bowl o a bathtub. Trotsky fought heroic- 
ally and stubbornly against the heteronomic impulses 
of his peasant soul, but he only contained it; he never 
freed himself fully from its Oblomovist control. Trot- 
sky was thus one of those brilliant individuals who can- 
not funion without a patron. ( ) 

Stalin, with all his comexities, was a Bolshevik 
version of Machiavelli's Prince, the master of were 
from the stand of combinatorial litics and the 



. Evgeny Preobrazhensky, The New Economics, trans, by Brian 
Pearce (New York: Oxford University Press, Inc., ),  pp. 

. L. Marcus (Lyndon LaRouche) and K. Ghandhi, "The Passion 
and Second Coming of L.D. Trotsky/' The Campaigner, Vol. VII, No.  
(Summer, ), pp. -. 



otting rinsic to such arts. In embracing the com- 
bination as a whole, his identity and self-image be- 
came that of a pular diator embodying in himself 
the primary self-erest as represented by the com- 
bination itself. That institutionalization of himself be- 
came his controlling self-image  a Soviet Oliver 
Cromwell. () 

What today's professed Stalinist sees predominantly 
is not the contradiions embodied in Stalin, but Stalin 
belatedly seizing Preobrazhensky* s analysis, and con- 
tinuing that as the guiding perception of the charaer- 
istic self-erest of the combination thereafter. The 
Soviet Stalinist abstras that moment from Stalin's 
leadership, that moment in its resultant form, and re- 
flexively attributes that adduced aspe as the homo- 
geneously-charaeristic Stalin impulse. 

The Stalin constitution of the Soviet republic has the 
ent of transfeng the personalized role of Stalin 
the diator to the lawful organic democratic-republi- 
can institutions of a republic after him. That constitu- 
tion and associated constitutional tradition is viable as 
it embodies the *Treobrazhenskian*' moment\ it is 
corrupted by its imicit denial of the problems associ- 
ated with the princie of combination. 

Both the sitive and flawed features of that consti- 
tutional tradition  as an organic, embedded tradi- 
tion of willful praice  carry forward direly o 
the problems presently focused ernally around the 
projeed agricultural comnent of the five-year 
an. It is also in this specific respe that the curtail- 
ments of litical freedom within the Soviet repub- 
lic  as we have defined freedom  are causally 
mediated. The abuses of law within the Soviet republic 
are generated by the constras aced un those 
proper expressions of freedom which are checked 
and oppressed to the extent that they are viewed as 
leading, in turn, toward provoking a decisive open re- 
solution of the essentially irrepressible conflis be- 
tween the two principal social tendencies embodied 
within the combination. 

This is generatively causal of the persisting stupid- 
ity which charaerizes most of ''official Marxism- 
Leninism." Just as the ignorant, tradition-oriented per 

ception of capitalist litical forms of ownership with- 
in the United States contributes to stupidities within 
the U.S. Soviet foreign licy, so the stupidities we 
have just located within Soviet thinking are the princi- 
pal, ernal-Soviet obstacle to establishing a com- 
munity of princie in fa. 

To resume, now, our comementary focus, on the 
significance of industrial-capitalist litical forms of 



. Lyndon LaRouche, "The Question of Stalinism Today," The 
Campaigner, Vol. VIII. No.  (Nov. ). 







ownership under the ent of our Constitution and 
republic: 

The stand of the ent of our Constitutional re- 
public is not that of axiomatically adopting capitalist 
litical forms of ownership as a pre-given element of 
law. Hamilton and Jefferson, among others, are em- 
phatic respeing the conditional right of any specific 
capitalist ownership to exist only to the extent that it 
does not confli in praice with the vital erests of 
the nation as might be defined without respe to capi- 
talist forms. 

For exame. When the demands of the New York 
City debt-holders could be met only at the expense of 
the vital erests of the people of New York City, it 
was unconstitutional and imicitly treasonous for 
New York State Governor Hugh Carey and other judi- 
cial, executive, and legislative bodies to perpetuate 
the erests of debt-ownership at the expense of the 
vital erests of the City and State pulation and na- 
tion as a whole. Such aions represent in themselves 
sufficient grounds in constitutional law for prompt im- 
peachment aions against all the officials resn- 
sible. 

This does not mean that mere summary repudiation 
of debts was the axiomatic constitutional remedy. The 
state is obliged to consider the chain-reaion reper- 
cussions of partially or entirely suspending New York 
City debt service payments. It must prote the vital 
erests of the nation respeing technological pro- 
gress and the maenance of institutions of credit in- 
dispensable to the economy as a whole. This does not 
prescribe saving Chase Manhattan Bank by govern- 
ment ''bailout." It means that if Chase Manhattan 
Bank and other institutions must be pushed o bank- 
ruptcy because of vital erests of the nation, any es- 
sential funion performed by such bankrupt institu- 
tions must be either perpetuated under conditions of 
financial reorganization in bankruptcy, or alternate 
means of serving the affeed vital national erests 
be efficiently, promptly provided. 

Where, otherwise, contraual rights confli with 
the vital national erests as defined by the ent of 
our Constitutional republic, the rights of contra are 
axiomatically to be nullified in behalf of the national 
erest. Every Federal court is obliged to strily ap- 
y that rule in all relevant instances. The court must 
either itself direly nullify the contraual obligations 
as required by national erest, or must suspend that 
right while direing the resolution of the procedures 
of financial reorganization to the aion of executive 
and legislative branches of government. 

Under the content and clear ent of the Constitu- 
tion and republic's founding, there exists no axiom- 
atically '*sacred" right to capitalist litical forms of 



 

ownership  no more than personal incomes are ex- 
empt from taxation, or the persons of our citizens ex- 
empt from military conscription. Rather the rights 
delegated to agencies and persons by constitutional 
law are proteed from all invasions, except those in- 
trusions which fall under appropriate due process 
within the ent of constitutional law. The rights re- 
speing the litical freedoms of citizens represent 
the highest priority of categorical right. Although the 
right to develop capitalist forms of ownership is a 
principal right added to the right of personality under 
a capitalist form of democratic republic  hence, its 
great were under law  it is not a categorically in- 
alienable right, but a right created by constitutional 
law to the advantage of the vital erests of the repub- 
lic. 

It is a corollary of this to emphasize afresh that the 
constitutional government is not established primar- 
ily to enforce a system of exicit and imicit contrac- 
tual agreements among the constituent persons and 
agencies of the society. Rather, constitutional law de- 
limits contraual forms of relationship to those forms 
and methods deemed consistent with the national in- 
terest as a whole. Nor does the legality of a contra 
once-existing exist in perpetuity because it was for- 
merly lawful. Such rights are as much defined in re- 
spe to the circumstances in which their perpetuation 
is attempted as the circumstances under which they 
are initially exercised. 

The constitutional right to capitalist forms of pro- 
perty in the means of produion and distribution was 
adopted because no alternate, efficient means existed 
in praice for the apication of the princie of free* 
dom to the tasks of technologically centered general 
progress. The inability of the society to competently 
predetermine what technological innovations and 
apications would be most fruitful for progress, and 
in what manner of development and use, warranted  
and required  the establishment of the area of 
development of technological innovations as an area 
of sitive toleration. Since the testing of germ forms 
of such innovations could not be efficiently cometed 
apart from basic forms of produion and commerce, 
this and economic considerations required the api- 
cation of the essential fiions of sitive toleration to 
the corresnding areas of produion and commerce. 

For related reasons, the notion of the liberties and 
rights of capitalist ownership is inseparable from the 
notion of the stated or imicit ent of the articles of 
incorration of a capitalist firm. The same princie 
is imicitly apicable to the privately held firm. This 
must not properly delimit the existence of such an 
entity to its initial ent. The ent undergoes proper 
evolutionary shifts. However, the currently adducible 







 

ent associated with capitalist litical forms of own- 
ership for produion and commerce is properly the 
key comementary feature of the ownership itself for 
lawfully defining the rights of ownership. 

It is pure nonsense and reckless mythology to ima- 
gine that government aced itself therefore at a dis- 
tance from produion, commerce and so forth. Our 
government came o being as a federal republic in 
significant part because the Confederation failed, 
among its other incompetencies, to develop canals. 
The railroads were built  in chief  on the initia- 
tive and through the grants and aid provided by gov- 
ernment. Wherever the need for a form of produion 
and commerce  or services  is clearly prede- 
fined  predeterminable  the basis for delegating 
that to capitalist litical forms tends to evarate. 
Historically, either government has undertaken that 
economic aivity independently, has aed as **prime 
contraor** for a jo effort of government and 
capitalist firms, or has donated the fruits of govern- 
ment produion to continued development and opera- 
tion under capitalist forms of ownership. 

Broadly, capitalist litical forms exist because 
they suited our purses, and most specifically 
because they represented the only efficient in- 
strument of the republic for accomishing those 
aspes of the tasks of freedom most direly 
associated with technological progress. As long as the 
republic is persuaded that equally efficient alter- 
native instruments are not readily available in 
praice, we shall preserve the capitalist litical 
forms as rights and liberties  rights and liberties 
circumscribed by vital national erests. 

Granted, our constitutional republic did not create 
capitalist forms de novo  they did not leap as 
original creations from the Constitution as Minervas 
from the brow of Jove. They represented an existing 
alternative, a heritage, principally, of the Tudor and 
Commonwealth revolutions. They had been developed 
to a certain extent and tested. We adopted them as 
proven instruments of national erest. Moreover, we 
fought for such institutions against Britain  we 
fought for industrial capitalism against the embodied 
anti-capitalist British dorines of Adam Smith, It was 
American working men who provided the core of the 
hard fighting in that cause. 

Conversely, although the maenance even of 
existing modes of produive technology is always in 
our immediately most vital national erest, if the 
princie of development of technology is repudiated 
by a capitalist corration, and so forth, then the 
princie of freedom has been virtually extinguished 
by such a capitalist. According to the ent of con- 
stitutional law, such a capitalist has to that extent in 
fa nullified the validity of his property rights. 



For exame, the maenance of ownership rights 
of a slumlord is properly seen as an abhorrence from 
the stand of capitalist constitutional law. Those 
others who are direly comicit in perpetuating the 
slumlord praice have similarly nullified their 
constitutionally derived rights of ownership to a 
corresnding degree. 

That is not merely a rigorous princie derived from 
constitutional law. It is an historical fa of capitalist 
development. This is a  concerning which Karl 
Marx confronted the greatest conceptual difficulties, 
because of his error in attempting to emoy early 
nineteenth century British capitalist development as a 
clinical model of reference for analysis of capitalism 
in general. The struggle between industrial capitalism 
and the opsing ground-rent erests has been 
historically the centerpiece of capitalist development. 
Corresndingly, the worst horrors incurred in the 
course of capitalist development have been causally 
correlated with industrial-capitalist retreats of ac- 
comodation to or subordination to the ground-rent 
erest. It is the rigorously derived apication of the 
ent of our Constitutional law and the suprting 
evidence of praice that the rights of ground rent are 
at most a negatively tolerated liberty within the stri 
reading of that law. 

The proper approach to defining the distinions of 
the Soviet constitution respeing litical forms of 
ownership is within the framework of the notions of 
constitutional law we have apied to the capitalist 
property forms. Only by such approaches can we 
obtain the coherence of conception necessary for 
purses of lawfully defining a community of prin- 
cie. 

The method of law for that case, as for our own, is 
the historical method as we have presented and 
illustrated it in this licy study. 

There is no other approach to consider as a ssible 
alternative. The pretense that there exists a body of 
ernational law comparable to our own con- 
stitutional law is utter rubbish. Such ernational law 
exists presently neither in fa nor imicit princie. 

Among the nations of the world, there exist to date 
only four viable original currents of constitutional 
law: The United States, France, Mexico, and the 
Soviet Union. Otherwise, the only formulated dorine 
of constitutional law available is that dorine of 
/euda a vi^ associated most prominently with the work 
of Thomas Aquinas. 

The only notable effort to establish the kernel of an 
articulated body of ernational law was the effort of 
Justice Jackson and others respeing the so-called 
Nuremberg Law. That effort had two defes. 
Jackson's method was rinsically scholastic and not 
an expression of modern constitutional law as typified 







by the charaer of ent within both the United 
States and Soviet constitutional law. The humanist 
dorines peculiar to scholasticism are the content of 
each of the determinations of indiable offenses 
adopted. That was a shortcoming, not a criping 
defe of Justice Jackson's contribution (in par- 
ticular). If the Nuremberg Code had been made an 
efficient kernel for establishing a body of ernational 
law, we might have advanced to more modern con- 
ceptions from that first step. Unfortunately, prin- 
cipally because the apication of the Law was 
delimited in apication to seleed notable and token- 
exemary cases within the scope of Nazi and Nazi 
occupation praices  thus, inclusively, letting the 
Rockefeller erests off scot-free  the Nuremberg 
Law was made a hideous travesty. 

Constitutional law exists in existing original forms, 
as we have just noted, for the cases of the United 
States (Franklin et aL), France (de Gaulle et ah), 
Mexico (Obregon et al.). and the Soviet Union (Lenin, 
Stalin). These original forms have, in two notable 
cases, been reicated in other nation's constitutions: 
the models of the United States and the Soviet Union. 
These reications are not efficient except in cases of 
socialist countries, including Yugoslavia. Most of the 
constitutions otherwise adopted by nations are 
showcase pieces pasted onto national sitive and 
customary law, constitutions which do not efficiently 
order the law as a whole, and whose shallow- 
minded, ecleic charaer renders them essentially 
worthless as instruments for the purse of 
generating constitutional coherence in the law as a 
whole. In the four cases cited, the constitutional law 
was developed through a painful experience of 
revolutionary and comparable struggles. During 
those struggles, the need for governance by a single 
coherent princie of law, a law empirically deter- 
mined in approximate appropriateness to natural law, 
was defined in conception and praice, and made the 
conscious commitment adopted by the majority of 
that eleorate which established the law. 

The United States' vital erests prescribe its 
commitment to premise its domestic and foreign 
licies un conceptions of natural law appropriately 
expressed as coherent constitutional law. In defining 
our foreign licy, we do not proceed from what other 
nations may regard as law, but from what we know to 
be the necessary constitutional charaer of national 
and ernational law. 

We respe the fa that the capacity of national 
leaders and eleorates to reach a competent per- 
ception of natural and constitutional law has been 
developed heretofore only under conditions of ex- 
tended crises of the sort associated with prolonged 
revolutions and wars. Consequently, we have 



 

toleration for the lack of competent perception of law 
in other nations, but our relations with such nations 
are nonetheless sitively generated according to our 
neo-atonic humanist notions of natural and con- 
stitutional law. 

The Soviet republic was created as an extension of 
the leadership of V.L Lenin. That is the indispensable 
key to a lawful determination of its constitutional 
charaer. 

The litical mobilization initiated and led by Lenin 
was initially defined according to the licies set forth 
by Karl Marx in the Communist Manifesto, and as 
exemified by Marx's aive suprt of the U.S. 
government of Abraham Lincoln. Lenin's com- 
mitment, and the commitment around which the 
Bolshevik cadre and its following were developed, was 
to mobilize an independent litical labor movement 
as an indispensable included instrument for 
establishing a Russian capitalist republic. 

This perspeive was abandoned because the 
Russian capitalists refused to break with those foreign 
financier forces, centered in the City of London, which 
direly and indirely looted a major amount of 
ground rent from Russian agriculture and primary 
commodity extraion. For that reason, the Russian 
capitalists refused to proceed with the establishment 
of capitalist litical reforms in Russian agricultural 
produion, a refusal which made Russian industrial 
capitalist development imssible under capitalist 
litical forms. 

For this reason, under Lenin's leadership, the 
Bolsheviks and their allies, aing through the ruling 
institutions of the existing government, the Soviets, to 
become the government, undertook the industrial 
development of Russia without the capitalists. 

From the stand of natural and associated 
constitutional law, the Russian Revolution of Oober 
 is identical before such law with the American 
Revolution. It was a revolt against a Tory regime  
the pawn of (principally) the City of London  
for the purse of establishing the national litical 
institutions necessary to industrial capitalist 
economic forms of development. 

The charaeristic ernal distinion between the 
American and Russian Oober revolutions is the 
opsite role performed by the national capitalists in 
the two cases. In the American Revolution, the 
capitalists, in suprt of Benjamin Franklin et al, led 
the revolution. In the Oober Revolution, the national 
capitalists joined the foreign colonial forces' 'Tory" 
opsition. 

That, we insist, is the standing of the Oober 
revolution before the law, and is exemary of the 
princie governing the occurrence of socialist 







 

transformations within a world order under the rule of 
appropriate constitutional notions of natural law. 
That, we insist is the generating princie of law 
within U.S. foreign licy direing our relationships 
to both capitalist and socialist republics, and also 
concerning the occurrence of socialist transform- 
ations within a previously capitalist nation. 

As a corollary, we repudiate the Woodrow Wilson 
and Franklin Roosevelt dorines respeing the 
notion of conditional sovereignty as exemified in 
their praice for the cases of Mexico and the Soviet 
Union. 

Current Soviet dorine conforms imperfely to the 
licy conceptions we have just prescribed. At the 
outset of the Soviet republic, Lenin, Trotsky and 
others correly accounted for the ruling necessity of 

J" 

the litical transformation to a diatorship of the 
litical labor movement. To that extent, that con- 
scious statement of licy and the prescribed con- 
ception concur in a most essential aspe. However, 
their historical analysis of the origins of the necessity 
thus cited is imperfe, in that it attributes the con- 
ditions produced by monetarism to the rinsic 
charaer of industrial capitalist development. That 
error is flagrantly developed as an included element 
in Lenin's Imperialism and Trotsky's deviant but 
comementary special dorine of ''permanent 
revolution." The perpetuation and aggravation of that 

i 

included flaw as present Soviet dorine is an obstacle 
to establishing a sitive formulation of a community 
of princie. 

// the Soviet republic abandons the erroneous and 
disorienting dorine to which we have referred, and 
adopts, instead, the constitutional dorine for lawful 
socialist transformations we have enunciated, then 
the basis for a sitive treaty based on community of 
princie exists between the Soviet republic and a 
"new Federalist'' government of the United States. 

The remaining ernal Soviet problems of our 
nation's Soviet foreign licy are the residual dif- 
ficulties we must clarify here respeing the ernal 
features of the Soviet republic as a republic. 

We must accept, according to the rule of natural and 
subsumed constitutional law. both the absence of 
litical institutions and praices peculiar to 
capitalist litical forms of ownership of basic means 
of produion and distribution. We will be obliged also 
to accept the present absence of provision for 
existence of litical parties and related instruments 
whose purse would be that citizens of the Soviet 
republic attempt to establish capitalist litical forms 
of ownership. Neither of these restriive features of 
Soviet ernal life represents in fa, according to 
natural and properly associated constitutional law, a 
lack of sitive litical freedom within the Soviet 



republic. We agree to accept those and associated 
features of the Soviet republic as a diatorship of the 
litical labor movement according to the 
specifications for a republic we have developed 
earlier in this licy study. These are necessary treaty 
specifications of any efficient, sitive agreement 
between the United States and the Soviet Union pur- 
suant to establishing or approaching relations based 
un community of princie. 

The second of the two s will tend to stick in 
some craws: **What about Communist parties in the 
United States?" In this conneion  and we concede 
the difficulties the problem presents to some bodies of 
opinion  it is necessary to understand clearly what 
we are saying, what we are agreeing to in fa, and not 
to be stuck in some scholastic nightmare of quid pro 
QUO among empty litical-legal fiions. 

We are not stipulating by law that the United States 
 a capitalist republic by law  has **traded away" 

the aspirations of pro-capitalist U.S. citizens for the 
ssibility of a capitalist transformation within the 
USSR. No President or Congress of the United 
States has the were to make that sort of stipulation, 
either in princie or in fa. What we are doing  and 
must do  is to break off those pre-existing con- 
neions of United States licy to ernal Soviet 
affairs which are historically derivative of the varying 
degrees of adversary and tential-adversary 
relationships between the two weres and their 
respeive allies during a period of sixty years. What 
we are doing is to repeal Zbigniew Brzezinski and his 
ilk, and in the appropriately definitive way. The  
is to get a clean slate in these matters. 

The answere to the objeion is clearer, from the 
stand of fa, once we review the history of 
the Communist organizations in the industrialized 
capitalist nations, and set the imications of that 
history in the special context of the circumstance in 
which the present writer is either President of the 
United States or is otherwise a leading influence in 
national licy. 

The immediate  of historical fa to be made 
concerning the Communist parties in the OECD 
countries is: it doesn't funion. At the most  
meaning the Communist parties of Italy and France  
those parties are reformist parties of the social 
democratic type, for better or worse. With few ex- 
ceptions, the small Communist parties are owned top- 
down, lock, stock and barrel by the Rockefellers or 
allied monetarists' litical-elligence networks, 
networks which also own large segments of the 
leadership of the French (Kanapa, Marchais, et al.) 
and Italian (Amendola, Berlinguer, Segre et al.) 
parties. This state of affairs is not in fa a recent 







development. Beginning with the foundation of the 
Communist International at the end of World War I, 
and by qualitative stages at successive s there- 
after, the leadership of the Communist International 
outside the Soviet Union was effeively taken over 
from the inside by Anglo-American and related l- 
itical-elligence networks. 

Under conditions in which the first phases of a 
community of princie are established between the 
United States and the Soviet Union, and with the 
corresnding elleual hegemony of the writer and 
his associates in the litical labor movement of the 
OECD and other nations, what, then, is the reality of 
the situation? What then is the praical imication of 
the troublesome stipulation? 

Otherwise, it is to be emphasized again  out of 
respe for the identified general sort of objeions  
that the sort of stipulation prosed has two distin 
motivations. First, respeing the Soviet republic, it is 
necessary for us to repeal Zbigniew Brzezinski  
which most of us have excellent other reasons to do, in 
any case. To wipe that off the slate. Second, respeing 
ourselves, we must clarify our own perception of the 
lawful nature of a republic. We must clarify that most 
shary, not "to sacrifice liberty'* for the sake of 
clarity, but to develop clarity so that we may launch a 
fresh assault for the cause of freedom. If we desire an 
increase in litical freedom within the Soviet Union 
(in particular), we must a in such a way as to 
generate the preconditions under which that will 
develop.. To a to that effe, we must commit our- 
selves to clear perceptions of what we ought to desire, 
rather than encumbering our purse with the 
baggage of at-best ambiguous habituated stures. 

The real problems of litical freedom within the 
Soviet Union lie not in the lack of free expression of 
capitalist litical tendencies, but in the litical 
derivatives of the stupidity to which we referred 
earlier  discounting the problems direly at- 
tributable to the aversive conditions we (chiefly) have 
imsed un the Soviet Union and its ernal life. 

The proper conceptual vantage- from which to 
locate the dire links between Oblomovist stupidities 
and aual abuses is Karl Marx's notion of the litical 
class-for-itselt The absence of a systematic approach 
to imementing that conception is the continuing 
wellspring for aual or tential ernally generated 
abuses against litical freedom within the Soviet 
republic. That is the only significant ernally 
situated cause for the significant flaws of the Soviet 
Union as a republic. 

The charaeristic flaw of the litical labor 
movement, the flaw which prevents it from com- 
petently independently knowing its own real erest, 
is the heteronomic relationship of the individualized 



 

working person to the produive process. The in- 
dividualized worker has a sitive impulse (a Whig 
impulse) because of his self-identification with the 
development of improved produive and related 
problem-solving mental skills. However, his in- 
dividualization sets him o heteronomic opsition 
to profit  and thus makes him sometimes a tential 
dupe of lunatic varieties of ''socialism.'* As a 
heteronomic individual, he is unable to define the 
sitive conneion of profit to his self-erests, ex- 
cept his desire that his own immediate emoyer enjoy 
sufficient profit to keep him emoyed with the 
prospe of income and related improvements 
trickling down to him as an emoyee. 

He does not view profit in its aive funion as a 
part of the national and global absolute profit. He does 
not see direly and sitively the problem of main- 
taining and effeively realizing that profit as the way 
of effeing a universal improvement in the 
technological progress of his national and the global 
economy. That is not the entirety of his outlook as a 
human being who is a skilled or semi-skilled worker, 
but that is the heteronomic comnent of his outlook. 

It is only when the methods emoyed by Benjamin 
Franklin et al. to create the eleorate of the 
American Revolution are apied to the conscious 
litical organization of the labor movement, that 
labor looks at itself consciously as a whole labor force 
with a unified general erest in the efficient increase 
and appropriate investment of profit as a whole. Thus, 
as Franklin et al. transformed the individualized 
impulses of the eleorate o informed impulses 
concerning the determining relationship of the general 
erest for the individual erest, as the worker not 
only understands the general erest, but how it 
concretely determines the satisfaion of his individ- 
ual erest, his world outlook is educated, trans- 
formed. 

This developed perception of the universal stand- 
 as the pr/jnary basis, is a transformation in the 
individual worker which Marx identifies as the 
transformed stand of the litical class-for-itself . 

In the heteronomic case, the individual defines his 
erests primarily in terms of localized circum- 
stances. He does not think through the consequences 
of alternative aions to the effes on the general 
circumstance and, in turn, the consequences of the 
general circumstance in determining his local situa- 
tion. Thus to the extent that the worker sees his in- 
dividual relationship to an emoyer as primary^ or a 
group of trade unionists see their localized relation- 
ship as primary^ their impulses are heteronomic in 
tendency and consequence. 

In the alternate case, embodied within the notion of 
the litical class-for-itself, the worker locates the 







 

solution to his immediate-erest problems, by first 
satisfying himself as to the problems of the national 
and global economy as a whole, and extending that 
economic approach to other, related areas. Through 
such means he redefines his local problems as sub- 
sumed features of a national and global licy prob- 
lem, and informs his aions concerning the local prob- 
lems accordingly. 

Under these altered circumstances, his govern- 
ment  to the extent it more or less consciously and 
efficiently represents the general erest  ceases 
to become his oppressor, and becomes his common in- 
strument of self-rule. His government becomes the 
general instrumentality through which he accomish- 
es those generalized aions necessary to create the 
climate indispensable for solving his immediate prob- 
lems of self-erest. 

When the charaer of the Soviet republic is viewed 
by those criteria, the principal flaw stands out clearly, 
well defined. 

Obviously, the problem  the defe  is not that 
there is not what self-styled '*Trotskyists" idiotically 
define as a lack of "workers democracy" in the Soviet 
Union. Prosing to toss the franchise and so forth 
about among a heteronomically defined pulation, 
and calling that sort of nonsense a ''republic," has no 
ace in study of the Soviet Union. This is not to say 
that we do not desire to have the Soviet Union achieve 
the fullest realization of a democratic republic, but 
mere democracy per se is not the solution. 

The first fa to be acknowledged is that the leading 
strata of the Communist Party continue to substitute 
themselves for the working class as a class-for-itself. 
That is not in itself good or bad. It is not the desired 
form of a republic, but if conditions require such sub- 
stitution for the time being, the arrangement is prob- 
lematic while not abhorrent in princie. 

What is abhorrent is that aspe of substitution 
which contributes to fostering heteronomic stupidity 
within the eleorate, and thus perpetuating in that ag- 
gravated way the necessity for gason-economy sub- 
stitution. 

At the outset, under the conditions of foreign inva- 
sion and foreign-snsored civil wars, during the fol- 
lowing period of war-wrecked industries and cordon 
sanitaire, and so forth, the Bolsheviks had no option 
but to substitute themselves for a then -nonexistent 
class-for-itself. This has been aggravated by the al- 
ready-cited varieties of perpetuated and overlapping 
developments which have maained the Soviet re- 
public in the condition of a gason economy. 

The praical question is properly reduced to the 
prosition: in what significant ways, what viciously 
persisting blunders of licy and general praice, has 
the leadership of the Communist Party unnecessarily 



aggravated the conditions fostering substitution? We 
are clearly not concerned with such petty issues as 
Khrushchev's or Brezhnev's sneezing in the wrong di- 
reion at a certain turn in affairs. We are concerned 
with the efficiency of the institutions and instruments 
of a republic. It is not a matter of errors as such, but of 
licies. We are concerned with vicious errors in 
licy which obstru a process of self-improvement 
in the development of a democratic republic. 

Let it be fairly emphasized that as the case of Crom- 
well illustrates, the princie of substitution expresses 
the use of the oppressive weres of sovereignty to 
check the heteronomic impulses of a litically incom- 
petent tential eleorate  as well as other forces. 
For this reason, substitution is litically dangerous, 
litically unviable except as a temrary expedient. 
When does the eleorate cease to be litically incom- 
petent? How long do the conditions fostering require- 
ment of ernal litical security measures persist? 

Respeing a republican diatorship by the litical 
labor movement, the princie of the Soviet republic's 
constitutional law, when, in fa, does the Soviet work- 
ing class become a litical class-for-itself? In fa, of 
course, the answere is neither all the one way or the 
other. Since the writer is not direly acquaed with 
the ernal life in the Soviet Union, he can offer only 
those conclusions which are based on crucial evidence 
externally available. Certain decisive conclusions are 
nonetheless reached with absolute certay. 

First, one does not develop an eleorate by lying to 
it persistently concerning the circumstances which 
govern its government's major elements of domestic 
and foreign licy. For exame, recently, especially 
since February of this present year, the prender- 
ance of the leading articles of note appearing in 
Pravda and Izvestia concerning the United States 
have been downright sweeping lies to the knowledge of 
the authors and editors, and also known to be lies by 
most members of the CPSU Central Committee, ac- 
cording to other information previously published in 
such leading sources as Pravda, Izvestia, and 
Krasnaya Zvezda. This is the worst case of the lying 
issued by such leading sources, but such praices on 
leading foreign and domestic licy matters are by no 
means lacking precedents. 

Why  by what reason and licies  do the rest 
of the Politburo and CPSU CC members tolerate such 
dangerous filth as the edification of the Soviet eleor- 
ate? The name of the game is called * 'party disci- 
ine." Although each faion emoys its associated 
litical apparatus down through the res of the So- 

Viet Union and Eastern Europe's institutions to worry 
away at building up a correlation of forces for its line, 
in princie the issues are fought out within the 
leadership without the conscious involvement of the 







eleorate  even as speators  until after the 
fight is settled and someone trots out to exain the 
horrors which have been covered up pending the con- 
clusion of the faional proceedings at the top. 

This sort of nonsense is not peculiar to the Soviet 
Union. We have our own lying national press institu- 
itons, and even when the truth is known to leading cir- 
cles in the USA, that truth is seldom disclosed to the 
eleorate then or later. We are not prosing a bo- 
geyman competition between our clowns and theirs. 
We are concerned with the way in which such prac- 
tices systematically impair the Soviet republic. 

This problem is not a produ of the mere fa that 
the Soviet leadership is substitutionist. If substitution 
had been the only causal element in the situation, the 
problem would have been significantly correed be- 
fore this time. The problem is that  all Soviet de- 
nials to the contrary  the litical class struggle con- 
tinues to rage quite hotly in the Soviet state and its 
leadership. The key to the temrary prominence of 
the Arbatov Dorine, the long-standing ^'realist" 
Rockefeller garbage, and the lying in the Soviet press 
are all part of the same generative problem. 

The key to the problem, the generative element, is 
that the Soviet leadership operates still on the basis of 
the Machiavellian princie of '^combination," The in- 
dustrialists and military are on the one side, and the 
Oblomovists and their allies on the other. It is the ef- 
fort to maain *'party disciine" under these cir- 
cumstances, and the licy of presenting a patched- 
up, unprincied agreement negotiated within the 
combination, representing such horse trades as the 
produ of nothing but **pure Marxist-Leninist sci- 
ence," which is the aive element behind both the ly- 
ing in the Soviet press and the litical ignorance 
fostered within the eleorate. 

Although this is the principal ernal flaw within 
the Soviet republic, it is also obvious that the basis for 
the maenance and aggravation of this unprincied 
combination within the Soviet leadership is the perpe- 
tuation of the gason-economy state of affairs. 

As an individual, as leader of the U.S. Labor Party, 
the writer takes sides morally and in suitable prai- 
cal ways concerning the course of affairs inside the So- 
viet Union. As President of the United States  or, in 
prosing the licies of a **new Federalist" Presi- 



 

dent  the duty of the U.S. President is to know which 
levers of U.S. licy to emoy, to give a properly di- 
reed evolution to the external circumstances of the 
Soviet republic affeing these and related problems. 
The President also had the duty to cause the aual na- 
ture of the ernal situation in the Soviet republic to 
be known to the U.S. eleorate and its representa- 
tives. 

Under the conditions generated by that approach, a 
*'new Federalist" President of the United States has 
the immediate prospe for establishing first steps of 
sitive agreements toward a community of princie 
with the Soviet republic. 

In such matters, and others, it must always be 
emphasized that the foreign and domestic licies of 
the United States are not properly defined in terms of 
sime resnses to things as they are. The duty of the 
Presidency is to a to shape the course of events to 
reach the conditions favorable to the imementation 
of proper licy. 

It is that princie which the new **new Federalist" 
President must follow, and which competencies must 
govern his seleion by the Congress  in the course 
of the impeachment of the olerable Tory usurper. 
Eyeing the Presidency, and engaged, increasingly 
over recent years in catalytically influencing the 
course of events from a sition of relatively maxi- 
mum disadvantage to significantly beneficial effe, 
this writer knows what can and must be done by ac- 
ing those methods at the dissal of the Presidency. 
Provided our licy conforms to the apication of 
natural law to the problems of the world at hand, the 
President of the United States has at his dissal the 
were to shape the course of global development o 
conformity with the vital erests of the United 
States. Such gains will be obtained with the enthusias- 
tic suprt and partnership of most of the world's pre- 
sently leading litical forces. We need only resume 
our constitutional government according to the ent 
of the founding of our republic, appropriately apying 
that to the world at hand, and with the establishment 
of a community of princie with the Soviet Union, the 
adulthood of humanity will have begun. 

That is what the **new Federalist" President and the 
Congress together must set out immediately to accom- 
ish. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



.Y 



Foreign Economic Policy 



The central and chief duty of the new President 
of the United States is to effe a general solution 
to the current world depression and the effes of that 
depression un the ernal life of the nation. He 
faces the most profound crisis the nation has ever 
confronted  respeing the hazards involved  and 
must quickly extricate the nation from that deadly 
predicament. 

The basis for the principal aions the President and 
Congress must take  and promptly  is the au- 

i 

thority exicitly embedded in the ent of our Consti- 
tution and the founding institutions and instruments of 
our republic. On the basis of that authority, it is the 
duty of the President and the Congress to promptly re- 
establish the nation as an industrial capitalist republic 
committed to the Idea of Progress as centered about 
the licy of technological progress. It is also the duty 
of the President and the Congress to restore to effi- 
cient funioning the essential princie of our repub- 
lic, the seleion of representatives and the adoption of 
laws and licies according to the princie of a pro- 
perly informed general eleorate. 

The two central tasks before the President and the 
Congress are the establishment of a National Bank, 
and the aions taken by the United States to termi- 
nate the bankrupt vestiges of the Bretton Woods sys- 
tem and a in concert with other nations to establish a 
new world monetary system, a gold-reserve-based 
International Development Bank, to serve as the com- 
mon rediscount facility of member national banks like 
our own, representing various nations and regions of 
the world. 

Within this framework, the President and the Con- 
gress must take emergency measures to prevent the 
present bankruptcy of major private financial institu- 
tions from precipitating a chain reaion impairing 
the funions of essential instituitons of desit and 
credit. These measures and related necessary 
measures have been developed adequately in the 



Emergency Emoyment A and related draft leg- 
islation published by the U.S. Labor Party. 

Within the framework of these indispensable in- 
stitutional and emergency measures, the President 
and Congress must dire the process of rapid econo- 
mic recovery within the nation. The principal instru- 
ment for effeing that recovery will be the National 
Bank. The method emoyed will be principally to 
issue credit through existing banks aing as corre- 
sndents of the National Bank for financing those 
payroll, materials, and capital expenditures of basic 
industry, transrtation, construion, extraion and 
agriculture required to bring the utilization of existing 
capacities up to full or approximately full produive 
tential. 

The same method will be emoyed for the issuance 
of credit for purses of capital expansion. The 
methods of ordinary sound industrial banking prac- 
tices will be apied to the National Bank for this 
purse. Wherever, by virtue of national licy for 
domestic priorities or foreign programs, the capital- 
ization of expansion and improvements is known to be 
in corresndence with forecastable requirements, 
and on the basis of other standard estimates of merit, 
the National Bank shall be a participating prime 
lender. 

The governing consideration in National Bank 
licies will be the maenance of a *'hard dollar. " 
For every dollar of credit issued to the private seor, 
there must be a reasonably forecastable regenerative 
expansion of tangible wealth in a form of capital and 
consumer commodities themselves representing the 
raw materials of further expansion of the output of 
tangible wealth. Hence, the dire participation of the 
National Bank in the private seor will be restried 
to industry, transrtation, extraion, agriculture (in 
the broad definition), and construion. The special 
added case will be those categories of scientific and 
engineering research and development which are 

 







designated for this purse according to the President 
and the specified related weres of the President to 
that effe. 

The necessary new credit additionally required for 
non-produive commerce and private services must 
originate as a by-produ of the expansion of the 
money supy and desits through the income and 
credits received direly by industry, transrtation, 
extraion, agriculture and construion. 

The correlated objeive of this licy is to effe a 
persisting shift of emphasis in emoyment, away, in 
net effe, from unemoyment, governmental em- 
oyment, services and clerical occupations o the 
industrial labor force and increases in the labor-force 
ratio of scientists and engineers. Within this overall 

direedness of government fiscal and monetary li- 
cies, certain categories of services should be numer- 
ically expanded, notably medical and related profes- 
sions, and certain shifts within the teaching profession 
should be fostered to increase the emphasis un sci- 
ence and engineering within the developing labor 
force. 

The principal means to accomish this are a hard- 
dollar monetary licy of the National Bank, and the 
streamlining and reorienting of tax and other fiscal 
aspes of government to create an economic environ- 
ment in which the desired shifts toward a high-produc- 
tivity, higher-technology economy will automatically 
occur through natural processes principally within the 
private seor. 

The slogan expressing the economic licy of gov- 
ernment must be** Let *s get it built! Built right  and 
newere, and more, and better." Not more with our 
backs, but more with our brains. 

The means for generating this rapid industrial ex- 
pansion will be a massive increase in high-technology 
exrts. These exrts, insofar as they are direed in 
large part toward the developing seor, will involve 
very low-erest long-term (ten-to-twenty-five year) 
loans through the mechanisms of the National Bank 
and the International Development Bank. By dis- 
counting these loans through the International Deve- 
lopment Bank we shall obtain the credits through 
which to purchase needed increased primary mater- 
ials from the developing seor and obtain imrts 
from OECD and CMEA countries. However, the net 
long-term credit extended to the developing seor 
must come from a rtion of our own national absolute 
profit. This must be above the rtion of our absolute 
profit required for expanding and technologically im- 
proving our domestic produive capacities. There- 
fore, we must proceed rapidly to levels significantly 
above present produive capacities. 

We must effe early and then persisting rates of im- 
provement in the modal real incomes and leisure of 



 

our pulation. That added wealth must come from 
putting the unemoyed and misemoyed o produc- 
tive jobs, and otherwise from capital expansion and 
improvements utilizing new technologies. 

Three comnents of national tangible output must 
increase each year: () The modal level of real in- 
comes and leisure of. the pulation, () The rate of 
capital investment in our industry and agriculture, 
and () The rate of high-technology exrts. These 
gains must come not through ensifying the physical 
labor of our workforce, but through increasing the 
ratio of produively emoyed adults and through 
rapid increases in technological advancement. 

The centerpiece of this program of technological 
progress will be science and energy licies. For the 
short to ermediate term, the emphasis will be on 

high-energy forms of combustion of coal (including 
steel produion) and rapid expansion of fission were 
programs. For the period beginning approximately 
the middle s, we must begin the transition to fu- 
sion energy as the world's new basic energy source, 
while continuing with fission programs. This shift in- 
volves much more than a new energy source. The de- 
rivations of asma physics research associated with 
developing fusion energy sources will produce a quali- 
tative transformation in produive technologies, of a 
type we may broadly term high-energy produion 
methods. Once we have begun that transition, which 
we proje as a matter of licy for the middle s, 
all the various environmental and other threats now 
confronting us for the end of this century with old, 
stagnating technology, will, in princie, forever dis- 
appear. 

The program of high-technology inputs o the 

I- 

industrial and agricultural development of the so- 
called developing nations has the proper overall objec- 
tive: to establish the preconditions required within 
that seor for a worldwide "takeoff" o a new 
technological revolution, an emergence which shall 
begin on a smaller scale during the - period. 
That is the task and the joy of living we give to our- 
selves, the gift we bequeath to our sterity. 

The overall basis for the shaping of the nation's 
foreign licy is the development and funioning of 
the prosed International Development Bank (IDB). 
In this matter, the United States must have a clear 
and * 'hard-nosed*' licy: The IDB will not issue 
grants or credit for the funding of waste and swindles. 
Our nation, once painfully ridding itself of the 
bankrupt institutions and habits of a monetarists' 
domestic and ernational financial order, will not 
promote or tolerate the erosive insinuations of the 
beginning of the same old crap all over again in some 
new form. 

Our domestic and foreign licy are mutually con- 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^^ 






: .'fa : 







:...-s:-.:-:'"r- 





 







IS- .:: 









 . . ." 







... 











 f..-..r-- 








mmmsmmm 



'i: 



:(. -^. 





  V : 'i" . ^ .:::: '?  .v.i v j' - ^ 




: 



^j-.V ^j-.. 






:;:^v:;:::V^::;--::-;;|--:?^ 

' /y--y. . : ': yi- ' 




Federalist Tom Paine, author of the  pamphlet Common Sense, was a vigorous advocate of the republican 
form of government as opsed to Tory '*pure democracy. " 



tinuous and coherent on this . The following key 



weres of the government in such a way as, for exam- 



s of domestic fiscal licy foreshadow the gener- pie, to make slum-like rental property highly unprofit- 



ative corresnding features of our foreign licy. 



() The notions of negative and sitive forms of 
toleration are properly governing in the deter- 
mination of the way in which the revenues of the 
nation are disbursed and in the categorical 
distinions of relatively punitive and offsetting 
reduced rates of apication of an average rate of 
taxation. 



For exame: Speculative gains and undesirable 
praices which the law otherwise negatively 
tolerated must be taxed at relatively **punitive" rates. 
This must, in approximation of the fiions of law, 
offset the compensating, relatively reduced rates of 
taxation on income which is direed toward reinvest- 
ment in real economic expansion and technological 
progress. 

A federal tax on illegal gambling is one of those all- 
too-clever perversions of sitive law which any 
competent federal court aion should have denounced 
and nullified as an abhorrence in the eyes of constitu- 
tional law. However, for aivities and entities which 
exist within the bounds of toleration of the law, federal 
tax licy is obliged, for exame, to use the taxing 



able relative to maaining quality real property in- 
vestments and quality new construion. 



() (The presently existing tax and related fiscal 
licies and praices of the nation are immoral 
overall, and in some aspes clearly obscene, 

I 

respeing the clutter and comexity they 
represent.) There are two categorical aspes of 
the design of national tax licy: (a) the 
analysis of the principal, categorical comnents 
of national income, (b) the apication of 
discrimination respeing sitive and negative 
toleration, as the means for determining the 
relative weight of taxation un equal amounts of 
income within the areas of income so defined. 
This should be apied as a national taxation 
licy, with the federal government aing in 
partnership with state and local government 
according to a uniform tax licy for all aspes 
of government. The relationship among the 
federal, state and local governments should be a 
division of labor among those litical entities 
respeing the categories of taxation delegated to 
each, within the bounds of a uniform national tax 
licy. The tax methods and procedures should 







be simified and direly aimed at their ob- 
jeives in the simest way. 

For exame: A domestic sales tax is an economic 
abhorrence, principally emoyed by governments 
which variously lack the perception, the litical 
courage, or the authority to attack the revenue 
problem in a competent manner. 

Imrt duties and related apications of excise 
have had a legitimate economic funion of enabling 
the government to **reach" indirely those foreign 
influences affeing our nation's vital erests which 
are beyond our dire means of control. The same 
princie erupts in the gray areas of U.S., state and 
local law, in resnse to discrepancies of law among 
litical sub-units of the nation. The right of local 
government to emoy those and related methods and 
procedures is an area of toleration  within limits 
determined by the national erest  from the stand- 
 of proper sitive federal law. 

What are inadmissible on princie are the 
following enterprises in petty deception and useless 
comexities: 

The demagogic trick of peddling a sales tax to a 
credulous eleorate by creating it fiively as an *'old 
age tax.*' (The hideous imication is that somebody's 
grandmother may suffer if one misses a customary 
Wednesday dinner-out at "Joe's Chinese Southern 
Fried Chicken Palace.") 

Various litical entities variously soning o 
corrate and personal income  where such cate- 
gories of taxation ought to be reserved to the federal 
government, with associated revenue-sharing for- 
mulas apied to order distribution to budgets of local 
government. 

Taxes which significantly, unnecessarily increase 
the administrative costs of both government, quasi- 
governmental, corrate and personal life, thus 
contrary to the nation's erest in developing a high 
social produivity within the labor force as a whole. 

() The clearing of all tax and related revenues and 
disbursements of government through the 
National Bank, to the effe that the ^'multiier" 
effes of reserve balances may be concentrated 
in the credit-issuing were of the National Bank. 
This is essential, both to give the nation efficient 
control in fa over the prenderance of its own 
monetary system, and to provide the means for 
freeing the federal, state and local governments 
from dependency un private financial 
markets. 

The  which will want to be emphasized and 
reemphasized, until the eleorate and its repre- 
sentatives have efficiently assimilated that , is 



 

that the pring of money by the U.S. Treasury (U.S. 
notes) as the instrument of securing credit inclusively 
for the federal government's uses is not in and of 
itself an issuance of **funny money" or otherwise 
inflationary. This **Hamiltonian" method and proce- 
dure is the proper measure emoyed by a capitalist 
republic. 

The problems tentially associated with such 
procedures are all derivative of a failure to regulate 
that praice according to sound national-banking 
princies. The revenues of government (government 
aggregately) are properly attributed to a rtion of 
the lawfully defined national absolute profit. This is 
the balance of total national income, as measured in 
rea/ terms, after the current prime costs of produion 
of that income are dedued. 

The elements of real national income are tentially 
* 'regenerative" forms of tangible output, including the 
produive labor force in the quantity and quality 
affeed with the means of education, associated 
forms of leisure, household consumption, and essen- 
tial social services of the national infrastruure. The 
residue, absolute profit, is represented by tangible 
produs and produive labor, whose usefulness is 
qualitatively determined by their tentially 
* 'economic-regenerative" effes through appropriate 
forms of capital and household consumption. This 
absolute profit, so defined, has four principal, cate- 
gorical apications: administration and services of 
the private seor; governmental consumption; 
foreign ermediate- and long-term credit against 
U.S. exrts; and domestic capital expansion. As long 
as the revenues and expenditures of government are 
defined within an efficient forecast-determination of 
the total absolute profit and the proper government 
prortion of that absolute profit, the mediating, 
short- and ermediate-term circulation of U.S. notes 
within those confines, if accomished through a 
National Bank, is an egral part of a "hard 
currency" licy. 

This prescribes, also, that there are only two cate- 
gorical areas in which the government should go 
outside a notes-only licy to issue bonds representing 
a long-term national (or, other governmental) debt: 

-r 

First, in respe to foreign long-term credit 
balances. 

The principal occasion for this under the new world 
monetary system will be the investment of U.S. 
domestic capital abroad. The investment of U.S. 
domestic capital o areas of the world which have or 
may probably adopt socialist constitutions must be 
balanced against the degree of risk national (and 
ernational) licy deems it necessary and proper to 
perpetuate (as "performance incentives"), and the 
comementary imperative of separating the legi- 







 

timate erests, of domestic capital from the predi- 
caments of ernal licies of foreign nations. In 
general, wherever efficient performance has been 
accomished for economic results consistent with the 
objeives of U.S. foreign licy, the fa of such ef- 
ficient performance warrants the use of the credit of 
the United States as a kind of national insurance 
fund" in behalf of such aggregate U.S. domestic 
capital extended. The methods emoyed for such 
determinations of performance are broadly identical 
to those governing the transformation of construion 
loans o permanent mortgages. 

This will involve not merely the credit of the United 
States, but these obligations will be colleively 
discounted through the credit of the International 
Development Bank. That is the indispensable, prin- 
cied method by which we maain the erface 
between U,S, domestic capital exrt and  most 
notably, but not exclusively  those nations which 
have socialist constitutions. 

Second, as was done badly during World War II, 

whenever the nation is obliged to secure capital from 
those categories of total national income representing 
modal levels of prime-cost (e.g., wage-incomes), this 
sacrifice (primitive accumulation) can be regarded 
as ** borrowing" in whole or part  if forecastable la- 
ter rates of national economic growth and other 
considerations of national erest warrant this as 
praicable. The princied purse of such measures 
is to defend the egrity, in princie and in fa, of 
the modal levels of income which have been tem- 
rarily reduced. How and when this is done is for each 
occasion a praical question, but the prosition to be 
praically so considered is admissible for deli- 
beration according to the proper ent of the consti- 
tutional law of a capitalist republic. 

These same princies of **hard currency*' licy 
apy to the International Development Bank, and 
represent the included feature of foreign licy of the 
United States concerning the IDB and all related and 
comparable relationships with other nations. 

The scare word which immediately arises as ob- 
servers note the praical imications of such foreign 
and domestic licies is *'dirigism." 

The case of that abomination which has become the 
National Environmental Policy A in praice, is 
perhaps the most efficient starting  for getting 
o the core issues of licies affeing the fear of 
**dirigism." 

Granted, the condition of the biosphere (''ecology") 
is a matter of princied concern, and related vital 
erest to the nation. However, the NEPA, as an 
imicitly and efficiently zero-growth approach to 
both the definition and treatment of such matters, is 
contrary to natural law and to the ent of our con- 



stitutional law, and is therefore abhorrent and most 

fundamentally unconstitutional. The problem of 

NEPA is not merely that it represents a **dirigist" 

rusion o a privileged area, but that it represents 

an incompetent and destruive rusion, both in 

ent and method emoyed. 
The cases of the steel and automotive industries 

adequately illustrate the general problem. 

The problem of industrial and related forms of 

llutant emissions is in the main categorically a 

by-produ of insufficiently advanced technology. As 

the efficiency of combustion is increased, the ratio of 

i 

thermal and other waste by-produs is corres- 
ndingly reduced. That is step one. Such thermal 
efficiency is charaeristically effeed by operating 
those produive processes at corresndingly higher 
temperatures. This higher temperature not only 
enables thermal efficiency (step one), but brings new 
physical chemistries within the range of efficient, 
economical emoyment. This enables us to deoy 
secondary, egral features of the produive (or 
other) process to dire the shaping of the net by- 
produ o forms which are either new produs 
(consumable by-produs), or harmless forms of 
waste. That is step two. 

The apication of NEPA has attacked the problem 
of emissions by violating our fundamental national 
erests direly (reducing the produion of wealth) 
and by mis-direion (diverting limited and. 
diminishing supies of capital to costly after-the-fa 
emissions control, away from the produive invest- 
ments which would have followed the two-step ap- 
proach toward a real solution, as we summarized.) 

The remedies broadly indicated for steel are these. 
Environmental concerns properly diate accelerated 
infusions of capital o steel and related processes 
for fulfilling the two conditions stipulated as a sub- 
sumed charaeristic feature of such capital invest- 
ment. For the automobile itself, the solution is not 
costly emission control devices and other attached 
gadgetry, but accelerated flows of capital toward 
more technologically advanced and better maained 
motive devices, and more human-safe forms of auto- 
motive design. 

The problem associated with steel capitalization has 
been that the available capital has been insufficient 
(and that existent entirely diverted to NEPA-mis- 
direed nonsense), and that the capitalizations for 
higher technology imy a demand for steel  to  
percent above the currently prevailing and previously 
forecastable levels of recent periods. However, both of 
these economic problems are principally by-produs 
of monetarists' diatorship over our government and 
economy, and the correlated lack of a competent 
sitive national domestic and foreign licy. 



PEF=T(o)® i()X. E)EM© E^S 



The problem of the automobile is not the auto in and 
of itself, but as with the crisis situation generated in 
commercial air traffic by proliferating -mile-range 
short hauls, includes the failure to establish efficiently 
modern forms of erurban and metrolitan-area 
mass transit systems, all of which is aggravated by 
the monetarist-determined decay and autarchy of our 
transrt and urban areas. 

There is only one approach to the "^environment" 
which is not rinsically incompetent or downright in- 
sane. The time has come at which we must regard the 
biosphere as a whole as an elligent, modern Ameri- 
can farmer and his agronomist-advisor regard the 
farm. Nature itself must be defined for licy and 
praice as man-made. For purses of national 
domestic and foreign licy, we must extend the 
notion of fixed capital (as industrial capital) from the 
particular farm, the particular ant, to nature as a 
whole. 

For that reason envirnomental scientific licy- 
making belongs in the Department of Agriculture, 
with the obvious aspes of domestic fiduciary func- 
tions delegated to the Department of the Interior. 

It is imssible  and insane, at this time  to at- 
tempt to *'defend nature against man." The Nader- 
environmentalist outlook is refleive of the mentality 
of a lowere beast, not a human being. The necessary 
consequence of the mere continued existence of the 
human species is the deetion of any fixed order of 
nature. To defend'' nature is to prose genocide 
against man. Looking at nature as a whole with the 
charaeristic outlook already embedded in our 
Department of Agriculture, looking at the entirety of 
nature as *'our great farm," we must develop its fer- 
tile fields, its woodlots, its streams, its living and re- 
creation areas, its livestocks, as an elligent modern 
farmer does in transforming a former dustland o, 
once again, a rich grain-producing area. 

By acing the knowledge of modern asma physics 
and its by-produs at the dissal of our Department 
of Agriculture, and emwereing that Department to 
look at the nation and world as the greater farm" 
from which human needs must be annually extraed 
in increasing amounts, we ave at the kernel of a 
sitive ecological licy in conformity with natural 
and constitutional law. 

The instrument of government for imementing the 
sitive licies generated around the focal, coor- 
dinating  of our Department of Agriculture is 
principally national economic-development licy. 
The principal subsumed instruments for that licy 
are the credit licies of the National Bank and our 

federal fiscal institutions. 

Those instruments shape the overall economic 
environment. 



 

We must add instruments for checking specific 
heteronomical problems not efficiently controlled by 
the principal instruments. This is the area of dire 
enforcement. The principal form of enforcement 
should be congruent with the princie of minimum- 
wage law and working-conditions law. We establish 
standards, defining in terms specified by legislative 
law  and not some casual administrative or judicial 
procedure extending the law  precisely what those 
standards are: what exicitly represents an oler- 
able condition, and what methods shall be used to 
determine qualitative non-conformity with the prai- 
cal ent of the principal instruments of national eco- 
nomic licy for this area? 

We need steel. We cannot stop steel produion, 

bringing it below required levels of output and capa- 
city because of a short-term, localized ''environmental 
problem." The head-on opsition of two elements of 
national erest, which may appear to exist in such a 
case, does not exist in fa under proper conditions of a 
national, economic-licy-determined environment. 
These most troublesome s of the erface be- 
tween produion and the ecology merely shape the 
peripheral features of our technological development 
licies. 

The obje of the overall approach is to minimize all 
dire rusion o the ernal ordering of the er- 
nal, privileged domain of liberties of the citizen and 
the firm. This is not a noble sentiment, a truism, but a 
praical licy imperative. 

There are two indispensable primary instruments 
for the government of a democratic capitalist 
republic: the litical instrument of properly inferred 
willful impulses for praice of the firm and individual 
citizen, and the establishment of a praical environ- 
ment of national licy praice which enables the 
desired result to occur ''molecularly" by means of 
individual initiative. The associated obje of these 
measures is to reduce to the ssible minimum the 
number of heteronomic and other exceptions which re- 
quire dire enforcement or other dire govern- 
mental erventions. 

The real problem of *'dirigism" is that leading 
agencies and others variously do not understand the 
lawful features of the processes involved, or refuse to 
acknowledge the imications of such knowledge* 
Hence, when litical stupidity attempts to mobilize a 
society to conformity with some specified result, it too 
quickly, foolishly substitutes methods converging ulti- 
mately or sooner un ''totalitarian" methods of 
dirigism. The knowledgeable approach, based in con- 
sciousness of natural law, is premised un a compre- 
hension of the lawful determination of the environ- 
ment in which individualized aion seles its choices. 
This same distinion defines the two distin no- 







 

tions of litical were. One notion of were, the notion 
of force, is associated with military and lice mea- 
sures. The other notion of were, the were of natural 
law, is the writer's charaeristic method and licy. 
The former's use is not excluded, but is properly 
delimited to those exceptional cases in which heter- 
onomy sets itself fixedly o opsition to natural law 
and the force of reason. It is the second kind of were, 
the conscious apication of natural law to simul- 
taneously informing individual willful praice, and 
creating a praical licy environment appropriate 
to that informing, which is the tentially mighty 
were of the United States government, which this 
writer proses to awaken to exert itself. 

The overwhelming majority of the people of this 
nation and of other nations will regard the diates of 
natural law as their primary individual self-erest, 
on condition that their willful impulses are so in- 
formed, and that the ordering of the environment of 
individual praice by great weres is coherent with 
such informed impulses. That is the proper essence  
the rinsic might  of a **new Federalist" govern- 
ment of the United States at home and abroad. 

The social basis for that licy is the **Whig im- 
pulses" more notably charaeristic of our trade 
unionists, modern farmers, scientists, engineers, and 
industrialists. This, as an informed pulation and a 
litical force unified to that purse, is the leading 
force of the majority of our people, the majority which 
must rule our licymaking and government. 

The Tories, here and abroad, won't like that 
arrangement, but it is nonetheless in their real in- 
terest and that of their sterity, and the only course 
through which their own individual liberties will be 
maained and enriched. 

The technological charaeristic of United States 
foreign licy is the establishment of a division of 
labor in exrt-oriented, high-technology produion 
and development among the combined OECD and 
CMEA nations. It is capital goods that these nations 
are going to exrt in the main, and with increasing 
emphasis. While competition among firms and parti- 
cular specifications of capital-commodity types will 
and must persist in this process, that competition does 
not represent a competition of vital economic erests 
within the ranks of the OECD and CMEA nations. 

The days in which industrialized national semi- 
autarkies condued ernational trade wars are past 
in any sane ordering of global economic affairs. The 
necessary base required by any specific form of rela- 
tively high-technology capital-goods produion has 
become so broad, in terms of subsumed total-economy 
process-sheet analyses, that no one nation  even the 
United States or Soviet Union  could economically 



develop a full sperum of modern high-technology 
capital goods produion. 

The prosal offered by Soviet physicist L. Ruda- 
kov, to the effe that U.S. high-technology firms 
should produce advanced ion-beam devices developed 
by the Soviet Union, s to several erconneed 
s of licy-shaping imrtance. 

First, Soviet basic physics is, overall, presently 
years ahead of that of the United States. This is the 
conclusion advanced by numbers of U.S. high-tech- 
nology firms deey engaged in Soviet projes. This is 
the conclusion to be reached from proceedings at the 
 Berchtesgaden and recent Trieste conferences. 
The reasons for this overall discrepancy have already 
been sufficiently developed for our immediate pur- 
ses above. Although in certain specific features of 
asma physics research, groups of U.S. scientists, 
such as the writer's immediate associates, may be 
theoretically advanced beyond the Soviets in some 
imrtant theoretical or experimental feature of the 
work, Soviet physics at this  is at the  of 
becoming hegemonic world-wide. 

Second, Rudakov delivered the prosal that certain 
relevant very-high-technology creations of Soviet 
physics would be more efficiently produced for world 
needs in the USA. The Rudakov case is not a fluke. It 
typifies the broader conclusion offered by some lead- 
ing U.S. high-technology industrialists over the recent 
wer. 

We are not prosing that this Soviet physics hege- 
mony is a permanent arrangement. Beginning with the 
Kennedy administration and accelerating since ap- 
proximately , the Tory social and litical licies 
shaping our nation's praices and the outlooks of our 
youth have savaged the ranks of science and engineer- 
ing professionals to produce a monstrous discrepancy 
between the modal levels of our high-technology base 
and the basic research and research-and-development 
superstruure that base requires and warrants. This 
miserable state of affairs we shall promptly and pro- 
foundly change. We are not citing Soviet scientific 
physics hegemony as a projeed permanent state of 
affairs, but as a typification of kinds of licy pro- 
blems which must inclusively shape our licies. 

The development of new technologies begins 
properly in an educational process which is simul- 
taneously rinsically epistemological and er- 
meshed with an environment of experimental prac- 
tice. The scientist, engineer, and technician-specialist 
developed by that educational process is emoyed at 
several distinguishable s of the process of initi- 
ating new technologies and transforming them o 
the developed forms appropriate to generalized pro- 
duive praice. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The first stage is basic research  scientific dis- 
covery. 

The second stage is research and development: the 
transformation of new discoveries o tential forms 
of produive apication. 

The third stage is the transformation of the produs 
of the second o experimental forms of devices to be 
produced. 

The fourth stage is the pilot or trial, limited pro- 
duion of a **de-bugged** experimental form o a 
produ which can be transferred from the ownership 
of the maker to another user. 

The fifth stage is the shift of an established produ 
in a slightly altered, mass-produion or analogous 
''final" form. 

At any  among those stages, the further 
development of high technology may involve transfer 
of resnsibility for the continuation to a different 
institution, or a different national economy. 

Admittedly this has been emerging as the charac- 
teristic feature of technological development since the 
sixteenth century. Modern developments have now al- 
tered the imications of that process. Without turning 
yet to the developing seor problem, limiting our- 
selves for yet another moment to the relations among 
OECD and CMEA economies, the following broad 
observations apy. 

First, the negentropy of modern high-technology 
produion is so great, and the required rate of new 
technological progress consequently so ensified, 
that the ordering of the process of technological 
development becomes a major area of national and 
global economic licy. 

Second, the human input o this process, epito- 
mized by the education and emoyment of both 
professional specialists and the labor force generally, 
has imications direly corresnding to the 
process-determinations of produive development it- 
self. The proper ratio of scientists and engineers per 
thousand produive workers emoyed represents a 
qualitative comnent of the total labor force  and 
one whose increase must tend to accelerate. 

In this configuration, we can no longer speak of 
science and engineering in broad generalities. Al- 
though the governing conceptual and related skills of 
scientists and engineers may be approximately 
common in form of apication at all s of the pro- 
cess, the process of development of technology has a 
lawful **struure." We cannot simy prose to put 
more o science  although that would be far better 
than what has recently prevailed. We must under- 
stand the ernal features of the process, and balance 
our science, technology, produion and capital in- 
vestment licies accordingly. 



 

We must understand  as a matter of licy  what 
the term basic scientific research signifies from the 
stand of that process. We must eliminate the con- 
siderations of narrowly defined, cost-benefit analysis 
in budgeting basic scientific research, understand 
how a totality of basic scientific research generates a 
forecastable degree of total benefit, which benefit 
cannot be pre-defined through aggregating predied 
line-by-line budgetary projeions. We cannot apy 
the cost-benefit cost-analysis methods of mass pro- 
duion to the programming of the fostering of scien- 
tific work. 

In that same conneion, we must ace the notion of 
the epistemological charaeristics of basic scientific 
work within the specifications of licy, both for 
fostering basic science and for shaping the licies of 
education to cohere with the desired objeives. 

We must, in the same vein, terminate the confusion 
which prevails in the formulation and erpretation of 
law, the confusion of basic scientific research with 
scientific research and development. Even though the 
two kinds of efforts may often be performed on the 
same premises and by the same group of persons, 
there is a fundamental epistemological distinion of 
praical emphasis between basic scientific research 
and what heretofore has been understood for U.S. 
executive and legislative praice as scientific re- 
search and development. 

The crucial licy problem refleed in that distinc- 
tion is that we must be concerned with the generation 
of discoveries respeing scientific princies, the 
transformation of the previously existing body of 
scientific knowledge, without which the apication of 
the existing body of scientific knowledge to develop- 
ment must, ultimately or sooner, stagnate for want of 
fresh inputs to science itself. Basic scientific research 
is the sitive transformation of scientific knowledge 
itself. From that origin, onwards in the process out- 
lined, the emphasis is increasingly on the apication 
of the already existing body of scientific knowledge. 

The economic objeive of this process is to increase 
the average negentropy of national and global pro- 
duion by successive waves of new technologies 
spreading out to supercede the old. Basic scientific re- 
search is the wellspring of that process, a process on 
which the successful existence of the human species 
now immediately depends. 

As we imement that process of incorrating new 
technologies o praice we are confronted by the 
fa that no matter how large the absolute profit avail- 
able, it is never sufficient. That is expressed for 
praice in these terms. If we expend capital to 
develop competing new industries simultaneously in 
several nations, that redundancy in apication of 







 

capital diminishes the supy of capital available for 
other purses. Some redundancy is necessary and 
useful, as a competitive hedge against the mis- 
direion or orer performance imicitly risked by 
putting all of technology's eggs in one basket. 

The proper balance between the two desiderata is 
tentially a theoretical nightmare to some, but from 
our national experience with the eleronics- 
aerospace development, we have learned some basic, 
tough lessons which enable us to approach the proper 
balance with reasonably good results. In brief, the ap- 
proach to the solution is to balance off desirable com- 
petitiveness in the molecular aspe of technological 
development against the blunder of redun- 
dancy  and resulting bottlenecks  in major allo- 
cations of capital resources. 

The basic licy approach has two moments; the 
first moment is the high-technology capital exrts of 
the combined OECD and CMEA countries, and the 
second moment the somewhat contrary impulses 
associated with the localized national erest of the 
nations involved. 

Respeing the final-stage exrt capabilities of the 
combined seor, we require at least two or three re- 
gionalized centers of capability, with a more numerous 
back-up in the corresnding, smaller-scale pilot-pro- 
duion phases of technological development, and a 
tendency toward homogeneity of capabilities in ex- 
perimental praice. We must work toward establish- 
ing a global scientific community in respe of basic 
scientific research. 

Respeing U.S. ernal erests, as long as any 
tential threat to national-economic security exists 

in respe of foreign relations, we must not be rinsi- 
cally vulnerable  we must be able to rapidly de- 
velop a high-technology produive capability in any 

needed direion. Hence, both for local, ernal capi- 
tal-goods market requirements not efficiently met 
through the world market, and for reasons of national 
economic security, we must keep every basic type of 
produive capability ''simmering'* within the ranks 

of professionals, the labor force and industry. 

The overall foreign economic licy toward the de- 
veloping seor as a whole is premised on a set of well- 
defined targets of industrial, agricultural, and infra- 
struural projes throughout the developing seor 
taken as a whole. 

These projes are typified by such major cases as 
three, highest priority development projes: () a Rio 
de la Plata industrial-agricultural comex in South 
America  one of the greatest and most rapidly fruit- 
ful tentials for effeing a major increment in global 
economic development; () the longer-term effort re- 
quired to transform the Sahel o a great grain belt; 



() the massive benefits to the world through a com- 
prehensive development of the Ganges-Brahmaputra 

region. These appropriately refle the emphasis on 
increasing present and future food produion within 
the developing seor as a whole  on a seor-wide 
basis  as a self-evident imperative, and as the indis- 
pensable basis for viable, sustainable industrial and 
infrastruural development throughout the seor. 

Although the development of capital goods indus- 
tries within the developing seor should become in- 
creasingly a part of the ernational division of labor 
in capital goods produion, the wretched infrastruc- 
ture and or average quality of the labor force will 
persist, even optimistically, as an obstacle to high- 
technology produion methods for approximately a 
generation. The relative emphasis will be on establish- 
ing consumer goods produion, wherever the combi- 
nations of regional consumption requirements and 
capabilities of the labor force available permit the em- 
oyment of technologies which are competitive with 
those existing for the same kinds of industries in the 
industrialized seor. 

This will be associated with development of primary 
commodities produion, emphasizing more modern 
technologies of extraion and agronomy. These com- 
modities are to be priced at equitable prices, which 
shall be determined as world-market competitive with 
necessary prices prevailing for the same catgories of 
commodities in the produive output of OECD-CMEA 
nations. We shall not fear deetion of mineral de- 
sits in this process, so long as that deetion will not 
occur as a cumulative world-wide problem within  to 
. decades. This is premised on the commitment to 
establishing new technologies associated with fusion 
energy development. 

This primary commodities aspe of foreign 
relations with developing nations will be for an un- 
determined period an endemic area of licy confli, 
a source of tential disruptions of global develop- 
ment, which threats we must efficiently check. 

For principally two reasons, parts of the developing- 
seor pulations and their litical institutions are 
infeed with the ignorant and barbaric delusion that 
primary commodities as presently defined for their 
knowledge, represent rinsically natural wealth. 

This idea was impressed un such governmental 
faions by the charaer of their long-standing econo- 
mic relations with the British Empire and other mone- 
tarist colonial and semi-colonial weres. The mone- 
tarists' licy degraded these regions to the crudest 
forms of ground-rent looting, emphasizing the exrt 
of primary mineral and agricultural commodities 
from these regions  mines and antations. In the 
historical praice of their nations' economic relations 







with the world market, such bestialized ground-rent 
economics is, in the main, the only economic dorine 
they have been taught by general experience. 

This same source of infeion with dangerously non- 
sensical ideas was aggravated by the circumstance 
that the educated strata of these countries were mis- 
educated in significant part at such cessols of rav- 
ing monetarism as the London School of Economics. 
Vienna and our own Cornell, Princeton, Berkeley, Co- 
lumbia, Johns Hopkins and Harvard have not repre- 
sented exaly happy alternatives to the notorious 
LSE. The viims of such miseducation, in turn, pro- 
vided the core of the faculties of educational institu- 
tions established back in the home country. 

This disorientation among leading litical and in- 
telleual strata is aggravated and reenforced by con- 
vergent native ideologies. 

Not only were the charaeristic pre-capitalist 
social relations in those countries in the main broadly 
describable as semi-feudal, feudal, barbaric and so 
forth, but in numbers of cases the worst features of 
those backward cultures were seleively cultivated 
by Anglo-American '^cultural relativist'* administra- 
tive and counterinsurgency dorines. 
The British pattern is exemary. 
The happier effes of conta with modern techno- 
logy have been, by way of various contributing chan- 
nels, to develop a pro-capitalist hardcore of ellec- 
tuals and urban and semi-urbanized labor in these 
countries. This force, which formerly represented a 
tendency for national capitalist, anti-colonial revolu- 
tions, has shifted in recent times to tend to a as the 
leading pro-socialist force. 

Most consistently from the time of William Pitt the 
Younger, British licy, informed by both the Ameri- 
can Revolution and Latin American revolts against 
Spain (notably), was consciously determined to check 
and abort such infeious tentials for new '* Ameri- 
can Revolutions.*' Hence, notably beginning with Pitt 
the Younger, the barbaric licy of Adam Smith's 
fraudulent Wealth of Nations was enforced through a 
British Foreign Office licy of using social relics 
(barbaric tentates, tribal chiefs, and so forth) as lo- 
cal *'agents of influence" and litical instruments 
and institutions of colonial and semi-colonial rule. 
Obscene relics and British-remodeled caricatures of 
* 'native culture'* were propped up and deoyed 
against the ** modernizing," urban-oriented ellec- 
tual and labor movements. 

Hence, the imsition of the British colonialists* 
dorine of "cultural relativism.*' 

Under our lowere Manhattan monetarists, the United 
States was exoited by those monetarists to enforce 
the British colonial and semi-colonial licies in a 



 

slightly altered outward litical form. Instead of flag 
colonies, lowere Manhattan ruled through geo-litical 
**zones of influence,'* smeared over with attorney 
John Foster Dulles' legal-fiion ungent of regional 
treaty organizations. This was not original to Dulles 
himself; it was prescribed as a new dorine by Roose- 
velt (Lippmann) in -. Colonial rule by foreign 
debt accomished the reacement of the Union Jack 
by the Dollar Sign. Underneath these cosmetic altera- 
tions in colonialism, the duped government and people 
of the United States permitted the Rockefellers et al. 
to freely deoy our nation's were to perpetrate the 
same bestial, "cultural relativist" licy which the 
British had established before us. 

There was once hardly a week in which some bab- 
bling, brutal semiliterate from an African, Latin Ame- 
rican or other parody of a Viennese operetta was not 
paraded through Washington and generally patted 
and coddled, while being heralded in the U.S. press as 
a bastion of the "Free World*' and its noble culture. 
Among those of us so rudely incredulous as to examine 
more closely the paradise of liberty the visiting digni- 
tary was supsed to represent, we saw a savage dic- 
tatorship veering toward the perfeion of Rockefel- 
ler's model, "Papa Doc** Duvalier. A gaggle of mostly 
confused colonels and junior officers leading a semi- 
disciined, uniformed and armed rabble gathered 
from the brutalized peasantry and urban slums. And, 
what did we find was the heroic a for freedom they 
had accomished with such instruments?  the sup- 
pression of the same sort of litical-social ferment 
which our own American Revolution typified for emu- 
lation ! 

That was before the Kennedy administration  
before David Rockefeller, Rockefeller*s Cyrus Vance, 
and the lunatic Milton Friedman "improved" un 
Banana Republic traditions with a large dose of Nazi- 
occupation economic licies of the sort exhibited in 
the auto-cannibalistic collapse of st- Chile. 

 

Contrary to Rockefeller*s collaborator, J. Paul 
Austin, a Coca-Cola bottle does not represent ade- 
quately the enlightening touch of modern civilization. 

Although the "Whig impulse*' persists as an impulse 
among the industrialists, urban labor and some el- 
leuals of the developing seor, this sitive ten- 
tiality is frequently precariously balanced against 
dominant or wereful-minority currents whose ideolo- 
gical outlook erupts from some of the most stagnant 
bowels of humanity. That stink is in part historically 
rooted in the wretchedness Europeans first en- 
countered in such regions, a wretchedness which "cul- 
tural relativist" colonialist licies and looting have 
often exacerbated o a form of degeneracy of the cul- 
tural vestiges first encountered. 







 

In too many cases, the peasantry is not a produive 
peasantry in the main. He miserably scratches at the 
earth. He does not produce a surus, and even what 
miserable little he produces is looted in large part 
from him by local chieftains, landlords, and other 
petty, thieving tyrants and swindlers. The peasantry 
shades o burgeoning masses of urban and semi-ur- 
ban vagabonds  a vagabondage produced by the 
same sort of monetarist-generated processes which 
caused the mid-fourteenth century Black Death. As in 
the case of the present collapse of the Sahel, in the ef- 
fort to squeeze more out of or peasants and nomads, 
local governments foster grazing and cropping li- 
cies  under ruinous tax pressure  destroying 
their own nation in the effort to pay debt service to 
lowere Manhattan. Without fertilizers and related mod- 
ern techniques, the ecological collapse of the Sahel 
caused by the Rockefellers and their allies was inevit- 
able. (Just as the Congo at the beginning of the s 
and Zaire today have no mystery for those who know 
the history of Rockefeller investment movements o 
Rhodesia and Congo during the s and the larger in- 
flux after the elimination of Lumumba.). 

Large masses of the pulations of such countries 
live at the edge of dionysiac frenzy  if they have, in- 
deed, the energy to do much at all. The tendency to 
identify with lowere forms of life  lowere beasts and 
ants  rinsic to the precarious humanity of 

heteronomized barbaric cultures  merely has been 
smashed, its allonian order scattered o a 

nominalist schwarmerei. The embryonic Rothschild 
mentality of the *'buy cheap, sell dearer'* petty trader, 
the infantile netism of the petty official and clerk, 
erse the dionysian despair of the brutalized im- 
verished  the endemic '*Tory'* tential **in the 
people*' un which some ambitious swindler pre- 
mises his litical career. 

What do they know of development? When did they 
experience it as empirical reality? These or people 
only know '*what is there" to be taken, and to be sold 
for as much as can be gained. 

That summary depis the ernal problems of the 
developing seor in its worst extremes, admittedly. 
That extreme defines the conceptual  of reference 
for understanding the ermediate, less glaring 
approximations of the same problem, and how those 
problems lawfully influence the outlooks and licies 
of faions of the developing seor nations. 

The most efficient model for understanding the 
sitive thrusts within the developing seor in 
general is the case of **Arab nationalism." 

No doubt the epigonoi of the late Walter Lippmann 
have more than once cited this ''phenomenon" as 
crucial clinical evidence in suprt of the Atlanticists* 
regional-bloc dorines. That is irrelevant, except as it 



once again exses more efficiently how stupid the 
corresnding features of our past foreign licy have 
been. 

The secret of "Arab nationalism" is not geographic, 
but rather the Arab religion. What about the Arab 
tongue? How, dear questioner, do you imagine that the 
Arab diales from the Atlantic to the Euphrates are 
mutually comprehensible  approximately as much 
as local Italian diales are mutually comprehensible 
in today's Italy  except through the commonality of 
the Koran? Once the Arab tongue was rooted in the 
pulation, with the aid of the Koran, it was the 
mediation of the Koran which preserved that in- 
fluence. 

Does this fa favor the views of any variety of 
'* cultural relativists"? They would look at the outside 
of the Koran, and say,"Aha, a religion. Don't you see 
what that exains?" The Koran is not just a 
mediation of a "religion;" it is the central axis of a 
body of knowledge which has very specific ernal, 
epistemological charaeristics. It is not a member of 
a "class of religion;" it is not a member of the "set of 
religions" which includes Zen Buddhism  and who- 
knows-what-else the Fabians and neo-Fabians might 
have dredged up or synthesized in the way of fake 
cults lately. 

From the period of approximately the seventh 
through twelfth centuries, A.D., the Arab Caliphates 
were the mainstream of modern civilization. It was 
un that foundation, mediated to Europe chiefly by 
the Mediterannean Caliphates  from the Fatimids of 
Egypt to Cordova  that the elleual foundations 
of modern European culture were contributed. Its 
greatest elles, best known to us as Al-Farrabi, Ibn 
Sina, Averroes, and Omar Khayyam, were in- 
telleually qualitatively above the Hellenic and 
Roman culture in respe of science and epistemol 
ogy. That is sime historical fa, whatever wishful 
fraudulent mythology says to the contrary. 

This great culture, which built un the salvageable 
elleual relics of the decaying Hellenic-Roman 
order which had preceded it, was the great civilizing 
force of the period of its dominance. It is that achieve- 
ment which remained embedded in Arab culture, even 
after the combination of Mongol invasions, Turkish 
conquest, and the European crusades had broken the 
back of Arab civilization, and, one by one, unged the 
parts of that Arab world o atavistic parodies. 

When an Arab is awakened to the hope of becoming 
a part of a process of the onward development of civili- 
zation, it is not the miserable circumstances of the 
fellahin and bedouin that provide the wellsprings of a 
renaissance. It is certainly not the miseducation doled 
out to the "little brown brothers" at LSE, Cornell, or 
Berkeley which provides that basis. What, then, can 







he seize un in himself and in his fellow Arab to make 
that renaissance? There is only one common well- 
spring available to that purse, the humanist tra- 
ditions of the Caliphates. 

The commonality of language permeating the Arab 
diales is an imrtant praical consideration. It is 
that humanism, which developed to its fiercest and to 
its greatest heights in the struggle against the Mon- 
gols and their Turkish comnent (Ibn Sina) and the 
Ottoman Turks (Averroes' Destruion of the Des- 
truion), un which they legitimately and usefully 
draw in the struggle against heathen monetarist bar- 
barians of today. 

The commonality of language as language is of 
praical significance  especially for purses of 
economic development, and  with some mentionable 
degree of efficiency  for unified litical aion. The 
wellspring of that unity is the commonality of the hu- 
manist heritage, without which  in every empirical 
instance  *'Arab nationalism" degenerates o a 
bad diomatic joke. Peoe are not what they are, but 
what they are efficiently dedicated to becoming. A 
nation constituted on any other basis today is only 
some degree doomed toward becoming a totalitarian 
swindle. 

In the course of the first phases of the period before 
us, the United States must face the tential problem, 
that this or that developing seor nation or group of 
nations will return to us one of the noisome packages 
circulated among their ranks by such U.S. monetarist 
creatures as C. Fred Bergsten. Some vestiges of the 
Kissinger (Brookings Institution) * 'International Re- 
sources Bank,** the **Common Swindle,** or kindred 
feudal-Physiocratic nonsense may crop up. 

With one eye toward the lessons of the Soviet agri- 
cultural mess, we are forewarned that such noisome 

V 

eruptions will tend to occur whenever a developing 
seor government faces acute ernal litical-eco- 
nomic problems arising either from its own bungling 
or its inability, for one reason or another, to advance a 
remedy it deems performance*credible for the 
problem at hand. Under such circumstances, many 
governments are known to turn, in their desperation, 
to seek some gimmick, some single a that will some- 
how ^'miraculously*' offset the ernal pressures. 
Their borders with this or that neighbor tend to ac- 
quire uglier hues, and so forth. Frequently, some 
grand gesture  or what natural law regards as a 
swindle  is then militantly, self-righteously prosed 
by the desperate government in question. Given the 
psychological-litical profile of some traditionally 
primary-commodities-exrting countries and the 
seeds of folly distributed by Bergsten and Kissinger, 
one or another primary-commodity oligoly may 
crop up. 



 

How then shall the United States resnd? Let us 
presume the case in which a cabal of such foolish 
governments attempts to skyrocket the world-market 
price of a primary commodity, what shall we do? 

Very simy: ''Gentlemen, since you have imsed 
fiitious price levels on this commodity, we shall de- 
du from your ernational credit, to the advantage 
of your customer, the exa amount of the difference 
betv/een your fiitious price and the world-market 
price. You see, we do not deprive your nation of a 
penny of its rightful net benefits, but we shall not bow 
before a swindle which threatens to disrupt the 
economy of the world as a whole.'* 

The imications of that exame for how the United 
States will deal with analogous expressions of oler- 
able heteronomy among nations ought to be suffi- 
ciently defined by the exame itself. 

As a "new Federalist** government assumes the 
Presidency, it is confronted with a pattern of ugly to 
hideous regimes in various nations. The majority of 
these obscenities, such as the present regime in Chile, 
were created by such as Mr. David Rockefeller and 
his associates. Hence, these represent a double re- 
snsibility for the government of the United States: 
we are a great were and they are evil, and during the 
past our government has in various ways fostered 
their creation and perpetuation. 

In one way or another, the United States is going to 
shape the global environment so that such atrocities 
are soon terminated. 

In a number of cases, such governments will eva- 
rate without any necessary specific aion but the 
installation of the new U.S. President. (The relevant 
slogan covering this is, "Scram, guys, the jig is up!**) 
The principal deterrent to such flights will be the want 
of suitable host countries to which such tyrants might 
wish to seek asylum. () 

Let us consider a sufficient range of ssible 
variants so as to define the licy involved. 

Let us take the nasty one first. Should the United 
States emoy military force? Let us consider a clear- 
cut case in which we should. 

Pinochet's Chile invades Peru. Do we take a spec- 
tator role for the imbroglio? By no means. With all its 
recently developed faults (diated direly by David 
Rockefeller et al.), the United States has a princied 
sition concerning the tattered but still real viability 
of Peru as a sovereign republic. Prior alliance with 
Peru or not, if Peru wishes our alliance at this , 



. Perhaps we should do the generous thing, since they are in a 
sense our property, and take them in, thus establishing in some 
suitably managed "living museum," a ace where social scientists 
from around the world can study these exotic relics of a bygone time. 
Perhaps Pocantico is the appropriate location. 



Mp;//www.d)®(Buirgi(gfe.(S®[ffli/ 







 

we deliver appropriate force to clean the mess up as 
quickly and '^surgically*' as ssible. 

It is not ssible to foresee what other configur- 
ations might exist among Peru's and Chile's neighbors 
at that  of a hythetical war. If the conditions in 
any way approximated those presently and recently 
existing, we would not only have the right to offer Peru 
a military alliance, but strategic imperatives for 
desiring this. If such a war can be settled before it pre- 
cipitates a chain reaion among other states, we are 
obliged to pursue our erests in the matter in a 
Clausewitzian way, and settle the war at the inception. 

Having engaged in the hythetical war beside our 
ally Peru, we would not stop our aion at Chile's 
borders. In the improbable hythetical case Peru and 
Mexico foolishly were involved in wars on opsite 
sides, our aion would be bounded by our self-erest 
in preserving the entire sovereignty of both the belli- 
gerents. In the case of an outlaw regime, such as to- 
day's Chilean regime, we pursue the matter of belli- 
gerency until the offensive cabal has been rooted out 
of its control of the institutions of government. There, 
our military objeives end. We may assist the 
Chileans to establish their own government, but their 
constitution of a government is their sovereign affair. 

Let us consider the different case of Brazil. Brazil 
has acquired hideous included features, dating 
notably from the operations of David Rockefeller's 
Cyrus Vance in the course and wake of the Kennedy 
administration. However, there are viable aive and 
tential impulses within the Brazilian government, 
which in any reasonable estimation would come to 
the fore within the existing government if United 
States' foreign licy toward Brazil came o effi- 
cient corresndence with vital Brazilian national 
erests. 

Let us be more specific on the latter. Brazil has 
developed a monstrosity deadly to both its national 
erests and the effes of global weather-pattern 
shifts in the destruion of the Amazon rain forest's 
viability. Under any circumstances, without regard to 
any foreseeable coloration of the Brazilian govern- 
ment, it is the diate of U.S. foreign licy erests in 
general and the matter in particular that we seek to 
reach agreement with Brazil enabling whatever ex- 
ternal assistance is required to corre that Amazon 
problem, and to provide the Brazilian government and 
economy with whatever other such assistance is caus- 
ally relevant to correing the causes of the creation 
and perpetuation of the problem. Such other measures 
prominently include consummation of the fission 
were agreements between the BRD and Brazil, 
which it is in our urgent national erest to foster. 

It is, similarly, in the vital erests of the United 
States that Brazil, Argentina, and Uruguay should 



prosper in the development of the agricultural and in- 
dustrial tentials of the Rio de la Plata region. We 
must offer dire cooperation to that specific purse 
and must a to foster an economic environment in 
which such developments will be efficiently pursued 
through the sovereign choice of those governments. 

By citing these two cases, one emphatically more 
hythetically, the other representing a current state 
of affairs, we are emphasizing that there are dis- 
tinguishable specific routes within the United States' 
self-rule of its foreign licy by its perception of 
natural law, in which routes exist along which United 
States military force will be emoyed to accomish 
the termination of a foreign government. Such an 
exame as that we have given for the Chile case 
should be understood as a model and warning of the 
corresnding  even sudden  tentialities of a 
**new Federalist" foreign licy. 

We are also emphasizing on the contrary, by taking 
Brazil  a nation which also operates significantly in 
terms of a U.S. -diated Friedmanite ernal licy 
 that adversary sture is not to be used generally 
for problematic cases. Most of the problematic cases 
emphatically do not lean toward becoming tential- 
adversary cases, if the United States is able to secure 
a degree of agreement for praice through which we 
may create an economic environment favorable to the 
expression of the most desirable impulses within the 
governing forces. Assistance and persuasion are the 
normal best means for conduing foreign licy. 

Moreover, we wish to emphasize by these exames, 
that there is no admissible condition under imputable 
princies of constitutional forms of ernational law 
corresnding to a dorine of ^'limited sovereignty." 
Either a nation is sovereign or it is not. The mere fa 
that a nation may have become an adversary of the 
United States does not in itself impair that nation's 
sovereignty in the foreign licy of the United States. 
Ordinarily, unlike the Chile case, we seek the defeat of 
an adversary, not the violation of his sovereignty one 
inch beyond what may be properly required to effe 
that defeat. Even in the exception, as in the hy- 
thetical case we cited for Chile, the fa that we 
repudiate the sovereignty of a government does not 

mean that we do not accept axiomatically the 
sovereignty of a reacement government for the 
same nation. 

Consider a not-so-hythetical exame which may 
be mooted concerning the ^'Republic of South Africa." 
If that government as to promote general war in the 
region, not only is the sovereignty of the government 
lawfully open to nullification by its adversaries, in our 
view of ernational law, that opens the door for the 
dissolution of the nation itself as now constituted. 
Even then, whether as an ally of that government's 



I 



adversaries or not, we have a vital erest of prin- 
cie and associated praical considerations in secur- 
ing the rights of (for emphasis) the white pulation of 
that nation to a viable sovereignty. If the Soviet Union 
were to ally itself to the offending government's ad- 
versaries under those conditions, we could not obje 
rightly to the imications of that. However, we would 
have a quarrel with the Soviet Union and its African 
allies if the rights of humanity and right to exist under 
a viable sovereign government, sovereignly deter- 
mined, were denied to any seion of the defeated 
nation's general pulation. 

By imication of natural law, the right of sovereign- 
ty must be a very tough princie, otherwise it has no 
efficient meaning. We must adhere to the princied 
differences John Quincy Adams sed against 
British foreign minister Canning's government on this 
. We do not follow British precedents in this 
matter; in ernational law we follow our own 
Federalist-originated notions of constitutional law. 

It is imssible to get past the topic of foreign licy 
toward the southern hemisphere without  alas!  
stumbling over the United Nations Organization. 
Generically, that organization is history's most 
flatulent living monument to parliamentary 
cretinism, of which for the present we are obliged to 

make the best. 

As for praical authority, that institution has none 
but as much as either or both of the two great weres 
choose to lend to it. 

From the stand of any reasonable approxi- 
mation of constitutional forms of ernational law, 
the United Nations' Charter is a nominalist abomi- 
nation  whose coincidence with the corresnding 
prosals of Walter Lippmann's - book is in no 

degree accidental. 

Otherwise, to a **new Federalist" administration, 
the fa that other, credulous governments have a cer- 
tain emotional attachment to the thing obliges us to 
respe their sensibilities as far as tolerable. To us, 
the UNO is like some abominable gift from a lovable 
Aunt. For her sake, we have to keep it, but what, with- 
in the outer limits of our imagination, are we going to 
do with the blasted thing?" 

It does have included special tentialities for an 
administration which wants to honor a contributor or 
a contributor's protege, but at the same time wishes to 
keep the problematic apee at a maximum 
distance from serious matters of government. (That is, 
of course, already almost a U.S. tradition, now being 
utilized.) Broadly, the entity has its uses as a forum, 
some of the administrative funions are useful, and if 
some serious matter arises, a resnsible represen- 
tative of the government can step over to New York 
City and take over the matter from the primarily- 



 

decorative official UNO Ambassador. Nothing really 
good could be developed out of the UNO proceedings 
as that agency is constituted, but it can serve a 
collateral role while we wait out the emergence of 
some competent institution of ernational law. 

The usefulness of the UNO is not its formal arrange- 
ments, but those qualities typified by its dining room 
and lounges. It has the same princied sort of utility 
as the famous old U.S. neighborhood corner drug 
store. The issue was not whether the store's ice- 
cream-and-soda cuisine was good or not; it was a con- 
venient location at which one might run o a relevant 
person during a wide range of odd hours. As a ace  
rather than as a litical institution  it serves as a 
useful meeting ace for discussions which might lead 
to some useful result. Even aspes of the formal fes- 
tivities occasionally might collaterally contribute to 
that same effe. 

This is to emphasize that the UNO is not in fa or in 
proper princie a principal feature of United States 
foreign licy. During the past, a number of charades 
have been staged which might suggest the contrary to 
the credulous  but credulities, while fas in them- 
selves, do not represent the sort of fas which 
presently occupy our praical concern. 

While the United States will be suitably respeful of 
its incurred relationship to the UNO, United States 
foreign licy must pursue a course independent of 
that institution's more objeionable pretenses to 
authority in fa or law. We are properly bound in all 
aspes of foreign licy by the governance of those 
princies of natural law which were embodied in the 
original ent of our nation's constitutional law. This 
signifies that our foreign licy refles what we 
imicitly regard as the proper constitutional form of 
ernational law. It is that imicit ernational law 
which governs our approach to establishing the insti- 
tutions and instruments of our foreign licy. 

By establishing approaches to a community of 
princie with other nations, inclusive of the Soviet 
Union, we will thus set o motion those processes 
through which an aual body of competently consti- 
tutional ernational law will emerge to brush aside 
the olerable hodge-dge currently deemed pre- 
vailing. We will, in that course, assimilate those as- 
pes of customary licy and law which are con- 
sistent with purses and requirements of proper 
ernational law, and, in the erim will be tolerant 
of the emotional attachment of other nations to which- 
ever outstanding fiions we can in fa tolerate. The 
emerging instrument, around whose aivities such a 
proper body of ernational law is catalyzed o 
being will be the International Development Bank. 
That perspeive is the guiding praical orientation of 
the United States toward the establishment of a body 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



 

of ernational-law praices consistent with the 
notions of natural law. 

This same problem of ernational law coheres 
with our proper foreign licy distinions of commu- 
nity of princie, agreement for praice, toleration, 
and abhorrence, and the apication of those distin- 
ions to nations and their incumbent governments 
respeively  and somewhat distinly. 

Some will quibble at the distinion. Radical nomi- 
nalists will naturally profess  in criticizing us  that 
if we regard the sovereignty of a state as a tough 
princie, then the licy toward a sovereign state 
must be extended in princie of logic toward a 
sovereignly determined incumbent government of 
that state. Such specious syllogisms are only empty 
construs  wild paralogisms. At what time in 
modern history has it not been praice in fa to pro- 
se on one or another pretext determining distinc- 
tions between a licy toward a state and its incumbent 
government? We do not endorse the imied per- 
ceptions of law usually expressed in such past prac- 
tice. We are merely emphasizing a distinion in fa, a 
distinion which we appreciate according to different 
criteria than those generally apied up to this time. 

The notion of community of princie must be under- 
stood to carry the broad imication, that those 
nations with which we have the present basis for re- 
lations determined as those of community of princie, 
are nations with which we have the existing premises 
of agreement concerning notions of natural and consti- 
tutional law appropriate, in turn, to constitute a 
community of either imicit or exicit constitutional 
ernational law according to the original, generative 
ent of our Constitution and republic. 

Thus, we do not have presently a basis for com- 
munity of princie with the United Kingdom, al- 
though we have the emerging basis for working 
toward such agreement in distinguishing features of 
the Callaghan government. We do have a basis for a 
community of princie with the Fifth Republic of 
France, but not with the government of Giscard 
d'Estaing. Excepting such ntably abhorrent ernal 
features of the Federal Republic of Germany as its 
prominent Interl-erlinked institutions and the 
carry forward of radical-nominalist traditions asso- 
ciated with Carl Schmitt in its judiciary and legal 
praice, that nation embodies a strong industrialist- 
labor thrust which rtends convergence un 
community of princie. At the moment of writing we 
have an emphatic community of princie with our 
own constitutional republic, but the Carter Executive 
Branch of government is an abhorrence. 

The notion of community of princie is not defined 
by formalities. We know that those modern nations 
which rule themselves according to an informed 



impulse for industrialized technological development 
cannot accomish that in fa unless social forces 
most closely associated with that domestic self- 
erest are, in effe, the ruling party. Without that 
ernal feature, a republic may be viable in form, but 
that viability is not durable in respe of content. On 
condition that the hegemony of such social forces is 
the efficient content of the law and the government, 
and that the institutions and instruments of the nation 
are a properly informed expression of that content, 
that nation and its government represent a sovereign, 
viable republic with which the United States has a 
basis for community of princie. This apies both 
with respe to immediate relations between our 
nations, and in respe to the common basis for av- 
ing joly at a body of constitutional ernational law 
acceptable to the generative ent embodied in the 
establishment of our own Constitution and republic. 

The industrial and labor social forces of the United 
Kingdom thus represent the aive content of the basis 
for developing a community of princie between our 
nations. Unfortunately, the past anti-humanistic 
domestic and foreign praices of that nation are not 
merely past offenses against natural law, but persist 
in institutions and instruments of the nation and its 
laws. It is the moral imbecility embedded in the ruling 
law of the United Kingdom, a defe which is not yet 
merely a **dead letter,*' which is the vicious defe. 

Our relationship with the United Kingdom is not 
based on an effort to balance those contrary consider- 
ations, as if they were fixed abstraions. Precisely 
because the evil content embedded within the cus- 
tomary law and institutions of the United Kingdom be- 
came the charaeristic of an alien force, the lowere 
Manhattan monetarist faion, the United Kingdom 
has itself experienced the impa of such evil tra- 
ditions adopted by what is for it an alien oppressor. As 
that nation struggles to defend its very existence 
against the alien oppressor, it is impelled to repudiate 
the same oppression in its own ernal order. It can- 
not do that unless it repudiates that same evil em- 
bedded within its own institutions. 

Respeing those princies which charaerize the 
two nations, there is the basis for community of 
princie between a *'new Federalist'* United States 
and the Soviet Union. The ta, the principal obstacle 
to such a relationship in fa is that efficient con- 
sciousness of that tentiality has not heretofore been 
established. It is not sufficient that the basis for 
community of princie exists ; the parties must super- 
sede their mutually heteronomic impulses to ef 
ficiently inform their willful impulses for praice to 

that desirable effe. 

Respeing the nations of the world in general, we 
must start not from abstraedformalities concerning 







the present, but according to the determining content 
of developing relations. Most emphatically, the 
charaer of governments throughout the world is 
shifted significantly, and quite abruptly, according to 
the shifts in charaer of the government of the United 
States. This means most prominently, the Presidency 
and its licy outlook for aual praice, and also, 
most significantly, the relationship between the Presi- 
dency and Congress on these matters. The apication 
of the foreign licy of the United States under a '*new 
Federalist'* government is determined thus by the 
qualitative changes in governments and government 
stures throughout the world which the mere exis- 
tence of such a **new Federalist** administration 
represents. 

It has been demonstrated beyond doubt, by the 
experience of this writer and his associates, that a 
United States government committed to the establish- 
ment of its own National Bank and an International 
Development Bank will gain virtually immediate 
agreement for praice with, at the very least, nearly 
every nation of the world. Excepting a few stubborn 
cases of remaining governments, which can be merely 
tolerated or are abhorrent, a significant prortion 
among the presently abhorrent regimes will flee or be 
ousted from their ensconcements in were at the mere 
perception that a **new Federalist** government has 
been installed. 

What governments currently proffer as their licy 
stures on a number of leading issues are in the main 
a refleion of the aversive influences created by 
David Rockefeller and his allies. Beginning with the 
Kennedy administration, and more notably as a result 
of the "Mutt-and-Jeff** manipulations associated most 
prominently with Messrs. Henry Kissinger, Cyrus 
Vance, and Zbigniew Brzezinski, a majority of the 
world's governments have been **attitudinally con- 
ditioned'* in principal features of their current foreign 
and domestic licies, frequently adopting licies 
and stures direly contrary to their own nation's 
most vital erests. 



 

Take away from the world the pressure of a mone- 
tarist United States foreign licy, and reace the 
perception of the might of the United States as em- 
bodied in its industrial and associated technological 
were, and an entirely new global litical geometry 
is brought o being. If the nations of the world also 
understand that the United States' people and 
government, in turn, understand the might our nation 
represents in the world, and that the United iStates is 
committed to deoying that might in behalf of its 
well-defined national and global self-erests  
immediately, a substantial number and variety of 
very desirable changes in governments and licies 
will sntaneously erupt around the globe. 

On the further condition that that government of 
the United States proceeds toward a community of 
princie with the Soviet republic, a subje to which 
we have devoted appropriately larger attention here, 
' the world's affairs are brought overall under control 
of the forceful rule of reason, and on the way to rule by 
consciously defined constitutional ernational law. 

Within that fortunate overall state of global affairs, 
the next two decades will be nonetheless charaer- 
ized by many localized troubles. The ugly vestiges of 
the past will be refleed repeatedly in difficulties con- 
fronting the condu of our foreign relations. The 
might of the United States, a might linked to an e- 
merging, strong community of princie with other na- 
tions, will moderate the heteronomic impulses of the 
eng. Hence, we do not anticipate the need for mili- 
tary undertakings, but that risk can be minimized only 
if it is clear that our licy has a fist within it, a fist we 
will use only if necessary, but which we will use if ne- 
cessary. If our economic fist is used elligently, our 
military were will remain probably only a visible 
tentiality. 

If we take these steps  before our Tory traitors 
have taken us past the  of no return toward 
general war and biological catastrophe  then we may 
be certain that by approximately - man's on- 
ly further conquests will be in science and outer space. 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 



The Federalist Presidency 



These coherent foreign and domestic licies can- 
not be efficiently served under those conditions of 
constitutional and funional degeneracy which ex- 
tended Tory rule has brought to the organization and 
funions of the Executive Branch of government. It 
would be a Utopian dream to assign to the Presidency 
certain duties if that branch of government is not a 
competent emoyee for the performances of the 
duties assigned to it. 

The Presidency is not a dutiful errand boy, merely 
to apy to the letter the law and licy given to it. This 
is understood negatively by the Congress, in terms of 
those notable cases in which a Presidency makes a 
travesty of a law according to the methods of the 
"Good Soldier Schweik**  just as eng federal 
courts have aed to transform the NEPA o the 
abominable horror that statute has become in prac- 
tice. It is understood sitively by Congress, or in a 
different negative sense, in the failure of the Exe- 
cutive to submit competently defined prosed legis- 
lation to the legislative branch. 

This same problem to which we refer in that way, is 
also cumulatively refleed in an excess of legislative 
law at this time. Instead of a body of legislative law 
developed to make efficient a coherent licy shared 
by the President and the majority of the Congress, a 
narrow facet of national life becomes a semi-autarki- 
cal licy domain unto itself. Even within the fiefdoms 
so narrowly defined, there is no aual princie of 
licy, but a tumult of confliing and short-term im- 
pulses, with methods and praices defined which are 



more or less inappropriate to an acceptable ex- 
pression of the stated legislative purse. 

This chaos and incompetence has become insti- 
tutionalized in the heteronomy within the Executive 

Branch itself. The "sitive feedback'* heurism is 
most appropriate. 

The heteronomy imparted to the Executive Branch 
in turn imparts itself to the overall body of legislation 
prosed to the Congress by the Executive as a whole. 
The Congress, in turn, struggling to make its ent 
efficient with respe to the Executive's funioning, is 
impelled to patch o the existing Executive new 
features of resnsibilities, which, in turn, foster new 
bureaucratic fiefdoms or sub-fiefdoms, whose het- 
eronomic independence from control by the Presi- 
dency has been given to it by legislative specification, 
executive order pursuant to or in attempted defleion 
of legislative ent, or in associated fashions. This 
aggravation of the bureaucratic heteronomy becomes 
the new reality affeing executive funioning and 
legislative prosals. This becomes, in turn, the more 
awful mess with which the Congress is confronted. 

It is clear that the "Gordian Knot" cannot be 
patiently untied. How is it to be cut? 

Some new, sweeping Executive reorganization? On 
the basis of past performance, we know that such 
methods may temrarily check the growth of the 
bureaucracy, expunge a few dead cats from the filing 
draweres  and generally turn up all sorts of curious 
little things to astonish and titillate pular opinion. 
When it is done, the same old crap resumes afresh  

 







and not accidentally. Rather than attacking the 
causal, generative feature of the problem, the symp- 
toms are attacked. Worse, too often, essential built-in 
checks against the real disease are debrided in the 
purrted erest of "efficiency." 

The charaeristic problem of recent decades' ef- 
forts at government reorganization is that they have 
been condued under Tory influences. The subversion 
of the ent of the Constitution and republic according 
to revisionist and allied nominalist dorines has been 
the licy-context in which the prosed reorgani- 
zation was shaped. Hence, the nominalist methods of 
William of Ockham charaerized the reorganization. 
Essential princies were shaved away by "Ockham *s 
Razor" in the ent to make government conform 
more efficiently to the revisionist Tory's nominalist 
princies. 

This is the notable reason that the effort of pro- 
Constitutionalist forces in the Executive and Congress 
have predominantly failed to date. By rearguard  
Fabian?  taics, the conservative-led resistors of 
Toryism have adapted themselves to their enemy's 
"Fabian game. They have seleed specific sympto- 
matic aspes of the problem as target issues, rather 
than seleing a focused  of counterattack which 
direed their efforts to the vital . Consequently, 
conservatives' Fabian guella taics have aimed at 
building in impediments to Tory encroachments 
within the bureaucracy and law: abetting thus the 
very heteronomy un which both bureaucracy and 
nominalist Tory licies feed. 

It is no use pretending that all of us close to govern- 
ment do not know this to be the fa. This writer knows 
it, and knows that every experienced Congressman 
and many others know better than he precisely how 
this process develops: save at least this viable little 
bastion of constitutionalism in the bureaucracy and 
the statutes  and so forth. 

Nelson Rockefeller and his family's associates con- 
sidered (with IBM's Watson and others) the ssi- 
bility of establishing the Central Intelligence Agency 
as a private corration  as was done in transform- 
ing the U.S. Strategic Bombing Survey o the Rand 
Corration. It was better to have the CIA under 
government control  of course  as the case of the 
hideous ernational Interl network warns us. How- 
ever, the CIA was attached to the government in the 
worst ssible fashion, outside the Constitution's 
prescriptions and ent concerning augmentations of 
the Executive. The bogeyman, the fear that this 
agency would be too imately attached to the Presi- 
dential weres, was used to foster the worst arrange- 
ment. 

Nelson Rockefeller promoted the establishment of 
the National Security Council  about as unlawful an 



 

entity as might have been tolerated at that time. What 
right does such a body have to exist without 
congressional advice-and-consent checks of the same 
sort apicable to Cabinet and related high ap- 
ments? 

The National Security Agency is another consti- 
tutional crisis-. 

Nelson Rockefeller created the Department of 
Health, Education and Welfare, which has evolved 
according to the Tory faion's guiding impulses ever 
since, to become one of the most unwholesome entities 
of government. With this, the stwar wave of bureau- 
cratic cancer was launched in full sweep, making 
Franklin D. Roosevelt's administration appear 
relatively almost one of Doric simicity. 

The Department of Housing and Urban Develop- 
ment was added later, according to the same bastard 

logic as that for HEW, and so on to Transrtation. 
The General Accounting Office (GAO) evolved o 

a kind of fourth branch of government, moving away 

from any competent limits of defined original ent, 

and out of the domain of constitutional legitimacy. 

It was, retrospeively, a mistake to ace the 
Federal Bureau of Investigation under the Depart- 
ment of Justice in the first ace. Like any competent 
distri attorney's office, Justice requires its own 
investigatory instruments. However, the FBI evolved 
in fa o a national lice force by imications, not 
an investigative agency with auxiliary law-enforce- 
ment weres, but the foot-in-the-door for a national 
lice force. The same separation of law enforcement 
and prosecuting attorney we prescribe properly for 
municipalities and state governments was mandatory 
if the FBI and Justice were not to develop a mutually 
corrupting relationship. 

This was aggravated by linking the FBI to the 
Rockefeller-created private organization, Interl, an 
organization under fascist direion during its Vienna 
period, under outright Nazi direion well o the war, 
and under direion of "laundered" Nazis at the end of 
the war and thereafter. Admittedly, the links between 
the Nazi Interl and FBI became so painful to the 
public conscience that the Interl conneion was dis- 
creetly transferred from Justice to Treasury, where 
the Treasury-Interl erface within the Treasury 
Department proceeded to corrupt the drug- and arms- 
traffic funions of that department. 

The Omnibus Crime Bill, developed by Rockefeller- 
associated agencies, the Russell Sage Foundation, 
Ford Foundation and others, was credulously passed 
by the Congress and Executive. This ^created a new 
agency within the Justice Department, the Law En- 
forcement Assistance Administration, it created new 
agencies within state and local governments, and 
launched funions  as in the area of drug-main- 







 

tenance programs  which inevitably subverted 
regular law enforcement almost nationwide, and 
fostered conditions within which monstrous horrors 
grew. It is not irrelevant that certain categories of 
crime have zoomed since  and significantly in con- 
sequence of  the passage and imementation of the 
Omnibus (i.e., More) Crime A. The S-, and its 
thinly disguised variants, originates with the same 
authorships and is inherently designed to aggravate 
the matter in the direion of a **Clockwork Orange'* 
sort of **utopia.*' 

This cancer within our midst, the LEAA and related 
developments, has promoted an erface among 
Interl, major private deteive agencies and ser- 
vices, the LEAA network, the neo-Fabian networks, 
the Glynn County, Georgia freak show, and certain 
irregular offshoots of government foreign military 
and elligence operations, which, currently, under 
the coordination of de fao President Zbigniew 
Brzezinski, exoit the fa of an unstable and easily 
confused President Carter to deoy wholesale covert- 
operations assassinations and similar hideous deeds 
even against officials and other prominent citizens of 
governments to which the United States is allied. 
Private forces, exoiting their unconstitutional ac- 
cess to various unconstitutional or quasi-consti- 
tutional elements of government itself, are in fa in a 
state of armed insurreion against the Constitution, 
government and people of the United States. 

This mess, and all its major imications, must be 
cleared away. 

There is only one princied approach consistent 
with our Constitution and its ent to resolve this. 
Within that delimitation by princie, there are debat- 
able specific remedies which might be deemed accept- 
able alternatives. 

Our Constitution itself was authored and adopted as 
an imperfe instrument. Although our litical fore- 
bears were unified in the broad conceptions of ent 
respeing the rule of natural law, they were divided 
among themselves respeing the specific, detailed 
means through which to pursue that agreed ent o 
all significant areas of praice. Therefore, the Consti- 
tution was authored and adopted to define the range 
within which detailed elaborations would be subse- 
quently evolved. 

We, today, face an analogous problem. Therefore, 
let us now distinguish between essential matters of 
princie and the specific recommendations which 
this writer offers as what appears to him at this junc- 
ture as the most appropriate approach to ime- 
menting those princies. 

As a matter of princie, we start from agreement 
that the institutions of President, Congress, Supreme 
Court, and the eleoral processes of a republic as 



established by our litical forebears are the appro- 
priate institutions and instruments which define our 
task with respe to law. 

If someone were to prose an alternative, however 
sound in conception that prosal might be, we would 
reje it. The proven constitutional institutions and 
instruments, emoyed according to the generative 
princies of their original ent, are amy adequate 
to the tasks before our nation. Therefore we reje 
alternatives categorically as unnecessary inno- 
vations, a dangerous defleion of our energies from 
the urgent and essential tasks to be performed. 

Our second, less weighty but wereful limitation is 
the fa that our government has incurred funions 
and duties which cannot be swept away in the manner 
of contematively designing the institutions and 
instruments of our republic de novo. We must effe 
the maximum benefit with the least effort, the least 
tential disruption. 

Respeing the Congress itself, although the 
Congress has created within itself institutions and 
praices which are unsuited to our nation's presently 
proper licies, the Congress has the autonomous 
were to dissolve and constitute its committees and 
associated sub-funions with a greater freedom than 
the other two main branches of government. The 
problems associated with the ernal struure of the 
Congress are therefore in no sense of the quality or 
magnitude confronted in either the federal courts or 
the Executive. In general, on condition that the 
Executive's dysfunional features are correed, the 
Congress will more or less automatically adjust its 
committee and related sub-funions to the 
requirements of its erface with the Executive 
Branch. 

The charaeristic problem of the federal courts is 
the cumulative effe of Tory influences. The key to 
this problem is of course the comsition of the 
Supreme Court and, to a lesser extent, the lowere 
federal courts. Except in those instances where a 
Supreme Court justice or federal court judge is guilty 
of clearly impeachable condu or condu verging 
un that, the other two main branches of government 
must be concerned to avoid the errors of zeal in 
remedying the overall problem. 

While we work, according to the prescriptions of the 
Constitution and subsumed laws, to effe a com- 
sition of our federal courts agreeable to the ent 
of the Constitution, we have several principal 
remedies available to the other two branches of 
government. We can pass laws which nullify oler- 
able rulings derived from the courts* reading of the 
ent of statutes. We can pass Constitutional Amend- 
ments. Such use of the **Amendment route" is a dire 
means not only for amending the Constitution but for 



P^OF-T(o)(Q)llOT. OEM© E^iD©i 




The first Cabinet: President Washington with the Secretaries of State \Jefferson\, Treasury [Hamilton], War 
[Knox]y and, in background. Attorney General [Randolph], an engraving from a paing by nineteenth 
century artist Alonzo ChappeL 







 

affirming its ent in exicit terms. Also, we can 
create a litical climate in the nation, in which con- 
text we will be better able to exert the force of reason 
un eng justices and to give suprt to those 
justices which are already persuaded of or inclined 
toward the aual ent of the Constitution. 

With these means, and with the chain-reaion con- 
sequences of a few crucial laws and court decisions 
un the apication of the outstanding body of law 
and precedent, the federal court system and other 

areas of legal praice can be shifted back onto the 
track of constitutional law. 

It is the Executive which remains the monstrous 
problem. 

Aii proper reforms center around tlie princie that 
the President of the United States embodies in his per- 
sonal office all the resnsibilities, authorities and 
duties of the Executive Branch. The President cannot 
be resnsible in fa unless all subordinate funions 
of the Executive Branch are efficiently accountable to 
the President. No ''fourth branch of government/' 
whether so in law or in fa, can be tolerated. 

The proper instrument through which the President 
fulfills the resnsibilities of his office, excepting his 
personal staff, is the Cabinet, comsed of heads of 
regular Departments. These Departments are estab- 
lished by law, and the heads of these Departments are 
aped with the advice and consent of the Congress. 
No other chain of command within the Executive 
Branch maybe tolerated. 

Every other funion and sub-funion of the Exe- 
cutive Branch is assigned to a regular Department, 
and is uniquely accountable, according to the lawful 
execution of its funion, to the Cabinet Department 
head and the President. No other funions of the Exe- 
cutive Branch will be tolerated. 

Although crucial apments to executive 
sitions are either presently filled as permanent 
sitions with the exicit advice and consent of the 
Congress, or otherwise should be filled with aid of effi- 
cient informal consultation with the Congress, the 
President has independent authority to summarily 
discharge any member of the Executive Branch 
within the limits of the procedures defined by la w for 
this purse. Without this authority, the resn- 
sibilities of the President are not matched by subordi- 
nate's accountability. 

Similarly, the President delegates the were of dis- 
charge through his Cabinet members respeing their 
Departments. 

This prescribes relatively great centralized 
authority and resnsibility to the President and his 
Cabinet members. The Tories and their liberal and 
radical camp followeres have made a great, self- 
righteous howling concerning this fa in itself. This 



pressure of Tory opinion  this thrust toward over- 
throwing our Constitution and the institutions of our 
republic  has been the background pressure 
fostering various efforts toward decentralizing the 
executive authority. It is that subversion of the Consti- 
tution's ent and prescriptions which is key to the 

degeneration of the Executive Branch which we must 
remedy. 

The founders of this nation were by no means blind 
to the tential problems incurred by the effort to 
imement the Constitution and dire institutions of 
our republic. Three principal constras un the 
Executive were provided as sufficient to this purse : 
() the imperative of suitable quality of the President 
and legislators; () the duty of the Congress to exert 
its were of advice and consent, and to make laws 
defining the licies and methods of government; and 
() the constitutional-law duties of the Supreme 
Court. The last is clear without further discussion 

H 

here; it is sufficient to consider the relevant imi- 
cations of the first two of the three s. 

There is no remedy but impeachment or resignation 
for a person unsuited to continue to occupy the office 
of President. A **bum in the White House" is in itself 
a violation of the ent of constitutional law. 

The republican form of government was adopted 
inclusively to put efficient impediments in the way of 
the efforts to ace a '*bum" in either of the three 
principal branches of federal government, with 
special emphasis un the need for the highest per- 
sonal qualifications of the President himself. The 
Eleoral College was originally a most imrtant 
such constitutional hurdle. 

The original funion of the Eleoral College's Ele- 
ors was to erse an ermediate step of about 
four months' duration between a general eleion and 
the installation of a new President. The funion of the 
Eleoral College was to serve as a refleive process 
through which duly eleed representatives of the 
general eleorate enabled that general eleorate to 
*'change its mind*' from the heat-of-the-moment re- 
sults of a preference eleion, to make that seleion 
which corresnded in deliberated fa to the com- 
bined ent and constitutionally defined erests of 
the eleorate as a whole. Hence, the constitutional 
were of lawful seleion by the eleorate was em- 
bodied in the Eleoral College, and it was the qualifi- 
cations of those Eleors to deliberate such a seleion 
which was focused as the principal proper concern of 
the individual member of the eleorate in casting his 
preference ballot. 

This arrangement also provided a safeguard against 
the use of massive eleion fraud in parts of the nation 
to attempt the eleion of an undesirable candidate to 
the Presidency. 







Reviewing the consequences of the recent Novem- 

I 

ber through January proceedings overall, including 
the massive vote-fraud (probably between  to  
millions fraudulent Carter votes) and associated out- 
rages, and contemating the manifest result, we are 
now more firmly convinced of the wisdom of our liti- 

' r 

cal forebears in this matter. 

Especially following the  general eleion, the 
Eleoral College hurdle tended to become a very low 
hurdle indeed, and was gradually transformed by 
custom and erosion almost o a mere accounting 
procedure for transforming a pular vote o its 
constitutional eleoral projeion, so that the Ele- 
ors were unconstitutionally degraded in fa to mere 
bearers of a predetermined mandate. Under the 
Roosevelt administration, the constitutional ten- 
tialities of the Eleoral College were substantially 
nullified by accelerating the inaugural date. The 
Kennedy administration gutted the constitutional 
provision still further. In princie, the Eleoral 
College vote for James E. Carter was condued in 
total violation of the ent of the Constitution  and 
we now see in part, at least, what we paid for that vio- 
lation. 

Admittedly, the Eleoral College is not an axio- 
matic feature of a viable form of democratic republic 
in general. It was a choice made by our litical fore- 
bears. However, although this feature of the Consti- 
tution was in particular a praical choice, the ent 
governing that choice represents in no sense an op- 
tional feature of constitutional law. One cannot alter 

the Eleoral College procedure without reacing it 
with means equally efficient to the same purse. To 
do otherwise is not to amend the Constitution, but to 
overthrow it in respe of its most vital, generative 
princie  the princie of the democratic republic. 

The Quality of the person eleed to the Presidency 
is one of the princied cornerstones of a democratic 
republic. The eleorate does not have the inherent 
right to commit national suicide. It does not have the 
right to ace a donkey, a baboon or a James E. Carter 
in the White House. Happily, at this junure, the 
majority of the eleorate has probably refreshed its 
faith in that constitutional princie. 

This nation does not belong to the eleorate of any 
moment. The nation belongs in part to them, but also 
to their forebears and to their sterity. The elec- 
torate is bound by that condition of trusteeship, a trus- 
teeship which obliges it to secure the benefits of 
progress to its sterity, arid to effe that contin- 
uation through the instruments of a democratic repub- 
lic. That is the law, that is the condition of trusteeship 
which binds and delimits the weres of choice of the 
general eleorate. 

A dog does not know tomorrow. A baboon does not 



 

know tomorrow. That is the form of difference be- 
tween lowere beasts and human beings. If a person says, 
**I know only *now,' I know only what I perceive to be 
my immediate needs and preferences,** that person is 
litically a moral imbecile, litically only a little 
more qualified to vote than a dog, a horse, or a baboon. 
Since a certain rtion of the eleorate is, from time 
to time, caught up in the dog-like, heteronomic state in 
which its weres of reason do not reach beyond a very 
small *now' and a very narrow 'here,* our litical 
forebears aced bounds of trusteeship un the 
weres of the general eleorate, binding it to the con- 
sequences of its aions of today in the world of 
tomorrow. 

We are not a Tory '^democracy ; ** we are not a troop 
of baboons. It is the competence of the President to 
ernalize unto himself, in his person, both the whole 
erest of the nation, and the competent judgment of 
the consequences for the whole sterity, which is the 
absolute, indispensable mental and moral qualifi- 
cation for the holder of that office. It is also required 
that a person of such qualities of knowledge and per- 
ception also be efficient in corresnding executive 
aion. The President must, more than any other 
single eleed official, embody in himself the best-in- 
formed willful impulses respeing the general er- 
est of the nation as a whole both for today and tomor- 
row. 

We might, therefore, lawfully amend the Consti- 
tution, to reace the Eleoral College with some oth- 
er instrumentality to the same purse. We may not 
amend that purse itself out of the Constitution with- 
out declaring that we have repudiated the princi- 
pie of a democratic republic and have chosen to re- 
pudiate our trusteeship to sterity, in favor of the 
heteronomic frivolities of a baboon-like **utopia.'* We 
must not abandon the constitutional hurdles to the 
Presidency without providing something equally effi- 
cient to that same ent 

If one is nonetheless still frightened by the fa that 
the Presidency of the United States represents great 
were, there are only two principal remedies: the 
quality of the President, and the were of the Congress 
(principally) to define the laws which circumscribe 
the weres of the Executive Branch as a whole. 

However, the Congress may not decentralize the 
Executive Branch without thereby invalidating the 
letter and ent of the Constitution. 

The relationship of the Congress to the Presidency is 
primarily a relationship of the Congress to the Office 
of the President itself. '*The President shall..." and 
**The President shall not...** are the only princied 
form in which the Congress may properly exert its 
constitutional weres concerning the Executive 
Branch as a whole. 



 

Among the things a President may not do is to dele- 
gate his resnsibilities to a quasi-lawful body such as 
the National Security Council. He is accountable to 
Congress and law to be efficiently resnsible for the 
Executive Branch. He may not pass out pieces of 
Executive were like confetti every time a Rocke- 
feller comes sniffing about the White House. He may 
not evolve the Executive Branch o a bureaucratic 
nightmare, to the effe of thus preventing himself or 
his successor from competently fulfilling his Constitu- 
tional and other lawful resnsibilities. He may not 
infest subordinate executive sitions or other sts of 
high trust with scoundrels. It is the resnsibility of 
the Congress (principally) to emoy its weres of 
advice and consent and lawmaking authority to cir- 
cumscribe the licies of the President and the 
elaboration of the Executive Branch according to the 
standards of constitutional law appropriate to a quali- 
fied President 

If the President is not qualified, he must be im- 
peached. One does not struure the Executive in un- 
constitutional ways to the purse of constraining an 
incompetent President  one impeaches the incom- 
petent President. 

The following are the prosed measures of 

Executive Branch reorganization. 

Create three new Cabinet sts and Departments: 

*A Secretary for Political Intelligence; 

*A Secretary for the National Bank; 

*A Secretary for Domestic Security; 

and: 

*Eliminate DHEW, HUD, Transrtation. 

*Dissolve the National Security Council. 
Establish the Cabinet as the sole executive body 

within the Executive for all questions of licy, includ- 
ing national security. Establish a sition of Under- 
Secretary for each Department, who is the permanent 
sitting representative of the Department in the Cab- 
inet as a continuously funioning body. 

All funions of the Executive Branch are assigned 
to their most appropriate Department, with a dire 
chain-of-command within the Department deter- 
mining accountability of each seion and funion to 
the Secretary, the Cabinet and the Office of the Presi- 
dent. 

The Cabinet  us the Vice-President  funions, 
together with the President, as the dire erface 
between the Executive and the Congress. All legis- 
lative and related prosals developed within the Exec- 
utive pass through mis channel-erface, except for 
funions of congressional inquiry o the condu of 
government operations, and o matters pertinent to 
other normal and special aivities of inquiry initiated 
properly by the Congress. 

On condition that the Vice-President is seleed 



I© E^iD©i 



according to his proper qualifications as a tential 
President, the Vice-President and his personal office 
is the most dire special erface between the Cabin- 
et and the Senate, and should be resnsible for coord- 
inating especially respeing matters pertaining to 
the Senate's special weres and duties of advice and 
consent. 

The following subsumed features of that reorgani- 
zation concerning detail and licy-direions are 
recommended as those presently seen as most appro- 
priate. First, the details, and then the licy- 
direions. 

Secretary of Political Intelligence: Perhaps there is 
a better choice of name, but the suggested name given 
here emphasizes the relevant s : 

Through the history of the writer's experience in the 
development of his own organization's litical-elli- 
gence funions, beginning Autumn, , he argues 
this matter with unusual competence, both concerning 
the praice of litical elligence and the indis- 
pensable role it properly performs within government 
as a whole. 

Most notably, beginning mid- January , when the 
writer and his associates first solved the basic riddle 
of the **Watergate" proceedings against President 
Richard Nixon, there has been an ongoing, growing 
erface between the writer's organization and lead- 
ing litical and related forces in the United States 
and other parts of the world. This culminated in the 
September-December discussions between the U.S. 
Labor Party and Republican, Democratic, trade- 
union, industrialist leading circles concerning our 
forecast of the imications of a Carter inauguration. 
The same mistaken doubts and reservations ex- 
pressed toward the Labor Party analysis by a 
majority of these domestic U.S. leading circles were 
experienced among developing seor and Western 
European circles. It is now clear that the Labor Party 
was corre and the doubts mistaken. That latter 
experience is consistent with the pattern during the 
- period as a whole. 

Although the reality of the matter has not yet be- 
come the perception of the man-in-the-street, every 
significant faional current in world and various na- 
tional litical frameworks today is hitched to liti- 
cal-elligence circles to the extent that each has a 
definable elligence-network **pedigree." There are 
several principal pedigrees  including two princi- 
pal Soviet-linked varieties  governing litics be- 
hind the scenes in every part of the world today. At 
this moment, you cannot walk o a Masonic circle in 
Western Europe, for exame, without being in the 
midst of a hot brawl between ''American" (pro-terror- 
ism taics) and ''British" (anti-terrorist) faions... a 
curious fa which, incidentally, requires some insight 







I- 



o the history of the Scottish Rite. The piure of glo- 
bal and national litical life peddled to the credulous 
in the **civics lesson'* and the principal news media 
has no corresndence with the governing reality 
which anually operates. () 

Granted, many influential liticians included in va- 
rious faions, either simy profess slyly not to know 
this, or even genuinely do not know that they are in 
fa a part of an elligence network. That is of no 
great relevance in itself; the briefings they receive 
from leaders of their faion, the flow of background 
information across luncheon tables, and so forth, is 
generated as "perceptions" in one or another circle 
operating just behind the scenes in an exicitly liti- 
cal-elligence mode, and erfacing with one or 
more exicitly litical-elligence and other lice 
and elligence governmental and private agencies. 

Consequently, the resnses to Labor Party brief- 
ings have been determined, predominantly not merely 
by the way in which corrupt major national press and 
lling organizations shape the elleual environ- 
ment. Each circle has its ^'sources,*' which are, 
mainly, either dire or indire ^'pipelines'* to a liti- 
cal-elligence network. (These, amusingly, have 
been often the same influential individuals who com- 
ain against ''conspiracy theories!") Consequently, 
in large part, the conflis between our estimations 
and those of others have been conflis in methods of 
litical-elligence evaluations  in which the wri- 
ter and his associates have, on balance, been predomi- 
nantly corre, despite the relatively more massive 
resources available to the other litical-elligence 
networks participating in these eerie shadowboxings. 

Two broad conclusions of dire relevance to gov- 
ernment reorganization arise from this background 
knowledge. First, the competent funioning of gov- 
ernment  especially of the Executive and Con- 
gress  requires the highest quality of regular liti- 
cal elligence. Second, the notable advantage of 
the writer's litical elligence over competing 

* 'brands" was essentially a matter of method. That 
method has been essentially represented in this licy 
study. The correlative judgment is that such methods 
should be incorrated in governmental litical-in- 
telligence funions. 

In consequence of this, the writer proses that the 
time has been reached and passed at which the proper 
litical-elligence funions of the Executive ought 
to "come out o the open," and be aced direly at 
the dissal of the Executive and Congress as a whole. 



. Not to single out the Federal Republic of Germany in what is a 
widespread fa, it is notable that some wag, refeng to the ''sok 
conneions" involved, prosed that the Bundestag ought to be 
renamed the BundesnachV. 



The redireed Central Intelligence Agency should ob- 
viously be the only branch of the Executive engaged in 
this funion, and freed, meanwhile, from "special 
operations'* and related defleions from its resnsi- 
bilities. 

This funion must be controlled at the Cabinet 
level, with Cabinet-level accountability. It must be an 
information agency in form, with an included and 
growing resnsibility for basic scientific research 
and research and development. It must also be em- 
oyed, under Cabinet-level control as a special capa- 
bility for auditing the performance of the ernal func- 
tions of the Executive as a whole. 

The military and related elligence funions 
should be consolidated in the Defense Intelligence 
Agency, the domestic security funions of enforce- 
ment prescribed by law should be consolidated under 
the Secretary for Domestic Security (if that is the pro- 
per choice of title), and "everything else closed 
down," except for the restried investigative func- 
tions of the Attorney General, Treasury, and National 
Bank, immediately pursuant to their specific duties 
and resnsibilities. 

Things which should be respeively at some degree 
of arm's length must be aced at arm's length, and 
brought together only according to courses of aion 
prescribed by law or through the funions of the Of- 
fice of the President and Cabinet. This government's 
Executive Branch must be brought under control and 
made efficiently accountable to the President and 
Congress. 

The Secretary of the National Bank's funions are 
obvious, as it is obvious that this aspe of licy must 
be resnsible and accountable at the Cabinet level. It 
is also clear that the National Bank and Treasury 
must be kept at arm's length, so that the specific ac- 
countabilities of each are respeively balanced. 

The Secretary for Domestic Security should take 
over and reorganize the Federal Bureau of Investiga- 
tion, the Secret Service, and other enforcement and 
security agencies of the Executive Branch. Within the 
limits aced un such constituent agencies by law, 
the Department must funion as a law-enforcement 
agency, within the limits appropriate to a law-enforce- 
ment agency. It must be accountable at the Cabinet le- 
vel, and must operate in an environment in which it is 
balanced by the Justice Department and the audit 
funions of the Secretary for Political Intelligence. 

Otherwise, stri, coherent definitions of Cabinet 
areas of resnsibility should rule, by agreement be- 
tween the President and Congress and appropriate stip- 
ulations of law to this effe. State is foreign licy; 
Agriculture is biosphere; Interior is custody of real as- 
sets of the federal government; Commerce is every 
aspe of science, industry, transrtation, construe- 

tion and commerce, excepting those funions as- 
signed to Agriculture and the National Bank; Labor is 
the labor force in all respes bearing un the well- 
being and development of the pulation which produ- 
ces the labor force. Defense is defense. The areas of 
confli among the Departments are areas in which 
we desire confli to be expressed for purses of li- 
cy deliberation. 

In addition to these rearrangements within the Ex- 
ecutive, the Executive must resnd to the realities of 
the modern world by establishing an official govern- 
ment press agency, funioning under the direion of 
the Secretary for Political Intelligence, Government 
has been too long manipulated by the abuse of the de 
fao were of a core of national media to create an en- 
vironment of disinformation and distortion around the 
processes of government. If we are to have a free 
press in fa, the government must provide the radio 
station and newspaper in the proverbial **East Po- 
dunk" with an alternative source of information, 
against which to compare the packaged output of the 
national TV, wire-service and major newsweekly and 
metrolitan news sources. What the editor in **East 
Podunk" does with government information is a mat- 
ter of his choice, but he and his community have the 
right to be given that choice. 

The obscene situation, in which officials and eleed 
representatives of government  in the Executive 
and Congress  are pressed o propitiating the 
Washington Post, the New York Times, and so forth, 
for fear of what disinformation may otherwise "get 
back home," must end. Insofar as a government news 
service accounts the issues mooted within the Con- 
gress, Congress should prescribe what it deems ac- 
ceptable standards  since in this aspe of the mat- 
ter, the Executive must properly refle the ent of 
the government as a whole. With that sort of restric- 
tion, the government has the right and obligation to 



defend itself by its own independent means against 
disinformation. 
